THELETOS CREATURE 7
LN MEDIUM AEON MONITOR
Perception +18; darkvision
Languages envisioning
Skills Arcana +16, Intimidation +16, Religion +18, Stealth +15
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +3, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +3
Envisioning When a theletos conveys information, it does so wordlessly through psychic
projections. This acts as telepathy with a range of 100 feet but is understandable to all
creatures regardless of whether they have a language. The meaning to non-aeons can be
vague and is often mysterious. A theletos can use this ability to communicate flawlessly
with any other aeon on the same plane.
AC 25; Fort +16, Ref +13, Will +18; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 125; Weaknesses chaotic 5
Speed 25 feet, fly 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +17 (lawful, magical),
Damage 2d10+4 bludgeoning plus 1d6
lawful
Melee [one-action] tentacle +17 (agile,
lawful, magical), Damage
2d8+4 slashing plus 1d6 lawful
and fate drain
Divine Innate Spells DC 25, attack
+17; 4th augury (at will), charm,
dispel magic, enthrall, outcast’s curse,
remove curse, suggestion, touch of idiocy
Rituals DC 25; geas
Fate Drain (curse, divine, mental) A creature
damaged by the theletos’s tentacle must
succeed at a DC 22 Will save or become
stupefied 1. As long as the creature is stupefied, it can
no longer benefit from fortune effects. If the target fails additional
saves against this ability, the condition value increases by 1 (to a
maximum of stupefied 4). This condition value decreases by 1
every 24 hours.
Wrath of Fate [two-actions] (curse, divine, mental, misfortune) The
theletos releases a 60-foot cone of energy from its center.
Creatures in the cone become overwhelmed with
the knowledge of various fates that destiny has in
store for them and lack of clear pathways to
these potential futures. They must succeed at
MAINTAINING THE BALANCE
Theletoses care little for the individuals
and societies they manipulate, only
that balance between freedom and
fate is maintained. A theletos might
help a creature who has lost their
freedom escape, but it may also force
those who swore to perform an unjust
duty to stick to their word. If its plans
are thwarted, a theletos doesn’t seek
revenge, but instead looks for other
ways to redress the balance.
A-C
9
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
a DC 26 Will save or be slowed 1 indefinitely. An affected creature can choose to roll
twice when it attempts an attack, saving throw, or skill check and take the lower result.
Regardless of the outcome, that creature is no longer slowed after that roll. The theletos
can’t use Wrath of Fate again for 1d4 rounds.
ZELEKHUT
A zelekhut is a bounty hunter and executioner. The zelekhut resembles a mechanical
centaur crafted from silvery metal with golden clockwork wings adorning its back.
Instead of hands, the zelekhut’s arms end in long, barbed chains that crackle with
electricity. Whether sent by the powers of Axis or summoned by mortal authorities,
the zelekhut seeks out those who continually evade justice—either through active
flight, or by abusing their power and station—so as to bring justice to the multiverse’s
most notorious fugitives and criminals. Indeed, many a zelekhut’s quarry are as
famous for their ability to evade capture as for the crimes they commit.
Though the zelekhut is implacable and unrelenting in
enforcing sentences, it does not pass judgments of its own
or take the initiative in pursuing targets of opportunity. While
hunting a condemned serial killer or notorious thief across half a
dozen planes, the zelekhut wouldn’t shift a single hoof to capture a
corrupt ruler whose offenses are far greater. All zelekhuts understand
that laws can and must differ from place to place, and it is not the
zelekhut’s job to moralize, merely to obey its rightful assignments
and track down those who seek to flee their punishment.
ZELEKHUT CREATURE 9
LN LARGE AEON INEVITABLE MONITOR
Perception +21; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Celestial, Infernal, Utopian; truespeech
Skills Acrobatics +18, Athletics +21, Axis Lore +15, Diplomacy +16, Survival +21
(+23 when tracking)
Str +6, Dex +5, Con +4, Int +0,
Wis +3, Cha +3
Truespeech A zelekhut can
speak with and understand
any creature with a language.
AC 28; Fort +17, Ref +20, Will +18;
+1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 160; Immunities death
effects, disease, emotion, poison,
unconscious; Weaknesses chaotic 10
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 40 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] chain +21 (lawful, magical, reach
10 feet), Damage 2d10+6 slashing plus 2d6
electricity and 1d6 lawful plus Knockdown
Divine Innate Spells DC 28; 5th locate; 4th clairaudience,
clairvoyance, dimensional anchor, dispel magic, paralyze (×3);
Constant (6th) true seeing
Rituals DC 32; geas
Double Attack [two-actions] The
zelekhut makes two
chain Strikes, each
targeting a different
creature. Each Strike counts toward the zelekhut’s multiple
attack penalty, but the penalty doesn’t increase until after it has
made both attacks. If the zelekhut subsequently uses the Knockdown action, it affects
all creatures it hit with Double Attack.
PARADOX AND UNITY
To mortals, aeons sometimes
seem to combine elements that
are fundamentally incompatible,
whether it’s an aeon combining
opposing concepts, or axiomites and
inevitables mixing the organic with
the mathematical or mechanical.
Aeons see no paradox in this, but
rather claim it is an expression of the
underlying unity of all things.
Bestiary 2
10
MARUT
A marut is tasked with hunting mortals who cheat death by artificially extending
their lifespans. This includes those who seek undeath, such as liches and
vampires, but also includes those who use powerful magic to cling to their youth,
use divination to discover and avoid an appointed death, or call too often on
the power of resurrection. Once the marut has selected its target, the inevitable
pursues its quarry without surcease or deviation until either it or the target
is dead.
Maruts seem to be carved from stone and clad in golden armor, yet they move
with the deliberate grace of a creature made of flesh and bone. A marut never
rushes, but its thunderous footfalls are relentless as it pursues its target. Though
able to speak any language, the marut is taciturn even among inevitables.
MARUT CREATURE 15
LN LARGE AEON INEVITABLE MONITOR
Perception +26; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Celestial, Infernal, Utopian; truespeech
Skills Athletics +31, Axis Lore +22, Diplomacy +27, Intimidation +29, Religion +26,
Survival +28
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +1, Wis +5, Cha +6
Truespeech As zelekhut.
AC 37; Fort +27, Ref +25, Will +26; +2 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 230, regeneration 15 (deactivated by chaotic); Immunities death effects, disease,
emotion, poison, unconscious; Weaknesses chaotic 15
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet; air walk
Melee [one-action] fist +30 (lawful, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+11 bludgeoning plus
1d6 lawful and fists of thunder and lightning
Divine Innate Spells DC 37; 8thchain lightning, dispel magic, earthquake,
harm; 7th fear, plane shift, wall of force; 5th command, locate; 4th
dimension door (at will); Constant (8th) air walk, true seeing
Rituals DC 36; geas
Final End The marut is anathema to beings that unnaturally
extend their existence, including undead. Its fists bypass such
creatures’ resistances to damage and apply the creatures’ highest weakness to
damage. If a marut kills a creature that rejuvenates, like a lich or ghost, it always
knows that the creature isn’t fully defeated.
Fists of Thunder and Lightning (divine, evocation, incapacitation) Each time the
marut makes a fist Strike, it chooses either lightning or thunder. If it chooses
lightning, the attack deals an additional 2d12 electricity damage and the
target must succeed at a DC 33 Fortitude save or be blinded for 1 minute. If it
chooses thunder, the attack deals an additional 3d8 sonic damage and the target
must succeed at a DC 36 Fortitude save or be deafened for 1 minute.
BYTHOS
The bythos is a guardian of space and time, and at all times seeks out
those who misuse planar and temporal magic. A bythos is a roughly
humanoid creature with four arms and a body made of swirling clouds
and mist. Despite its appearance, its body feels like dry stone. A bythos
seeks out paradoxes caused by irresponsible planar or dimensional
travelers and repairs breaches where the barriers between planes have
become thin or damaged. If the mortals responsible remain in the area
and cannot be convinced to cease their activities, the bythos has no
qualms about removing them. Using its ability to manipulate time, a
bythos might cause an opponent to quickly die of old age as time
speeds up around them, or cause a target to disappear from
time and space.
PSYCHOPOMP ALLIES
The mandate of marut inevitables
is similar to that of psychopomps.
Generally, the practical psychopomps
are content to let an unyielding
marut complete its mission and
swoop in afterward to ensure the
work has been done, but occasionally,
they may work together.
A-C
11
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
BYTHOS CREATURE 16
UNCOMMON LN LARGE AEON MONITOR
Perception +30; darkvision
Languages envisioning
Skills Athletics +32, Arcana +29, Deception +25, Intimidation+25, Nature +30, Occultism
+29, Religion +30, Stealth +26
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +5, Int +7, Wis +8, Cha +5
Envisioning As theletos.
AC 39; Fort +25, Ref +26, Will +30; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 245, regeneration 15 (deactivated by chaotic); Weaknesses chaotic 15
Confusing Gaze (aura, divine, enchantment, emotion, incapacitation, mental, visual) 30
feet. A creature that ends its turn in the aura must attempt a DC 34 Will save. If it fails,
it’s confused for 1 round (or 1d4 rounds on a critical failure).
Temporal Reversion[free-action] (fortune) Trigger The bythos fails or critically fails a check; Frequency
once per day; Effect The bythos rerolls the triggering check and takes the better result.
Speed fly 35 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +32 (lawful, magical, reach 10
feet), Damage 2d8+16 bludgeoning plus
2d8 cold and 2d8 lawful
Divine Innate Spells DC 37; 8th augury (at
will), teleport; 7th dimensional anchor,
dimensional lock, haste, plane shift; 6th
slow; 4th dimensional anchor (at will)
Rituals DC 37; imprisonment (temporal stasis only)
Aging Strikes [two-actions] (divine, necromancy) The bythos
make two fist Strikes against a single target. If both
Strikes hit, the target attempts a DC 37 Fortitude
save. Creatures that don’t get weaker with age or
don’t age are immune (GM’s discretion). If a creature becomes clumsy 4,
drained 4, and enfeebled 4 due to Aging Strikes, it dies of old age.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature becomes clumsy 1, drained 1, and enfeebled 1,
or increases each of these conditions by 1. This effect is
cumulative with other aging strikes from bythoses, to a
maximum of clumsy 4, drained 4, and enfeebled 4.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature becomes
clumsy 2, drained 2, and enfeebled 2, or increases
these conditions by 2.
Focused Gaze [one-action] (concentrate) The bythos focuses its
gaze on a creature it can see within 30 feet. The
target must attempt a save against the bythos’s
confusing gaze. A bythos can’t use this ability
against the same creature more than once per turn.
Temporal Flurry [two-actions] The bythos makes four fist
Strikes. Its multiple attack penalty increases normally
with each attack.
Temporal Strike [two-actions] (divine, conjuration, incapacitation, teleportation) The
bythos touches a creature or object to displace it from time. The target
attempts a DC 37 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success Time flows around the target; the target is slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The target disappears from the present moment and reappears
in the same location 1d4 rounds later as if no time had passed for it.
If a creature or object occupies that space when the target returns, the
target appears in the closest available space to its original location.
Critical Failure As failure, but the target is slowed 1 for an extra 1d4 rounds after
it returns.
GUARDIANS OF TIME
Bythos aeons have no innate ability
to directly enter the mysterious
Dimension of Time, but many know
of the hidden routes in the Great
Beyond one can use to travel to this
strange realm. A bythos prefers to
destroy those who seek entrance to
the Dimension of Time rather than
risk the knowledge of how to reach it
spreading too far.
Bestiary 2
12
Ahuizotl
The ahuizotl is a vicious, semi-aquatic predator that resembles a hideous
cross between a badger and an otter, with disturbingly web-fingered paws
supplemented by a fifth hand at the end of a long, serpentine tail. A clever and
stealthy hunter, the ahuizotl lures unwary prey to their doom by mimicking the
cries of people in distress. The ahuizotl’s macabre habit of feeding on a victim’s
eyes, fingernails, and teeth leaves the corpses of its kills uniquely mutilated.
Some say the creatures consider these body parts delicacies, while others insist
ahuizotls collect them as tribute to a powerful but unknown entity. The fact
that an ahuizotl does not eat the actual flesh of its victims, instead depositing
their savaged and waterlogged corpses in locations where the remains are sure
to be found by friends or family, points to a third and perhaps more likely
possibility—the ahuizotl simply enjoys using its violent dietary quirks to spread
fear and despair.
An ahuizotl walks on all fours, but its hands are capable of manipulating
simple tools and other objects. Ahuizotls have roughly mustelid features and an
extra membrane covering their eyes, giving their eyes a dull color suggestive of
cataracts and somewhat blunting the creature’s vision. Yet despite their bestial
appearance, ahuizotls are nearly as intelligent as the average human, and wiser
than most. Although they don’t form societies of their own, they have been
known to ally with violent cults or conclaves of monsters, and even to found
small shrines and temples to sinister deities. The cult of Charon, the horseman
of Death, is particularly popular among certain ahuizotls, who look forward to
an afterlife spent wallowing in the waters of the River Styx.
AHUIZOTL CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON NE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS BEAST
Perception +13; darkvision
Languages Aklo, Common
Skills Athletics +15, Deception +15 (+19 when
using Voice Imitation), Stealth +15
Str +5, Dex +3, Con +5, Int –1, Wis +3, Cha +3
Voice Imitation An ahuizotl can mimic
the sounds of a person in distress by
attempting a Deception check to Lie.
The ahuizotl has a +4 circumstance
bonus to this check.
AC 23; Fort +17, Ref +13, Will +13
HP 105
Speed 25 feet, swim 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +17, Damage 2d8+8 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile), Damage 2d6+8 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail claw +17 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d4+8
slashing plus Improved Grab
Tail Drag [one-action] Requirements The ahuizotl has a Medium
or smaller creature grabbed with its tail claw;
Effect The ahuizotl attempts an Athletics check
against the creature’s Fortitude DC.
Critical Success If the creature is 10 feet
away from the ahuizotl, it is dragged into
a square adjacent to the ahuizotl. The ahuizotl
can make a jaws Strike against the creature.
Success If the creature is 10 feet away from the ahuizotl, it is dragged into
a square adjacent to the ahuizotl.
Failure The creature is not dragged.
Critical Failure The creature is not dragged and the ahuizotl
no longer has the creature grabbed.
AHUIZOTL ALLIES
An ahuizotl is unexpectedly
canny in how it handles potential
competitors in its territory, and
when presented with fellow
predators capable of conversation,
it sometimes brokers alliances. Willo’-wisps are particular favorites as
allies, as they can lure prey into the
ahuizotl’s clutches and feast on the
anguish later when the mutilated
corpse is discovered.
A-C
13
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Akata
An akata is a hairless, blue-skinned quadruped with fearsome jaws, glowing eyes,
a pair of thin tails, and a mane of writhing tentacles. It is a strangely silent beast,
as it lacks the lungs and vocal chords necessary to vocalize. It also lacks ears, but
it has heightened visual and olfactory senses.
When food is scarce, an akata secretes a resin from its pores that forms into
a sturdy cocoon of pale green crystal—the skymetal noqual. An akata can
hibernate in this cocoon without needing to eat or drink for centuries, though
it retains a rudimentary sense of its surroundings and can break out in only a
few minutes’ time. These cocoons allow the creatures to travel through the void
of space, seeking new worlds where they can infect suitable humanoid hosts
with their larval young. Once a victim succumbs to this infection, the offspring
fight among themselves until one proves the strongest. The surviving akata then
animates the corpse—now a void zombie (page 288)—which shambles about of
its own accord.
AKATA CREATURE 1
RARE N MEDIUM ABERRATION
Perception +6; darkvision, no hearing, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +7, Stealth +7
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
Hibernation After 3 or more days without eating, an akata can secrete resin that
encases it in a noqual cocoon. The cocoon has Hardness 9, 40 HP, and a
Broken Threshold of 18. It has resistance 5 to damage from magical
sources. As long as the cocoon remains intact, the akata can’t be
harmed, and it doesn’t need to eat or drink. While inside the
cocoon, the akata gains lifesense 30 feet. The akata remains
in a state of hibernation until it is exposed to extreme
heat or senses a living creature, at which point it can
burst free of its cocoon in 1d4 minutes.
No Hearing An akata has no auditory senses. It is
immune to auditory effects, automatically
critically fails Perception checks that
require it to hear, and takes a –2
status penalty to Perception checks
(but not initiative rolls) that involve
sound but also rely on other senses.
AC 16; Fort +9, Ref +5, Will +6
HP 15; Immunities disease; Weaknesses
salt water 5; Resistances fire 5, poison 5
No Breath An akata doesn’t breathe and is immune
to effects that require breathing (such as an
inhaled poison).
Salt Water Vulnerability Salt water acts as an extremely
strong acid to an akata. Full immersion in salt water deals
4d6 acid damage per round.
Speed 30 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +9 (agile), Damage 1d6+4 piercing plus void death
Void Death (disease) An akata implants its parasitic larval young into
any creature it bites, but only Medium or Small humanoids
make suitable hosts; all other creatures are immune to
this disease; Saving Throw DC 17 Fortitude; Stage 1
carrier with no ill effect 1 (1 day); Stage 2 drained 1
(1 day); Stage 3 as stage 2 (1 day); Stage 4 drained 2
and fatigued (1 day); Stage 5 as stage 4 (1 day); Stage
6 dead and corpse rises as a void zombie (page 288)
in 2d4 hours
NOQUAL COCOONS
An akata’s noqual cocoon, despite
its crystalline appearance, is in fact
made of a rare skymetal with a glassy
green sheen. Noqual is as easy to
work as iron but much lighter, and
it is valued for its magic-resistant
qualities, but the noqual from an
akata’s cocoon is very low quality and
can’t be used as a crafting material.
Bestiary 2
14
Angel
Angels are benevolent messengers who aid good forces in the fight against evil.
Each angel has a special aura that assists in their individual tasks, and each angel
delivers certain types of messages and performs other duties for the angelic
hosts. While most angels live in the enlightened realm of Nirvana, some serve
the forces of Heaven and Elysium, especially in the case of the angel empyreal
lords within those two realms. Angels organize themselves into choirs depending
on their ranks and roles.
MOVANIC DEVA (GUARDIAN ANGEL)
Movanic devas are stewards of the flow of good creatures’ souls through the cycle
of life and death, from the point a creature is born to the day it dies. These angels
arise from the souls of stalwart nurturers and protectors, and share a specific
connection with a creature’s vital essence—its life force. Movanic devas are most
concerned with guiding and protecting good creatures during their mortal lives,
so once a soul has passed into the River of Souls, the movanic deva
leaves its protection to the soul angels, or monadic devas. As part of
their stewardship over good creatures, movanic devas can waken within
animals a level of sapience to allow them to become kindly and benevolent
as well, thus increasing the flow of goodness into the afterlife. They also
spend time patrolling the Positive Energy Plane and Negative Energy
Plane, seeking to contain significant threats to life.
MOVANIC DEVA CREATURE 10
NG MEDIUM ANGEL CELESTIAL
Perception +22; darkvision
Skills Athletics +20, Diplomacy +22, Intimidation +22, Nature +22,
Religion +19, Stealth +17, Survival +17
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +4, Wis +5, Cha +5
Items +1 striking bastard sword
AC 30; Fort +21, Ref +17, Will +19; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 195; Immunities negative; Weaknesses evil 10
Aura of Vitality (abjuration, aura, divine) 20 feet. Allies in the
movanic deva’s aura gain a +1 status bonus to all saving
throws, resistance 10 to positive and negative damage,
and are unharmed by the effects of a plane’s positive and
negative traits. Animals in the aura of 12th level or lower
don’t attack the movanic deva or the deva’s allies unless
they are controlled or otherwise forced to attack.
Speed 30 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] flaming bastard sword +23 (good, magical, two-hand
d12), Damage 2d8+9 slashing plus 1d6 fire and 1d6 good
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 5th divine wrath, remove curse,
remove disease, remove fear; 4th create food, heal (×3); 2nd
invisibility (at will, self only); 1st detect alignment (at will, evil
only); Constant (5th) tongues
Rituals DC 29; angelic messenger, awaken animal
Dispelling Field [two-actions] (divine, transmutation) Frequency once per
day; Effect The movanic deva attempts to unravel unwelcome
magic effects on allies within its aura of vitality to protect them
from malevolent forces. The movanic deva attempts a counteract
check against as many spell effects affecting allies in the area as it
wishes with a +19 counteract modifier and a counteract level of 4,
rolling once for the selected effects.
Flaming Armaments (divine, transmutation) When a movanic deva wields
a weapon, that weapon gains the effect of a flaming rune.
THE GIFT OF SAPIENCE
When a movanic deva awakens an
animal, the animal becomes neutral
good and is well-disposed toward
the deva, but the deva understands
that free will is an important part of
life. While the deva provides enough
support and guidance to the animal
to help it adjust to its newly sapient
world view, not all animals awakened
in this way remain on the path of good. 
A-C
15
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
WHAT IS A DEVA?
Three types of devas exist among
the angelic host, all of which serve
as angelic “field agents.” Of the types
of angels, devas are the ones most
likely to be encountered dwelling
somewhere other than Nirvana, as
these angels focus their work on
cultivating and protecting goodness
in mortal souls, be they living or dead.
MONADIC DEVA (SOUL ANGEL)
Monadic devas stand vigil along the River of Souls as it passes from the mortal
realm into the Ethereal Plane. Those who seek to fish souls out for their own use
stalk this metaphysical river, and it is against these predators that monadic devas
fight. At other times, monadic devas work to guide newcomers to the River of
Souls who might be in danger of drifting from the current and lingering as ghosts.
Monadic devas often find their tasks place them in alliances with psychopomps,
and they work well with the monitors despite the philosophical divide between
their views on a soul’s inherent goodness. A monadic deva is 7 feet tall and weighs
220 pounds.
MONADIC DEVA CREATURE 12
NG MEDIUM ANGEL CELESTIAL
Perception +25; darkvision
Skills Arcana +25, Diplomacy
+24, Intimidation +22,
Occultism +20, Religion
+25, Survival +22
Languages Celestial, Draconic,
Infernal; tongues
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +5, Int +4, Wis +4, Cha +5
Items +1 striking mace
AC 33; Fort +24, Ref +21, Will +20; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 245; Immunities death effects; Weaknesses evil 10
Spiritual Warden (abjuration, aura, divine) 20 feet. Allies in the aura
gain a +2 status bonus to saving throws against death effects and
effects that target or manipulate their souls.
Speed 30 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] holy mace +28 (good, magical, shove), Damage 2d6+15 bludgeoning
plus 1d6 force and 1d6 good plus solid blow
Divine Innate Spells DC 31; 6th divine wrath, heal, paralyze, remove curse, remove
disease; 5th creation, remove fear; 4th charm; 2nd invisibility (at will, self only);
1st detect alignment (at will, evil only); Constant (5th) tongues
Rituals DC 32; angelic messenger
Holy Armaments (divine, evocation) Any weapon gains the effect of a
holy property rune while a monadic deva wields it.
Rebuke Soul [one-action] (auditory, divine, enchantment, good, incapacitation)
The monadic deva speaks a word to cause a creature’s soul to recoil at
its sins or an undead creature to recoil at its lack of a soul. One non-good living or undead
target within 40 feet takes 5d10 good damage and must attempt a DC 32 Fortitude save.
Regardless of the outcome, the target is then temporarily immune for 10 minutes.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target takes half damage and is stunned 1.
Failure The target takes full damage and is stunned 2.
Critical Failure The target takes double damage and is stunned 4.
Solid Blow (divine, evocation, force) When a monadic deva hits a target for the second
time during its turn with its mace, it deals an additional 2d12 force damage as its
weapon shimmers with ripples of power.
PLANETAR (JUSTICE ANGEL)
The beings of righteous fury known as planetars are known to be the least patient
of angels. They exist to destroy evil that cannot be redeemed, and they often
leave prolonged dialogue to other angels. Of course, no planetar ignores the
importance of diplomacy, but they know that others among the angelic
hosts are better suited to that task, while they focus on the larger picture.
In angelic armies, planetars serve as commanders or generals. They
stand at least 9 feet tall and weigh over 500 pounds.
Bestiary 2
16
PLANETAR JUSTICE
Planetars know pathways to travel
between many planes of existence,
and they use these frequently to
deliver messages, warnings, and
ultimatums to those whose actions
have attracted angelic concern. If a
situation can be resolved with swift
on-the-spot justice, a planetar takes
that route in hopes of staving off an
escalation of violence.
PLANETAR CREATURE 16
UNCOMMON NG LARGE ANGEL CELESTIAL
Perception +28 (+32 to detect illusions); darkvision, true seeing
Skills Athletics +32, Intimidation +32, Religion +32
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Str +8, Dex +3, Con +6, Int +5, Wis +6, Cha +6
Items +2 greater striking greatsword
AC 39; Fort +28, Ref +25, Will +28; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 300, regeneration 15 (deactivated by evil); Weaknesses evil 15
Aura of Righteousness (aura, divine, evocation) 20 feet. Allies in the planetar’s aura gain
a +2 status bonus to AC against evil creatures and a +2 status bonus to damage rolls
against evil creatures. The area in the aura is difficult terrain for
evil creatures.
Speed 25 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] holy greatsword +32 (good, magical, versatile P), Damage
3d12+16 slashing plus 1d6 good
Divine Innate Spells DC 37, attack +29; 8th dispel magic, divine
wrath, earthquake, heal, power word stun, sunburst; 7th
charm, plane shift, power word blind, remove fear (at will);
6th blade barrier, dispel magic (at will); 5th breath of life,
death ward, freedom of movement, restoration (×3);
2nd invisibility (at will, self only), remove paralysis;
Constant (5th) detect alignment (evil only), tongues,
true seeing
Rituals DC 37; angelic messenger, call spirit, resurrect
Blade of Justice [two-actions] The planetar makes a greatsword
Strike against a target it detects as evil. If the target is
evil, the Strike deals three extra weapon damage dice
and deals 1d6 persistent good damage to the target.
The planetar can convert all the physical damage from
the attack into good damage.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph,
transmutation) The planetar can take on the
appearance of any Small or Medium humanoid. This
doesn’t change their Speed or Strikes.
Holy Armaments (divine, evocation) Any weapon gains
the effect of a holy property rune while a planetar
wields it.
SOLAR (ARCHANGEL)
Solars are among the greatest of all angels, ranking just
below empyreal lords. Many solars serve at the right
hand of a deity or champion a cause that benefits an
entire world. Most archangels resemble humanoids, but
not all—they can adopt more unusual forms as needed.
A typical solar is about 9 feet tall and weighs about 500
pounds, with a commanding voice that is impossible to
ignore. Most have silvery or golden skin.
Solars are legendary trackers; the most masterful of them
are said to be able to follow the centuries-old passage of a pit
fiend flying through the Astral Plane.
SOLAR CREATURE 23
RARE NG LARGE ANGEL CELESTIAL
Perception +40; darkvision, true seeing
Skills Arcana +38, Athletics +43, Diplomacy +43, Religion +43,
Stealth +36, Survival +46
A-C
17
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SOLAR GENESIS
Unlike most angels, solars are
created from divine energy,
sometimes blended with good souls.
They are joined in this distinction by
the ancient empyrean angels.
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Str +10, Dex +6, Con +8, Int +5, Wis +9, Cha +10
Items +3 major striking greatsword, +3 major striking longbow
AC 49; Fort +40, Ref +34, Will +37; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 500, regeneration 20 (deactivated by evil); Weaknesses evil 25
Aura of Protection (abjuration, aura, divine) 20 feet. Allies in the solar’s aura gain
a +2 status bonus to AC against evil creatures and a +2 status bonus to saves
against effects from evil creatures. The bonus increases to +4 against control by
evil creatures and attacks by evil summoned creatures. When the solar or an ally
is hit by an attack from a creature in the aura, that foe must succeed at a DC 43
Will save or be blinded for 1 minute (this is an
incapacitation effect). It’s then temporarily
immune for 1 minute.
Speed 35 feet, fly 100 feet
Melee [one-action] holy greatsword +44 (good, magical,
versatile P), Damage 4d12+22 slashing
plus 2d6 good
Ranged [one-action] holy longbow +40 (deadly d10, good,
magical, propulsive, range increment 100 feet,
volley 30 feet), Damage 4d8+17 piercing
plus 2d6 good and arrow of mortality
Divine Innate Spells DC 46, spell attack +38;
10th charm, power word stun, remove
curse, remove disease, revival; 9th dispel
magic (at will), heal, overwhelming presence,
power word blind, power word kill, sunburst;
7th plane shift, remove fear (at will); 6th
restoration (at will); 5th breath of life, death ward;
4th dimensional anchor (at will); 2nd invisibility (at
will, self only); Constant (10th) detect alignment
(evil only), tongues, true seeing
Rituals DC 46; angelic messenger, animate
objects, call spirit, freedom, imprisonment,
resurrect
Animate Weapon [reaction] Trigger The solar hits with a melee weapon
Strike while Animate Weapon is not already in effect; Effect The
solar’s weapon leaps into the air and moves with the solar as
if held with both hands. The weapon gains the effects of the
dancing weapon rune for 1 minute.
Arrow of Mortality The solar doesn’t need to provide
ammunition for their bow. When they draw their
bow, they create a magical arrow of light that sheds
bright light in a 20-foot radius until the end of the
solar’s next turn. On a critical hit with the arrow, if
the target has 75 or fewer Hit Points after taking
the damage, it drops to 0 Hit Points and becomes
dying 1 (or, if it was already dying, increases its
dying value by 3).
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine,
polymorph, transmutation) The solar can
take on the appearance of any Small
or Medium humanoid. This doesn’t
change their Speed or Strikes.
Holy Armaments (divine, evocation)
Any weapon gains the effect of a
holy property rune while a solar
wields it.
Bestiary 2
18
Animate Dream
An animate dream coalesces from centuries of stray fragments of reverie and
dream left behind as slumbering minds drift through the Dimension of Dreams.
In most cases, these fragments simply disperse on their own, but when dreamers
flee from nightmares back to the waking world, these fragments can take on a
supernatural life of their own. They have little reasoning and intent except to seek
similar fragments, absorb them, and grow. When enough of them gather together,
they merge into a horrific form as an animate dream.
Individually, animate dreams can hold a wide range of appearances, but most
take on rudimentary shapes akin to the living forms of the minds that spawned
them. Animate dreams that rise from slumbering humanoids, the most commonly
encountered, thus appear humanoid, but with distorted, nightmarish shapes
that incorporate additional twisted limbs and frightening features. In these
forms, animate dreams find their way out of the Dreamlands and into the
waking world, only to discover they have no way of returning and suffer a
relentless hunger that only new nightmares can sate.
An animate dream thrives on the terror fueled by nightmares and
fear and uses its supernatural abilities to invoke such feelings in the
minds of its victims, cursing its prey by creating a permanent link
to that individual’s dreams. Thereafter, the victim is subjected to all
manner of reoccurring nightmares. As the nightmares continue, the
victim finds it more and more difficult to remain awake. In the end,
the victim plunges into an accursed slumber from which it cannot
return. These victims provide the animate dream with the purest form
of fear and are its preferred sustenance.
An animate dream can subsist on the ambient fear generated by regular
nightmares, but these lesser fears aren’t as satisfying, often driving the
animate dream to seek out new victims. Left without a source of fear, an
animate dream won’t starve to death, but it will grow increasingly violent
and desperate. Famished animate dreams are the ones most often
encountered, as they have been forced to abandon subtlety to pursue
more blatant methods of harvesting fear. Yet such animate dreams also
tend to be the least powerful of their kind. Those who have grown
metaphysically fat on fear have generally done so by adopting a specific
nightmare theme, such as being buried alive, being swept away by ocean
waves, or being consumed by wild beasts. Such animate dreams often have
similarly themed innate spells to augment their powers.
ANIMATE DREAM CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM DREAM INCORPOREAL
Perception +14, darkvision
Languages telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +14, Deception +18, Intimidation +18, Occultism +12, Stealth +18
Str –5, Dex +4, Con +3, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +6
AC 24; Fort +15, Ref +18, Will +14; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 110; Immunities disease, paralyzed, poison, precision, sleep; Resistances all 5
(except force, ghost touch, or negative; double resistance vs. non-magical)
Speed fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] nightmare tendril +20 (agile, finesse), Damage 4d8 negative plus endless
nightmare
Occult Innate Spells DC 26; 4th confusion, dimension door (at will), nightmare,
phantasmal killer, sleep; 3rd fear
Endless Nightmare (curse, emotion, enchantment, fear, mental, occult) An animate
dream’s touch fills the victim’s mind with terrifying visions; Saving Throw DC 26
Fortitude; Stage 1 fatigued (1 day); Stage 2 fatigued and stupefied 1 (1 day);
Stage 3 The victim falls asleep and can’t be awakened as long as they remain at
this stage (1 day).
ENSLAVED DREAMS
Night hags have been known to
enslave animate dreams, forcing
them to feed upon themselves. These
captives break down into a fearful
essence used for the hag’s rituals, such
as the crafting of heartstones.
A-C
19
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Ankou
Ankous are shadowy killers who serve powerful fey creatures, or even the Eldest—
the demigods of the First World. Amid the courts of the Eldest or of powerful fey
rulers, these sinister assassins lurk overhead as they await the call to action—implied
threats akin to deadly weapons hung as decor in a royal hall. Ankous never speak
aloud; when they feel the need to communicate at all, they do so in a telepathic
whisper directly into a victim’s mind. While an ankou’s body is made of strange,
fleshy material, their claws and the cruel hooks on their wings are made of razorsharp cold iron, a quality that makes them much feared among other fey. A typical
ankou is 10 feet tall and has an 8-foot wingspan but weighs less than 80 pounds.
While most ankous serve powerful masters, some of these murderous fey are
left to their own devices and serve none but their own capricious, cruel whims. In
some cases, their master may have been slain, while in others the ankou may have
been released from service for any number of reasons. An ankou left to indulge
their own whims unrestrained is often the most dangerous ankou of them all!
ANKOU CREATURE 14
LE LARGE FEY
Perception +25; lifesense 120 feet, low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan (can’t speak any
language); telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +28, Bluff +25, Intimidation +27,
Nature +22, Stealth +28
Str +7, Dex +8, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +2, Cha +5
AC 36; Fort +23, Ref +28, Will +24
HP 280; Weaknesses cold iron 10
Speed fly 75 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +29 (agile, cold iron),
Damage 3d6+15 slashing
Melee [one-action] wing +29 (cold iron, reach
10 feet), Damage 2d6+15 piercing
plus 2d6 persistent bleed
Primal Innate Spells DC 34,
attack +26; 8th discern location;
7th prismatic spray, teleport; 6th
true seeing; 4th darkness (at will),
dimensional anchor; 2nd silence; 1st ray of enfeeblement
Shadow Doubles [one-action] to [three-actions] (illusion, occult, shadow)
Frequency once per day; Effect For each action spent to
use this ability, the ankou creates one shadowy duplicate
of themself anywhere within 60 feet of themself.
Shadow doubles have the same statistics as an ankou,
but they have the summoned trait, have 84 Hit Points,
can’t use Shadow Doubles or innate spells, and have
an attack bonus of +25 for their Strikes. A shadow
double that attempts a saving throw against
a light effect can’t get a result better than
failure. Each double remains for 1 round,
until it’s reduced to 0 Hit Points, or until
it moves further than 120 feet from the
ankou, whichever comes first. Each round thereafter, the ankou can spend a single
action that has the concentrate trait to extend the duration of surviving duplicates by
1 round, to a maximum duration of 1 minute. The ankou can see through the eyes of
all of the shadow doubles at once. A character who Seeks can identify an ankou as
real or a shadow double with a successful DC 39 Perception check.
Sneak Attack An ankou’s Strikes deal an additional 2d6 precision damage to
flat-footed creatures.
ANKOU GUILDS
The most dangerous ankous are
those who have rebelled against their
masters. Ankous of this nature are
more powerful, gathering others to
form deadly “guilds” of assassins that
pursue common goals in the most
dangerous parts of the First World.
Bestiary 2
20
ANT HIVES
Giant ants form vast underground
colonies, excavating deep burrows
or infesting existing caverns. Ants
are omnivorous and cultivate fungus
farms, but they are happy to eat
whatever presents itself. Humanoids
and their domesticated animals are
easy fuel for the insectile machinery
of their hives. Worker ants lack the
sting of their warrior cousins, while
elite drones fly on gossamer wings
(fly Speed of 30 feet) to seek new
food sources for their queen.
Ant
Ants are industrious insects that aid the natural processes of decay and renewal.
GIANT ANT
Giant ants are much like their smaller kin in their industrious habits, though
growing to the size of ponies makes them much deadlier.
GIANT ANT CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +7; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +8, Survival +7
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –4
AC 18; Fort +10, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 30
Speed 40 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +11, Damage 1d8+4 slashing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] stinger +11 (agile), Damage 1d6+4 piercing plus giant ant venom
Giant Ant Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 18 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 4 rounds;
Stage 1 1d8 poison and enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 1d10 poison and enfeebled 2
(1 round); Stage 3 1d12 poison and enfeebled 3 (1 round)
Haul Away [one-action] Requirements The giant ant has a Large or smaller creature grabbed;
Effect The giant ant Strides up to its full Speed, carrying the grabbed creature with it.
It is encumbered if the grabbed creature is Medium or larger.
ARMY ANT SWARM
An army ant swarm is a terrifying carpet of stinging insects that devours all in
its path.
ARMY ANT SWARM CREATURE 5
N LARGE ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +11; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +7
Str –2, Dex +4, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –4
AC 21; Fort +13, Ref +11, Will +9
HP 55; Immunities precision, swarm mind; Weaknesses area
damage 5, splash damage 5; Resistances bludgeoning
2, piercing 5, slashing 5
Cling[reaction] Trigger A creature leaves the swarm’s
space; Effect The swarm takes
1d6 damage as ants cling to the
creature and continue biting, dealing 3d6 persistent piercing
damage. High winds or immersion in water reduces the DC
of the flat check to end this persistent damage to 5. Any
area damage dealt to the creature destroys these
clinging ants.
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet
Swarming Bites [one-action] Each enemy in the swarm’s
space takes 3d6 piercing damage (DC 21
basic Fortitude save). A creature that
fails its save against Swarming Bites
becomes clumsy 1 for 1 round. If the
creature attempts a concentrate or
manipulate action while affected, it
must succeed at a DC 5 flat check
or the action is lost; roll the check
after spending the action, but
before any effects are applied.
A-C
21
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Aolaz
Aolazes are great beasts carved from stone and metal and magically imbued with
the essence of life. The exact means of their creation is a long-lost secret, and
they are so rare that scholars have little opportunity to study active specimens.
The best-known aolazes are museum pieces or battlefield relics destroyed or
deactivated centuries ago, though fragmented records suggest that many more
were made and might remain, yet to be unearthed.
Most aolazes are built in the shape of great land-bound beasts, such as elephants,
rhinoceroses, or dinosaurs. Regardless of the specific creature an aolaz has been
constructed to resemble, it is not bound to walk the earth like its inspirations
are—it’s imbued with the magical ability to pursue across
water and even through the air. Few can escape an
aolaz’s wrath once it is earned.
AOLAZ CREATURE 18
RARE N GARGANTUAN CONSTRUCT
Perception +33; low-light vision, flawless
hearing
Skills Athletics +35
Str +9, Dex +4, Con +8, Int –4, Wis +6, Cha +3
Flawless Hearing An aolaz has an incredible
sense of hearing. It can hear any sound
made within 1,000 feet as though it were
only 5 feet away from the source of the
sound, and any sound within 1 mile as
though it were only 30 feet away from the source
of the sound. An aolaz’s hearing is a precise sense.
AC 42; Fort +35, Ref +27, Will +31
HP 255; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease, doomed, drained,
fatigued, healing, necromancy, nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison, sickened,
sonic, unconscious; Resistances physical 15 (except adamantine)
Speed 50 feet, air walk, water walk
Melee [one-action] trunk +35 (magical, reach 20 feet, sweep, trip), Damage 5d10+17
bludgeoning plus Grab
Melee [one-action] foot +33 (magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 5d8+15
bludgeoning
Arcane Innate Spells DC 40; Constant (9th) air walk, water walk
Roll [one-action] The aolaz tucks its head down and rolls up into an armored
sphere. While Rolling, an aolaz has AC 44, Fort +37, Ref +29, Will
+33, and Speed 100 feet, but it can’t use its trunk Strikes or its
Ultrasonic Blast. It can make foot Strikes while rolling, but only as
part of a Trample. The aolaz can use this action again to unroll and
resume its standing form.
Trample[two-actions] Huge or smaller, foot, DC 40
Ultrasonic Blast [one-action] (arcane, evocation, sonic) The aolaz releases a
tremendous blast of sonic energy from its trunk in a 150-foot line,
dealing 12d10 sonic damage. The frequency of this sound is such
that it is completely imperceptible to humanoids, but the damage it
wreaks is all too evident. Each creature in the area must attempt
a DC 40 Fortitude save. The aolaz can’t use Ultrasonic Blast again
for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage and is stunned 1.
Failure The creature takes full damage and
is stunned 2.
Critical Failure The creature takes double
damage and is stunned 3.
JISTKAN BEHEMOTHS
Thousands of years ago, the Jistka
Imperium mastered the art of
construct creation, and the aolaz
represents the height of its craft.
The Jistkans used primal magic
to imbue their constructs with
spirits of nature. However, when
Jistkan creators turned to the outer
planes, and to fiends in particular,
as a source to power even greater
constructs, they unknowingly
orchestrated their own doom. 
Bestiary 2
22
Archon
Tireless agents of Heaven, archons embody virtues and strive to guide mortals
while battling the evil forces of the fiendish realms. Heaven’s seven-tiered
mountain is generally known as a place of contemplation and philosophy,
as exemplified by the fifth level, Illumis. But the archon denizens of Heaven’s
threshold and the second level, Proelera, concern themselves with defense and
mustering armies for the endless battles against Hell and the Abyss. However,
whereas devils and demons take pleasure in harming the innocent, Heaven’s
wardens reserve their blades for only the truly wicked and irredeemable. Among
mortals, they prefer to guide and nurture a rule of law that looks out for the
weak and powerless, leading mortal agents to overcome mortal threats rather
than solving those threats themselves.
HOUND ARCHON
Among the rank-and-file soldiers of Heaven’s armies, few individuals are more
dependable and truer to the cause than the noble hound archons, embodiments
of the virtue of diligence. Unlike horned archons, who perform at a similar
level along Heaven’s grand hierarchy, hound archons do not scout ahead for
evil or perform reconnaissance missions in hostile territory. A hound archon’s
role is as a soldier in the heart of battle or, occasionally, as a sentinel tasked with
protecting a particular strategic location or holy site.
HOUND ARCHON CREATURE 4
LG MEDIUM ARCHON CELESTIAL
Perception +13; darkvision
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Skills Athletics +12, Intimidation +10, Religion +9, Stealth +10
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +2
Items greatsword, full plate
AC 22; Fort +14, Ref +8, Will +11; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 70; Weaknesses evil 5
Retributive Strike [reaction]
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] greatsword +14 (good, magical, versatile P), Damage 1d12+6
slashing plus 1d6 good
Melee[one-action] jaws +14 (agile, good, magical), Damage 1d6+6 piercing plus 1d6 good
Divine Innate Spells DC 19; 4th dimension door; Cantrips (2nd) message;
Constant (5th) tongues
Archon’s Door Once per day, if an archon sees another creature cast
dimension door, the archon can use dimension door (heightened to
5th level) within 1 round to attempt to follow that creature to the
maximum distance of the archon’s dimension door. If the archon’s
dimension door has enough distance, the archon appears the
same distance and direction from the creature as before either
creature used dimension door.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph,
transmutation) A hound archon can take the appearance
of any canid animal of Small to Large size. This doesn’t
change their Speed or the attack and damage bonuses
for their Strikes, but if the canid’s bite attack has the
Knockdown ability, then the hound archon’s bite
attack gains that ability while they are in that form.
Diligent Assault [two-actions] The hound archon carefully
makes one greatsword Strike and one jaws Strike
in any order. These attacks count toward the
hound archon’s multiple attack penalty, but the multiple
attack penalty doesn’t increase until after all the attacks.
ARCHON EVOLUTIONS
When a spirit becomes an archon,
they usually start as a lantern archon,
the lowliest of archonkind. As they
perform noble deeds and bolster their
pureness of heart, an archon evolves
into greater forms, possibly skipping
stages or remaining in others for long
spans of time, depending on their
particular strengths and personality.
A-C
23
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
INSTRUMENTS OF WAR
A trumpet archon’s magical
instrument is no mere piece of
brass; each of these immaculately
crafted horns is said to be crafted
in Heaven’s blessed forges and
infused with the voices of a thousand
angels. Only archons can truly
play such trumpets—mortals lack
the power necessary to create
trumpet archons’ iconic clarion
calls, but can still play them as
virtuoso instruments.
TRUMPET ARCHON
Trumpet archons are messengers, emissaries, and storytellers—embodiments of
the virtue of kindness. They use stories and allegories to prevent bloodshed, and
among all archons they are the most likely to work together with angels, perhaps
leading to the similarities in their forms. When diplomacy is impossible, trumpet
archons rally the righteous to battle—one reassuring glance from a trumpet archon
is often all it takes to instill a shaken ally with resounding courage once again.
TRUMPET ARCHON CREATURE 14
LG MEDIUM ARCHON CELESTIAL
Perception +26; darkvision
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Skills Acrobatics +25, Diplomacy +29, Intimidation +28, Nature +23, Religion
+23, Performance +31, Stealth +25
Str +7, Dex +5, Con +5, Int +3, Wis +6, Cha +8
Items +2 striking bastard sword, +1 resilient full plate, virtuoso trumpet
AC 36; Fort +24, Ref +24, Will +27; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 285; Resistances sonic 15; Weaknesses evil 15
Retributive Strike [reaction]
Speed 35 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] bastard sword +29 (good, magical, versatile P),
Damage 2d12+13 slashing plus 2d6 sonic and 1d6 good
Divine Innate Spells DC 34; 7th heal (×2), sound burst;
6th heroism, zealous conviction; 5th banishment,
breath of life; 4th dimension door (at will); 3rd circle
of protection (against evil only; ×2); Cantrips (6th)
message; Constant (5th) tongues
Archon’s Door As hound archon.
Kind Word[one-action] (auditory, divine, emotion, enchantment,
linguistic, mental) The trumpet archon offers an
ally praise or encouragement. The archon attempts
to counteract one emotion effect on the ally (with a
counteract modifier of +24), and the archon and the
ally both gain a +1 status bonus to attack rolls and
saving throws for 1 round.
Trumpet Blast[one-action] (auditory, divine, emotion, enchantment,
mental) The trumpet archon blows mightily on their
horn, creating a tone of such beauty and grandeur
those who hear it are paralyzed in awe. Non-archons
within 100 feet must attempt a DC 34 Fortitude save.
They are temporarily immune for 10 minutes.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is flat-footed.
Failure The creature is stunned 1 and
flat-footed as long as it’s stunned.
Critical Failure The creature is
paralyzed for 1 round.
STAR ARCHON
Embodiments of the virtue of prudence, star
archons serve as philosophers and administrators,
and in times of war as the tacticians, strategists, and
generals of archon armies. Star archons burn with the glory
and intensity of a sun, and their sense of duty and desire to defeat evil are
as indefatigable as the light of the stars. While their dazzling intellects and
unmatched strategic cunning make them most useful in war rooms rather
than on battlefields, star archons are fierce opponents when motivated to enter 
Bestiary 2
24
HEAVENLY MOUNTAIN
Archons reside in Heaven, a plane that
appears as a single massive mountain.
Heaven is broken into seven tiers, with
most archons occupying the second
level and base of army operations,
Proelera, or the sixth level, Iudica, the
administrative heart of Heaven.
the fray. Those who witness the self-sacrifice of a star archon and live to tell the
tale describe the experience in terms that might befit the sight of a supernova at
the instant the star collapses in on itself.
STAR ARCHON CREATURE 19
LG MEDIUM ARCHON CELESTIAL
Perception +35; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Skills Arcana +33, Athletics +37, Acrobatics +31, Diplomacy +33, Intimidation +33,
Occultism +33, Religion +37, Society +33, Warfare Lore +39
Str +8, Dex +9, Con +6, Int +9, Wis +9, Cha +6
Items +2 greater resilient full plate, +2 greater striking returning starknife
AC 43; Fort +31, Ref +34, Will +34; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 400; Resistances fire 15; Weaknesses evil 15
Blinding Soul (divine, evocation, light, visual) Whenever the star archon takes slashing
damage, bright light pours from their wounds. Non-archons within 10 feet must
attempt a DC 38 Fortitude save. On a failure, a creature is dazzled for 1 round. On
a critical failure, the creature is blinded for 1d4 rounds instead. The creature is then
temporarily immune for 1 round.
Explosive Rebirth (death, divine, evocation, fire, good) When killed, the star archon
explodes in a blinding flash of holy energy that deals 12d6 fire damage and 12d6
good damage to anything in a 100-foot emanation, with a DC 40 basic Reflex
save. A non-archon creature that sees the explosion and critically fails its save is
permanently blinded as well. The slain star archon reincarnates 1d4 rounds later
as a shield archon (Bestiary 29).
Retributive Strike [reaction] A star archon can also make a Retributive Strike by throwing
its starknife, and the enemy and ally can be within 60 feet instead of 15 feet.
Speed 35 feet, fly 75 feet
Melee [one-action] returning starknife +38 (agile, deadly 1d8, finesse, good, magical, reach
10 feet, versatile S), Damage 3d4+16 piercing plus 2d6 good and
3d6 fire
Ranged [one-action] starknife +38 (agile, deadly 1d8, good, magical, thrown 60
feet, versatile S), Damage 3d4+16 piercing plus 2d6 good and 3d6 fire
Divine Innate Spells DC 43; 9th blindness, implosion, sunburst; 7th heal,
prismatic spray; 5th sending; 4th dimension door (at will); Constant
(6th) true seeing; (5th) tongues
Archon’s Door As hound archon.
Prudent Asterism [two-actions] The star archon calculates a celestial
constellation and sends their starknife flying along that
path from one foe to the next. It makes a starknife Strike
against a target within 60 feet. If the Strike hits, it can
make another Strike at a different target within 60 feet of the first target, and so on,
until it misses with a Strike or runs out of targets it hasn’t attacked within range of
the most recent target. The star archon can attack a given target only once per use
of this ability. These attacks don’t apply any range increment penalty, and the star
archon resolves all the attacks before increasing the multiple attack penalty.
BASTION ARCHON
The mightiest of archon-kind form in the heat of battle from incredibly
uncommon circumstances. When a gathering of lantern archons
converges into a gestalt in order to defend allies in a fight that seems all
but lost, a fellow archon of significant strength—such as a star archon—
can commit a brave act of self-sacrifice by dimensionally transposing
itself with the gestalt. If the circumstances are just right and luck is
with the archons, the result is not a glorious sacrifice, but instead the
earth-rocking emergence of a bastion archon. In this way, the lowliest of
archons—the lanterns—can, in an instant, become their kind’s greatest hope.
A-C
25
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ARMORED ARCHONS
Always ready to defend others, most
archons are never encountered out of
their suits of armor. Even those who
eschew armor, such as the bastion
archon, tend to still appear as if they
are wearing heavy protection against
the scourge of battle.
Bastion archons are massive beings made of the very stone of Heaven’s Holy
Mountain, with their visages obscured by a blinding light surrounding the gestalt
that originally formed the bastion. Tireless in their embodiment of the virtue of
sacrifice, a bastion archon almost always protects the area where they manifested,
and even when they are destroyed they leave an indelible mark of righteousness
upon the surrounding region.
BASTION ARCHON CREATURE 20
RARE LG HUGE ARCHON CELESTIAL
Perception +37; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Skills Athletics +38, Diplomacy +34, Intimidation +34, Religion +32
Str +10, Dex +7, Con +10, Int +6, Wis +8, Cha +6
AC 47; Fort +38, Ref +31, Will +34; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 280, fast healing 30; Weaknesses evil 15
Bastion Aura (aura, divine, good, healing, necromancy) 50 feet. All
good-aligned creatures in the aura have fast healing 30 for as long as
they remain in range, and they gain a +2 status bonus to attack
rolls and damage rolls.
Ultimate Sacrifice (divine, good, healing, necromancy) If the
bastion archon is slain by an evil creature, it explodes in a
geyser of holy light, restoring 140 HP to all good-aligned
creatures in a 40-foot emanation. The ground in the affected
area is also subjected to a level 10 consecrate ritual, and the
ground is consecrated for 10 years (or only 24 hours if the
ultimate sacrifice took place in Hell, Abaddon, or the Abyss).
Retributive Strike [reaction]
Speed 70 feet; air walk
Melee [one-action] fist +40 (good, lawful, magical, reach 15
feet), Damage 4d8+20 bludgeoning plus 2d6
good
Divine Innate Spells DC 42, attack +34; 10th meteor
swarm, polar ray, sunburst; 7th prismatic spray,
true target (×3), vibrant pattern; 4th dimension door
(at will); Constant (10th) air walk, true seeing, tongues
Archon’s Door As hound archon.
Blinding Beams [free-action] Trigger The bastion archon hits a
creature with two fist Strikes this turn and can use its Holy
Beam; Effect The bastion archon fires its Holy Beam at only the
creature it hit twice. The creature’s save result is one degree of
success worse than the result it rolled.
Entrench [one-action] The bastion archon locks itself in place, becoming
voluntarily immobilized. While Entrenched, the archon can’t be
forcibly moved or tripped, and it gains a +2 circumstance bonus
to AC and Reflex saves. Entrench ends automatically as soon as
the bastion archon uses another move action.
Holy Beam [two-actions] (divine, good, incapacitation, light) The bastion
archon releases a blinding beam of holy light in a 500-foot line
that deals 20d6 good damage to non-archons in the area, with a
DC 38 Reflex save. The bastion archon can’t use Holy Beam again
for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage.
Failure The creature takes full damage and is blinded for
1d4 rounds.
Critical Failure The creature takes double damage and is
blinded permanently.
Bestiary 2
26
ASSASSIN WINE
The berries of an assassin vine are
something of an acquired taste to
most, but the process of aging the
berries into wine can remove the
unpleasant aftertaste—provided the
berries are harvested from a living
vine. After the vine’s death, toxins in
the plant quickly seep into its berries,
making them unsuitable for harvest,
and as a result, assassin vine wine is a
dangerous delicacy to prepare. Those
who master the art, though, find that
the proceeds can more than cover
the cost of having to periodically hire
adventures to help curtail an unruly—
and—hungry vineyard.
Assassin Vine
The assassin vine is a carnivorous plant with a voracious appetite. Rather than
consuming creatures directly, it creates its own fertilizer by entangling prey
and squeezing the life from it. Once the plant has killed a creature, it pulls the
carcass over to its roots to feed from the decaying flesh. Although an assassin
vine lacks eyes, it can detect and track prey through a combination of using its
root systems to detect vibrations through topsoil and its leaves to detect heat
changes in the vicinity. Although the assassin vine has no real intelligence, its
learned behaviors mimic those of cunning ambush hunters.
As it is slow moving, the assassin vine typically remains rooted in a single area
for as long as it has sufficient prey. Though most often found along woodland
trails or swamps, these plants can also be encountered in more rural settlements,
poorly tended fields, and vineyards. While assassin vines can’t be trained in the
classical sense, they can be used as defenses, and woodland-dwelling creatures
like goblins and fey have been known to cultivate assassin vines as guardians
for less-used routes into their lairs. In such cases, the tenders often seek to
make the path more obvious than its disuse would otherwise suggest, while
simultaneously working to ensure the bones of the vines’ victims are removed to
keep their presence a secret, resulting in what appears to be an easy
approach to the den but is actually an organic ambush.
Mature assassin vines grow to 20 feet long and have smaller
vines extending off the main trunk that reach from to 5 to 10
feet in length. The smallest of these vines sprout every 6 inches
or so; they tend to grow clusters of full leaves and occasionally bear
small berries. A recently fed assassin vine can have bunches of plump,
blood-red berries that are juicy and tart but leave a slightly unpleasant
iron aftertaste, as if from the faint taste of blood from a bitten lip.
ASSASSIN VINE CREATURE 3
N LARGE MINDLESS PLANT
Perception +10; tremorsense 30 feet, low-light vision
Skills Athletics +9, Stealth +9 (+11 in forests or
grasslands)
Str +4, Dex +0, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +3, Cha +0
Camouflage The assassin vine can Hide in natural
environments even if it doesn’t have cover.
AC 18; Fort +10, Ref +7, Will +8
HP 68; Weaknesses fire 5, slashing 5
Grasping Foliage [reaction] (primal, transmutation) Trigger
The assassin vine detects a creature within 20 feet
via tremorsense; Effect The assassin vine causes
vegetation within a 20-foot emanation to writhe for
1 round, turning this area into difficult terrain. When
a creature starts its turn in this area, it must attempt a
DC 20 Reflex save. On a failure, it takes a –10-foot
circumstance penalty to its Speeds until it
leaves the area, and on a critical
failure it is also immobilized for
1 round. A creature can
attempt to Escape to
remove these effects.
Assassin vines are immune
to Grasping Foliage.
Speed 5 feet
Melee [one-action] vine +12 (reach 10 feet), Damage
1d8+6 bludgeoning plus Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d8+4 bludgeoning, DC 20
A-C
27
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ATHACH TREASURE
Athachs are infamously greedy, but
the distrustful creatures have a unique
way of hiding gems and shiny metal.
When an athach finds items such
as coins and jewelry, they crush the
valuable metal into a lumpy ball about
the size of an apple and then swallow
it. When not tormenting humans, the
athach regurgitates these lumps and
plays with them. Any of these lumps
found lying about an athach’s lair are
likely coated in the giant’s toxic drool.
Athach
The towering and brutish giants known as athaches are reviled for both their
monstrosity and their cruelty. Beyond an athach’s filthy habits, this giant is made
stranger by the gangly third arm that protrudes from their torso and ends in a
twitching, long-fingered claw. Huge, tusk-like fangs descend from an athach’s
upper jaw and prop their mouth open, leaking long strands of viscous drool that
is itself is a toxic venom and coats the athach’s fangs.
Athachs despise civilization almost as much as they despise their own kind, and
they delight in committing sadistic acts and terrorizing victims. An athach does
not keep a traditional territory of their own, but rather wanders the hinterlands of
settled territories until they find a suitably easy settlement of smaller humanoids to
target. Once the athach has chosen their target, the giant establishes a hidden lair
in a location like an abandoned farmhouse or cave, and from there they launch
their reign of torment. After a few weeks of harassing, capturing, and
torturing victims, the athach bores of their games. The giant then goes
on a final rampage, destroying every dwelling and eating every creature
they can find. Sometimes, the giant allows a survivor or two to escape,
forcing these terrified victims to spend the rest of their lives spreading
word of the athach’s fearsomeness.
ATHACH CREATURE 12
CE HUGE GIANT HUMANOID
Perception +22; darkvision
Languages Jotun
Skills Athletics +25, Intimidation +21
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +7, Int –1, Wis +4, Cha +3
AC 33; Fort +25, Ref +20, Will +21
HP 250; Weaknesses cold iron 10
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] An
athach gains an extra reaction
at the start of each of its turns
that it can use only to make
an Attack of Opportunity with
its claw. It can’t use more than one
Attack of Opportunity triggered by the
same action.
Catch Rock [reaction]
Speed 40 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +25 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+13
bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] jaws +25, Damage 3d8+13 piercing plus athach
venom
Melee [one-action] claw +25 (agile), Damage 3d8+13 slashing
Ranged [one-action] rock +25 (brutal, range increment 120
feet), Damage 3d8+13 bludgeoning
Athach Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 32
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 2d6
poison damage and enfeebled 1; Stage 2 2d6
poison damage and enfeebled 2; Stage 3 2d6
poison damage and enfeebled 3
Swift Claw [reaction] Trigger The athach hits a creature with
two fist Strikes; Effect The athach makes a claw
Strike with no multiple attack penalty against
the creature it hit with its fist Strikes.
This claw attack does not increase the
athach’s multiple attack penalty.
Throw Rock [one-action]
Bestiary 2
28
VARISIAN NURSERY RHYME
Is the attic whispering?
Are we safe below?
Do you think he’s listening?
Is that his shadow?
Do you hear him waking,
Up above the stairs?
Do you hear him weeping?
Is he really there?
Can you say “I’m speaking?”
Are you saying naught?
Is it you who’s weeping?
Is it you he’s caught?
Attic Whisperer
Beware the haunting sobs of the attic whisperer, for they carry the pained wrath of
an abandoned child who perished due to the neglect or absence of their caretakers.
Animated by loneliness, the embittered spirit binds itself to the material world in
a body made of bits and oddments of a lost childhood—wooden blocks, scraps of
blankets, ratty dolls, buttons, carved trinkets, and glass marbles. To give themselves
the semblance of a head, they top their patchwork bodies with a small animal’s skull.
Attic whisperers most frequently lurk in old infirmaries, orphanages, and other
such institutions where children were forgotten, and they lay dormant for decades
in hopes that they might one day find a playmate to ease their eternal loneliness.
When they sense the living, attic whisperers attempt to lure them into their clutches
by calling out to them using the voice of a small child. Though attic whisperers
intend only to play with those they encounter, they drain the breath and voice from
living creatures as their dark impulses take over.
ATTIC WHISPERER CREATURE 4
NE SMALL UNDEAD
Perception +10; darkvision
Languages Common, Necril
Skills Deception +11, Society +10, Stealth +13
Str +0, Dex +5, Con +0, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +3
AC 21; Fort +8, Ref +13, Will +12
HP 60, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison, unconscious
Aura of Sobs (auditory, aura, emotion, enchantment, mental, occult) 10 feet. An attic whisperer
enshrouds itself in a tapestry of stolen voices. Each living creature that enters or starts
their turn in the aura must succeed at a DC 19 Will save or the unnerving, bitter sobs
render them distraught and they become stupefied 1 for as long as they remain within the
aura. A creature that succeeds is temporarily immune for 1 hour. The attic whisperer can
activate or deactivate the aura with a single free action, which has the concentrate trait.
Whispered Despair [reaction] Trigger A creature with an active emotion effect enters an attic
whisperer’s aura of sobs; Effect The attic whisperer attempts to counteract
the emotion effect, with a counteract modifier of +13.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +15 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d8 piercing plus steal breath
Melee [one-action] bony hand (agile) +13, Damage 2d10 negative plus steal voice
Steal Breath (curse, incapacitation, necromancy, occult) The attic whisperer
siphons the breath from living creatures, sapping their strength. A living
creature hit by a jaws Strike must attempt a DC 21 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target is enfeebled 1 for 1 round.
Failure The target is enfeebled 1 for 24 hours and fatigued.
Critical Failure The target is enfeebled 1 for 24 hours, is fatigued,
and falls unconscious.
Steal Voice (curse, necromancy, occult) When an attic whisperer hits a
living creature with a bony hand Strike, it tries to pull the victim’s
voice into its aura. The victim must attempt a DC 21 Will save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target’s voice is weak for 1 minute. Anytime it
attempts an action with the auditory trait, it must succeed at a
DC 5 flat check or the action is lost.
Failure The target loses the ability to speak for 1 hour, until the curse
is removed, or until the attic whisperer is destroyed, whichever
comes first. During this time, the attic whisperer can perfectly
mimic the target’s voice, and the target takes a –2 circumstance
penalty to saving throws against that attic whisperer’s aura of sobs.
Critical Failure As failure, but the effects lasts until the attic whisperer
is destroyed or the curse is removed.
A-C
29
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
GOLDEN GUARDIAN
While wholly carnivorous,
aurumvoraxes are known for gnawing
on metals (particularly gold and
copper), though whether they do this
to sharpen their teeth or because of
some nutritional need is unknown.
Aurumvorax warrens can stretch for
thousands of feet dug into the rock,
often following veins of ores and
winding deep into the earth. Mining
dwarves love the creatures’ fondness
for eating rust monsters. Those who
keep aurumvoraxes for protection call
them golden guardians.
Aurumvorax
Aurumvoraxes are highly aggressive and territorial predators that sprint on eight
legs, using their terrific strength and iron-hard claws to dig through solid stone.
A typical aurumvorax is only 3 feet long but weighs more than 200 pounds, for
its thick, sturdy bones are densely packed with muscle, making the creature very
strong but a notoriously poor swimmer. Its fur is golden, sometimes with a silvery
or russet tone depending on the metals it has ingested, and its claws are always the
shiny black of seasoned iron.
Aurumvorax adults claim hunting territories spanning a mile or more, driving
out other predators and leading solitary lives except when they mate. They are
irascible creatures, impossible to train as adults, but daring trainers can rear
aurumvorax pups as deadly guard beasts, which they sell for hundreds of gold
pieces to discriminating buyers. Aurumvorax pups are usually single births,
and their mothers are fiercely protective, making their acquisition a dangerous
proposition. Even when trained, the creatures are prone to dangerous bursts
of rage.
AURUMVORAX CREATURE 9
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +18; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +20 (+6 to Swim), Stealth +18
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 28; Fort +19, Ref +17, Will +16
HP 170
Tenacious Stance An aurumvorax gains a +4 circumstance bonus to its Fortitude or
Reflex DC against Shove and Trip attempts, and to its Athletics DC
against attempts to escape its Grab.
Ferocity [reaction]
Speed 35 feet, burrow 10 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +21, Damage 2d10+12 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +21 (agile), Damage 2d8+12 slashing plus Grab
Bleeding Critical When an aurumvorax scores a critical hit,
the target takes 1d6 persistent bleed damage.
Gnaw Metal [one-action] The aurumvorax makes a jaws Strike against
a creature it has grabbed. If the attack hits, the target
is knocked prone if it is Medium or smaller. In addition, if
the target is wearing armor with Hardness 10 or lower, the
armor becomes broken. If this Strike
breaks a creature’s armor or damages
a creature that is unarmored or wearing
broken armor, the target also takes 1d6
persistent bleed damage. This Strike
doesn’t further damage armor that’s
already broken.
Rapid Rake [two-actions] The aurumvorax makes
four claw Strikes against a creature it
has grabbed. Each attack counts toward
the aurumvorax’s
multiple attack
penalty, and the
multiple attack
penalty increases
with each attack.
Bestiary 2
30
BRALANI CONTESTS
Bralanis enjoy inventing games and
contests and adding new twists to
popular sports rather than following
familiar rules. Speed often features
somewhere in bralani games, whether
it be physical speed or quickness of
wit. It is not uncommon for bralanis
to seek the input of young children,
encouraging adults to draw inspiration
from a child’s creativity rather than
allowing themselves to settle into
comfortable and repetitive patterns.
Azata
Azatas embrace the love of life and the fight to retain individuality and choice.
BRALANI (WIND AZATA)
Bralanis embody the freedom of fair competition, embracing opportunities to
test their skills against worthy foes and bring mortals together with the thrill of
good-natured sports and contests. Their interest in constructive conflict also extends
to higher stakes, such as diplomatic negotiations. In these cases, bralanis ensure
that neither side’s desires are crushed by the other’s and work as mediators when
needed. They believe in friendly contests to diffuse tension. When discussions are
going well, bralanis step back, allowing the participants to shape their own futures.
They delight in sailing through violent storms as wind, basking in the raw energy.
BRALANI CREATURE 6
CG MEDIUM AZATA CELESTIAL
Perception +14; darkvision
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; tongues
Skills Acrobatics +13, Deception +15, Diplomacy +15,
Games Lore +14, Stealth +15
Str +5, Dex +5, Con +3, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +5
Items +1 composite longbow,scimitar
AC 24; Fort +13, Ref +17, Will +12
HP 120; Weaknesses cold iron 5, evil 5;
Resistances electricity 10
Speed 30 feet, fly 80 feet
Melee [one-action] scimitar +16 (forceful, sweep), Damage
1d6+8 slashing plus 2d6 electricity and 1d6 good
Ranged [one-action] composite longbow +18 (deadly 1d10,
reload 0, volley 30 feet), Damage 1d8+6
plus 1d6 electricity and 1d6 good
Divine Innate Spells DC 24; 4th gaseous
form (at will); 3rd heal, lightning bolt,
wall of wind; 2nd calm emotions; 1st gust
of wind (at will); Constant (5th) tongues
Fair Competition (divine, enchantment,
mental) Once per day, a bralani can
spend 1 minute to bless willing creatures within
100 feet who are about to participate in a
contest. This blessing lasts 24 hours.
If a blessed creature cheats or uses
the contest to harm another,
the creature grows visibly ill,
becoming sickened 1 and unable to remove this condition for
the duration or until they withdraw from the competition. At
the end of the contest, participants
who competed fairly find it easier
to negotiate and understand their
opponent’s perspective. For 1 hour,
they gain a +2 status bonus to
Diplomacy checks and Recall Knowledge checks
that directly pertain to their opponents.
Whirlwind Blast [two-actions] (air, divine, evocation) The bralani
generates a 20-foot line of scouring wind that deals
7d6 bludgeoning damage (DC 24 basic Reflex save).
It can’t use this ability again for 1d4 rounds.
Wind Form A bralani flies at full Speed in gaseous
form.
A-C
31
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
PRIMORDIAL VERANALLIA
In the deepest reaches of Elysium,
the eldest of veranallias roam. These
beings concern themselves with
transformations that take place over
the course of millennia, as well as
changes in the climates of entire
worlds. Primordial veranallias have
an array of unique powers that
can affect the area for many miles
around them, from turning deserts
into glass to triggering earthquakes.
VERANALLIA (REBIRTH AZATA)
Veranallias represent the freedom of life to grow, change, and adapt. They rarely
interact directly with non-azatas, as most other beings find their nature hard to
comprehend, but those who secure their aid find them powerful allies. The lower
half of a veranallia’s body is made of vegetation that constantly repeats a dizzying
cycle of sprouting, blooming, thriving, and wilting. The upper half of their body
appears as that of a humanoid of any gender—it is rare for a veranallia to remain
consistent in their gender for more than a few seasons at a time.
Veranallias transform the landscape in their wake, bringing creation and
destruction alike. The world around them overflows with an abundance of
vegetation, with plenty of food for nearby animals, and when they bring destruction,
they do so without cruelty, as it is sometimes necessary to make room for new life.
They trigger forest fires in woodlands before dry brush piles up to dangerous levels,
and bring bitter winters to areas plagued with parasites that thrive in hot weather.
VERANALLIA CREATURE 20
CG MEDIUM AZATA CELESTIAL
Perception +38; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 120 feet
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; speak with animals, speak with
plants, tongues
Skills Athletics +34, Deception +36, Diplomacy +38, Elysium Lore +36,
Intimidation +36, Medicine +36, Nature +34, Survival +38
Str +8, Dex +6, Con +8, Int +6, Wis +10, Cha +8
Items +3 greater striking sickle
AC 45; Fort +36, Ref +34, Will +38
HP 475; Weaknesses cold iron 20, evil 20; Resistances
fire 20, cold 20
Speed 40 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] sickle +39 (agile, finesse, trip), Damage 3d4+16
slashing plus 4d6 cold and 1d6 good
Melee[one-action] vine +39 (reach 20 feet) Damage 4d12+16 bludgeoning
plus 1d6 good and Improved Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 42, attack +32; 10th
cataclysm, primal phenomenon (once
per year), revival, 9th nature’s enmity,
regenerate (×3), storm of vengeance,
tree stride (at will); 8th polar ray (at will),
sunburst (at will), 6th baleful polymorph
(at will), tangling creepers (at will); Constant
(9th) endure elements, speak with animals,
speak with plants, tongues
Rituals DC 42; awaken animal, blight, commune with
nature, consecrate, plant growth, primal call,
reincarnate
Alter Weather [three-actions] Frequency three times
per day; Effect The veranallia dramatically
alters weather patterns in the surrounding area,
producing any of the results of a successful 9th-level
control weather ritual.
Rebirth (divine, necromancy) Frequency once per day;
Effect The veranallia spends a minute to
encase a creature that has been dead for
no more than a year in a cocoon. After 24
hours, the creature is restored to life, and
the cocoon explodes in a shower of colorful
blossoms. If the veranallia’s chooses, Rebirth can change the
creature’s ancestry or heritage, typically into an aasimar.
Bestiary 2
32
TRAINED DIGGERS
Kobolds and others who dwell in
underground warrens know the
value of having a few trained giant
badgers in their lair, since when
their digging habits are supervised
and directed, they can excavate new
tunnels and chambers with ease. Of
course, the fact that giant badgers
find kobolds and others who dwell
in underground warrens delicious
means that relying on such trained
diggers can be a risky endeavor. A
giant badger trained for use as a
digger or a guardian tends to only
obey the commands of one master,
and even then they can be prone
to unpredictable outbursts for no
reason other than pique.
Badger
The burrowing badger is plentiful in most temperate forests. All badgers are naturally
fierce and tenacious, and their squat stature belies their strength and speed.
BADGER
The typical badger has dark, brownish-gray fur highlighted with white markings,
particularly on the head, giving it a striped mask of fur around its eyes. A
threatened badger can swiftly become a ferocious combatant that typically fights
until slain.
BADGER CREATURE 0
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +6; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +4, Stealth +6
Str +0, Dex +1, Con +2, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 16; Fort +8, Ref +5, Will +6
HP 15
Ferocity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet, burrow 10 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +8, Damage 1d8 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +8 (agile), Damage 1d6 slashing
GIANT BADGER
The violent, territorial giant badger is a relentless predator. An obligate carnivore,
its prey ranges from rabbits to deer, livestock, and even the occasional traveler or
adventurer. A giant badger’s claws are sharp and strong enough to carve tunnels from
solid rock. They typically stand 4 feet tall at the shoulder and weigh 500 pounds.
GIANT BADGER CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +8; low-light vision, scent
(imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +8, Stealth +7
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha –1
AC 18; Fort +10, Ref +6, Will +8
HP 30
Ferocity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet, burrow 10 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +11, Damage 1d8+4 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +11 (agile), Damage 1d6+4 slashing
Badger Rage [one-action] (concentrate, emotion, mental)
The giant badger enters a state of pure
rage that lasts for 1 minute, until there
are no enemies it can perceive, or until it
falls unconscious, whichever comes first.
While raging, the giant badger has AC 17,
its jaws Strike deals 1d8+8 damage,
and its claw Strike deals 1d6+6
damage. While raging, the giant
badger also can’t use actions
that have the concentrate
trait except for Seek.
After it has stopped
raging, a giant
badger can’t use
Badger Rage again for
1 minute.
A-C
33
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
HAUNTING LAIRS
A baobhan sith adores the aesthetics
of abandoned homes, desolate burial
grounds, and crumbling ruins. They
strive to give their lairs a gothic
beauty rather than allowing them to
get run down and filthy.
Baobhan Sith
Undeath is rare in the fey realm of the First World, for that plane’s infusion with the
raw power of life makes undead uncomfortable at best. Yet a few fey have adopted
the vile practices and habits of notorious undead while still being living themselves,
as seen in the blood-drinking habits of the murderous baobhan sith.
A baobhan sith avoids confrontations when outnumbered, and although
territorial, they won’t reveal their true nature to larger groups. They prefer to drink
blood from victims they find attractive, and they avoid drinking blood from animals
and beasts entirely, as they consider such activities to be uncultured.
BAOBHAN SITH CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM FEY
Perception +12; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +15, Deception +15, Nature +12, Performance +15 (+17 when
dancing), Stealth +15
Str +3, Dex +5, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +2, Cha +5
AC 24; Fort +12, Ref +17, Will +14
HP 105; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6+6 slashing and 1d6 persistent
bleed
Primal Innate Spells DC 24; 3rd mind reading (at will)
Captivating Dance[two-actions] (enchantment, incapacitation, mental, primal, visual)
The baobhan sith sways rhythmically and Strides up to their Speed.
Each creature within 30 feet of the baobhan sith at the end of their
movement must attempt a DC 25 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily
immune to Captivating Dance for 24 hours.
Success The creature is slowed 1 for 1 round and
is temporarily immune to Captivating Dance for
24 hours.
Failure The creature is fascinated, and it must spend at
least 1 of its actions on each of its turns to move closer
to the baobhan sith as expediently as possible, while
avoiding obvious dangers. If the creature ends its
movement or turn adjacent to the fey, it is slowed
1 until the end of its next turn.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature must
spend each of its actions moving closer to the baobhan
sith, and if it ends its movement or turn adjacent to
the fey, it is paralyzed until the end of its next turn.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal,
transmutation) The baobhan sith can transform into a
large raven, with the effects from the bird option in the
aerial form spell (Core Rulebook 316).
Drink Blood [one-action] Requirements A bleeding creature is within
the baobhan sith’s reach; Effect The baobhan sith tries to
Drink the Blood from the bleeding creature’s wounds. The
baobhan sith attempts an Athletics check against the victim’s
Fortitude DC. On a success, the victim becomes drained 1 and the
baobhan sith regains 10 HP, gaining any Hit Points in excess of their maximum Hit
Points as temporary Hit Points. Drinking Blood from a victim that’s already drained
doesn’t restore any Hit Points to the baobhan sith but increases the victim’s
drained value by 1. A victim’s drained condition decreases by 1 per week. A blood
transfusion, which requires 10 minutes, a successful DC 20 Medicine check,
and sufficient blood or a blood donor, reduces the drained value by 1.
Bestiary 2
34
HARVESTING SPORES
The psychotropic spores of the
basidirond can be harvested with
a successful DC 20 Herbalism Lore
or Nature check, yielding 1 dose
of spores (1d4 doses on a critical
success); on a critical failure, the
basidirond creates a 10-foot-radius
hallucinogenic cloud. Each dose
is worth 10 gp for use in Crafting
poisons, or 20 gp if the poison causes
the confused or stupefied condition.
Basidirond
The basidirond, also called a mindfrond, is a fungal creature that crawls about on
woody tendrils. The large, bowl-shaped pod atop its body collects mineral-rich
moisture—whether runoff from cave walls or fresh blood—for sustenance. It uses
hallucinogenic spores to incapacitate prey long enough for it to beat its prey to
a bloody pulp, then deposits the deliciously tenderized remains into this pod for
consumption. A basidirond is over 6 feet tall and 3 to 4 feet wide, and weighs
nearly 300 pounds when saturated.
BASIDIROND CREATURE 5
N MEDIUM MINDLESS FUNGUS
Perception +8; low-light vision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +13, Stealth +13
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –3
AC 22; Fort +13, Ref +11, Will +12
HP 80; Immunities cold, mental; Weaknesses slashing 5
Cold Lethargy Although a basidirond is immune to cold damage, any effect that deals
cold damage causes it to become slowed 1 for 1d4 rounds. During this time, it cannot
use its Hallucinogenic Cloud or basidirond spores.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] frond +15, Damage 2d8+6 bludgeoning plus basidirond spores
Basidirond Spores (disease) Saving Throw DC 22 Fortitude; Maximum
Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d8 poison damage and enfeebled 1 (1 round);
Stage 2 1d10 poison damage and enfeebled 1 (1 round);
Stage 3 1d12 poison damage and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
Hallucinogenic Cloud [two-actions] The basidirond releases a
cloud of invisible spores in a 20-foot emanation.
Each creature in the area must succeed
at a DC 22 Fortitude save or experience
powerful hallucinations as long
as it remains in the cloud, plus
an additional 1d4 rounds after
leaving the area. A creature
must attempt a new save each
round it remains within the
area. The cloud persists for 5
rounds unless dispersed before
then by a strong wind. Each
hallucinating creature rolls 1d6
each round to determine what it
hallucinates that round.
1 The target is sinking in quicksand. It falls
prone and spends 1 action on its next turn
flailing its limbs as if attempting to swim.
2 The target is attacked by a swarm of spiders. It spends 2
actions on its next turn attacking the floor with a melee weapon
(drawing a weapon if needed). It is flat-footed against all attacks.
3 An item the target is holding turns into a viper. The
target Releases the item and spends its next turn fleeing
from it.
4 The target is suffocating. It holds its breath and is
stunned 3.
5 The target shrinks to 1/10 its normal size. For 1 round it is
slowed 2 and enfeebled 4, and takes a –10-foot status penalty
to its Speed.
6 The target is melting. It drops everything it’s holding and becomes slowed 2
and clumsy 4 for 1 round.
A-C
35
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DRACONIC HERITAGE
A dracolisk’s favored dwelling place
most closely resembles that of its
dragon parent: black dracolisks
prefer marshlands, blue dracolisks
favor deserts and warm hills, green
dracolisks temperate or warm forests,
red dracolisks warm mountains and
deep caverns, and white dracolisks
glaciers and frozen landscapes.
Basilisk, Dracolisk
Dracolisks are rare magical crossbreeds of chromatic dragons and basilisks. None
now know how they first came to be, but they have proven viable and can breed
with one another as well as with basilisks. While a dracolisk appears much like
a young true dragon of its parent type, its eight legs are an immediate indication
that it is something more. Its coloration varies, depending on the nature of its
draconic ancestry, though it’s lighter on its underside and darker near its wing
tips. A typical dracolisk is 15 feet long and weighs 3,000 pounds.
DRACOLISK CREATURE 9
UNCOMMON N LARGE BEAST DRAGON
Perception +18; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +17, Athletics +21, Stealth +17, Survival +20
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +5, Int –3, Wis +5, Cha +1
AC 28; Fort +20, Ref +17, Will +18
HP 155; Immunities paralyzed, petrified, sleep; Resistances draconic resistance 10
Draconic Resistance A dracolisk has resistance 10 to the type of damage it produces
with its breath weapon (see below).
Petrifying Glance [reaction] (arcane, aura, transmutation, visual) Trigger A creature within 30
feet that the dracolisk can see starts its turn; Effect The target must attempt a DC 26
Fortitude save. If it fails, it becomes slowed 1 for 1 minute as its body stiffens.
Speed 20 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +21, Damage 2d12+8 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +21 (agile), Damage 2d10+8 slashing
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (arcane, evocation) The dracolisk breathes a gout of energy based
on its draconic heritage, as noted below. This breath weapon deals 6d10 damage
of the appropriate type, with a DC 28
basic save of a type indicated in
parenthesis below. The dracolisk
can’t use Breath Weapon again for
1d4 rounds.
Black (acid) 60-foot line of acid (Reflex)
Blue (electricity) 60-foot line of electricity (Reflex)
Green (poison) 30-foot cone of poison (Fortitude)
Red (fire) 30-foot cone of fire (Reflex)
White (cold) 30-foot cone of cold (Reflex)
Petrifying Gaze [two-actions] (arcane, concentrate, incapacitation,
transmutation, visual) The dracolisk stares at a creature it can
see within 30 feet. That creature must attempt
a DC 28 Fortitude save. If it fails and has
not already been slowed by Petrifying
Glance or this ability, it becomes slowed
1. If the creature already was slowed
by this ability or Petrifying Glance, a
failed save causes the creature to be
petrified permanently.
A creature petrified in this
manner can be instantly restored
to flesh by being coated (not just
splashed) with fresh dracolisk or
basilisk blood no more than 1 hour
old. A single dracolisk contains enough blood
to coat 1d4+2 Medium creatures in this manner.
Savage Jaws [two-actions] The dracolisk makes a single Strike with its
jaws. If the attack hits, it deals 4d12+16 piercing damage (versatile S ) .
This counts as two attacks for its multiple attack penalty.
Bestiary 2
36
VENGEFUL BEASTS
Polar bears have been known to take
special interest in those who have
vexed or wounded them, sometimes
following individual hunters back
to their villages and stalking them
exclusively for several days. This
could happen because the hunter
killed the bear’s mate or one of its
cubs, or took prey that the polar
bear had been stalking. Polar bears
engaged in such behavior have even
ignored easier prey to focus intently
on the chosen target.
Bear
Determined foragers and persistent predators, bears spend much of each year
either preparing for hibernation, recovering from hibernation, or taking care of
young following a successful opportunity to mate.
BLACK BEAR
Contrary to the name, black bears can be cinnamon or even blond in coloration,
depending on which hue is most beneficial for surviving in their local environment.
Regardless of their coloration, they are opportunistic eaters who gain sustenance
from berries and nuts just as often as from fish and smaller mammals. They
steal food when they find it, including from humanoid camps. Although they are
predators, black bears are more timid than other bears. Unless defending themselves
or their young, black bears often avoid conflict or fight only until they can retreat.
BLACK BEAR CREATURE 2
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +8; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +9, Survival +7
Str +3, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –2
AC 18; Fort +11, Ref +8, Will +5
HP 32
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +9, Damage 1d8+5 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +9 (agile), Damage 1d6+5 slashing plus Grab
Mauler The black bear gains +1 circumstance bonus to damage rolls against creatures it
has grabbed.
POLAR BEAR
Polar bears are known for their pale fur, with black eyes, lips,
and toe pads. They are aggressively predatory creatures,
stalking prey for miles on land or across the icy
waters of frozen oceans. They are also amazing
ambush predators, leaping from the water to
ambush seals resting on ice floes. If they are
desperate, polar bears hunt not only other
animals but also humanoids.
POLAR BEAR CREATURE 5
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +12; low-light vision,
scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Athletics +14, Stealth +10 (+14 in
icy or snowy areas), Survival +10
Str +5, Dex +1, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –1
AC 22; Fort +14, Ref +10, Will +10
HP 73
Speed 35 feet, swim 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +15, Damage 2d8+7
piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +15 (agile), Damage
2d6+7 slashing plus Grab
Sneak Attack The polar bear’s Strikes
deal an additional 1d6 precision
damage to flat-footed creatures.
Mauler The polar bear gains a +3
circumstance bonus to damage rolls
against creatures it has grabbed.
A-C
37
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ADAPTIVE HUNTERS
Though it doesn’t happen often due
to their ability to shift planes, some
bebiliths find themselves trapped on
other planes either through magical
binding or subjugation to beings of
great power. While trapped away
from their favored prey, a bebilith’s
hungers can shift. In such cases, the
creature’s penetrating strikes can
adapt—a bebilith trapped in Elysium,
for example, might become a hunter
of azatas, and its Penetrating Strike
would count as cold iron and evil
instead so that it could target
traditional azata weaknesses.
Bebilith
While demons control much of the Abyss, even they are hunted in the wilder
regions of this horrific plane. The most notorious of these predators—though not
the deadliest—is the bebilith. These fiends resemble elephant-sized spiders with
glowing eyes, barbed chitin, and a fanged maw dripping caustic fluid.
Many demons and planar travelers have underestimated bebiliths’ devious
intellects, believing them to be little more than oversized vermin. Bebiliths take
advantage of this, ambushing foes with unexpected tactics. While they lash out
at any creatures they encounter, they take great pleasure in chewing on demonic
flesh. Qlippoth are the only creatures bebiliths never consume.
BEBILITH CREATURE 10
CE HUGE BEAST FIEND
Perception +21; darkvision, scent demons 60 feet, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Abyssal (can’t speak any language); telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +19, Athletics +23, Intimidation +21, Stealth +19
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +6, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +5
Scent Demons A bebilith can smell demons as a precise sense.
AC 30; Fort +22, Ref +19, Will +19
HP 200; Weaknesses good 10
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 35 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+13 piercing plus
Abyssal rot
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d8+13
slashing
Ranged [one-action] web +23 (range increment 60 feet), Effect dimensional
tether
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 7th plane shift (self only)
Abyssal Rot (disease, necromancy) The drained
condition from Abyssal rot is cumulative, to
a maximum of drained 4; Saving Throw DC
29 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds;
Stage 1 3d6 negative damage (1 round);
Stage 2 3d6 negative damage and
drained 1 (1 round); Stage 3 3d6
negative damage and drained 2
(1 round)
Dimensional Tether A creature
hit by the bebilith’s web Strike
is restrained and tethered to
the bebilith, preventing it from
moving further away from the
bebilith. The restrained creature
is also under the effects of a
dimensional anchor spell (DC 29)
with a duration that lasts as long as
the creature remains tethered. The
bebilith can have only one creature
tethered at a time. The DC to Escape
or Force Open the tether is 29. The
tether can be severed with a Strike
(AC 20, Hardness 2, HP 20); this ends
the dimensional anchor effect but does
not free the restrained creature.
Penetrating Strike Against demons, a bebilith’s
Strikes count as cold iron and good.
Bestiary 2
38
HATRED OF DRAGONS
Some scholars have speculated
that behirs are somehow related to
blue dragons, citing their reptilian
features, lightning breath, and ability
to speak the Draconic language,
but such scholars would do well
to keep such opinions from behirs
they encounter in the field. Nothing
infuriates a behir faster than likening
it to a dragon!
Behir
The behir is a massive, serpentine beast with never fewer than a dozen short
legs, each ending in three hooked talons. A behir can live to 80 years, but most
perish far younger to violence. Fully grown, a behir is 40 feet long and weighs
4,000 pounds.
BEHIR CREATURE 8
N HUGE BEAST ELECTRICITY
Perception +17; darkvision
Languages Draconic
Skills Acrobatics +16, Athletics +19, Intimidation +18, Stealth +18, Survival +15
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +5, Int -2, Wis +3, Cha +4
AC 27; Fort +19, Ref +16, Will +15
HP 140; Immunities electricity
Speed 30 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +18 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+10 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +18 (agile), Damage 2d6+10 slashing
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (electricity, evocation, primal) The behir breathes lightning that
deals 9d6 electricity damage in an 60-foot line (DC 27 basic Reflex save). It can’t use
Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Claw Storm[three-actions]The behir Strides up to its Speed, during which it can
walk on air as if it were solid ground, ascending or descending at
up to a 45-degree angle. It can make up to four claw
Strikes at any point during this movement,
each against a different target
within reach, and it deals an
extra 1d6 electricity damage
with each Strike. These attacks
count toward the behir’s multiple
attack penalty, but the multiple
attack penalty doesn’t increase until
after the behir makes all of its attacks.
If the behir moves half its Speed or less
during a Claw Storm, that movement doesn’t
trigger reactions. The behir can’t use Claw
Storm if it has a creature wrapped in its coils.
At the end of Claw Storm, it drifts downward up
to 60 feet to the ground, landing softly and taking
no damage from the fall. If it descends further
than 60 feet, it takes damage normally
from the remaining fall.
Constrict [one-action] 2d6+7 bludgeoning,
DC 27
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack)
Large, 2d12+7 bludgeoning,
Rupture 21
Wrap in Coils [one-action]
Requirements The behir
has a creature either
restrained or grabbed in
its jaws; Effect The behir
moves the creature into its
coils, freeing its jaws. The
creature remains grabbed
and takes 1d6+6 slashing
damage. The behir’s coils can hold as many
creatures as will fit in its space.
A-C
39
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SIGNAL LIGHTS
To communicate at a distance,
blindheims flash their eye lights in
specific patterns. This is instinctual,
not truly a language, and blindheims
are incapable of inventing new
signals. Some underground explorers
use lanterns to ape these signals.
Two Quick Flashes: Danger!
Long Pulse: All is safe.
Two Long Pulses: Captured food.
Very Long Pulse: Come here.
Rapid Strobing: Let’s mate!
Intermittent Quick Flashes: Excited!
One Long Flash, then Darkness: Sad.
Blindheim
Inhabitants of damp, subterranean caves, blindheims resemble stubby humanoids
with oversized, frog-like heads and bulbous eyes. Their eyes emit a soft glow at all
times, but a blindheim can draw back the heavy membrane that normally covers
them to emit an intense light as bright as day. These simple creatures use their
lights to draw in or disorient prey, mostly small animals like lizards, rodents, or
fish. However, they might go after larger prey if trying to feed their young. When
they encounter creatures their own size or larger they retreat, flashing their eyes to
facilitate their escape if necessary. They often hunt in pairs or small packs. Using
their lights to coordinate from a distance, they slowly close in on the creatures
they hunt. One common hunting pattern involves one blindheim diving deep and
using its light to chase fish to the surface, while another up above snatches them
up and tosses them onto the land to eat later.
Blindheims make their nests in damp caverns, especially grottoes next to
underground lakes or bogs. An ideal nest rests in a cozy cavern with plenty of
fungus to eat, a few fish swimming in a lake, and the comforting drip of water
from the ceiling. Blindheims prefer to lead quiet and serene lives, and even when
first born they emit only the meekest of vocalizations. A blindheim is born shining,
and its parents cuddle over it to dim the light so as to avoid attracting predators.
It’s not just animals that endanger blindheims. Underground peoples find the
creatures useful and attempt to capture them for specialized purposes. Duergars
use them as “raid frogs,” placing heavy hoods over blindheims’ heads
and revealing them suddenly during raids to blind their foes. They
sometimes send the creatures along with their slaves that lack
darkvision into the mines as a source of light. Drow use them for
some of these same purposes, and some nobles have been known
to treat the creatures as mere lanterns, having them hoisted to the
ceilings of their halls. Neither duergars nor drow take good care
of the captive creatures, so blindheims rarely last long in captivity.
BLINDHEIM CREATURE 2
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +9; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +6 (+9 to Leap or Swim), Stealth +7
Str +2, Dex +3, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –2
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +9, Will +5
HP 27; Immunities blinded, light
Speed 25 feet, climb 15 feet, swim 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +10, Damage 1d12+2 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +11 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d8+2 slashing
Spotlight [one-action] (concentrate, light) Bright light shines from
the blindheim’s eyes in a 30-foot emanation (also
creating dim light to 60 feet). Each creature
in the bright light when the blindheim
uses this action, or who enters it
while the light continues, must attempt
a DC 18 Fortitude save. It is then temporarily
immune for 1 hour. This light remains until
the blindheim dims its eyes by using this
action again.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is dazzled for
1 round.
Failure The creature is blinded
for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Failure The creature
is blinded for 1 hour.
Bestiary 2
40
BLINK DOG SAGES
In every blink dog pack, the wisest
and most intelligent member of
the pack is chosen by the alpha to
act as the pack’s sage. The sage is
charged with maintaining the longrunning oral histories and tales of
the pack, to bind all packs together
in one story that spans centuries.
The sage often has a closer bond to
the mysteries and hidden paths of
magic than the average blink dog, a
result of their advanced years. They
counsel the alpha on all matters
pertaining to the stars, omens,
tactics, and even diplomacy.
Blink Dog
At first glance, blink dogs seem to be little more than long-eared, bearded canines
with tawny coats. Yet their intelligent eyes and the blue nimbus of energy that
dances across their fur hint at not only the blink dog’s inherent intelligence, but
also of their connection to the occult energies and mysteries that hide beyond the
sight of the untrained eye. These honorable creatures are as intelligent as most
humanoids. They live and hunt in large packs, roaming forests, plains, and the
hidden places of the world in hunt for evil creatures—particularly those that dwell
in the depths of the Ethereal Plane.
Unless acting in concert with specific allies who have proven that their goals
are shared, blink dogs tend to avoid other creatures if at all possible. Their packs
are constantly on the move and hidden from those that would seek them out.
But in times of need, they have been known to come to the rescue of villages and
lost travelers. While they have no innate ability to travel to the Ethereal Plane for
extended periods of time, all blink dogs constantly shimmer and ripple between
the Material Plane and the Ethereal. They do their best to use their ability to blink
to snatch glimpses into the Ethereal Plane and keep track of potential threats that
might be building there, but in practice this tactic yields more of a constant stream
of hunches and estimations of Ethereal-based threats. Of course, to a blink dog,
this constant state of flux is as natural as breathing.
Pack leadership always falls to a pair—an elder blink dog (called
an alpha) who relies upon the valued guidance of a trusted
pack mate (the sage). Honor and tradition are keystones of
blink dog society. They are fiercely loyal, defending
the pack or creatures they befriend to the
death and maintaining oaths handed
down from litter to litter. Though
different packs hold different traditions
and oaths, their connection through
the tales and stories told among their
kind and the shared experience of the
movement of stars above weave all blink
dogs into an extended family, a great pack. Through
their myths and folklore, blink dogs have names for
celestial phenomena, note births under auspicious stars,
and read omens from unusual
stellar conjunctions. These
celestial signs are woven into
blink dogs’ lifeways; their names
contain a reference to the specific
constellation under which they were born, and a pack’s sage
watches the heavens for signs to help them decide when a pup is
old enough for their first hunt.
BLINK DOG CREATURE 2
UNCOMMON LG MEDIUM BEAST
Perception +8; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +8, Stealth +8, Survival +8
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +4, Cha +2
AC 18, Fort +8, Ref +10, Will +11
HP 30
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws (agile, finesse) +11, Damage 1d6+3 piercing
Occult Innate Spells DC 18, 4th dimension door; Constant (4th) blink
Pack Attack The blink dog’s Strikes deal an additional 1d4 damage to creatures within
the reach of at least two of the blink dog’s allies.
A-C
41
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
BLODEUWEDDS AND NYMPHS
Nymphs often think of blodeuwedds
as uncouth or too wild, while the
reverse holds true for blodeuwedds,
who consider nymphs to be spoiled
and pampered “princesses” who
take the beautiful parts of the world
in which they dwell for granted. It
speaks volumes to blodeuwedds’
strength of personality that they
don’t let these bitter emotions
control them. Very few of their kind
drift into actual evil—yet likewise,
very few of them display the
kindness that nymphs do.
Blodeuwedd
The mysterious blodeuwedds dwell in those parts of the world where the
boundaries between the Material Plane and the First World have worn thin, or
around portals between the two planes. Their link with such regions of the natural
world is so strong that it rivals the bond shared between nymphs and places of
great natural beauty, yet none would look upon a blodeuwedd and mistake them
for something as elegant as a nymph.
Although blodeuwedds share certain traits with nymphs, their role as guardians
of the pathways between this world and the First World prevents them from
forming as powerful a magical bond with the natural world. Never truly a part
of either reality yet forced to keep watch over both, blodeuwedds tend to grow
cynical and sharp-tongued toward any who would seek travel from one realm to
the other, regardless of their actual goals.
BLODEUWEDD CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON CN MEDIUM FEY PLANT
Perception +14; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan; speak with plants
Skills Acrobatics +15, Diplomacy +15, Nature +13, Performance +15,
Stealth +13 (+17 in grasslands), Survival +11
Str +4, Dex +5, Con +2, Int +3, Wis +2, Cha +5
Items +1 sling
Allergen Aura (aura, primal) A blodeuwedd exudes a 30-foot
aura of pollen and irritating allergens. A non-plant living
creature that begins its turn in the aura must succeed at
a DC 22 Fortitude save or become sickened 2. A creature
that succeeds at its save is then temporarily
immune to the allergen aura for 24 hours. A
blodeuwedd can suppress this aura or activate
it again as a free action.
Wild Empathy The blodeuwedd can use Diplomacy
to Make an Impression on and make very simple
Requests of animals.
AC 24; Fort +12, Ref +17, Will +14
HP 105; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +14 (agile), Damage 2d8+7
slashing
Ranged [one-action] sling +17 (propulsive, range increment 50 feet),
Damage 2d6+4 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 25; 4th hallucinatory terrain, modify
memory, sleep; 3rd wall of thorns; 2nd entangle (×3); Cantrips (4th)
dancing lights, tanglefoot; Constant (4th) speak with plants
Change Shape [two-actions] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) A
blodeuwedd can take on the appearance of a single unique humanoid or the
form of a prairie owl. When in humanoid form, the blodeuwedd loses its claw
attack. In owl form, its statistics change as follows: Size Small; Speed fly 60
feet; Melee [one-action] talons +15, Damage 1d3+1.
A blodeuwedd can return to their normal form as a free action.
Living Footsteps Every Stride action taken by a blodeuwedd causes small plants,
grasses, and wildflowers to sprout from the ground, though they can suppress this
effect if they desire. In a region or terrain that wouldn’t normally support
plant life, these plants thrive for 1 minute before withering away.
Nature’s Infusion[two-actions]Frequency once per day; Effect While surrounded
by any field or fertile plain, a blodeuwedd can infuse themself with
borrowed life energy from nearby plants and nutrients in the ground. The blodeuwedd
gains 15 temporary Hit Points that last for 1 hour.
Bestiary 2
42
Bodak
When a living, sentient humanoid is exposed to an extreme expression of
supernatural evil, the experience can irrevocably damn the victim, crushing their
mind and ripping out their soul in an appalling, unholy transformation that results
in a creature that’s anathema to life—the bodak.
The shreds of physicality that survive this absolute corruption serve only to
enhance the humanoid’s profoundly disturbing appearance. The bodak’s body
is horrifically twisted, as though it’s locked in a convulsion of agony and terror.
Its desiccated and hairless flesh bears an otherworldly, pearlescent sheen, strung
taut across a malformed skeleton that reduces its gait to a slow shamble. But
most disturbing of all are its eyes, set in a
drooping, melted visage with scant remains of
its former facial structure. These eyes, sunken
deep into their sockets, nevertheless glow with an
unholy light, stare with unremitting malevolence,
and constantly weep noxious vapor.
Fragmented memories of a prior existence filtered
through a vengeful hatred of the living lead the bodak to
try to return to those places it once knew. If successful,
it assaults former friends, acquaintances, and loved
ones with its murderous gaze and an incomprehensible
torrent of gibberish laced with vile curses, accusations, and
threats—an assault that often leads to the victims rising as
newly formed bodaks themselves.
BODAK CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM UNDEAD
Perception +17; darkvision, lifesense 60 feet
Languages Abyssal, Common
Skills Acrobatics +18, Athletics +15, Intimidation +19, Stealth +18
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +1, Int -2, Wis +5, Cha +5
AC 27; Fort +13, Ref +16, Will +19
HP 160, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed,
poison, unconscious; Weaknesses good 10
Sunlight Vulnerability If exposed to direct sunlight, the bodak can’t use
actions with the death trait and it becomes slowed 1. The slowed value
increases by 1 each time the bodak ends its turn in sunlight. If the bodak
loses all its actions this way, it is destroyed.
Draining Glance[reaction](aura, death, necromancy, occult, visual) Trigger A living
creature within 30 feet that the bodak can perceive with its lifesense
starts its turn; Effect The target must attempt a DC 23 Fortitude save. If
it fails, the bodak regains 5 Hit Points and the target becomes drained 1.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +18 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6+6 bludgeoning plus 1d6 negative
Bodak Spawn (necromancy, occult) Any humanoid who dies while drained or doomed by
a bodak rises as an autonomous bodak 24 hours after its death.
Death Gaze[two-actions] (death, necromancy, occult, visual) The bodak stares at a living creature
within 30 feet that it can sense with its lifesense. That creature must attempt a
DC 26 Fortitude save. If the target becomes drained, the bodak gains a number of
temporary Hit Points equal to 5 times the value of the drained condition the target
gained. Multiple exposures to this ability can increase a creature’s drained condition
to a maximum of 4. If the bodak is destroyed, any doomed condition a creature has
gained from Death Gaze are removed.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is drained 1.
Failure The creature is doomed 1 and drained 2.
Critical Failure The creature is doomed 1 and drained 4.
BODAK CREATION
The rarity of the events that create
bodaks ensure that most of these
abominations were humanoids slain
by another bodak’s gaze. Yet bodaks
can also be brought into being by
a rare version of the create undead
ritual. This horrific ritual emulates an
encounter of absolute, supernatural
evil, and so the spell must begin
when the subject is alive and located
on one of the evil Outer Planes. 
A-C
43
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Bog Strider
The insectile bog striders call themselves seshes, but they take no offense at those
who use the more common vernacular to refer to them. They resemble upright
water striders with four legs, two arms, and powerful mandibles. Bog striders
can move about on water like solid ground, chasing down prey or fleeing from
predators across the water. They rarely leave the swampy rivers and lakes they
call home. Bog striders stand 5 feet tall and weigh approximately 150 pounds.
A bog strider’s diet consists almost entirely of meat, but they prefer to feed
only on animals, as they consider the consumption of the flesh of any sapient
creature a taboo.
In sesh society, each individual is expected to serve equally in all efforts to
ensure the society’s survival against the more aggressive creatures often found
in or near their swampland homes. In addition, each member of the community
is expected to develop a skill that contributes to the community’s prosperity,
and by extension, the continued survival of the species. Traditionally, female
bog striders are builders and artisans while males are hunters and gatherers, but
often such roles aren’t limited to a single gender, as every member of a small
community pitches in to help as they can.
BOG STRIDER CREATURE 2
UNCOMMON N MEDIUM ABERRATION
Perception +8; darkvision, wavesense 120 feet
Languages Aquan
Skills Athletics +8 (+10 to Leap while Water Striding or Swimming), Stealth +8,
Survival +8
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +0
Items net, spear
Deep Breath A bog strider can hold their breath for
2 hours.
AC 18; Fort +8, Ref +10, Will +8
HP 30
Speed 25 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] spear +8, Damage 1d6+4 piercing
Melee [one-action] mandibles +8 (agile), Damage 1d6+4 piercing
Ranged [one-action] spear +10 (thrown 20 feet), Damage 1d6+3 piercing
Hurl Net [one-action] Requirements The bog strider is holding a net in
two hands; Effect The bog strider hurls their net to hamper a
foe. They make a ranged Strike (with a +10 modifier) against
a Medium or smaller creature within 20 feet. On
a hit, the target is flat-footed and takes a
–10-foot circumstance penalty to its Speeds.
On a critical hit, the creature is instead
restrained. The DC to Escape the net is 16. A
creature adjacent to the target can Interact
with the net to remove it from the target.
Water Sprint[three-actions] The bog strider Strides
up to three times in a straight line across
smooth water. They can make a single
Strike against a creature at the end of
this movement.
Water Stride The bog strider can stand
and move on the surface of water
or other liquids without
falling through. The bog
strider can go underwater if
they wish, but they must
Swim to do so.
TREMOR TAPPING
Seshes can communicate with other
bog striders via wavesense by
tapping at a water surface they’re
standing upon. Other creatures with
wavesense can detect these tappings,
but understanding them is typically
beyond non-seshes. A GM might
allow a character who has wavesense,
can speak Aquan, and spends a
significant amount of time living
among bog striders to understand
tremor tapping or to communicate via
this unusual method.
Bestiary 2
44
BROWNIE BARGAINS
As they are not a monolithic group
of fey and often have their own
proclivities, it’s sometimes hard to
predict what might attract a brownie
or ensure their aid. One of the more
commonly thought gifts is a saucer
of milk or cream, though brownies
seem to enjoy other edible treats.
Some farmers have reported success
in leaving shiny but inconsequential
knickknacks like buttons, polished
and painted stones, smoothed glass,
thimbles, or silver flatware. The
whims of some brownies shift, so
someone who wants to retain the
services of a brownie should vary
the gifts they leave for these elusive
fey creatures.
Brownie
Brownies make their homes in the trunks of hollow trees, small earthy burrows,
and even under porches or within the crawl spaces of farmhouses. Often attired in
clothes that appear to be made of plants or leaves, brownies wear belts lined with
pouches and tools. Whatever language they choose to speak is often is riddled
with odd pronunciations and colloquialisms. Their manner of speaking might
call upon turns of phrase that are decades or even centuries out of vogue, for
example, or they might mix up their metaphors in strange ways. It almost seems
as if brownies adopt these quirky ways of speaking intentionally—certainly they
do not react favorably to corrections to their chatter. There’s often no swifter way
to annoy a brownie than to try to correct its grammar. Brownies stand barely 2
feet tall and weigh about 20 pounds.
When facing danger, brownies rarely engage in combat, preferring instead to
confound and confuse their attackers in order to buy enough time for escape.
Content with honest toil and the love of their kin, brownies maintain a pacifist
nature, harassing creatures only to run them off or punish them for an insult.
Despite this nature, all brownies carry a blade. They refer to their swords with a
hint of disgust, and jokingly call their blades their “final trick,” reserving their use
for the direst of circumstances.
Honest to a fault, brownies take freely but always repay their debt through
work or leave something behind as an offering. They may eat an apple from
a farmer’s orchard but harvest the entire tree as repayment. A brownie might
eat an entire pie left on a windowsill, only to straighten up the kitchen or wash
the dishes. A brownie can share a home with a family for years and years while
avoiding detection. A family that is aware of a brownie in their midst usually finds
this a beneficial relationship and leaves dishes of milk, pieces of fruit, trinkets, and
sometimes even wine as gifts. In exchange, the resident brownie keeps the home
clean, mends clothes, repairs tools, and shoos away vermin and small predators.
Bragging about having a brownie in the house is the best way to lose one.
Brownies distrust foxes and fear wolves, and they avoid farms with dogs.
BROWNIE CREATURE 1
N TINY FEY
Perception +7; low-light vision
Languages Common, Elven, Gnomish, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +7, Crafting +5, Deception +6, Stealth +9
Str –2, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +3
Items shortsword
AC 16; Fort +4, Ref +9, Will +9
HP 25; Weaknesses cold iron 3
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] shortsword +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6
Primal Innate Spells DC 17; 4th dimension door (self only); 3rd mending; 1st
ventriloquism; Cantrips (4th) dancing lights, prestidigitation
Baffling Bluff [two-actions] (emotion, enchantment, mental, primal) The brownie’s
antics can confuse and disorient a creature. When the brownie uses
Baffling Bluff, it targets a single creature within 30 feet; that creature must
attempt a DC 17 Will save. The target is temporarily immune to Baffling Bluff
for 1 minute.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target is fooled momentarily and is flat-footed against the
next melee Strike the brownie makes against it before the end of
the brownie’s next turn.
Failure The target is confused for 1 round.
Critical Failure The target is confused for 1 minute. It can
attempt a new save at the end of each of its turns to end the
confused condition.
A-C
45
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
VENGEFUL FLOWERS
Calathgar cuttings are greatly desired
in warmer lands, yet horticulturalists
often fail to realize that calathgars
are sapient, mobile, and vengeful
against those who prune their leaves
or take cuttings. These feral flowers
understand the speech of forest
denizens and often shift and move
their groves when they sense danger
approaching. They protect their
immature and immobile offspring,
and if they discover a garden of their
young has been despoiled, they track
down the perpetrators to unleash a
flurry of vengeance upon them.
Calathgar
Calathgars are mysterious predatory plants that grow in the depths of the densest
frozen forests, realms where icicles rarely melt from snow-cloaked trees. A
calathgar’s blue flowers grow from 3 to 5 feet across (with specimens as wide
as 10 feet reported), while the plant itself stands just under 4 feet in height and
weighs up to 50 pounds when heavy with seeds.
Calathgars’ psyches are alien to most sapient creatures. They have little interest
in emotion, culture, or ambition, yet they have nearly flawless memories and can
share experiences with other calathgars by scent (perceptible to other creatures as
a vinegary odor that may reveal their presence) as easily as humanoids can pass on
information by speech. While calathgars themselves can’t speak, they can typically
be reasoned with—though like most protective parents, an incensed calathgar
defending its young is rarely in a mood to listen.
CALATHGAR CREATURE 4
N SMALL COLD PLANT
Perception +10; darkvision, scent 30 feet
Languages Sylvan (can’t speak)
Skills Stealth +13, Survival +10
Str +2, Dex +5, Con +2, Int –2, Wis +2, Cha +2
AC 21; Fort +10, Ref +13, Will +10
HP 75; Immunities cold; Weaknesses fire 5, slashing 5
Cold Healing Calathgars are healed by cold. Anytime a calathgar would take cold
damage, it instead regains 1d6 Hit Points (regardless of the amount of damage the
cold effect would have caused). In severe cold or colder environments (Core Rulebook
518), calathgars gain fast healing 1.
Mold Mulch When a calathgar is reduced to 0 Hit Points, it immediately decays
and dies, transforming into a 5-foot patch of mold (or a 10-foot patch of mold
if it was killed by fire damage). This patch of mold persists for 1 minute,
during which time it deals 3d6 cold damage to any creature that begins its
turn in this area, or 1d6 cold damage to any creature that begins its turn
in an adjacent square. The mold patch decays away after an
hour, but it can be destroyed before then (treat each 5-foot
square as an object with Hardness 0, 10 Hit Points,
BT 5, immunity to cold, piercing,
and slashing damage;
the mold deals half its
regular cold damage once
it’s broken).
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] flower +13 (finesse),
Damage 2d6+4 bludgeoning
plus 1d6 cold
Melee [one-action] tendril +13 (agile,
finesse), Damage 2d4+4
slashing plus 1d4 cold
Seed Spray [two-actions] (cold, evocation,
primal) The calathgar expels
thorny, frozen seeds in a 15-foot
cone, dealing 1d6 piercing and
4d6 cold damage (DC 20 basic
Reflex save). In mild cold or colder
environments (Core Rulebook 518),
these seeds cling to living creatures
they strike, dealing 1d4 persistent
cold damage. The calathgar can’t
use Seed Spray again for 1d4 rounds.
Bestiary 2
46
CALIGNI SLAYER TRINKETS
Slayers obsess over magical trinkets,
coveting them above all else.
They often have a consumable or
permanent item of use in combat,
such as a scroll, wand, or talisman.
Unfortunately, their incessant
tinkering and fiddling often leaves
their treasures broken or depleted.
Caligni Slayer
Caligni slayers possess greater occult talents than others of their kind. In most other
calignis, the power bartered from the long-lost demigods known as the Forsaken
merely burns within. But in caligni slayers, this power is a deep and terrible hunger.
Slayers embrace their evil impulses as a result, and they seek to feed on others with
their soul harvest ability to keep this supernatural hunger sated. Slayers denied
the opportunity to feed descend into paranoia and, eventually, murderous rage.
Delayed feeding improves but never fully restores their composure and patience.
Perhaps the greatest manifestation of a slayer’s hunger appears at the moment of
their death. Upon its last breath, a slayer collapses into itself in a violent, lightless
implosion, rather than the blinding eruption of other calignis’ deaths, consuming
the body itself in a final attempt at satiation.
Slayers view themselves as the cleverest and most gifted of the calignis. They seethe
with ill-concealed envy at the position of power caligni stalkers occupy (Pathfinder
Bestiary 51), ever scheming to displace them and claim that power for their own.
For their part, stalkers tolerate these machinations as an acceptable price for the
talents slayers contribute to an enclave. If necessary, any slayer who grows too
ambitious can become a brave sacrifice in battle, for the good of the enclave.
In physical stature, slayers fall between the willowy caligni dancers
and the diminutive creepers. Stalkers tower above most slayers—yet
another source of slayers’ envy and resentment.
CALIGNI SLAYER CREATURE 3
UNCOMMON CE SMALL CALIGNI HUMANOID
Perception +8, greater darkvision
Languages Caligni, Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +9, Arcana +10, Athletics +7, Occultism +10, Stealth +10
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +2, Wis +0, Cha +2
Items black smear poison (2 doses; see below), kukri
Light Blindness
AC 19; Fort +9, Ref +12, Will +6
HP 45; death implosion
Death Implosion (sonic) When the caligni slayer dies, their body implodes
violently into nothingness, dealing 3d10 sonic damage to creatures
in a 10-foot burst. Each creature in the area must attempt a DC 20
Fortitude save. The slayer’s gear and treasure are unaffected by the
implosion and are left in a pile where they died.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage.
Failure The creature takes full damage and is deafened for 1 minute.
Critical Failure The creature takes double damage and is deafened for 24 hours.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] kukri +11 (agile, finesse, trip), Damage 1d6+3 slashing plus black
smear poison
Occult Innate Spells DC 20, attack +12; 2nd darkness (at will), death knell,
phantom pain, spectral hand; Cantrips (2nd) chill touch, daze, detect
magic, shield
Black Smear Poison (poison) Saving Throw DC 16 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison damage and
enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 As stage 1; Stage 3 1d6 poison
damage and enfeebled 2 (1 round). See Pathfinder Bestiary 51
for full details on this alchemical poison.
Call to Blood[two-actions] (enchantment, mental, occult) Each caligni within 30 feet
gains a +2 status bonus to attack rolls against flat-footed creatures.
This bonus lasts for 1 minute.
Soul Harvest (necromancy) The caligni slayer deals an additional 2d6
negative damage to flat-footed creatures.
A-C
47
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
CARBUNCLE CHATTER
“A lizard with an apple-sized
gem sticking out of its forehead?
Wishful thinking!”
“Carbuncles are real! I almost
caught one, but even though it
could barely walk, its magic allowed
it to escape my clutches.”
“Their mind control powers could
make them useful familiars, but if
you ever catch one, it dies of fright.”
“My advice is to stay away from
these pests. They drink your hopes
and aspirations through their horns,
leaving you empty except for bad
luck and bellyaches.”
“Planning a carbuncle hunt?
You’d better leave your self-respect
at home, and be ready to emerge
with fewer friends than you had at
the start!”
Carbuncle
Never have legend and misinformation met upon a more inauspicious brow than
that of the lowly carbuncle. At first glance, carbuncles appear to be little more
than ungainly reptiles. What sets them apart is their strange magical abilities and
the gemstone-like horn protruding from between their goggling eyes. Although
rumors suggest various uses for carbuncle horns, ranging from miracle cure-alls to
potent magical components, the truth is much more mundane: a carbuncle’s horn
is merely a highly reflective growth, not unlike a fingernail.
CARBUNCLE CREATURE 1
RARE N TINY BEAST
Perception +7; darkvision
Languages carbuncle empathy 30 feet
Skills Stealth +3 (+7 in grass or undergrowth), Survival +6
Str –3, Dex +0, Con +3, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +0
Carbuncle Empathy The carbuncle can telepathically send mild feelings and sensations
to nearby creatures. It can’t use this ability to communicate in language or hinder a
target, but it might convey a feeling of dread or the scent of food cooking nearby.
AC 16; Fort +8, Ref +3, Will +6
HP 20
Easy to Influence Any mental spell can affect a carbuncle, regardless of creature type
limitations. Against a suggestion spell, a carbuncle always gets an outcome one degree
of success worse than it rolled on its saving throw.
Fatal Faker [reaction] (arcane, conjuration, teleportation) Trigger The carbuncle takes damage;
Effect The carbuncle feigns death by teleporting away and leaving a replica of
its corpse behind, creating a colorful flash of light and a croaking sound. The real
carbuncle transports to a clear space within 30 feet that it can see, and a hollow
shell remains behind. The fake body appears solid until it is touched, at which point
it crumbles to dust.
Speed 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +5 (finesse), Damage 1d6 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 18; 3rd levitate (at
will, self only); 1st jump (at will); Cantrips
(1st) daze
Specious Suggestion [two-actions] (enchantment,
incapacitation, mental) Frequency three
times per day; Effect The carbuncle
concentrates on a creature it can see and
tries to manipulate that creature. The
target must attempt a DC 18 Will save.
The target then becomes temporarily
immune for 24 hours.
Critical Success The attempt backfires
and bolsters the target’s mind instead,
granting it a +1 status bonus to Will
saving throws for 1 hour.
Success The target briefly experiences an
unusual but harmless sensation like an
unexpected flavor or scent, an urge to eat
something strange, or an amusing half-forgotten memory.
Failure The target is compelled to spend all of its actions
on its next turn performing harmless, pointless, and
usually embarrassing actions.
Critical Failure As failure, but the compulsion
persists for 1 minute. The target can attempt
a new save at the end of its turn each round
to end the effect.
Bestiary 2
48
CATOBLEPAS NESTS
A catoblepas den is an awful place
indeed—a filthy nest composed
of piles of decaying vegetation,
half-finished or half-digested meals
of decaying animals, never-quite-dry
banks of mud, and tangles of thorny
branches. Worse, the catoblepas’s
stink infuses such a site, imposing
the beast’s ungodly stench upon
those who would explore and search
within for treasure. A catoblepas
nest can retain its stink in this way
for up to a week after it’s been
abandoned by its foul denizen.
Catoblepas
The catoblepas is an aggressive beast at the best of times. Though it prefers swamps,
the catoblepas has been know to forage in plains and forests for short periods,
leaving behind hunting grounds tainted by its foul breath and noxious waste that
other predators and prey alike avoid for days or even weeks thereafter. The catoblepas
bullies those creatures it believes are a match for it, and eats everything weaker.
A catoblepas is 15 feet long and weighs 2,200 pounds.
CATOBLEPAS CREATURE 12
CE LARGE BEAST
Perception +22; darkvision
Languages Aklo
Skills Athletics +25, Intimidation +20, Stealth +22 (+24 in swamps), Survival +20
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +6, Int –2, Wis +4, Cha +2
Stench (aura, olfactory) 30 feet. A creature entering the aura or starting its turn in
the aura must succeed at a DC 30 Fortitude save or become sickened 1 (plus slowed
1 for as long as itʼs sickened on a critical failure). While within the aura, affected
creatures take a –2 circumstance penalty to saves against disease and to recover
from the sickened condition. A creature that succeeds at its save is temporarily
immune for 1 minute.
AC 33; Fort +24, Ref +20, Will +22
HP 215; Immunities disease, poison, olfactory
Ferocity [reaction]
Speed 35 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +25 (magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d10+13 piercing
Melee [one-action] antler +25 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d12+13 piercing
Melee [one-action] hoof +23 (magical), Damage 3d10+11 bludgeoning
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (necromancy, poison, primal) The catoblepas breathes a 60-foot
cone of horrid fumes, dealing 13d6 poison damage (DC 32 basic Fortitude save). The
area of this cone is reduced to 30 feet underwater. Targets that fail their saving throw
also become sickened 1 (sickened 2 on a critical failure). The catoblepas
can’t use its Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, hoof, DC 32
A-C
49
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FISHER FILAMENTS
A cave fisher can rapidly produce
a cord from a gland at the back of
its throat. This filament resembles
a semi-transparent silk rope and is
coated with an adhesive that traps
prey that comes in contact with it.
When reeling in its prey, the cave
fisher consumes the filament as well,
slurping it up like a noodle.
A severed filament can be
harvested for use as rope. The
adhesive dries after about 10
minutes. A harvested filament gland
can’t produce new filaments, but
it can be used as 25 gp worth of
raw materials for creating potent
adhesives, such as sovereign glue.
Cave Fisher
Cave fishers lurk in dark corners near the ceilings of caves and underground
structures, lying in wait for prey to approach. When it does, the cave fisher
excretes thin, tough, and very sticky filaments at its prey with lightning speed
to capture it.
A cave fisher eats just about any live prey smaller than itself, though anything
smaller than a rat isn’t much of a meal for it. When a cave fisher captures such
a creature, it often leaves the hapless animal entangled, using it as bait to attract
larger creatures. Because the adhesive on its filament doesn’t last long, the fisher
frequently needs to eat one filament and excrete a new one. The filaments are
translucent and can be hard to see when they’re still and in darkness.
Cave fishers hatch with the ability to excrete filaments, but they molt many
times before reaching their adult size of about 7 feet long and 400 pounds. They
often leave shed shells in conspicuous locations as decoys.
CAVE FISHER CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +7; darkvision
Skills Athletics +10, Stealth +9
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –3
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +9, Will +7
HP 30
Speed 15 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +10, Damage 1d10+6 slashing
Ranged [one-action] filament +11 (range 60 feet), Effect sticky filament
Pull Filament [one-action] The cave fisher pulls a creature grabbed by its filament toward itself,
even suspending the target vertically if necessary. The cave fisher attempts an
Athletics check against the creature’s Fortitude DC. On a success, the cave fisher
pulls the creature 15 feet closer to it (30 feet closer on a critical success).
Sticky Filament Any creature hit by the cave fisher’s sticky filament is grabbed.
The cave fisher can move while it has a creature grabbed with its filament, but it
automatically releases the creature if the cave fisher moves beyond the filament’s
60-foot length. The cave fisher can use only one filament at a time, and it can
sever the filament and release any creature grabbed by it as a free action. The
filament can be severed by a Strike that deals at least 10 slashing damage to it.
This doesn’t deal any damage to the cave fisher itself. The filament has AC 17, and
its Escape DC is 19.
Bestiary 2
50
MASSIVE MYRIAPODS
All centipedes prefer to eat carrion,
gathering in numbers around
large corpses or battlefields and
jealously guarding their troves of
flesh from any who would disturb
them. Monstrous centipedes are
also aggressive hunters and are
particularly fond of devouring
horses and similar creatures, often
snatching a mount right out from
under its rider. They are unusually
stealthy for creatures of their size,
making their swift strikes all the
more frightening.
Centipede
Centipedes are flesh-eating myriapods that skitter with great speed through
tunnels, forests, and similar densely packed terrain. Many are small predators,
but others are titanic terrors that devour everything in their path.
GIANT WHIPTAIL CENTIPEDE
Whiptail centipedes are sleek and swift tunnel predators.
GIANT WHIPTAIL CENTIPEDE CREATURE 3
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +9; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +8, Athletics +10, Stealth +8
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –4
AC 19; Fort +11, Ref +9, Will +7
HP 45
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Tail only.
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +11 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+6 piercing plus whiptail
centipede venom
Melee [one-action] tail +11 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 1d6+6 bludgeoning plus Knockdown
Undulate [one-action] The giant whiptail centipede Strides **or Steps. During this movement, it
can pass through spaces as narrow as 5 feet without Squeezing.
Whiptail Centipede Venom (poison); Saving Throw DC 19 Fortitude; Maximum
Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d10 poison damage and clumsy 1 (1 round);
Stage 2 2d10 poison damage and clumsy 1 (1 round); Stage 3 2d10 poison
damage and clumsy 2 (1 round)
TITAN CENTIPEDE
These colossal, solitary centipedes claim vast hunting grounds.
TITAN CENTIPEDE CREATURE 9
N GARGANTUAN ANIMAL
Perception +18; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +16, Athletics +21
Str +8, Dex +1, Con +5, Int –5, Wis +5, Cha –4
AC 28; Fort +20, Ref +16, Will +18
HP 155
Speed 50 feet, climb 50 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +21 (reach 20 feet), Damage 2d10+12 piercing plus
titan centipede venom
Melee [one-action] foot +19, Damage 2d8+10 bludgeoning
Impaling Critical When a titan centipede scores a critical hit with its
mandibles, the target is painfully pierced with barbed spines and bristles,
taking 1d6 persistent bleed damage and becoming flat-footed as long as
the bleed damage continues.
Titan Centipede Venom (poison); Saving Throw DC 28
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 2d6
poison damage and clumsy 2 (1 round); Stage 2 2d8
poison damage, clumsy 2, and slowed 1 (1 round);
Stage 3 2d10 poison damage, clumsy 2, and
slowed 2 (1 round)
Trample[three-actions] Huge or smaller, foot, DC 28
Undulate [one-action] The titan centipede
Strides up to its Speed or Steps.
During this movement, it can
pass through spaces as narrow as
10 feet without Squeezing.
A-C
51
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
CHOKER TRINKETS
A choker’s nest is small and confined,
as the choker prefers. It doesn’t tidy
its nest, so everything from animal
bones to valuable treasures might
be within, compacted into one mass.
A choker in the wilderness might
have a few remnants of society taken
from victims who wandered through.
These remnants can include candles,
maps, or animal traps. Chokers in
cities have stolen goods appropriate
to their location: books and scrolls if
a library or wizard’s college is nearby,
steins and pillows near a tavern, or
fishhooks and shipping manifests near
a dock, for example. Chokers almost
never have edible or drinkable items,
as they prefer to consume these
“delicacies” themselves—even magical
potions and alchemical items.
Choker
With long, cartilaginous limbs and gray skin, chokers easily hide in stony alcoves,
rocky fissures, and darkened staircases to ambush their prey. The strange little
aberrations prefer to pick off weak and solitary creatures, especially those that
wander off from their packs or communities. A choker’s long, spongy arms are
flexible but deceptively strong. The fingers can tighten rapidly and are ridged with
spiky, tooth-like structures that provide an incredible grip. A choker typically
strangles its prey to death, then drags the body off or dismembers it using crude
tools if the body is too big to carry. If confronted or outnumbered, a choker
tries to escape, often compressing into a tight passage to get away. Chokers that
encounter humanoids exhibit intense curiosity about their culture, society, and the
products of art and industry. This interest isn’t very deep—it just results in chokers
that like killing people and collecting any of their items that seem sophisticated,
such as jewelry, nice clothing, or written texts.
Chokers sometimes gather in settlements, usually sticking to slums or abandoned
structures. These chokers stalk at night, flopping across rooftops, tapping at
windows, and scuttling through sewers, gutters, and chimneys to get at prey. An
urban choker that finds prey early on its hunt—a wandering pet, a person who
is out alone—might spend the rest of the night indulging its curiosity about the
products of society. A curious choker might abscond with all sorts of odd items,
from tavern signs to library books to roof tiles. A choker usually pilfers only one
item at a time, but as its collection grows, it might need to find a larger nest to
accommodate its collection, then move its pieces one by one to the new home.
CHOKER CREATURE 2
CE SMALL ABERRATION
Perception +7; darkvision
Languages Aklo, Undercommon
Skills Athletics +9 (+11 to Grapple), Stealth +9
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –3, Wis +1, Cha –2
AC 18; Fort +7, Ref +10, Will +7
HP 28
Yank [reaction] (manipulate) Trigger An enemy targets the choker with an attack; Effect The
choker tries to pull a creature it has grabbed or restrained into the path of the attack.
The choker attempts an Athletics check, including its bonus to Grapple. If it succeeds
against the grabbed or restrained creature’s Fortitude DC, the choker redirects the
attack to that creature, and the attacker compares its attack roll result against
the new target’s AC.
The choker must move the creature into a space adjacent to itself. The
creature must also be moved within the attacker’s reach against a
melee attack or into a space between itself and the attacker
against a ranged attack. The choker can’t use this ability
to make the attacker target itself, even if it’s grabbing or
restraining the attacker.
Speed 20 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] arm +11 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d6+3 bludgeoning
plus strangling fingers
Constrict [one-action] 1d6+3 bludgeoning, DC 19
Hidden Movement If the choker starts its turn hidden from or
undetected by a creature, that creature is flat-footed against
the choker’s attacks until the end of the turn.
Strangling Fingers Any creature hit by a choker’s arm
Strike is automatically grabbed, and the choker
begins to strangle the target. The creature is
suffocating and can’t speak as long as it’s strangled.
This prevents it from casting spells with a verbal component or
activating items with a command component.
Bestiary 2
52
WINGED CHUPACABRAS
Some chupacabras are mutants
with large reptilian wings and have
been known to carry off goats or
even children. A winged chupacabra
has a fly Speed of 50 feet. Other
chupacabras grow much larger, up to
Medium sized, and can stand eye to
eye with a full-grown human. These
chupacabras have elite adjustments
to their statistics and deal 2d6+5
damage with their jaws Strikes.
Chupacabra
These notorious predators have an undeniable thirst for blood. Chupacabras
prefer to prey upon the weak and slow, often hiding in wait and watching
potential prey for long periods before attacking. Spry and stealthy, they most
often make their homes in areas of high grass and protective rock, their slightly
reflective scales allowing them to blend in well with such surroundings.
Chupacabras prefer to eat lone travelers and farm animals (particularly goats),
and leave little evidence of their presence apart from the grisly, blood-drained
husks of their meals. Their tendency to stay out of sight combined with their
naturally nocturnal activity often leads superstitious locals to conclude the
worst, imagining that a particularly reckless vampire lives in the area.
A typical chupacabra measures nearly 5-1/2 feet from its muzzle to the tip
of its spiny tail, and it stands just under 4 feet tall. With their slight build and
lightweight bones, most weigh close to 100 pounds. They mate rarely and only
during the hottest months, with the females each producing a single egg that
hatches into a tiny, dehydrated creature. The mother typically leaves helpless
prey in her cave so the hatchling can immediately feed.
Although chupacabras are typically solitary creatures, they have been known
to form small gangs in bountiful areas. Members of these groups work well
together, growing bold enough to attack larger animals, small herds, and
otherwise more dangerous prey. Stories of chupacabras attacking travelers
or laying siege to farmhouses typically stem from the hunting practices of
such gangs. Regions where chupacabra activity like this is more common
often have complex and colorful myths and tall tales about chupacabra
capabilities or motive—and a few of the claims, such as that some
chupacabras can fly, are all too true.
CHUPACABRA CREATURE 3
N SMALL BEAST
Perception +9; darkvision
Languages Aklo (can’t speak any language)
Skills Acrobatics +9 (+11 to Leap), Stealth +9 (+11 in
undergrowth or rocky areas)
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +2, Int –3, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 20; Fort +9, Ref +11, Will +7
HP 45
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +11 (finesse), Damage 1d10+5
piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +11 (agile, finesse), Damage
1d6+5 slashing
Chupar [one-action] Requirements The chupacabra has
a creature grabbed; Effect The chupacabra
sucks blood from the grabbed creature. The
chupacabra gains the quickened condition
for 1 minute and can use the extra action
only for Strike and Stride actions. A
chupacabra can’t use Chupar again while
it is quickened in this way. A creature that
has its blood drained by a chupacabra is
drained 1 until it receives healing (of any
kind or amount).
Pounce [one-action] The chupacabra Strides and
makes a Strike at the end of that
movement. If the chupacabra began
this action hidden, it remains hidden
until after this ability’s Strike.
A-C
53
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
COCKROACH SPECIES
Beyond the common giant cockroach,
other flesh-eating cockroaches
exist throughout the world. These
variations include the giant hissing
cockroach, the noxious venomroach,
the huge spitting cockroach (which
can incapacitate enemies from a
distance), the aggressive sawback
cockroach, and the mysterious and
rare dragonroach.
Cockroach
Generally seen more as a nuisance than a personal danger, cockroaches inhabit
most reaches of the world. They are scavengers who live off the detritus of
the natural world and from those that inhabit it. These maligned insects can
survive weeks without eating, and most of their meals consist of organic
waste that would otherwise overwhelm an ecosystem, particularly in their
preferred urban environments. Though a typical cockroach presents virtually
no threat, they can become dangerous in large groups, and some species grow
particularly large.
GIANT COCKROACH
Cockroaches are communal creatures, rarely setting out on their own unless
they are searching for food. If an adventurer encounters a single giant cockroach
while exploring, they had best take precautions against others, as there is likely
an entire colony nearby.
GIANT COCKROACH CREATURE 1
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +6; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Acrobatics +6, Stealth +8
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –1
AC 16; Fort +6, Ref +8, Will +4
HP 20
Scurry [reaction] Trigger The giant cockroach is targeted by a melee attack; Effect The giant
cockroach gains a +2 circumstance bonus to AC against the triggering attack. After
the attack resolves, the cockroach Strides, Climbs, or Flies up to 10 feet.
Speed 25 feet, climb 25 feet, fly 15 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +8 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6+1 piercing
COCKROACH SWARM
While cockroaches tend to gather in cramped spaces, a
disturbed colony is sometimes prone to swarming,
where hundreds or even thousands of the
insects scurry out of their hiding places in
a raft of shiny brown and black carapaces
on thousands of skittering legs. Given how
disgusting many find cockroaches to be,
encountering such a swarm can be alarming
to even the most seasoned adventurers. The
creatures are relentless when disturbed; in contrast
to the insects’ normally skittish and harmless nature,
as swarms they pursue the creature or creatures
that provoked them and harry them with
thousands of stinging bites.
COCKROACH SWARM CREATURE 2
N SMALL ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +6; darkvision, scent
(imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Acrobatics +8, Stealth +8
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –4
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +10, Will +6
HP 20; Immunities precision, swarm mind; Weaknesses area damage 5,
splash damage 5; Resistances bludgeoning 2, piercing 5, slashing 5
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet, fly 15 feet
Swarming Bites [one-action] Each enemy in the swarm’s space takes 1d8
piercing damage (DC 18 basic Reflex save).
Bestiary 2
54
OTHER COUATLS
The quetz couatl presented here is
the most common of its kind, and
while most adventurers and scholars
refer to them simply as “couatls,”
other kinds exist as well, such as
the fierce xiuh couatl, the nomadic
auwaz couatl, the wise mix couatl,
the nurturing chicome couatl, and
the furious tletli couatl.
Couatl, Quetz
These sacred feathered serpents tirelessly serve the powers of law and good. Some
operate directly as messengers and intermediaries of the deities, while others
operate independently in aiding the cause of righteousness. Either way, they watch
over mortals and try to influence and aid them from the shadows, shifting from
plane to plane to spread wisdom and healing where they are needed. Some quetz
couatls are worshipped as divinities in remote or isolated societies, and while they
do not encourage such veneration, they use the trust placed in them to foster peace
and cooperation with others.
Quetz couatls are typically 10 to 20 feet long, with iridescent blue and green
scales. Their glorious wings of rainbow-hued feathers span 15 feet and weigh
nearly a ton. They are carnivorous, feeding on birds, mammals, and even the
occasional evil humanoid.
QUETZ COUATL CREATURE 10
UNCOMMON LG LARGE BEAST COUATL
Perception +21; darkvision, detect alignment
Languages Celestial, Common, Draconic;
telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +16, Arcana +19, Diplomacy
+22, Nature +22, Occultism +19, Religion
+22, Survival +16
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +5, Int +6, Wis +5, Cha +5
AC 30; Fort +19, Ref +19, Will +21
HP 175
Speed 15 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (magical), Damage 2d10+13
piercing plus quetz couatl venom and Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 7th ethereal jaunt (at
will), plane shift (self only); 5th breath of life, divine
wrath; 4th charm, gaseous form; 3rd mind reading
(at will); 2nd invisibility (self only, at will); Cantrips
(5th) disrupt undead, light, mage hand; Constant (5th)
detect alignment (all alignments simultaneously)
Greater Constrict [one-action] 2d10+7 bludgeoning, DC 29
Quetz Couatl Venom (poison) A quetz couatl’s venom deals good
damage rather than poison damage to fiends; Saving Throw DC 29
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 2d6 poison damage and
enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 2d8 poison damage, enfeebled 1, and
flat-footed (1 round); Stage 3 2d10 poison damage, enfeebled 2, and
flat-footed (1 round)
Radiant Wings [two-actions] (divine, enchantment, incapacitation,
mental, visual) The quetz couatl spreads its multicolored
wings and radiant plumage. Each enemy within 30 feet
must attempt a DC 29 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily
immune to Radiant Wings for 24 hours.
Success The creature is dazzled for 1 round.
Failure The creature is dazzled for 1 minute.
Critical Failure As failure, but if the creature is evil, it is also
stunned 3.
Wrap in Coils [one-action] Requirements The quetz couatl has a
Medium or smaller creature grabbed or restrained in
its jaws; Effect The quetz couatl moves the creature
into its coils, freeing its fangs to make attacks, then uses
Greater Constrict against the creature. The quetz couatl
can hold as many creatures in its coils as will fit in its space.
A-C
55
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
CRAB SPECIES
Crabs can be found along all of the
world’s coastlines, from relatively
small creatures like the king crab or
the coconut crab, to truly oversized
monsters like the great reef crab,
shark-eating crab, or the lumbering
shipwrecker crab.
Crab
Crabs are scavenging crustaceans known for their hard shells and iconic sideways
gait. They use their claws to defend themselves, hunt, and fight other crabs for
territory. When confronted with threats from outside their species, most crabs
prefer to flee, but when retreat isn’t possible, they clamp on to their foes as tightly
as they can.
The statistics presented here represent giant crabs that live close to the water’s
surface. Crabs that live deeper underwater often exhibit more extreme adaptations
to their environment. Crabs who live in the depths where little light reaches gain
darkvision and cold resistance, and those adapted to the most hostile reaches of
the deep sea can detect nearby creatures through subtle shifts in ocean currents.
These skittering creatures are prized for their delicious meat, but their size
makes them dangerous targets for harvesting.
GIANT CRAB CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +8; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +8, Stealth +7
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –3
AC 19; Fort +7, Ref +9, Will +8
HP 24; Resistances physical 3 (except bludgeoning)
Vulnerable to Prone If a creature critically succeeds on a check to Trip the giant crab, the
crab is flipped over onto its back in addition to the usual effects. A giant crab that is
flipped onto its back has a particularly hard time defending itself; instead of taking the
normal –2 circumstance penalty to AC for being flat-footed, it takes a –4 circumstance
penalty to AC.
Scuttle[reaction] Trigger A creature that the giant crab can see targets the crab with an attack;
Effect The giant crab scuttles to the side and gains a +2 circumstance bonus to AC
against the triggering attack. After the attack resolves, the crab can Stride up to its
speed in a straight line as part of the reaction.
Speed 25 feet, swim 15 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +10, Damage 1d10+4 slashing plus Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d6+4 bludgeoning, DC 18
Bestiary 2
56
CRAWLING HAND ORIGINS
A popular tale among necromancers
tells of an ancient wizard who
trafficked in evil magic. During a
summoning ritual gone wrong, the
wizard’s hand became possessed
and later strangled them while they
slept. The hand dragged the corpse
across the wizard’s rooms to their
workbench, propped up a knife in a
vise, and severed itself from the rest
of the body. According to the story,
the hand went on to commit several
more murders and disappeared into
the sewers of a major metropolis,
never to be seen again. Some
necromancers believe that this
original crawling hand still creeps
through the shadows of that city,
killing as it pleases.
Crawling Hand
Typically, crawling hands are formed when severed appendages are endowed with
a crude sentience by evil necromantic energies that turn them into tireless killers.
Yet crawling hands can also arise spontaneously, usually when a creature loses an
appendage in a place rife with necromantic energy or with a connection to the
Negative Energy Plane.
CRAWLING HAND
A crawling hand formed from the appendage of a Medium creature is quick and
agile, skittering in the shadows until it can strike its prey.
CRAWLING HAND CREATURE –1
NE TINY UNDEAD
Perception +5; lifesense 30 feet, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +5, Stealth +6, Survival +2
Languages Common (can’t speak any language)
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +0, Int –4, Wis +0, Cha +0
AC 12; Fort +2, Ref +5, Will +2
HP 8, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison,
unconscious, visual
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d4+1 slashing plus Grab
Grip Throat A Medium or smaller creature that is grabbed by the crawling hand has difficulty
speaking and must spend an extra action to perform any action with the verbal trait.
Mark Quarry A crawling hand can be assigned a quarry by anointing the hand with a
drop of the intended quarry’s blood. If the hand ever has no quarry, it automatically
gains the next creature it damages as its quarry. The hand gains a +1 circumstance
bonus to Perception checks when it Seeks its quarry, to Survival checks when it
Tracks its quarry, and damage rolls when it Strikes its quarry.
GIANT CRAWLING HAND
A giant crawling hand is the appendage of a very large creature, such as a giant.
GIANT CRAWLING HAND CREATURE 5
NE MEDIUM UNDEAD
Perception +12; lifesense 30 feet, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +13, Stealth +11, Survival +12
Languages Common (can’t speak any language)
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 22; Fort +13, Ref +11, Will +10
HP 75, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison,
unconscious, visual
Pus Burst [reaction] Trigger The giant crawling hand takes piercing or slashing damage; Effect
A random creature adjacent to the giant crawling hand is sprayed with vile pus that
deals 4d6 negative damage. The affected creature must attempt a DC 21 Reflex save.
Critical Success The creature takes no damage.
Success The creature takes half damage
and becomes sickened 1.
Failure The creature takes
full damage and becomes
sickened 2.
Critical Failure The creature takes double
damage and becomes sickened 3.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +15, Damage 2d6+7 slashing
plus Grab
Mark Quarry As crawling hand.
A-C
57
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
THE CURSE OF CRAWLEY JACK
The damnable curse of the culdewen
traces back to the First World, when
a bitter old culdewen named Crawley
Jack poached a fish from the pool
of a powerful fey noble. Short of
temper and feeling vindictive, the
noble doomed Crawley Jack’s people
to never consume another fish again.
Yet their desire to eat fish never
diminished. The curse’s punishment
is exacted in endless creative ways.
A culdewen’s catch might be rescued
by merfolk, stolen by skum, eaten
by nipping sharks, or carried away
on a piece of driftwood when the
culdewen’s boat is destroyed in a
storm or shipwreck.
Culdewen
Perpetually cursed to hunger and failure, a culdewen plies waterways in search of
appealing fish to catch—the bigger the better. Of course, this diminutive, emaciated
fey calls every living creature a “fish.” Only other fey are exempt, and they tend
to consider culdewens lost causes. A culdewen can never find satisfaction. Each
time they catch a fish, a magical curse forces them to hunt for an appealing spot
to dine—an island, cove, or abandoned dock or shack where they can eat in peace.
By the time they arrive, their catch will be gone. Every time. Forever.
A foul mood hovers over a culdewen, causing them to swear colorfully, smack
things with their oar, and shake their tiny fists at the sky. Conversation with a
culdewen is fruitless, as they talk in circles, speaking only of fishing and the weather.
Capturing a “fish” gives a culdewen a rare moment of happiness; the culdewen
capers and ululates, pleased with their catch, and rushes off to their boat.
CULDEWEN CREATURE 7
CE SMALL AMPHIBIOUS FEY
Perception +15, low-light vision
Languages Aquan, Common, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +16, Deception +16, Intimidation +14, Nature +12, Sailing Lore +14,
Stealth +15, Survival +16
Str +4, Dex +5, Con +1, Int –1, Wis +2, Cha +4
Items fish hook, oar (functions as mace)
Culdewen’s Curse (curse, enchantment, primal) A culdewen that captures a creature is
compelled to immediately retreat to a secluded place to eat, typically journeying by
boat. The travel to the secluded place always takes at least 1 day. Their captive is cursed
to vanish on the journey—typically being lost in the water or consumed by aquatic
creatures—and can be recovered only by a wish spell or similarly powerful magic.
AC 25; Fort +14, Ref +18, Will +13; –2 status to all saves vs. curses
HP 105; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Speed 40 feet, swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] fish hook +17 (trip), Damage 2d10+7 piercing
plus hooked
Melee[one-action] oar +17 (shove), Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] fish hook +18 (thrown 30 feet), Damage
2d10+7 piercing plus hooked
Hooked A creature struck by the culdewen’s fish hook is
skewered, taking 1d4 persistent bleed damage as long as
the hook remains stuck in it. The fish hook can be removed
only if a creature spends an Interact action and succeeds at a
DC 25 Athletics check to pull it free.
Land the Fish [one-action] Requirements A creature is hooked by the
culdewen’s fish hook and adjacent to the culdewen; Effect The
culdewen hoists the creature over their shoulder, as though it
weighs no more than a fish. Unless the creature is unable to
act, the culdewen must attempt an Athletics check against the
creature’s Fortitude DC. On a success, the creature is restrained by the culdewen.
While hoisting a creature, the culdewen gains a +20-foot status bonus to their
Speeds and is compelled to escape with it (see culdewen’s curse above).
Reel In [one-action] (manipulate) The culdewen pulls the rope attached to their hook. If they
have no creature hooked, the fish hook returns to the culdewen’s hand. If a creature
is hooked, the culdewen attempts an Athletics check against the creature’s Fortitude
DC, pulling it up to 30 feet closer on a success (60 feet on a critical success).
Swear [one-action] (auditory, curse, enchantment, primal) The culdewen
unleashes a string of invectives. Each creature that hears them
must attempt a DC 25 Will save, with the effects of mariner’s
curse and is then temporarily immune for 24 hours. Even on
a failed save, the curse ends automatically after 1 day.
Bestiary 2
58
ABADDON
Daemons hail from Abaddon, a plane
of pure evil for only the most corrupt
souls. If Hell is a realm of torture
and systematic depravity, Abaddon
is its twisted cousin—a place where
one can find only misery and
despair in ample quantities, with
neither the strictures of Hell nor
the chaotic freedom of the Abyss.
For evildoers who seek simply to
inflict their wickedness on others,
Abaddon is a rich hunting ground
where one can revel in turpitude,
though visitors be forewarned: the
competition is fierce.
Daemon
Daemons form from the most despicable souls and personify forms of death.
PISCODAEMON (VENOM DAEMON)
Scions of death by poisoning, piscodaemons are cruel even by daemonic standards,
delighting in slow and painful suffering. To a piscodaemon, death is but the icing on
a putrescent cake—its true pleasure comes from watching, hearing, smelling, and
even tasting raw anguish. While poisons and venoms are piscodaemons’ preferred
tools, their cruel claws are more than capable of tearing enemies asunder if necessary.
Piscodaemons dwell in fetid swamps and noxious waterways, including the River
Styx, the Bile Sluice, and the Drowning Court of Charon, Horseman of Death. They
are often accompanied by cadres of hydrodaemons—representations of death by
drowning. While they are cunning commanders, piscodaemons are apt to forget
their station in the heat of battle and slice their way to the center of the fray.
PISCODAEMON CREATURE 10
NE MEDIUM AMPHIBIOUS DAEMON FIEND
Perception +19; darkvision, see invisibility
Languages Common, Daemonic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Athletics +22, Intimidation +19, Medicine +17, Stealth +22, Survival +19
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +2, Wis +3, Cha +3
AC 28; Fort +22, Ref +16, Will +19; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 200; Immunities death effects, poison; Weaknesses good 10
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Enhance Venom[reaction] (divine, misfortune, necromancy, poison)
Trigger A creature within 30 feet attempts a saving
throw against piscovenom; Effect The creature takes
an additional 2d8 poison damage even if it succeeds
at its save.
Speed 25 feet, swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (evil, magical), Damage 2d10+12
slashing plus 1d6 evil and Grab
Melee [one-action] tentacle +23 (agile, evil, magical), Damage
2d6+12 bludgeoning plus 1d6 evil and piscovenom
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 5th dimension door; 4th
dimension door (at will), stinking cloud (×3); 1st detect
alignment (at will; good only), detect poison (at will);
Constant (2nd) see invisibility
Constrict [one-action] 2d10+6 bludgeoning, DC 30
Gory Rend [two-actions] The piscodaemon makes two claw Strikes
against the same creature. If both hit, the creature takes
2d10 persistent bleed damage and is exposed to piscovenom.
Piscovenom (poison) Saving Throw DC 30 Fortitude; Maximum
Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d8 poison and enfeebled 1
(1 round); Stage 2 2d8 poison and enfeebled 1 (1 round);
Stage 3 4d8 poison and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
MELADAEMON (FAMINE DAEMON)
Meladaemons personify death by starvation and thirst,
and revel in spreading the same despair that brought
about their mortal demise. When they aren’t blighting
fields, massacring livestock, or tainting water supplies,
they experiment on prisoners to study how long creatures
can go without sustenance and the deleterious effects that
result from such deprivation. Fiercely loyal to Trelmarixian,
Horseman of Famine, they serve no other beings. They work alongside other
daemons if Trelmarixian wills it, but are notoriously traitorous.
D
59
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FORMED IN HIS IMAGE
Meladaemons have always been
gaunt and bestial, but they didn’t
always resemble jackals. When
Trelmarixian overthrew the previous
Horseman of Famine, one of his
first acts as a ruler of Abaddon was
to forcibly twist the appearance of
his deacon caste to resemble his
own wicked form. He went on to
imbue meladaemons with other
jackal-like aspects as it suited him,
further warping them and cementing
their fealty.
MELADAEMON CREATURE 11
NE LARGE DAEMON FIEND
Perception +21; darkvision, lifesense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common, Daemonic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +20, Deception +23, Intimidation +23, Religion +20, Stealth +23, Survival +19
Str +7, Dex +5, Con +6, Int +3, Wis +4, Cha +6
AC 31; Fort +23, Ref +20, Will +19; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 225; Immunities death effects; Weaknesses good 10
Consumptive Aura (aura, divine) 20 feet. A meladaemon emanates an aura of intense
hunger. Each round a creature begins its turn in the aura, it must attempt a DC 27
Fortitude save. On a failure, the creature takes 1d6 negative damage (2d6 on a critical
failure) and becomes fatigued. This fatigue ends as soon as the creature eats any food.
Withering Opportunity [reaction] Trigger The meladaemon is attacked by an adjacent creature
and the attack misses; Effect The meladaemon swipes at the triggering creature, which
must immediately attempt a save against the meladaemon’s withering touch.
Speed 25 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +24 (evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d12+13 plus 1d6
evil and daemonic famine
Melee [one-action] claw +24 (agile, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d8+13 slashing plus 1d6 evil, Grab, and withering touch
Divine Innate Spells DC 31; 6th phantom pain; 5th dimension
door, fear, magic missile (at will); 4th dimension door (at
will); 1st detect alignment (good only; at will)
Rituals DC 31; blight
Daemonic Famine (disease) Saving Throw DC 29
Fortitude; Stage 1 carrier (1 day); Stage 2 enfeebled 1
(1 day); Stage 3 enfeebled 2 (1 day); Stage 4 as stage 3;
Stage 5 enfeebled 3 (1 week); Stage 6 dead
Withering Touch (divine, evil, necromancy) When the
meladaemon hits with a claw Strike or a creature
begins its turn grabbed by the meladaemon, the
creature must attempt a DC 30 Fortitude save.
On a failure, the creature takes 1d6 negative
damage and becomes fatigued. This fatigue
ends when the creature drinks.
DERGHODAEMON (RAVAGER DAEMON)
Derghodaemons represent death through
unfathomable violence and being eaten alive.
Whether in life a ravenous murderer hacked them to
bits for stew, a werewolf tore them limb from limb, or they simply succumbed to the
elements and became worm meat, derghodaemons seek to inflict the same twisted
and bloody ends upon any they come across. Unlike some daemons, derghodaemons
derive little pleasure from prolonged deaths—to these fiends, the quicker they can
enact a gory demise, the sooner they can turn their attentions to their next victim
and repeat the violent cycle.
Derghodaemons look like walking masses of razor-sharp insect claws connected
to equally menacing chitinous limbs, but few linger on their appearance for long—
the gaze of a derghodaemon is enough to cause others in the vicinity to experience
severe visual warping. The derghodaemon’s appearance becomes more and more
twisted as those who stare at it experience vicious hallucinations and ravenous
urges to inflict harm on and devour others. Perhaps the most horrific attack
derghodaemons can unleash upon their victims, though, is their swarming
infestation—the daemons cough up a crawling, buzzing cloud of
ravenous insects that cling to those targeted and chew them to death,
provided the mind-numbing, half-whispered threats made by the rasp
of the insects’ bodies don’t drive them to violent fury first!
Bestiary 2
60
DAEMON HARBINGERS
The four Horsemen are the most
powerful of the daemonic demigods,
but they are only four of many. Far
more daemonic harbingers dwell on
Abaddon, each a unique and powerful
demigod in their own right that
enjoys sweeping influence among
daemonkind. Jacarkas the Collector
(ruler of the slave city of Awaiting
Consumption), Vorasha the Ophidian
(consort to the Horseman of Famine),
and Zelishkar the Bitter Flame
(patron to arsonists and agent of the
Horseman of War) are but three of
the dozens of harbingers who rule
realms in Abaddon.
DERGHODAEMON CREATURE 12
NE LARGE DAEMON FIEND
Perception +24; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Daemonic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +22, Athletics +25, Intimidation +24, Stealth +24
Str +7, Dex +6, Con +5, Int +1, Wis +6, Cha +6
AC 33; Fort +21, Ref +24, Will +22; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 240; Immunities confusion, death effects, swarm attacks; Weaknesses good 10
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +25 (deadly 1d12, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+10 slashing plus
1d6 evil
Ranged [one-action] swarm spit +25 (evil, magical, range 60 feet), Damage 2d6+13 piercing plus 1d6 evil
Divine Innate Spells DC 32; 6th blade barrier, feeblemind (×3); 5th dimension door; 4th
dimension door (at will); 1st detect alignment (good only; at will)
Derghodaemon’s Stare [one-action] (divine, emotion, enchantment, incapacitation, mental, visual) A
non-evil target must succeed at a DC 32 Will save or become confused for 1 round, or 1
minute on a critical failure. It is temporarily immune for 10 minutes.
Rend [one-action] claw
Savage Assault [two-actions] The derghodaemon makes up to five claw
Strikes, each against a different target. These attacks count
toward the derghodaemon’s multiple attack penalty, but the
penalty doesn’t increase until after all the attacks.
Swarming Infestation [two-actions] The derghodaemon spews a
large swarm, making a swarm spit Strike against up to
two adjacent targets within range. Whether or not the
targets are hit, each must attempt a DC 31 Reflex
save (at a –2 circumstance penalty if it was actually
hit by the swarm spit). Persistent damage caused
by the swarming infestation ends as soon as the
creature takes any amount of damage from
an area effect. The derghodaemon can’t use
this ability for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The swarm disperses as soon
as it deals its swarm spit Strike damage.
Success The swarm clings to the target
and infests it, dealing 1d6 persistent
piercing damage.
Failure The swarm clings to the target
and infests it, dealing 2d6 persistent
piercing damage.
Critical Failure As failure, but the hissing sounds
caused by the infestation also cause the target to
become confused for 1 round; this additional effect
has the auditory, emotion, and mental traits.
THANADAEMON (DEATH DAEMON)
Also known as the deacons of death, thanadaemons
represent death via old age. They are among the
most patient daemons, and prefer to bide
their time to enact far-reaching, decadeslong plans rather than fight (though they
are still deadly foes). Like the Horseman
of Death, they ply the waters of the River
Styx in search of wayward souls. Rarely are
thanadaemons seen without a trademark oar
(which they wield as a bo staff), a tool they use to navigate the
river’s muck-ridden channels and turbulent rapids.
D
61
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
STYX PASSAGE FEES
Gliding with eerie ease along the
murky River Styx, thanadaemons
are only too happy to offer mortals
passage aboard their dilapidated
skiffs—for a price. Gold is typically
an acceptable payment for a
thanadaemon’s services, though these
fiends are well-known for altering the
details of arrangements after the fact,
and may just as likely demand a favor
or some esoteric good, such as a soul
gem, instead of coin.
THANADAEMON CREATURE 13
NE MEDIUM DAEMON FIEND
Perception +26; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Common, Daemonic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Arcana +22, Deception +26, Intimidation +26, Religion +22, Styx Lore +24
Str +6, Dex +6, Con +4, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +7
Items +1 striking bo staff, soul gem (2)
AC 34; Fort +21, Ref +23, Will +26; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 270; Immunities death effects; Weaknesses good 10
Terrifying Gaze (aura, divine, emotion, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) 30 feet. When a
creature ends its turn in the aura, it must attempt a DC 30 Will save. If the creature fails,
it becomes frightened 2. The creature is then temporarily immune to terrifying gaze (but
not Focus Gaze) for 24 hours.
Speed 25 feet; air walk
Melee[one-action]bo staff +28 (evil, magical, parry, reach 10 feet, trip), Damage 3d8+14 bludgeoning
plus 1d6 negative, 1d6 evil, and draining strike
Melee [one-action] claw +27 (agile, evil, finesse, magical), Damage 3d6+14
slashing plus 1d6 evil and draining strike
Divine Innate Spells DC 34; 7th finger of death, plane shift (at
will; self plus skiff and passengers only; Astral, Ethereal, and
evil planes only), teleport; 6th slow, vampiric exsanguination (×2);
5th dimension door; 4th dimension door (at will); 1st detect alignment
(good only; at will); Constant (7th) air walk, true seeing
Rituals DC 34; animate dead
Draining Strike (divine, necromancy) When a thanadaemon
damages a living creature with a melee Strike, the
creature must succeed at a DC 33 Fortitude save or
become drained 1. Further damage dealt by the
thanadaemon increases the drained condition value
by 1 on a failed save, to a maximum of drained 4.
Focus Gaze [one-action] (concentrate, divine, fear, visual) The
thanadaemon glares at a single creature they can
see within 30 feet. The target must immediately
attempt a DC 33 Will save against the thanadaemon’s
terrifying gaze. If the target was already frightened,
a failed save causes it to become fleeing for 1d4
rounds. After attempting its save, the creature is
temporarily immune to this ability until the start of
the thanadaemon’s next turn.
Soul Crush [two-actions] (manipulate) Requirements The
thanadaemon has a soul gem; Effect The thanadaemon
crushes the soul gem in one hand and gains fast healing
15 for 1 minute.
PURRODAEMON (WAR DAEMON)
Few creatures embody war’s sheer amount of bloodshed
and loss of life as deeply as the purrodaemons, deacons
of war. These giant humanoid daemons are bedecked
in black, unholy armor, with weapons piercing their
flesh at every opening. Far from wounds, however,
these weapons are the purrodaemon’s arsenal. A
purrodaemon can, with frightening swiftness
and nauseating ease, extract a weapon from its
own flesh as though drawing a sword from a
sheath, and their blood is so tainted with evil
that weapons steeped in it become
powerful tools of war.
Bestiary 2
62
DAEMONIC DEACONS
Each of the four Horsemen is
served by a specific category
of servitor daemons known as
deacons. Leukodaemons serve
as deacons to the Horseman of
Pestilence. Meladaemons serve as
deacons to the Horseman of Famine,
while thanadaemons serve as
deacons to the Horseman of Death.
Purrodaemons are currently the most
powerful of the deacons, and serve
the Horseman of War—yet over time,
which category of deacon is the most
powerful can wax and wane.
PURRODAEMON CREATURE 18
NE LARGE DAEMON FIEND
Perception +33; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Common, Daemonic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Athletics +37, Intimidation +35, Religion +30, Stealth +34, Survival +33, Warfare Lore +32
Str +9, Dex +6, Con +7, Int +4, Wis +7, Cha +7
Items +2 greater striking glaive, soul gem (2), steeped weapon (7–10)
AC 43; Fort +33, Ref +30, Will +29; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 335; Immunities bleed, death effects; Weaknesses good 15; Resistances piercing 15
Speed 25 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] glaive +37 (deadly d8, evil, forceful, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+17
slashing plus 2d6 evil and 4d6 persistent bleed
Ranged [one-action] hurled weapon +35 (deadly 1d10, evil, magical, propulsive, range 120 feet),
Damage 2d10+12 piercing plus 1d6 evil and 4d6 persistent bleed
Divine Innate Spells DC 37; 9th bind soul, blade barrier, chain lightning; 7th flame strike,
teleport; 5th dimension door; 4th dimension door (at will); 1st detect alignment (good
only; at will); Constant (6th) true seeing
Hurl Weapon [one-action] (divine, evocation) The purrodaemon causes a weapon that has steeped
in their flesh (see Steep Weapon) to telekinetically launch from their flesh. The
purrodaemon makes a hurled weapon Strike without using their hands.
Recall Weapon [one-action] (evocation) Requirements A steeped
weapon that’s no longer sheathed in the
purrodaemon’s body is within 120 feet of the
daemon; Effect The steeped weapon swiftly
flies through the air to resheath itself in the
purrodaemon’s body. If a creature is along
this flight path, the purrodaemon can make a
hurled weapon Strike against the target; if it
hits, the weapon drops to the ground in a square
adjacent to the creature.
Steep Weapon [one-action] (manipulate) The
purrodaemon sheathes a weapon in
their own flesh. This deals no damage
to the purrodaemon, which can have up to 10
weapons sheathed in their body at a time. A steeped
weapon must be one that deals piercing or slashing
damage.
If a purrodaemon Interacts to crush a soul
gem, one weapon of their choice sheathed in
their flesh becomes enchanted with the daemon’s
fiendish power and becomes a +2 greater
striking weapon that can be used in place
of their glaive or hurled at targets
(with a +2 item bonus to the hurled
weapon’s attack modifier and an extra
d10 of damage). This magical quality fades 24 hours after
it ceases being sheathed in the daemon’s living body. A
steeped weapon can be Disarmed.
Twist the Blade [reaction] Requirements The purrodaemon
has fewer than 10 weapons sheathed in their body;
Trigger The purrodaemon is hit with a weapon that
deals piercing damage; Effect The purrodaemon
seizes the triggering weapon. The weapon’s
wielder must attempt a DC 40 Reflex save. On
a failure, the weapon is disarmed and falls to an
adjacent square. On a critical failure, the weapon
is sheathed in the purrodaemon’s body as though the daemon had used Steep Weapon.
D
63
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SOUL GEMS AS GEAR
Daemons often carry soul gems
either as trophies or for powering
an ability. Cacodaemons (Pathfinder
Bestiary 70) are the most common
source for soul gems, but they can
also be created by spells like bind
soul. If a daemon crushes a soul gem
to power an ability, the trapped soul
is released into the afterlife and can
be resurrected normally.
OLETHRODAEMON (APOCALYPSE DAEMON)
Even daemons fear the most massive and terrifying of their kind, olethrodaemons.
No single entity could embody the level of evil necessary to manifest one; instead,
these living war machines are made from the souls of many—or so the story goes.
Other theories suggest that the four Horsemen of the Apocalypse are responsible for
creating the olethrodaemons, or that olethrodaemons are merely the seeping run-off
of an even greater being: a mysterious fifth Horseman.
Whatever the truth, olethrodaemons are real, and their existence is terrifying
enough to instill paralyzing existential dread. With dozens of unblinking glowing
eyes above a drooling maw, two sets of four muscled limbs, and countless horns,
olethrodaemons resemble no other creature known to mortalkind.
OLETHRODAEMON CREATURE 20
NE GARGANTUAN DAEMON FIEND
Perception +33; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 120 feet, true seeing
Languages Common, Daemonic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Athletics +40, Intimidation +38, Religion +34
Str +10, Dex +6, Con +7, Int +2, Wis +6, Cha +8
Items soul gem (4)
AC 44; Fort +35, Ref +32, Will +34; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 450; Immunities death effects; Weaknesses good 20
Aura of Doom (aura, death, divine) 60 feet. Any creature that begins its turn in the aura is
doomed 1 for as long as it remains in the aura and for 1 hour thereafter.
Speed 35 feet, burrow 35 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +38 (evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 4d12+17 piercing plus
1d6 evil and Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +38 (agile, evil, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d8+17
slashing plus 1d6 evil and Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 42, attack +34; 10th cataclysm,
massacre; 9th disintegrate (×3), disjunction, wail of the
banshee; 5th dimension door; 4th dimension door (at will);
1st detect alignment (good only; at will); Constant (10th)
true seeing
Rituals DC 42; control weather (9th)
Apocalypse Breath [two-actions] or [three-actions] (divine, negative) The
daemon expels a shrieking black cloud of smoke
from its mouth in a 120-foot line or a 60-foot cone.
(or both a line and a cone in the same direction if it
spends 3 actions). Living creatures in the area take
24d6 negative damage (DC 45 basic Reflex save).
The olethrodaemon can’t use Apocalypse Breath
again for 1d4 rounds.
Soul Crush [two-actions] (manipulate) Requirement The
olethrodaemon has a soul gem; Effect The
olethrodaemon crushes the soul gem in one
hand and regains the use of Apocalypse
Breath or any one of its innate spells.
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Huge, 4d10+10
bludgeoning and drained 2, Rupture 43. An
olethrodaemon has numerous stomachs
connected by labyrinthine digestive
organs. Swallowed creatures cannot
Escape, but can attempt to cut their way
out with a 1d6 roll. On a roll of 1–3, the
creature cuts into yet another stomach.
On a roll of 4–6, the creature manages to
cut its way out of the olethrodaemon.
Bestiary 2
64
SIGNS OF MURDER
Babaus revel in their art and often
leave behind a grim token or marker
as a signature. They may leave a
distinctive mutilation upon the
bodies of their victims, rather than
harvesting keepsakes and trophies
for a personal collection. Babaus
want their legacy to grow among
those they hunt and kill.
Demon
The living embodiment of mortal souls obsessed with sin and empowered by the
Abyss, demons are armed and armored by their prior lives’ obsessions.
BABAU (BLOOD DEMON)
The babau is an assassin, a murderer, and a sadist—certainly not unusual traits,
yet their penchant for stealth and surprise sets them apart from their kin. Babaus
form from mortal souls of lone killers—those who took pleasure in more personal
murders, and particularly those with grisly patterns to their killings.
BABAU CREATURE 6
CE MEDIUM DEMON FIEND
Perception +13; darkvision, see invisibility
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Draconic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +12, Athletics +13, Intimidation +14, Religion +10, Stealth +16, Thievery +14
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +3, Cha +2
Items +1 longspear
AC 24; Fort +14, Ref +16, Will +11; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 130; Weaknesses cold iron 5, good 5; Resistances
acid 10
Mercy Vulnerability Babaus revel in gore, and
when wounds are healed, they recoil in
pain. When a creature heals from damage
that the babau dealt on their last turn
with Grievous Strike, sneak attack, or a
critical hit, the demon takes 4d6 mental
damage. The babau can take this mental
damage only once per round.
Reactive Slime [reaction] Trigger A creature
within the babau’s reach successfully
hits the babau with a Strike; Effect The
babau excretes a gout of acidic, bloodlike
slime against the attacker and its weapon. The
attacker must attempt a DC 24 Reflex save.
Critical Success The attacker is unaffected.
Success The attacker takes 1d6 acid damage.
Failure The attacker takes 2d6 acid damage.
Critical Failure As failure, except the weapon used to Strike
the babau becomes broken, unless the weapon is made of
a material that is immune to acid.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] longspear +17 (evil, magical, reach 10 feet),
Damage 1d8+7 piercing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] jaws +16 (evil, magical), Damage 1d10+7
piercing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] claw +16 (agile, evil, magical), Damage
1d4+7 slashing plus 1d6 evil
Divine Innate Spells DC 24; 5th dimension
door; 4th dimension door (at will); 2nd
darkness; Constant (5th) see invisibility
Rituals DC 24; Abyssal pact
Grievous Strike [two-actions] The babau attacks with the intent of creating a particularly
horrific and gory wound. The babau makes a melee Strike. This counts
as two attacks when calculating the daemon’s multiple attack penalty. If
this Strike hits, the babau deals an additional 2d6 damage of the same
damage type, and the creature struck is frightened 2.
Sneak Attack The babau’s Strikes deal an extra2d6 precision damage to flat-footed creatures.
D
65
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
CONJURING DEMONS
Conjuring demons is ill-advised, yet
the desperate or wicked still do.
Rituals like planar ally or planar
binding are typical for long-term
ends, and summon fiend for combat
applications. For planar ally, demons
sometimes accept offerings that aren’t
valuable if gifting them to a demon
pushes the ritualist further into sin.
INVIDIAK (SHADOW DEMON)
For most demons, possessing a creature requires a ritual, magic item, or condition,
but for invidiaks, who lack a body, possession is akin to donning a suit of clothing.
Known also as shadow demons, invidiaks are formed from envious mortal souls.
INVIDIAK CREATURE 7
CE MEDIUM DEMON FIEND INCORPOREAL
Perception +15; darkvision
Languages Abyssal, Common; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +15, Deception +18, Religion +13, Society +15, Stealth +17
Str –5, Dex +4, Con +3, Int +2, Wis +2, Cha +5
AC 22; Fort +15, Ref +16, Will +13; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 90; Immunities disease, poison, precision; Weaknesses cold iron 5, good 5; Resistances
all 5 (except force, ghost touch, or positive; double resistance vs. non-magical)
Exorcism Vulnerability If an invidiak attempts to possess a creature and the creature rolls
a critical success on its saving throw to resist possession, or if an invidiak’s possession
of a creature is ended prematurely, such as via a successful dispel magic, the invidiak
takes 6d6 mental damage and cannot use possession
for 24 hours.
Speed fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +13 (agile, evil, finesse, magical), Damage
2d8 cold plus 2d6 evil
Divine Innate Spells DC 26; 7th possession (range touch); 5th
dimension door, shadow blast; 4th darkness, dimension
door (at will); 3rd fear; Cantrip (4th) telekinetic projectile
Rituals DC 26; Abyssal pact
Favored Host Each invidiak has a particular type of
creature they prefer possessing, chosen from the
following list: aberration, animal, beast, or any
humanoid (such as dwarf)—in most cases, the favored
type of target is human. When an invidiak uses
possession against a favored host, the duration of
possession increases to unlimited, and the effect lasts
until dispelled or until the invidiak dismisses it.
Shadow Blend[two-actions] (divine, illusion) The invidiak Strides
up to twice their speed. If the invidiak ends their
movement in an area of dim light, they become
hidden as long as they don’t move and the lighting
in the area they’re in doesn’t grow brighter than
dim light.
Unbodied Possession An invidiak leaves no body
behind when using possession.
NABASU (GLUTTONY DEMON)
Nabasus are birthed directly into the Material
Plane from the Abyss, an invasive infestation that
releases the newly formed and ravenously hungry demons
directly into the midst of their favored prey: mortal life.
Nabasus feed on sapient creatures, but they never quite manage
to sate their eternal hunger, even as they grow more and more
powerful. Once they have sufficiently feasted, the demons become
worthy to make the return trip to the Abyss, where they undergo
a vile transformation, finally digesting their accumulated meals
and deforming further into powerful vrolikais (page 69).
Nabasus form from the souls of evil gluttons, particularly
from cannibals, blood-drinkers, and those
who prefer the tang of undead flesh.
Bestiary 2
66
NABASU GROWTH
A nabasu stores their stolen deaths
until they finally become satiated.
For most, this occurs after consuming
death from at least 100 mortals, but
the exact timing is left to the GM. The
demon then travels to the Abyss and
transforms into a vrolikai.
NABASU CREATURE 8
CE MEDIUM DEMON FIEND
Perception +17; darkvision
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Draconic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +18, Arcana +16, Religion +16, Stealth +18, Survival +17
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +2 Wis +3, Cha +4
AC 27; Fort +19, Ref +16, Will +16; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 165; Weaknesses cold iron 5, good 5
Death-Stealing Gaze (aura, divine, necromancy, visual) 30 feet. When a non-demon ends its
turn in the aura, it must attempt a DC 23 Fortitude save. If it fails, it becomes drained 1.
Starvation Vulnerability A nabasu denied food suffers painful backlash as their demonic
nature feeds on their own corrupted spirituality. If a nabasu’s Consume Death is disrupted
(such as by a fighter using Disruptive Stance) or a creature resists the effect with a
critical success, the nabasu takes 4d6 mental damage.
Speed 25 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +20 (evil, magical), Damage 2d12+9 piercing plus
1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] claw +20 (agile, evil, magical), Damage 2d8+9
slashing plus 1d6 evil
Divine Innate Spells DC 26; 5th dimension door; 4th
dimension door (at will), grim tendrils, paralyze,
vampiric touch
Rituals DC 26; Abyssal pact
Consume Death [one-action] (concentrate, divine, necromancy,
visual) The nabasu focuses their death-stealing
gaze upon a single target they can see within
30 feet. The target must immediately attempt a
Fortitude save against death-stealing gaze.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and
the nabasu suffers starvation vulnerability.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is affected by deathstealing gaze and becomes drained 1. If
the creature was already drained 1 by the
death-stealing gaze before attempting
the save, a failed save increases the
value of the drained condition by 1, to a
maximum of drained 4. The nabasu gains
10 temporary Hit Points, and the drained
creature is temporarily immune until the
start of the nabasu’s next turn.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature
increases the amount of drain by 2.
Stolen Death A creature that dies while suffering
drain from a nabasu’s death-stealing gaze rises as
a ghoul (Pathfinder Bestiary 168) the next midnight.
HEZROU (TOAD DEMON)
Hezrous dwell in the vast and endless Abyssal swamps,
mires, and waterways and are equally at home on land
and in the water. A hezrou’s presence has an obvious effect
on nearby flora and water, causing plant life to twist and knot
and infusing water with a foul odor and brackish taste—signs much
easier to spot on the Material Plane than in the Abyss. Long
exposure to this corruption can cause vile transformations
and hideous mutations, and entire miserable communities
of corrupted creatures sometimes rise in swamplands where 
D
67
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
HALF-DEMONS
The Abyss can corrupt living
creatures through direct congress
or supernatural infusion of Abyssal
energies, resulting in monstrous
hybrids. A half-demon should be a
custom creature, but you can quickly
generate one by giving an existing
creature a few of a demon’s abilities
along with the demon’s sin-related
vulnerability. For example, a halfhezrou hill giant would gain purity
vulnerability, but perhaps also a bite,
swim Speed, and poisonous pustules.
When swapping over abilities between
creatures of different levels, be sure to
adjust the numbers for the new level.
a hezrou dwells. Hezrous themselves prefer simple pleasures, and they often
waste their considerable intellect in the pursuit of comfortable places to slumber,
squealing meals to eat, or objects of beauty to deface. They do not seek out cults to
fawn over them but will not turn away those who seek to worship on their own.
Hezrous form from the souls of those who abused and polluted their environs or
neighbors, either through the introduction of toxins to the region or the insidious
spread of drugs and poisons through a society.
HEZROU CREATURE 11
CE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS DEMON FIEND
Perception +21; darkvision
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Draconic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Athletics +24, Arcana +21, Intimidation +23, Stealth +20 (+24 in swamps)
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +6, Int +4, Wis +5, Cha +4
AC 31; Fort +23, Ref +18, Will +22; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 245; Weaknesses cold iron 10, good 10
Purity Vulnerability A hezrou revels in the foulness it exudes and becomes distraught
when contaminations are purified. The first time in a round when a contamination
is purified (such as via purify food and drink) or a toxin is neutralized (such as via
neutralize poison) within 30 feet of a hezrou, the demon takes 6d6 mental damage.
Stench (aura, olfactory) 30 feet. A creature entering the aura or starting its turn in the
aura must succeed at a DC 27 Fortitude save or become sickened 1 (plus slowed 1
for as long as itʼs sickened on a critical failure). While within the aura, affected
creatures take a –2 circumstance penalty to saves against disease and to
recover from the sickened condition. A creature that succeeds at its save
is temporarily immune for 1 minute.
Speed 30 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws (evil, magical, reach 10 feet) +24, Damage
2d12+13 piercing plus 1d6 evil and Grab
Melee [one-action] claw (agile, evil, magical, reach 10 feet) +24,
Damage 2d8+13 slashing plus 1d6 evil
Divine Innate Spells DC 27; 6th divine wrath, paranoia;
5th Abyssal plague, dimension door; 4th dimension
door (at will), divine wrath (at will), gaseous form
Rituals DC 27; Abyssal pact, blight
Poisonous Pustules [one-action](poison) Requirement The hezrou
is grappling a creature; Effect Toxic fluids spurt from
burst boils and weeping wens on the hezrou’s body.
A creature grabbed or restrained by the hezrou takes
2d12+6 poison damage (DC 30 basic Fortitude save).
NALFESHNEE (BOAR DEMON)
Nalfeshnees are huge, corpulent, boar-headed
demons that hoard treasures and knowledge alike
and form from the souls of avaricious mortals.
Few demons understand the inner workings
of the Abyss itself like nalfeshnees, and it’s not
unusual for a nalfeshnee to see itself as a servitor
of the Abyss itself first rather than bow before
a demon lord. Some claim stewardship over the
fleshy realms that birth new demons, while others
guard sites of particular significance deep in the
plane’s secret reaches. A nalfeshnee’s realm in the
Abyss can easily surpass the strength and size of the
largest mortal kingdoms, for nalfeshnees display a
singular gift for managing and manipulating the chaos
of the Abyss.
Bestiary 2
68
SECRET MONGERS
Nalfeshnees covet knowledge as
well as material goods, especially if
such information can help satisfy the
needs and desires of the Abyss. Each
nalfeshnee has areas of interest in
which they’re highly knowledgeable,
but before a nalfeshnee reveals a
secret, they typically demand a secret
of at least equal value in return.
NALFESHNEE CREATURE 14
CE HUGE DEMON FIEND
Perception +25; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Draconic; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Abyss Lore +25, Arcana +25, Athletics +28, Deception +26, Diplomacy +24,
Intimidation +28, Religion +25
Str +8, Dex +2, Con +8, Int +5, Wis +5, Cha +4
AC 34; Fort +28, Ref +22, Will +23; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 365; Weaknesses cold iron 15, good 15
Forfeiture Aversion A nalfeshnee’s greed is such that losing possessions causes them
harm. If an item is stolen from a nalfeshnee, the demon takes 3d6+10 mental damage.
Greedy Grab[reaction] Trigger A creature critically fails a weapon Strike against the nalfeshnee;
Effect The nalfeshnee attempts to Disarm the weapon used in the triggering Strike at a
–2 circumstance penalty. On a success, the nalfeshnee steals the weapon.
Speed 30 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +29 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d12+14 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +29 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+14 slashing
Divine Innate Spells DC 34; 6th dispel magic (at will), divine wrath (at will); 5th dimension
door, illusory object (at will); 4th dimension door (at will); Constant (6th)
true seeing
Rituals DC 34; Abyssal pact
Claim Wealth [one-action] (conjuration, divine, extradimensional) The
nalfeshnee steals all unattended items glowing with its Light
of Avarice into an extradimensional space. The demon can
Interact to regurgitate any number of these items into their
hand or onto the ground. If the demon dies, is affected by a
teleportation effect, or consumes an extradimensional space
(such as a bag of holding), they vomit up all the items.
Light of Avarice [two-actions] (divine, enchantment, light, mental);
Frequency once per hour; Effect Beams of unholy light
shoot from the nalfeshnee toward four items within 60
feet. If someone is holding or wearing a targeted item,
they can keep it from being affected with a successful
DC 34 Reflex save. For 1 minute, the affected items glow
in nauseating colors. Any non-demon is sickened 2
and slowed 1 as long as it holds, wears, or touches a
glowing item. Recovering from the sickness requires
a successful DC 29 Will save instead of a Fortitude
save. Ending the sickness this way ends the slowed
condition and makes the creature temporarily
immune to Light of Avarice for 24 hours. If the
creature removes or drops the item, both conditions
end immediately but the creature doesn’t become
immune to Light of Avarice.
VROLIKAI (DEATH DEMON)
Unlike other demons, the dread vrolikai doesn’t
form from a sinful soul—they instead manifest from
a nabasu once the nabasu finally satisfies their hunger
and returns to the Abyss, and as such vrolikais
suffer from no vulnerability associated with
a specific sin. A vrolikai who survives this
process and the period of vulnerability
that follows gains great power and in time can
claim large regions of the Abyss as their own domain.
Also known as death demons, these murderous monsters
often serve demon lords as executioners or assassins.
D
69
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
VROLIKAI NEWCOMERS
When vrolikais first manifest on the
Abyss, they have no base of power and
are, despite their abilities, relatively
defenseless from denizens even more
powerful than themselves. As a result,
most rely upon stealth and patience
for their first few centuries while
they build up a network of minions
and establish their own Abyssal
fortifications before they turn their
attentions back to the Material Plane.
VROLIKAI CREATURE 19
UNCOMMON CE LARGE DEMON FIEND
Perception +33; darkvision, true seeing
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Draconic, Necril; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +37, Arcana +33, Deception +35, Intimidation +37, Religion +33, Stealth
+33, Survival +33
Str +8, Dex +6, Con +9, Int +6, Wis +6, Cha +8
AC 44; Fort +34, Ref +31, Will +31; +1 to all saves vs. magic
HP 375; Immunities death effects; Weaknesses cold iron 15, good 15
Death-Stealing Gaze (aura, divine, necromancy, visual) 30 feet. As nabasu, but with a DC 38
Fortitude save.
Speed 35 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +38 (evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 4d12+16 piercing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] black flame knife +38 (agile, chaotic, evil, magical), Damage 3d4+16 piercing plus
2d6 negative plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] stinger +38 (evil, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d8+16 piercing
plus 1d6 evil plus mindwarping
Divine Innate Spells DC 43; 9th massacre, power word kill, vampiric
exsanguination; 7th paralyze, regenerate; 5th dimension door (at
will); Constant true seeing
Rituals DC 43; Abyssal pact
Black Flame Knives A vrolikai can manifest
a dagger-shaped blade of what looks
like crystallized black flame in each of
their four hands. These weapons function as
+2 greater striking daggers, although they fade away
into nothingness 1 minute after a vrolikai no longer carries them.
Consume Death [one-action] (concentrate, divine, necromancy, visual) As
nabasu, but the vrolikai does not have starvation vulnerability.
Focused Flames [two-actions] The vrolikai attacks a single target with
all of its black flame knives. The demon makes a black
flame knife Strike. On a successful attack, the
vrolikai deals the damage from a black flame
knife Strike to the target, plus an additional
2d6 negative damage for every black flame
knife they wield beyond the first (typically
6d6 extra damage). Even on a failed attack,
the vrolikai deals the damage from one black
flame knife to the target, though they still
miss completely on a critical failure. On a
critical hit, the victim becomes drained 2 as
the focused attack drains pure life essence
as well as damage. This counts toward the
vrolikai’s multiple attack penalty as a number
of attacks equal to the number of black flame
knives the demon wields.
Mindwarping (emotion, enchantment, mental)
The sting of a vrolikai is mind-warping. A creature struck
must attempt a DC 44 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature becomes stupefied 1 for 1 minute.
Failure The creature becomes stupefied 1. Further failed
saves against mindwarping increase the condition value
by 1, to a maximum of stupefied 4.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature also
becomes confused for 1 minute.
Stolen Death As nabasu.
Bestiary 2
70
LENG
Known variously as the Nightmare
Realm or the Terror Beyond Dreams,
the frozen Plateau of Leng looms
physically and spiritually above the
Dreamlands. Both a part of that
dimension and a corruption of it, Leng
is a realm inhabited by eldritch horrors
and ruled by the horrors’ ancient gods.
Denizen of Leng
Slavers and raiders from the cold, windswept dimension of Leng, these malevolent
humanoids range across reality in ominous black ships capable of sailing beyond
the borders of dimensions and planes. Although most denizens of Leng seek
slaves and plunder like any pirate, others operate as self-styled ambassadors and
merchants, sowing discord with far-ranging plots. While the inscrutable denizens
dress themselves in flowing robes, veils, and broad turbans to appear human, their
aberrant physiology, when glimpsed, is evident from their crown of stubby horns
and tentacled jaws to their furry, goat-like legs.
Above the fierce captains who command the infamous black ships are an even
higher caste of denizens of Leng. These cultists and musicians serve as high priests,
laboring to appease the frightening gods who look down upon the Nightmare
Realm with cold malice.
DENIZEN OF LENG CREATURE 8
CE MEDIUM ABERRATION DREAM
Perception +17; darkvision
Languages Aklo; tongues
Skills Acrobatics +15, Athletics +15, Deception +19, Occultism +18,
Sailing Lore +20, Stealth +17, Thievery +17
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +6, Wis +3, Cha +5
Items +1 striking kukri, Leng ruby worth 30 gp (2)
AC 27; Fort +16, Ref +19, Will +17
HP 100, planar fast healing 5; Immunities cold; Resistances critical
hits 10, precision 10
No Breath Denizens of Leng don’t need to breathe.
Planar Fast Healing A denizen of Leng maintains a connection to Leng
at all times, and when away from Leng, they have fast healing 5.
They lose this ability on Leng or in areas where planar connections
do not function. If killed, their body dissolves into nothingness
in 1d4 rounds, leaving behind their equipment. A slain denizen
reforms in Leng; they can be permanently killed only when
their planar fast healing doesn’t function.
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] kukri +18 (agile, finesse, magical, trip), Damage
2d6+6 slashing plus 1d6 persistent bleed
Melee [one-action] jaws +17 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d10+6
piercing plus debilitating bite
Occult Innate Spells DC 27, attack +19; 4th outcast’s
curse, phantom pain, suggestion; 3rd hypnotic
pattern, levitate, locate, mind reading; 2nd mirror image;
Cantrips (4th) chill touch, detect magic, mage hand,
message, read aura; Constant (4th) tongues
Debilitating Bite (curse, occult) A creature that takes damage
from a denizen’s bite must succeed at a DC 27 Fortitude save
or become clumsy 1. Each time a target fails an additional
save against this ability, the condition value increases by 1
(to a maximum of clumsy 4). This condition value decreases
by 1 every 24 hours.
Leng Ruby (enchantment, occult) Many denizens of Leng carry
strange rubies mined from quarries in Leng. As long as a creature
holds a Leng ruby that it willingly accepted as a gift or payment
from a denizen of Leng, any denizen of Leng can target that
creature with outcast’s curse, phantom pain, or mind reading at
a range of 1 mile, and the bearer uses an outcome one
degree of success worse than the result of its saving throw
against outcast’s curse.
D
71
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DESTRACHAN LANGUAGE
The Destrachan language can be
learned by other creatures, but
without a destrachan’s unique vocal
organs, non-destrachans can convey
only basic notions and concepts with
it. In most cases, it’s better to speak
Undercommon to a destrachan than
attempt to use its own language.
Destrachan
This underground reptilian horror walks on two powerful hind legs. Its
forelimbs are armed with sharp curving claws, and its toothy, eyeless, tubular
head has three hypersensitive frilled ears that turn toward any sound made in
its vicinity. This cruel monster’s true weapon, however, is an amplified version of
the sonic cry that it uses to navigate, communicate, and hunt. It communicates
with others of its kind through a complex series of clicks, shrieks, and whistles,
but it is intelligent enough to understand other languages. Most destrachans
understand at least one other language—usually Undercommon—and can often
be reasoned with.
An obligate carnivore, the destrachan relishes fresh meat but won’t hesitate to
make a meal of carrion it finds in its path. When traveling in packs, the creatures
take great delight in stalking travelers through miles of tunnels before attacking
and subduing them, then devouring them alive.
DESTRACHAN CREATURE 8
CE LARGE ABERRATION
Perception +20; echolocation 120 feet, no vision
Languages Destrachan, Undercommon (can speak only
Destrachan)
Skills Athletics +18, Stealth +15, Survival +18
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +3, Wis +6, Cha +3
Echolocation A destrachan can use its hearing as a
precise sense at the listed range.
AC 27; Fort +16, Ref +13, Will +18, +4 status bonus to all
saves vs. sonic
HP 135; Immunities blinded, visual; Resistances sonic 15
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +20, Damage 2d8+10 piercing plus 1d8 sonic
Melee [one-action] claw +20 (agile), Damage 2d8+10 slashing
Destructive Harmonics [two-actions] (auditory, evocation, occult, sonic) The
destrachan emits a harsh sonic cry that deals 9d6 sonic damage (DC 26
basic Reflex save) in either a 60-foot cone or a 30-foot burst. It can’t
use Destructive Harmonics again for 1d4 rounds.
Painful Harmonics [two-actions] (auditory, evocation, incapacitation, occult)
The destrachan emits a sonic cry in either a 60-foot cone or a
30-foot burst. This discordant ululation resonates along
the nerves and bones of living creatures in the area,
manifesting as waves of incapacitating pain washing
over the victims. Each living creature in the area must
attempt a DC 26 Fortitude save. The destrachan can’t
use Painful Harmonics again for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is sickened 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is deafened for 3 rounds
and stunned 2.
Critical Failure The creature is deafened for 1
minute and stunned 3.
Shattering Harmonics [two-actions] (evocation, occult,
sonic) The destrachan focuses its harmonics
against a single item within 60 feet that is
made of crystal, metal, stone, or wood. The
target object takes 7d8 sonic damage. If the
item is attended, its bearer can attempt a
DC 26 basic Reflex save for the item. The
destrachan can’t use Shattering Harmonics
again for 1d4 rounds.
Bestiary 2
72
THE HIERARCHY OF HELL
Hell is a harsh plane of law with little
use for compassion or empathy. As
such, it exists entirely within a strict
hierarchy, and this order extends to
its denizens. While different types of
demons correspond to various sins
and daemons are associated with
modes of mortal death, the different
types of devils exist solely to fulfill
particular roles in the infernal
machine. On occasion, a particular
devil can transcend the role for
which they were literally shaped,
but this often transforms the devil
physically into the type suitable for
their new role.
Devil
Each type of devil plays a particular role in Hell’s bureaucracies and hierarchies,
though some have far more specialized functions than others.
ZEBUB (ACCUSER DEVIL)
Zebubs serve as Hell’s messengers and spies. Their ability to share what they’ve seen
with other creatures makes them especially useful—not only to other devils, but also
to mortal conjurers. Some infernal lords unleash them in enormous, horrid swarms
upon unsuspecting lands to debase flesh and land alike while collecting secrets the
infernal host might later put to use. Zebubs use any opportunity to manipulate
weak-willed or easily tempted mortals into serving the zebubs’ whims. While
arrogant and deceitful, zebubs lack the cunning and confidence of most devils, and
thus their schemes often focus on satisfying self-serving or self-destructive ambitions.
Zebubs form from the souls of childish and craven mortals, reshaped by the archdevil
Baalzebul in the frozen, filthy wastes of Hell’s seventh layer, Cocytus.
ZEBUB CREATURE 3
LE SMALL DEVIL FIEND
Perception +12; greater darkvision
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +10, Arcana +7, Deception +8, Religion +9, Stealth +10
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +1
AC 20: Fort +8, Ref +10, Will +8; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 30; Immunities fire; Weaknesses good 5; Resistances physical 5 (except
silver), poison 5
Speed 15 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +12 (evil, finesse, magical), Damage 1d10+3 piercing plus 1d6
evil and Cocytan filth
Divine Innate Spells DC 17; 5th dimension door; 4th dimension door (at will); 2nd invisibility
(at will, self only), summon animal (swarm creatures only); Cantrips (2nd) message
Rituals DC 17; infernal pact
Cocytan Filth (disease, virulent) Saving Throw DC 18 Fortitude; Onset 1d4 days;
Stage 1 enfeebled 1 (1 day); Stage 2 enfeebled 2 (1 day); Stage 3 enfeebled 3 (1 day)
Infernal Eye[three-actions] (divine, divination) The zebub records everything they see,
and though they don’t remember all observations, they can pass them along
to another creature. The zebub replays 10 minutes of witnessed
events to a touched willing creature, which receives the memories
in a flash of information. By remaining in contact, the zebub can
spend additional 3-action activities to replay more information. After relaying
their visions to another, the zebub can’t ever recall those events again.
Sneak Attack The zebub’s Strikes deal an additional 1d6 precision damage to
flat-footed creatures.
SARGLAGON (DROWNING DEVIL)
Sarglagons dwell in Hell’s myriad waterways, lakes, and oceans. They serve
as guardians of the Academy of Lies—the repository of secrets in Stygia, the
fifth layer of Hell. Sarglagons breathe water and air with equal ease, and
can move through water, land, and even air with uncanny swiftness.
Few fiends travel the waterways of the multiverse, but where a river
crosses the planes, odds are sarglagons have traveled it to further their
infernal machinations. The only body of water they avoid is the River Styx, as the
fiends have yet to develop any defense against that waterway’s memory-sapping
qualities. Mortal spellcasters sometimes bind sarglagons as guardians of precious
secrets or treasures, particularly in aquatic areas. Most strangely, sarglagons
sometimes act as unnerving caretakers to mortals who have no idea what
they did to earn their unwanted protectors’ attention. The constant uninvited
vigilance of these devils is often disturbing and stifling to their wards.
D
73
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
HELLFIRE
Stinking, sulfurous hellfire is infused
with evil. Hellfire always deals a
combination of fire damage and evil
damage, though the specific ratio
depends on the hellfire’s origin. Certain
types of hellfire can impose other
effects on creatures as well, such as
sapping their strength or memories.
SARGLAGON CREATURE 8
LE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS DEVIL FIEND
Perception +18; greater darkvision, see invisibility
Languages Celestial, Infernal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Arcana +14, Athletics +18, Deception +15, Diplomacy +15, Intimidation +17, Stealth +15
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +3
AC 27; Fort +18, Ref +13, Will +16; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 120; Immunities fire; Weaknesses good 5; Resistances physical 5 (except silver), poison 10
Heavy Aura (aura, divine, incapacitation, transmutation) 10 feet. A creature that enters the
heavy aura must attempt a DC 23 Will save. It is then temporarily immune for 10 minutes.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is encumbered while it remains in the area. If the creature is
already encumbered, it is immobilized while it remains within the aura.
Critical Failure As failure, but the effect persists for 3 rounds after leaving the aura.
Stygian Guardian[reaction] Trigger A creature or object within the sarglagon’s reach is targeted
by an attack; Effect The sarglagon interposes themself, giving the creature or object
standard cover against the attack (+2 circumstance bonus to AC), or greater cover
(+4 circumstance bonus to AC) if the sarglagon was already granting it lesser cover.
Speed 25 feet, fly 25 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +20 (evil, magical), Damage 2d12+9 piercing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] tentacle arm +20 (agile, evil, magical); Damage 2d8+9 bludgeoning plus 1d6
evil and sarglagon venom
Divine Innate Spells DC 23, attack +18; 5th control water, dimension door; 4th dimension
door (at will), freedom of movement, hydraulic torrent; Constant (2nd) see invisibility
Rituals DC 23; infernal pact
Drown [two-actions] (conjuration, divine, incapacitation) The sarglagon conjures murky water
to fill the lungs of a creature that can’t breathe water within 30 feet. The target must
attempt a DC 26 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target coughs up water and is sickened 1.
Failure The target is holding its breath (Core Rulebook
478). The only action it can take is to attempt a
Fortitude save against Drown to expel the
water, which is a single action.
Critical Failure The target falls unconscious
and begins suffocating. If the target
succeeds at its Fortitude save
while suffocating, it coughs up the
water and can breathe again.
Sarglagon Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 26
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage
1 2d6 poison damage and clumsy 1 (1 round);
Stage 2 3d6 poison damage and clumsy 2 (1 round)
OSYLUTH (BONE DEVIL)
An osyluth is an unparalleled inquisitor that revels
in the sadism and torture for which Hell is so well
known. These devils’ charge is to seek out heresies,
both among mortals and among other fiends—a
commandment they uphold with unwavering
fervor. They spawn within the Styx-fed swamps
of Hell’s fifth layer, Stygia; where heresies and
the souls of heretics stagnate, osyluths eventually
rise. In the remote corners of that same layer of Hell,
they build massive, calcified hives where they perform their vile
interrogations and perfect their torturous arts upon lesser devils
and petitioners alike.
Bestiary 2
74
HELLMOUTHS
While travel to and from Hell is
possible with plane shift, another
way to reach and traverse the
infernal realms is via hellmouths,
strange living portals connecting
different layers or even different
planes. A hellmouth takes the form
of a grimacing face, distended
maw, or other distressingly organic
aperture, and no two share the
same appearance. Most are carefully
guarded, but some new or well-hidden
hellmouths have yet to be discovered.
OSYLUTH CREATURE 9
LE LARGE DEVIL FIEND
Perception +21; greater darkvision
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Arcana +18, Deception +19, Intimidation +21, Religion +17, Stealth +20
Str +5, Dex +5, Con +4, Int +3, Wis +4, Cha +4
AC 28; Fort +17, Ref +18, Will +17; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 135; Immunities fire; Weaknesses good 10; Resistances physical 10 (except silver),
poison 10
Speed 35 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +21 (evil, magical), Damage 2d10+11 piercing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] claw +21 (agile, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+11 slashing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] stinger +21 (evil, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 1d10+11 piercing plus 1d6 evil
and osyluth venom
Ranged [one-action] bone shard +21 (evil, magical, range increment 30 feet), Damage 2d6+8 piercing
Divine Innate Spells DC 25; 5th dimension door, phantom pain; 4th dimension door (at will),
dimensional anchor (×2), discern lies, zone of truth; 2nd invisibility (at will; self only)
Rituals DC 25; infernal pact
Osyluth Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 25 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds;
Stage 1 2d6 poison damage, enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 3d6 poison damage
and enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 3 3d6 poison damage and enfeebled 2
(1 round). Once a creature reaches stage 3, it takes a –4 status penalty to
Will saves against attempts to Coerce it for 1 hour (this is a mental effect).
Quick Invisibility The osyluth can cast innate invisibility using only 1 action.
Sadistic Strike An osyluth deals an extra 2d6 damage whenever they
Strike an enfeebled, frightened, or prone creature.
Stygian Inquisitor [one-action](linguistic, mental) The osyluth telepathically
questions a creature affected by zone of truth. After 1
round, if the creature intentionally refuses to answer
the question, it takes 2d6 mental damage.
Tail Sweep [one-action] The osyluth sweeps their tail in
a 15-foot cone. Each creature in the cone
must succeed at a DC 26 Reflex save or be
knocked prone.
HAMATULA (BARBED DEVIL)
Hamatulas are forged in Erebus to
protect infernal vaults from those
foolish enough to try to rob the
archdevil Mammon. In case the
vicious spines protruding from their
bodies and ability to teleport weren’t
deadly enough, they are also clever
wielders of warding glyphs. They are
effective conjured guardians, though
they resent being pulled away from
their duties in Hell. Unlike most fiends,
hamatulas are formed from several souls
that lack any features distinctive enough to
merit another role.
HAMATULA CREATURE 11
LE MEDIUM DEVIL FIEND
Perception +24; greater darkvision
Languages Celestial, Draconic, Infernal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +23, Arcana +18, Intimidation +21, Religion +20, Stealth +23,
Survival +22
D
75
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
HAMATULA TREASURES
Perhaps because hamatulas exist to
guard the riches of archdevils, infernal
dukes, and queens of the night, they
find themselves drawn to wealth.
Though they despise summoners who
pull them away from their assigned
duties, hamatulas use their servitude
as an opportunity to collect treasures
and wealth that they can offer to their
lords upon their return. Treasures that
are painful or dangerous to handle are
among their favorite prizes.
Str +7, Dex +6, Con +5, Int +1, Wis +5, Cha +4
AC 31; Fort +23, Ref +20, Will +20; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 165; Immunities fire; Weaknesses good 10; Resistances physical 10 (except silver),
poison 10
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Barb only. A hamatula gains an extra reaction at the start of
each of its turns that it can use only to make an Attack of Opportunity. It can’t use
more than one Attack of Opportunity triggered by the same action. In addition to the
normal trigger, a hamatula can make an Attack of Opportunity against a creature that
touches it or an adjacent creature that attempts a melee Strike against it.
Speed 25 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] barb +24 (evil, magical), Damage 3d8+13 piercing plus 1d6 evil and bloodletting
Ranged [one-action] hurled barb +23 (evil, magical, range increment 60 feet), Damage 2d8+13
piercing plus 1d6 evil and bloodletting
Divine Innate Spells DC 27, attack +21; 5th dimension door, glyph of warding (at will); 4th
dimension door (at will); 3rd harm, paralyze (×2); Cantrips (5th) produce flame
Rituals DC 27; infernal pact
Bloodletting On a critical hit, the hamatula’s barbs deal 3d6 persistent bleed damage.
Frightful Strike [free-action] (divine, emotion, enchantment, fear, mental) Trigger The hamatula
hits a creature with a barb Strike; Effect The creature struck must succeed at
a DC 27 Will save or become frightened 2 (or frightened 3 on a critical
failure). Regardless of the result of its saving throw, the creature
is then temporarily immune to Frightful Strike for 24 hours.
Impaling Barb [two-actions] The hamatula makes a barb Strike, then
Strides up to half its Speed without triggering reactions. If
the Strike hits, the hamatula impales the target with one of
its barbs and snaps the barb free as it moves away from
the target. This deals an additional 2d8 piercing damage
to the target and pins it to an adjacent surface, rendering
it immobilized (Escape DC 29).
Warden of Erebus A hamatula’s glyph of warding innate
spell can contain any common spell from the Core
Rulebook that meets the criteria in glyph of warding;
the hamatula doesn’t need to provide the spell.
GYLOU (HANDMAIDEN DEVIL)
Though gylous are deeply entrenched in the expansive
and complex machinations of Hell, they are highly
skilled agents capable of nuanced diplomacy, masterful
deception, physical finesse, and nearly any other
tasks they set their minds to. This versatility has
led to gylous becoming widespread throughout
all layers of Hell, enabling them to filter key
information to their masters regarding other
devils’ plots and schemes. Their allegiance
is no secret, but their skills are so great
that powerful devils employ one or more
gylous regardless. While most gylous have
a feminine form (combined with their role,
this is the source of their common moniker
of “handmaiden”), some have other gender
presentations, and nearly all gylous take on
carefully cultivated illusions to best suit the roles
they fill. More often than not, gylous arise when
lesser devils who have demonstrated exceptional utility
and invaluable skills are uplifted into a new form, though
on rare occasions they are shaped from the souls of evil mortals
who showed unparalleled savvy within bureaucratic enterprises.
Bestiary 2
76
QUEENS OF THE NIGHT
The four queens of the night wield
great power in the Pit. Ardad Lili
is a plotter and manipulator with
ambitions of ruling the heavens, while
Doloras revels in suffering. Most
distant is Mahathallah, watching over
fate and death. Mightiest among them
is Eiseth, who is assembling an army
in Dis in the hopes of claiming the iron
throne of Malebolge.
GYLOU CREATURE 14
LE MEDIUM DEVIL FIEND
Perception +28; greater darkvision, true seeing
Languages Celestial, Common, Draconic, Infernal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +27, Athletics +28, Arcana +25, Deception +30, Diplomacy +28,
Religion +26, Stealth +27
Str +4, Dex +7, Con +4, Int +5, Wis +6, Cha +8
AC 36: Fort +22, Ref +25, Will +28; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 240; Immunities fire; Weaknesses good 10; Resistances physical 10 (except silver)
Reflexive Grab [reaction] Trigger A creature leaves a square within the gylou’s reach using a move
action or attempts a melee Strike against the gylou; Effect The gylou lashes out with a
tentacle, attempting to Grapple the triggering creature. If the triggering Strike was with
a melee weapon, the attacking creature can Release the weapon to cause the gylou to
automatically fail the Athletics check.
Speed 35 feet, climb 35 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +30 (agile, evil, finesse, magical), Damage 3d8+12 slashing plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] tentacle +30 (evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+12 bludgeoning plus Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 36, attack +28; 7th dispel magic, dominate; 5th black tentacles,
dimension door, illusory object (at will); 4th charm (×3), dimension door (at will),
enthrall (at will); Constant (7th) true seeing
Rituals DC 36; infernal pact
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph, transmutation) The
gylou adopts the appearance of any Small or Medium humanoid.
This doesn’t change their Speed or the attack and damage modifiers
of their Strikes, but it might change the damage type their Strikes
deal (typically to bludgeoning).
Indispensable Savvy [reaction] Frequency once per day; Trigger The gylou
attempts a skill check but hasn’t rolled yet; Effect The gylou demonstrates
a preternatural ability for the task at hand. They use their Deception modifier for the
triggering check and for all skill checks using the same skill thereafter until the next
time the gylou uses this ability or until 24 hours have passed, whichever happens first.
Tentacle Encage [one-action] (attack) Requirements The gylou has a Medium or smaller creature
grabbed; Effect The gylou transfers the grabbed creature into their lower body’s
net of encaging tentacles, freeing their limbs and tentacles to make Strikes. This
has the same effects as Swallow Whole (Medium, 2d12+12 bludgeoning,
Rupture 30), except the encaged creature is not at risk of suffocation,
and the gylou can bring the encaged creature with them when
they cast dimension door. A gylou can have only one creature
encaged at a time.
CORNUGON (HORNED DEVIL)
Hell’s armies contain legions upon legions of
different devils all suited precisely to their roles.
But such an army needs able commanders,
and it is this role that cornugons fill. Their
mere presence inspires those under their
command to improved performance—
often through fear of the horrible
torments that a cornugon can unleash as
punishment for failure. Forged in the fires
of Malebolge from the most renowned
warriors among lesser devilkind, even
the least cornugon is among the fiercest
warriors of the multiverse. The greatest
among them on occasion ascend further
still, becoming those rare and feared
legends of Hell called malebranche.
D
77
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
THE MALEBRANCHE
Every 5,000 years, the mightiest
cornugon becomes a malebranche,
a quasi-deity below infernal dukes.
Scholars on Golarion currently know
of 12 active malebranche, and while
each is unique, all share the goal of
conquering the Material Plane.
CORNUGON CREATURE 16
LE LARGE DEVIL FIEND
Perception +28; greater darkvision
Languages Celestial, Common, Draconic, Infernal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +28, Athletics +32, Intimidation +30, Religion +28, Stealth +26, Warfare
Lore +30
Str +8, Dex +6, Con +7, Int +4, Wis +6, Cha +6
Items +2 greater striking unholy spiked chain
AC 38; Fort +31, Ref +26, Will +26; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 300; Immunities fire; Weaknesses good 15; Resistances physical 15 (except silver),
poison 15
Circle of Protection (abjuration, aura, divine, evil)
10 feet. A constant circle of protection
against good is centered on the
cornugon.
Commander’s Aura (aura, divine,
enchantment) 100 feet.
Allied evil creatures in
the aura of a level lower
than the devil’s gain a +1
circumstance bonus to
attack rolls, damage rolls,
AC, saves, and skill checks.
Frightful Presence (aura,
divine, emotion, enchantment,
fear, mental) 10 feet, DC 34
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] spiked chain +34 (disarm, evil, finesse, magical,
reach 10 feet, trip), Damage 3d8+16 slashing plus 2d6 evil
and stunning chain
Melee [one-action] claw +32 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d10+14 slashing
plus 1d6 evil
Melee [one-action] tail +32 (magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+14 slashing plus 1d6
evil and infernal wound
Divine Innate Spells DC 36; 7th dispel magic, fireball (×2),
lightning bolt (×2); 5th dimension door; 4th dimension door
(at will)
Rituals DC 36; infernal pact
Chain of Malebolge [one-action] Requirements The cornugon’s
last action was a success with a spiked chain
Strike; Effect The devil pulls the creature 5 feet
closer and grabs it with the spiked chain
(Escape DC 42). The creature is automatically
freed if the devil makes another spiked chain
attack or moves away.
Infernal Wound (divine, necromancy) A cornugon’s
tail Strike deals 4d6 persistent bleed damage.
The DC of the flat check to stop the bleeding
starts at 20 and is reduced to 15 only if someone
successfully assists. The DC to Administer First Aid to a creature
with an infernal wound increases by 10. A spellcaster or item using healing
magic on an infernally wounded creature must succeed at a DC 34 counteract check or
the magic fails to heal the creature.
Stunning Chain (incapacitation) If the cornugon critically hits with its spiked chain
Strike, the target must succeed at a DC 34 Fortitude save or be stunned for 1
round (1d4 rounds on a critical failure).
Bestiary 2
78
SOUL SWALLOWERS
The fact that devourers consume
souls makes them particularly hated
by the church of Pharasma and
psychopomps alike.
Devourer
When fiends and powerful evil spellcasters are lost beyond the farthest reaches
of the multiverse, they sometimes return as horrific undead called devourers that
consume the souls of the living to fuel their arcane machinations. Their bodies are
ruined and rebuilt, hollow and twisted, even as their minds undergo a spiritual
transformation. They gain the ability to bind other souls to their own and drain
their essence for magical power, yet can never be sated in their pursuit of it.
Seething masses of distorted ghostly shapes surge within their hollow rib cages—
manifestations of the devourers’ most recently consumed souls.
DEVOURER CREATURE 11
UNCOMMON NE LARGE UNDEAD
Perception +22; darkvision
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Common, Infernal, Necril
Skills Arcana +21, Deception +21, Intimidation +23, Occultism +23,
Stealth +19
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +5, Int +5, Wis +4, Cha +5
AC 31; Fort +20, Ref +18, Will +24; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 175, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison,
spell deflection, unconscious
Spell Deflection (abjuration, divine) A spellcaster who targets a devourer with
a mental spell, banishment, bind soul, divine decree, divine wrath, possession,
spirit blast, or spirit song can attempt a counteract check to free a soul the
devourer has trapped with Devour Soul. If this counteract attempt succeeds,
the trapped soul is released (though the creature remains dead), and the
devourer can’t use any soul charges from that creature. Devourers are
otherwise immune to these spells.
Speed 30 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +24 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+13 slashing plus
drain life
Occult Innate Spells DC 31, see soul spells below; 6th feeblemind, true seeing;
4th confusion, suggestion; 3rd bind undead, paralyze; 2nd death knell;
1st harm
Rituals DC 31; create undead
Devour Soul [two-actions] (death, divine, necromancy) The devourer touches
a creature within reach, dealing 8d6 negative damage (DC 31 basic
Fortitude save). If a creature is slain by this attack, its soul becomes
trapped within the devourer. While its soul is trapped, a creature
can’t be resurrected except by powerful magic such as a wish spell.
Destroying the devourer or successfully counteracting Devour Soul
(see Spell Deflection above) releases the soul. The devourer can hold only one
soul at a time. A soul has 5 soul charges per level of the originating creature
(see Soul Spells below). The devourer can expend these charges to cast
spells. If the soul is freed and the creature returns to life, the creature
is drained 1 for every 5 soul charges expended. If reduced to 0 soul
charges, the soul is consumed and can be restored to life only by
powerful magic such as wish.
Drain Life (divine, necromancy) When the devourer damages a living
creature with its claw Strike, the devourer gains 10 temporary Hit Points
and the creature must succeed at a DC 24 Fortitude save or become
drained 1. Further damage dealt by the devourer increases the condition
value by 1 on a failed save, to a maximum of drained 4.
Soul Spells A devourer casts occult innate spells, but to do so it must expend
a number of soul charges equal to the spell’s level (similar to casting a spell
using charges from a staff). It can heighten any spell to a maximum of 6th level by
expending more charges as it Casts the Spell. When encountered, a devourer typically
has one trapped soul with 10 soul charges.
D
79
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
WIDGET WORKSHOPS
The first dig-widget came from the
workshops of a dwarven thieves’
guild called Godak’s Grifters, which
used more advanced magical
clockwork theories as a springboard
for these simpler but no less effective
contraptions. With their dig-widgets,
the Grifters plagued the authorities
of several dwarven settlements
over the years. Their travels spread
dig-widget technology, and numerous
improvements have since led to faster
and more reliable versions. Though
upstanding dwarven mechanics have
observed dig-widgets and recognized
the complexity of the technology,
they’ve steadfastly refused to
adapt something with such an
unscrupulous origin.
Dig-Widget
Thieves covet dig-widgets, specialized constructs built for infiltration. Each
dig-widget contains numerous simple tools, including a set of mechanical devices
that function as thieves’ tools, two arms with drills, and two arms with corkscrews
for attaching to and climbing surfaces. Once activated, these devices propel
themselves forward. Though they have the full faculties typical of a construct,
they usually follow a simple routine: avoid notice, pick any lock barring the path,
dig past obstacles, and attack if caught. They’re rarely left unattended, as a thief
needs to be nearby to follow after—both to steal goods and to stop the dig-widget
from engaging in further larceny once it’s achieved its goal.
The source of a dig-widget’s power is as much mechanical as it is magical.
The gears and springs that provide a dig-widget mobility are an improvement
over more primitive true clockwork creations (whose functions require constant
winding to remain mobile), but at the cost of security, for a dig-widget’s moving
parts can be dismantled quickly by thieves and others with the proper training.
DIG-WIDGET CREATURE 5
N SMALL CONSTRUCT MINDLESS
Perception +9; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +12, Athletics +9 (+12 to Leap
or Climb), Stealth +14, Thievery +15
Str +2, Dex +5, Con +1, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Infiltration Tools A dig-widget’s face consists of
a set of infiltrator thieves’ tools. They can be
salvaged from a destroyed dig-widget with
a successful DC 20
Crafting check. On a
failed check, the tools
are destroyed.
AC 23; Fort +10, Ref +14, Will +7
HP 65; Immunities bleed, death
effects, disease, doomed, drained,
fatigued, healing, mental, necromancy,
nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison,
sickened, unconscious
Mechanical Vulnerability A creature with expert
proficiency in Thievery can attempt a check to
Disable a Device to damage a dig-widget. The
DC is 22, and each success deals 20 damage.
Speed 30 feet, burrow 15 feet
Melee [one-action] drill +14 (fatal d10, finesse), Damage
2d6+4 piercing plus 1d6 persistent bleed
Melee [one-action] corkscrew +14 (finesse), Damage 2d8+4
piercing
Fastening Leap [one-action] The dig-widget Leaps up 20
feet onto a creature or object and attempts
a corkscrew Strike against it. If the Strike
damages the target, the dig-widget attaches
to the target (typically to the back of a
creature). This is similar to Grabbing the
creature, but the dig-widget moves with that
creature rather than holding it in place. While
attached, the dig-widget can’t use its corkscrew. The
dig-widget can be Shoved off, or it can detach itself with
an Interact action.
Sneak Attack A dig-widget’s Strikes deal an additional 1d6
precision damage to flat-footed creatures.
Bestiary 2
80
COMPSOGNATHUS FAMILIARS
Appropriate familiar abilities for
a compsognathus familiar include
climber, damage avoidance, fast
movement, kinspeech, manual
dexterity, scent, or speech. A
compsognathus familiar who can
talk tends to do so in a rapid voice,
with plenty of questions as a result
of its eager curiosity. Note that while
dinosaurs aren’t technically all the
same species, you should consider
allowing a compsognathus with
kinspeech the ability to speak to any
dinosaur rather than limiting it to
only fellow compsognathuses.
Dinosaur
Dinosaurs encompass a staggering range of creatures, from tiny but still
dangerous scavengers like the compsognathus to lumbering giants like the
ravenous spinosaurus to ornery herbivores like iguanodons. Often sought out
and partially domesticated to serve as exotic pets for eccentric aristocrats or
dangerous guardians for those eager to protect their holdings with frightening
but tamable creatures, dinosaurs are far from limited to lurking in primeval
“lost worlds.”
COMPSOGNATHUS
The compsognathus is a small bipedal dinosaur that moves in swift, darting
motions. Its bite injects a venom that causes numbness and weakness, a trait that
the animal uses to bring down larger prey, although it prefers to scavenge food or
snatch up insects and other smaller creatures for its meals. The compsognathus
is curious to a fault; most encounters that result in combat with these diminutive
dinosaurs result not from the creatures’ hunger but from frightened defensive
reactions when the dinosaurs’ inquisitive natures compel them to enter into
situations (such as wagons or bedrolls) that inadvertently put them at odds with
surprised adventurers.
A compsognathus measures 3 feet long from its head to the tip of its tail and
weighs 15 pounds. It is small enough to serve as a house pet or even as a familiar
for a spellcaster. In cases where magical links aren’t involved, however, those
encountering or keeping the creatures would be well-advised to treat them with
the same caution one might extend to a pet viper or other poisonous reptile, as
they are at best partly tame.
COMPSOGNATHUS CREATURE –1
N TINY ANIMAL DINOSAUR
Perception +5; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +6, Stealth +6
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +2, Int –4,
Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 15; Fort +4, Ref +7,
Will +4
HP 8
Speed 30 feet, swim 15
feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +7 (agile,
finesse), Damage 1d6
piercing plus compsognathus
venom
Compsognathus Venom (poison)
Saving Throw DC 16 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 4 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison damage and enfeebled 1
(1 round); Stage 2 1d8 poison damage and enfeebled 1 (1 round)
PACHYCEPHALOSAURUS
Pachycephalosauruses are normally peaceful herbivorous dinosaurs, but they grow
much more violent during their mating season, when they fight one another to win
over mates and warn away interlopers. They also defend themselves vehemently
when potential predators stray too close to their herd. The pachycephalosaurus’s
skull has a distinctive dome-shaped crown surrounded by numerous blunt, bony
horns. This feature, combined with the dinosaur’s powerful, compact neck, allows
it to make battering-ram-like charges capable of inflicting great damage.
Some humanoid groups have successfully trained pachycephalosauruses for use
as mounts, but the creatures aren’t particularly well suited to the task.
Pachycephalosauruses grow to a length of 15 feet and weigh 1,400 pounds.
D
81
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DINOSAUR ABILITIES
While the real world fossil records
hold a wealth of inspiration for
the reconstruction of dinosaurs
in an RPG, you can also look to
living creatures for ideas. Giving
a dinosaur a poisonous bite or
an unusual attack routine like
Clobbering Charge ensures that
dinosaurs are as interesting in
combat as they are in appearance.
PACHYCEPHALOSAURUS CREATURE 3
N LARGE ANIMAL DINOSAUR
Perception +10; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +11, Intimidation +7
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 19; Fort +12, Ref +11, Will +7
HP 65
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] skull +11 (forceful, reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+6 bludgeoning
Clobbering Charge [two-actions] The pachycephalosaurus Strides up to its Speed. If it ends its
movement within melee reach of a target, it can make a skull Strike against that
target. If the pachycephalosaurus critically hits with this Strike, the creature hit is
stunned 1.
Sudden Shove [reaction] (attack) Trigger The pachycephalosaurus damages a Medium or
smaller foe with its skull Strike; Effect The pachycephalosaurus digs in and flings
its head up, shoving its foe away. It attempts an Athletics check against the target’s
Fortitude DC.
Critical Success The pachycephalosaurus pushes the opponent up to 10 feet away
from itself and knocks the target prone.
Success The pachycephalosaurus pushes the opponent back 5 feet.
Failure The pachycephalosaurus fails to push the opponent.
Critical Failure As failure, but the failed attempt leaves the pachycephalosaurus
flat-footed for 1 round.
HADROSAURID
Hadrosaurids are a broad grouping
of herbivorous dinosaurs that
share characteristic flat
snouts filled with rows
of grinding teeth well
suited for feeding
on vegetation. Also
known as “duck-billed
dinosaurs” due to the
unusual shape of their jaws,
hadrosaurids are lumbering
creatures that can rival an
elephant for size, although they
tend to be much less aggressive and
are prone to flight when confronted
with danger rather than stubbornly standing
their ground. Many species of hadrosaurids have
uniquely shaped crests on their heads that give each
species its own unusual profile, making them easily
recognizable even to an amateur dinosaur watcher.
Giants and other oversized creatures have been known
to domesticate hadrosaurids to serve as livestock. Despite
their ability to sprint quickly, they don’t make particularly
viable mounts due to their timid natures, but in a large group,
a panicked gathering of hadrosaurids can wreak
great damage with their trampling.
A hadrosaurid can walk for short
distances on its hind legs but prefers
to graze and travel on all fours. The
typical hadrosaurid is 20 to 30
feet long and can weigh up to
10,000 pounds.
Bestiary 2
82
HADROSAURID CRESTS
The different species of hadrosaurids
all use the same statistics. While
some species have no cranial crest
at all, those who do, such as the
distinctive backward-curling crest
of the parasaurolophus, are capable
of vocalizing sonorous and haunting
calls when they seek the attention
of a mate or warning their herd of a
predator’s approach.
HADROSAURID CREATURE 4
N HUGE ANIMAL DINOSAUR
Perception +13, low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +12, Stealth +10
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha +0
AC 21; Fort +12, Ref +10, Will +11
HP 60
Speed 30 feet
Melee tail +14 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d6+8 bludgeoning
Melee foot +12 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d4+8 bludgeoning
Sprint [two-actions] Frequency once per minute; Effect The hadrosaurid Strides twice. It has a
+20-foot circumstance bonus to its Speed during these Strides.
Trample[three-actions] Large or smaller, foot, DC 21
IGUANODON
Iguanodons are large, herbivorous dinosaurs that inhabit swamps and forests
where they browse on the abundant vegetation. The iguanodon is capable of
moving on two feet or on four, quickly switching from one stance to the other
depending on whether it needs to move through dense foliage or to reach
delectable morsels hanging up in the canopy.
Although iguanodons are herbivores, they are notoriously quick to anger.
Their thumb spikes make their claws particularly devastating weapons. A
well-placed blow from one of these claws can turn a hungry predator into a
cowering beast with one swift strike. Iguanodons are 30 feet long and weigh
6,000 pounds.
IGUANODON CREATURE 6
N HUGE ANIMAL DINOSAUR
Perception +14; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +15
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +4, Int –4,
Wis +4, Cha +0
AC 24; Fort +16, Ref +12,
Will +14
HP 95
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] thumb spike +17
(deadly d10, reach 10 feet),
Damage 2d8+9 piercing
Melee [one-action] tail +15 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d10+9
bludgeoning
Gouging Lunge [two-actions] The iguanodon makes a thumb spike
Strike at an adjacent foe and then Strides up to 15 feet,
dragging its thumb spike across the foe to gouge out a brutal
wound. If this Strike hits, it deals an extra 1d8 points of slashing
damage and the following Stride does not trigger reactions from the
creature struck. This thumb spike Strike counts as two attacks when
calculating the iguanodon’s multiple attack penalty.
SPINOSAURUS
The spinosaurus is more than just one of the largest carnivorous
dinosaurs—it’s also one of the most unusual in appearance,
with a large, sail-like fin running along its spine. Often
quite colorful, this sail allows the spinosaurus to
attract mates, aids in swimming, and makes it
appear to be even larger than it actually is.
A swimming spinosaurus can also use the 
D
83
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MAGICAL DINOSAURS
In a fantasy setting, magical effects
or supernatural influences can
enhance dinosaurs by giving them
unexpected attacks, modes of
movement, or other abilities. You can
quickly create a memorable magical
beast simply by giving a dinosaur the
magical attack of another creature of
an equal level, such as a spinosaurus
gaining an acidic breath weapon akin
to that of an adult black dragon.
sail as part of a unique means of staggering prey by slapping the water with it to
make a crushing wave.
The spinosaurus is equally at home in water as it is on land, and its long, toothy
maw is well-adapted to catching swimming prey. Attempts by giants to capture
spinosauruses to serve as guardians typically go poorly, for these headstrong
dinosaurs do not domesticate well. Their surly attitudes and striking appearances
make them better suited for bloodsports, and they are popular prizes for those
who run arenas specializing in battles that pit gladiators against hungry animals
or beasts. Of course, an angry dinosaur forced to fight for the amusement of
others won’t discriminate between potential meals on the battleground and ones
seated in the surrounding stands.
The spinosaurus’s appearance and strength make it attractive to more than just
giants and bloodsport organizers. Spellcasters who mutate and transform animals
into magical guardians have long been intrigued by the spinosaurus’s potential. More
so than any other dinosaurs, spinosauruses have been subjected to fleshwarping
procedures, crossbreeding with monsters, and other magical techniques to enhance
the creatures’ viability
as effective guardians.
A spinosaurus can
measure up to 60 feet
in length and weighs
25,000 pounds.
SPINOSAURUS CREATURE 11
N GARGANTUAN ANIMAL DINOSAUR
Perception +21; low-light vision, scent (imprecise)
30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +19, Athletics +23 (+25 to Swim)
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +6, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha +1
Deep Breath A
spinosaurus can
hold its breath for
2 hours.
AC 30; Fort +23, Ref +21, Will +19
HP 200
Speed 40 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +23 (deadly d12, reach 20 feet), Damage 2d12+14 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d8+14 slashing
Rip and Tear [one-action] Requirements The spinosaurus has a creature grabbed in its
jaws; Effect The spinosaurus reaches up and slashes with its claws at the
creature it has grabbed, dealing 4d8 slashing damage (DC 30 basic Reflex
save) and 1d6 persistent bleed damage.
Staggering Sail [two-actions] (incapacitation) Requirements The spinosaurus is
swimming on the surface of water; Effect With a powerful lunge to the
side, the spinosaurus uses its sail to slap the surface of the water, creating
a crushing wave of water that deals 6d6 bludgeoning damage in a 30-foot
cone. Each creature in the water in the area must attempt a DC 30 Reflex save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage.
Failure The creature takes full damage and is slowed 1 until the
end of its next turn.
Critical Failure The creature takes double damage and
is stunned 3.
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Medium, 2d12+12
bludgeoning, Rupture 19
Bestiary 2
84
DOLPHINS TO THE RESCUE
Dolphins have a somewhat unusual
trait—they often come to the aid of
other creatures in distress, such as to
save a drowning person or to protect
someone from the attack of a shark.
Not every monster in this book
wants to hurt player characters—
consider having a dolphin come to
an endangered PC’s rescue if the
situation merits!
Dolphin
Dolphins encompass a wide range of aquatic mammals, all of which are quite
social, intelligent, and widespread through the world’s oceans.
BOTTLENOSE DOLPHIN
The bottlenose dolphin is the most common and widespread species of dolphin.
They are social predators who hunt shallow seas and rivers in large family groups
called pods. Sailors are fond of bottlenose dolphins and frequently tell tales of how
they save drowning fishers or kill sharks with blows from their powerful snouts.
BOTTLENOSE DOLPHIN CREATURE 0
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +7; aquatic echolocation 120 feet, low-light vision
Skills Athletics +6
Str +2, Dex +3, Con +2, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
Aquatic Echolocation A bottlenose dolphin can use its hearing as a precise sense at the
listed range, but only underwater.
Deep Breath A bottlenose dolphin can hold its breath for 2 hours.
AC 15; Fort +6, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 16
Speed swim 60 feet
Melee [one-action] snout +6, Damage 1d6+2 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] jaws +6, Damage 1d6+2 piercing
Ramming Speed [two-actions] The bottlenose dolphin Swims twice and
then makes a snout Strike. As long as it moved at least 20
feet, it gains a +1 circumstance bonus to its attack roll. A
Large or smaller creature hit by this attack must succeed at
a DC 16 Fortitude save or be slowed 1 for 1 round.
ORCA
While many know orcas as “killer whales,” they are actually
the largest species of dolphin. These powerful animals hunt
together in pods to take down seals, sharks, and even true
whales. Adult orcas are typically 15–25 feet long and weigh
8,000–12,000 pounds.
ORCA CREATURE 5
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +12; aquatic echolocation 120 feet, low-light vision
Skills Athletics +14, Stealth +13
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
Aquatic Echolocation An orca can use its hearing as a precise sense at the listed range,
but only underwater.
Deep Breath An orca can hold its breath for 2 hours.
AC 21; Fort +14, Ref +11, Will +12
HP 75
Speed swim 60 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +13, Damage 2d8+9 piercing plus Grab
Aquatic Ambush [one-action] 30 feet. An orca can travel no further than 5 feet onto land as
part of an Aquatic Ambush. After it does so, it is prone until it Crawls
to return to the water.
Breach [two-actions] The orca Swims up to its swim Speed, then
Leaps vertically out of the water up to 25 feet in the
air, making a Strike against a creature at any point
during the jump (this lets it attack a creature within
30 feet of the water’s surface). After the Strike, the orca splashes back down into
the water.
D
85
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DOPRILLU MASKS
A doprillu’s stylized mask isn’t a part
of the creature itself, though doprillus
inherently understand the mask’s
purpose and power. When born,
doprillus start out weak and small.
Once one matures and gains sufficient
intelligence and manual dexterity, it
carves its personal mask. The first
time it dons the mask, the doprillu
rushes out to seek a fight. This mask
is never replaced, and it might be
marred from hundreds of battles.
Doprillu
The aberrations known as doprillus are hulks with banded muscles who wear ornate
masks at all times that fill their wearers with magical strength and fighting spirit.
Doprillus love to battle, especially by grappling, and are eager to start brawls. On
neutral ground, a doprillu offers to duel the strongest-looking opponent, but when
a doprillu’s home turf is invaded, no rules apply to the confrontation. As befits the
superheated blood that fuels them, doprillus make their homes in warm locations:
hot jungles, sunny deserts, and underground caverns near sulfur vents.
DOPRILLU CREATURE 14
NE MEDIUM ABERRATION
Perception +22; darkvision, see invisibility
Languages Aklo, Common, Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +26, Athletics +30, Intimidation +22, Stealth +24
Str +8, Dex +6, Con +7, Int +1, Wis +4, Cha +2
AC 36; Fort +27, Ref +28, Will +24; +2 status to all saves vs. fear
HP 260, regeneration 20 (deactivated by cold); Immunities enfeebled (while wearing its
mask), slowed (while wearing its mask); Resistances fire 15
Mask of Power A doprillu’s unique wooden mask is the source of its power. A
doprillu deprived of its mask loses its regeneration and its immunity to
enfeebled and slowed, and it immediately becomes enfeebled 1. The
enfeebled value increases by 1 at the start of each of the doprillu’s
turns, to a maximum of enfeebled 4. If the mask is put back on, the
doprillu immediately regains its abilities and loses the enfeebled
condition. A creature can pull off the mask with a successful DC 34
Athletics check to Force Open.
Volcanic Veins (fire) Fiery magma runs through the doprillu’s veins.
A creature that starts its turn grabbed by the doprillu takes
7d6 fire damage.
Deflect Arrow [reaction] Trigger The doprillu is the target
of a physical ranged attack; Requirements The
doprillu is aware of the attack, isn’t flat-footed
against it, and has a hand free; Effect The
doprillu gains a +4 circumstance bonus to
its AC against the triggering attack.
Speed 40 feet, climb 40 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +30 (agile, magical),
Damage 3d8+16 plus 2d6 fire and
Improved Grab
Occult Innate Spells DC 28; Constant
(6th) see invisibility
Body Strike [one-action] Requirements The
doprillu has a creature grabbed;
Effect The doprillu swings the
grabbed creature as a weapon. This
Strike has a +30 attack modifier and
deals 3d8+16 bludgeoning damage.
The Strike is magical and has a reach
of 10 feet. On a hit, the grabbed creature
takes half the damage dealt to the target.
Whirlwind Throw[two-actions]Requirements The doprillu has a creature
grabbed; Effect The doprillu whirls the grabbed creature about,
making a Body Strike against each creature in reach. After that
Strike, the doprillu can hurl the grabbed creature up to 50 feet
as a ranged Strike. This Strike has the same attack modifier
and damage as Body Strike, but has the thrown 20 feet
weapon trait
Bestiary 2
86
BRINE DRAGON SPELLCASTERS
Brine dragon spellcasters tend to
cast the following spells.
YOUNG
Primal Prepared Spells DC 26,
attack +20; 3rd haste, lightning
bolt, slow; 2nd animal messenger,
humanoid form, water breathing; 1st
create water, grease, negate aroma;
Cantrips (3rd) acid splash, detect
magic, prestidigitation, sigil, stabilize
ADULT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 33, attack
+26; as young brine dragon, plus 5th
cone of cold, control water, mariner’s
curse; 4th freedom of movement,
hallucinatory terrain, solid fog;
Cantrips (5th) acid splash, detect
magic, prestidigitation, sigil, stabilize
ANCIENT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 38, attack
+33; as adult brine dragon, plus 8th
dispel magic, horrid wilting; 7th energy
aegis, plane shift, regenerate; 6th
baleful polymorph, slow, true seeing;
Cantrips (8th) acid splash, detect
magic, prestidigitation, sigil, stabilize
Dragon, Primal
The strange and otherworldly primal dragons hail from realities adjacent to the
Material Plane—the four Elemental Planes and the Shadow Plane. These true
dragons have natures and powers that exemplify their plane of origin and an
affinity for primal magic, unlike chromatic and metallic dragons, who favor
arcane or divine magic. Although they come from distant planes, primal dragons
can be found on the Material Plane in regions touched by or reminiscent of their
home plane. Although such encounters are rare, adventurers and travelers have
sometimes found a brine dragon dwelling near a salty inland sea, for example,
or a crystal dragon living in massive natural caverns deep in the Darklands.
Unlike chromatic and metallic dragons, primal dragons tend not to develop
shape-changing powers, and they are less interested in infiltrating settlements or
influencing others from the shadows.
PRIMAL DRAGON SPELLCASTERS
Each type of primal dragon features a note in the margins on spellcasting dragons of
that type. To make a primal dragon spellcaster, remove the dragon’s Draconic Frenzy
and Draconic Momentum abilities and give it the spells outlined in its sidebar. You
can swap out any number of these with other primal spells, provided you keep the
same number of spells for each level. You might also want to increase the dragon’s
Wisdom or Charisma modifier by 1 or 2 to reflect their mastery of magic.
PRIMAL DRAGONS OF GOLARION
Golarion is not home to many primal dragons. Yet primal dragons do still come to
Golarion now and then, whether to escape persecution in their home plane, build
new lairs, torment and brutalize weaker creatures, or seek knowledge and resources
that are scarce or unavailable at home.
Brine dragons can be found along Golarion’s coastlines but are often frustrated
by piracy and other lawless elements. They tend to avoid heavily populated
coastal areas like the Shackles and instead choose remote islands in the oceans as
their homes, where they can rule small communities of their own curation. Cloud
dragons are even more isolated, and lacking any interest in politics, they prefer
to dwell in large mountain ranges like the Kodars or the Barrier Wall. Crystal
dragons’ vanity compels them to seek places that complement their natural
beauty, such as gem-studded caverns in the Darklands. Of all the primal dragons,
cantankerous magma dragons may be the ones most often found dwelling on
Golarion, where they are drawn to volcanic ranges like the Five Kings Mountains.
Umbral dragons hail not from an Elemental Plane but the Shadow Plane, and they
can be encountered anywhere the borders to that plane grow thin, particularly in
the sinister nation of Nidal.
BRINE DRAGON
Brine dragons are usually blue-green in color, with shiny scales, crests that help
them glide through the water, and sweeping neck frills. They care little for either
good or evil. As they are both opinionated and willing to impose their sense of order
on others, many brine dragons eventually seek to rule over a meticulously crafted
community. These communities are orderly and well-planned, with rigid standards
of courtesy and unchanging laws set down by the dragon themself. A settlement
seeded by a brine dragon can be made of members of almost any ancestry, but the
most common inhabitants are humans, merfolk, tengus, or sahuagin.
Depending on the dragon’s personality, their community members might view
their brine dragon ruler as anything from a benevolent force of order to a fearful
tyrant. Regardless, the typical brine dragon has little patience for kindness or
philanthropy, and the strength and health of their settlement as a whole are of
greater concern than individuals’ well-being. A notable exception to this dispassion
rises when an outside force encroaches on their lands. In these cases, the brine
dragon is quick to step in and aid in the defense of their community.
D
87
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
REZLARABREN
A series of underwater caverns
on Thoska Isle in the Ironbound
Archipelago serves as Rezlarabren’s
lair. There she rules a tribe of ulat-kini
who labor as miners. Her relationship
with the Linnorm Kings is complex,
and whether she views them as allies
or enemies depends on her mood.
Although brine dragons enjoy cultivating settlements, they rarely make their
lairs within the city limits, instead preferring to dwell in sea caves or cliffside
grottoes overlooking the coastline. Here they can retreat for privacy as needed,
or can accumulate and display their gathered wealth in a place where they feel
safe spreading out their treasures. Brine dragon hoards often consist of a mix of
offerings and taxes paid by those they rule over and strange discoveries salvaged
from sunken ships.
YOUNG BRINE DRAGON CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON LN LARGE AMPHIBIOUS DRAGON ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +16; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Aquan, Common, Draconic
Skills Acrobatics +14, Athletics +18, Deception +18, Intimidation +18, Nature +16,
Society +16, Survival +14
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +2, Cha +4
AC 27; Fort +18, Ref +16, Will +16
HP 142; Immunities acid, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 24
Brine Spit [reaction] Trigger A creature the brine dragon observes within 30 feet uses
a concentrate action; Effect The dragon spits a glob of caustic salt water at
the creature. The creature takes 3d6 acid damage (DC 26 basic Reflex save).
On a failure, the concentrate action is disrupted.
Speed 30 feet, fly 100 feet, swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +20 (acid, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d10+8 piercing plus 2d4 acid
Melee [one-action] claw +20 (agile), Damage 2d8+8 slashing
Melee[one-action] tail +18 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+8 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] wing +18 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 1d12+8
piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 26, attack +18; 2nd obscuring
mist; 1st hydraulic push (×2)
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (acid, evocation, primal) The dragon
breathes a spray of acidic salt water that deals 9d6 acid damage
in an 80-foot line (DC 26 basic Reflex save). They can’t use Breath
Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Draconic Frenzy [two-actions] The dragon makes two claw Strikes and one wing
Strike in any order.
Draconic Momentum The dragon recharges their Breath Weapon
whenever they score a critical hit with a Strike.
ADULT BRINE DRAGON CREATURE 12
UNCOMMON LN HUGE AMPHIBIOUS DRAGON ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +23; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Aquan, Common, Draconic, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +20, Athletics +25, Deception +24, Intimidation +24,
Nature +21, Society +21, Survival +21
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +5, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +6
AC 33; Fort +25, Ref +20, Will +21; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 222; Immunities acid, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 30
Brine Spit [reaction] As young brine dragon, but 5d6 damage and DC 30.
Speed 40 feet, fly 120 feet, swim 60 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +26 (acid, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+12 piercing
plus 3d4 acid
Melee [one-action] claw +26 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+12 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +24 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d12+12 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] wing +24 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 1d12+12 piercing
Bestiary 2
88
CLOUD DRAGON SPELLCASTERS
Cloud dragon spellcasters tend to
cast the following spells.
YOUNG
Primal Prepared Spells DC 29,
attack +23; 4th freedom of
movement, hallucinatory terrain,
speak with plants; 3rd earthbind,
haste, stinking cloud; 2nd animal
messenger, faerie fire, speak with
animals; 1st feather fall, negate
aroma, shocking grasp; Cantrips (4th)
dancing lights, detect magic, electric
arc, prestidigitation, read aura
ADULT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 34,
attack +29; as young cloud dragon,
plus 6th heal, slow, true seeing; 5th
banishment, death ward, passwall;
Cantrips (6th) dancing lights, detect
magic, electric arc, prestidigitation,
read aura
ANCIENT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 41,
attack +36; as adult cloud dragon,
plus 9th heal, storm of vengeance;
8th dispel magic, moment of renewal,
punishing winds; 7th energy aegis,
plane shift, unfettered pack; Cantrips
(9th) dancing lights, detect magic,
electric arc, prestidigitation, read aura
Primal Innate Spells DC 32, attack +24; 4th hydraulic torrent; 3rd hydraulic push (×3);
2nd obscuring mist
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (acid, evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a spray of acidic salt
water that deals 13d6 acid damage in a 100-foot line (DC 32 basic Reflex save). They
can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young brine dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young brine dragon.
Desiccating Bite [two-actions] The dragon makes a jaws Strike. On a hit, the target takes 4d6
persistent acid damage, and is sickened 2 from the pain of salt and brine in its wounds.
ANCIENT BRINE DRAGON CREATURE 17
RARE LN GARGANTUAN AMPHIBIOUS DRAGON ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +32; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Aquan, Common, Draconic, Sylvan, Utopian
Skills Acrobatics +28, Athletics +32, Deception +32, Intimidation +34, Nature +30,
Society +30, Survival +29
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +6, Int +5, Wis +5, Cha +6
AC 40; Fort +31, Ref +30, Will +30; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 330; Immunities acid, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 36
Brine Spit [reaction] As young brine dragon, but 7d6 damage and DC 36.
Speed 50 feet, fly 140 feet, swim 70 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +34 (acid, magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d10+17 piercing plus 5d4 acid
Melee [one-action] claw +34 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+17 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +32 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 3d12+17 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] wing +32 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 2d12+17 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 38, attack +30; 6th hydraulic torrent; 5th control water (×3),
mariner’s curse; 4th hydraulic push (at will), obscuring mist (at will)
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (acid, evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a spray of acidic salt
water that deals 18d6 acid damage in a 120-foot line (DC 38 basic Reflex save). They
can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Capsize [one-action] (attack) The dragon tries to capsize an adjacent aquatic vessel of their size
or smaller. They must succeed at an Athletics check with a DC of 35 (reduced by
5 for each size smaller the vessel is than the dragon) or the pilot’s Sailing Lore DC,
whichever is higher.
Desiccating Bite[two-actions] As adult brine dragon, but 6d6 persistent acid damage and sickened 3.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young brine dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young brine dragon.
Painful Strikes (acid) The brine dragon’s body is encrusted with salty, acidic crystals.
When a target takes damage from one of the dragon’s melee Strikes, it must succeed
at a DC 38 Fortitude Save or be stunned 1 (stunned 3 on a critical failure). The target
then becomes temporarily immune for 1 minute.
CLOUD DRAGON
At heart, cloud dragons are wanderers, explorers, and travelers who enjoy nothing
more than seeing new lands and meeting unusual creatures. Cloud dragons range
in color from light blue to a pale, milky white and have thick, curling horns and
rather short snouts. They keep lairs among the extreme altitudes of the highest
mountain peaks but are away on their many journeys as often as they’re at home.
Cloud dragons spend long hours surveying the lands they fly over from great
heights, but they are creatures of whim, making it hard to predict what will pique
their curiosity and bring them winging down to converse or investigate something
on the ground. Cloud dragons seldom perform acts of outright malice, but they are
not often charitable either. A cloud dragon is as likely to simply pluck something
they desire off the ground and fly away with it as they are to bargain fairly.
A cloud dragon’s ever-changing interests never seem to stray toward the
complicated schemes and long-term plans of other dragons. These rovers are 
D
89
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ZANEMBIS
While most cloud dragons prefer
solitude and avoid confrontations,
Zanembis is an excellent example of
how failed dragonslaying attempts
can create problems. Previously
content to dwell atop Angel Peak in
the Mindspin Mountains, this cloud
dragon has grown vengeful and
violent in the wake of unexpected and
unjustified attacks on his lair.
creatures of the moment, and although they are as mentally gifted as other
true dragons, their interests remain in the here and now. Yet the cloud dragon’s
penchant for living in the moment is not a personality flaw—they’re more than
capable of anticipating long-term results of their actions and won’t make foolish
choices simply to pursue a current interest. At the same time, cloud dragons have
little interest in worrying about the future and are as confident in their ability to
handle tomorrow’s problems as they are today’s.
Cloud dragon hoards tend to be well-guarded or well-hidden, as a natural
result of their roving habits often taking them away from their lairs for extended
periods. Their treasuries include a wide variety of items—they are driven to gather
a broad range of prizes rather than collecting one type of item intensively. To a
cloud dragon, a diversified hoard is a perfect hoard.
YOUNG CLOUD DRAGON CREATURE 10
UNCOMMON N LARGE AIR DRAGON ELEMENTAL
Perception +22; darkvision, mist vision,
scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Auran, Common, Draconic
Skills Acrobatics +20, Athletics +21,
Deception +20, Diplomacy +18,
Intimidation +22, Nature +18, Stealth
+18, Survival +16
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +5, Int +2, Wis +4,
Cha +4
Mist Vision Fog and mist don’t impair
a cloud dragon’s vision; they ignore
the concealed condition from fog
and mist.
AC 30; Fort +21, Ref +18, Will +20
HP 175; Immunities electricity,
paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion,
fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 26
Deflecting Cloud [reaction] Trigger The
dragon is the target of a ranged
attack; Requirements The dragon is
aware of the attack and has a free
wing; Effect The cloud dragon flexes
a wing and creates a billowing cloud
of mist. The dragon is treated as if
they were hidden for the purposes
of resolving the triggering attack, so
normally the attacker must succeed at
a DC 11 flat check to target them. The dragon
also gains a +4 circumstance bonus to AC
against the triggering attack.
Speed 40 feet, fly 140 feet; cloud walk
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (electricity, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d10+13 piercing plus 1d12 electricity
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (agile), Damage 2d8+13
slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +21 (reach 15 feet), Damage
2d12+13 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] horn +21 (deadly d8, reach 10
feet), Damage 1d12+11 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 29; 2nd
obscuring mist; 1st gust of wind (at will)
Bestiary 2
90
PRIMAL DRAGON HOARDS
Primal dragons may hail from other
planes of existence than chromatic or
metallic dragons, but they share one
thing in common with those types—
an obsession with treasure. Specific
details on the types of treasures each
category of primal dragon favors are
detailed in their respective entries
on the following pages; beyond
those broad guidelines, the treasures
in a dragon’s hoard should match
the themes of that type of dragon.
A brine dragon’s treasures should
have nautical themes to them, for
example, while an umbral dragon
would have collected treasures
of grim and shadowy nature; a
crystal dragon focuses on gemstone
valuables, and a cloud dragon seeks
items that grant flight or produce an
exotic scent. Of them all, the magma
dragon’s treasure hoards are most
akin to that of the classic dragon—
provided the items collected can
survive at the blazing temperatures
that tend to be present in these
dragons’ volcanic dens!
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (electricity, evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a thundercloud
that deals 11d6 electricity damage in a 40-foot cone (DC 29 basic Reflex save). They
can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Cloud Walk The cloud dragon can tread on clouds or fog as though on solid ground.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] The dragon makes two claw Strikes and one horn Strike in any order.
Draconic Momentum The dragon recharges their Breath Weapon whenever they score
a critical hit with a Strike.
ADULT CLOUD DRAGON CREATURE 14
UNCOMMON N HUGE AIR DRAGON ELEMENTAL
Perception +28; darkvision, mist vision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Auran, Common, Draconic, Jotun
Skills Acrobatics +23, Athletics +28, Deception +26, Diplomacy +26, Intimidation +28,
Nature +24, Stealth+ 23, Survival +26
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +5, Int +4, Wis +6, Cha +6
Mist Vision As young cloud dragon.
AC 36; Fort +26, Ref +23, Will +26; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 254; Immunities electricity, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 32
Deflecting Cloud [reaction] As young cloud dragon.
Speed 50 feet, fly 160 feet; cloud walk
Melee [one-action] jaws +29 (electricity, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+15 piercing plus
2d12 electricity
Melee [one-action] claw +29 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d10+15 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +27 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d12+15 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] horn +27 (deadly d10, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+13 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 36; 3rd wall of wind; 2nd gust of wind (at will), obscuring mist
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (electricity, evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a thundercloud
that deals 15d6 electricity damage in a 50-foot cone (DC 35 basic Reflex save). They
can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Cloud Form [one-action] (polymorph, primal, transmutation) The cloud dragon’s body becomes
vaporous and misty. They gain the effects of gaseous form, except their fly Speed remains
unchanged. The cloud dragon can use this action again to return to physical form.
Cloud Walk As young cloud dragon.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young cloud dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young cloud dragon.
ANCIENT CLOUD DRAGON CREATURE 19
RARE N GARGANTUAN AIR DRAGON ELEMENTAL
Perception +34; darkvision, mist vision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Auran, Common, Draconic, Jotun, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +35, Athletics +38, Deception +34, Diplomacy +34, Intimidation +36,
Nature +32, Stealth +35, Survival +36
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +7, Int +5, Wis +7, Cha +7
Mist Vision As young cloud dragon.
AC 44; Fort +36, Ref +32, Will +34; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 355; Immunities electricity, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 40
Deflecting Cloud [reaction] As young cloud dragon.
Speed 60 feet, fly 160 feet; cloud walk
Melee [one-action] jaws +36 (electricity, magical, reach 20 feet, sonic), Damage 3d10+17 piercing
plus 2d12 electricity, 4d6 sonic, and thundering bite
Melee [one-action] claw +36 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d10+17 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +34 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 4d12+17 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] horn +34 (deadly d12, magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d12+17 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 42; 8th wind walk; 5th cloudkill; 4th gust of wind (at will), solid
fog, wall of wind (at will)
D
91
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
PRIMAL DRAGON RELIGION
While religious primal dragons
sometimes worship Apsu or Dahak
(which dragon god they favor
depends on their stance on good
or evil), most prefer to worship
elemental divinities.
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (electricity, evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a thundercloud
that deals 20d6 electricity damage in a 60-foot cone (DC 41 basic Reflex save). This
cloud remains in the area for 1d4 rounds, with the effects of obscuring mist. A creature
that ends its turn inside of the cloud takes 10d6 electricity damage (DC 41 basic Reflex
save). The cloud dragon can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Cloud Form [one-action] As adult cloud dragon
Cloud Walk As young cloud dragon.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young cloud dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young cloud dragon.
Thundering Bite An ancient cloud dragon’s jaws Strike creates a deafening clap of
thunder when it damages a foe. A creature that takes damage from the dragon’s
jaws Strike must succeed at a DC 41 Fortitude save or be deafened for 1 minute (or
permanently on a critical failure).
CRYSTAL DRAGON
Good-natured but vain, crystal dragons are beautiful creatures with brilliant
hides made of multicolored crystal and gemstone. Their beauty is a source of
great pride but is also something of a weakness, as crystal dragons are easily
angered by insults about their appearance. Despite their relatively benign natures
when compared to other true dragons, crystal dragons can be short tempered
and prone to finding insults where none were intended. Although their opinions
are changeable, crystal dragons prefer orderly environments and are not fond of
sudden interruptions or distractions.
Crystal dragons build their lairs in underground grottoes, where they cultivate
environments of great beauty. Their exacting standards and vivid imaginations
mean that they are always working to improve the appearance or layout of some
part of their lair. These lairs are unique to each individual crystal dragon, but there
are always plenty of reflective surfaces that allow the dragon to observe their own
appearance. These range from crystals to reflecting pools to finely crafted mirrors,
which are arranged throughout the lair in a pleasing array. Gifts of well-crafted or
magical mirrors are an excellent way to curry favor with a crystal dragon.
Although crystal dragons are easily distracted by their sparkling collections
or their vanity, they remain good-hearted creatures at the core and make
friends quickly. While a crystal dragon tends to find evil creatures uncouth
and unpleasant, any other nearby denizen or inhabitant of their home could
become fast friends or beloved pets, depending upon the creature’s capacity
for conversation (and for providing the frequent praise and compliments that
crystal dragons hunger for).
YOUNG CRYSTAL DRAGON CREATURE 7
UNCOMMON NG LARGE DRAGON EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +15; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Terran
Skills Acrobatics +14, Athletics +16, Deception +15, Intimidation +15, Nature +15, Stealth
+18, Survival +15
Str +5, Dex +1, Con +3, Int +1, Wis +2, Cha +4
AC 27; Fort +16, Ref +14, Will +15
HP 105; Immunities paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses sonic 5
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 25
Twisting Tail [reaction] Trigger A creature within reach of the dragon’s tail uses a move action or
leaves a square during a move action it’s using; Effect The dragon makes a tail Strike
at the creature with a –2 penalty. If it hits, the dragon disrupts the creature’s action.
Speed 40 feet, burrow 30 feet, fly 100 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +18 (sonic, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+8 slashing plus 2d6 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +18 (agile), Damage 2d6+8 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +16 (reach 15 feet), Damage 1d10+8 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 25; 3rd color spray; Cantrips (3rd) dancing lights
Bestiary 2
92
CRYSTAL DRAGON SPELLCASTERS
Crystal dragon spellcasters tend to
cast the following spells.
YOUNG
Primal Prepared Spells DC 25,
attack +18; 3rd earthbind, meld into
stone; 2nd faerie fire, glitterdust,
shatter; 1st grease, mending,
pass without trace; Cantrips (3rd)
acid splash, detect magic, light,
prestidigitation, telekinetic projectile
ADULT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 30,
attack +24; as young crystal
dragon, plus 5th cloak of colors,
wall of stone; 4th hallucinatory
terrain, shape stone, stoneskin; 3rd
haste; Cantrips (5th) dancing lights,
detect magic, light, prestidigitation,
telekinetic projectile
ANCIENT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 37,
attack +32; as adult crystal dragon,
plus 7th energy aegis, spell turning,
volcanic eruption; 6th flesh to stone,
stone tell, true seeing; 5th chromatic
wall; Cantrips (7th) dancing lights,
detect magic, light, prestidigitation,
telekinetic projectile
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a flurry of piercing crystals
that deal 8d6 piercing damage in a 30-foot cone (DC 25 basic Reflex save). They can’t
use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] The dragon makes two claw Strikes and one tail Strike in any order.
Draconic Momentum The dragon recharges their Breath Weapon whenever they
critically hit with a Strike.
ADULT CRYSTAL DRAGON CREATURE 11
UNCOMMON NG HUGE DRAGON EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +20; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Terran, Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +19, Athletics +24, Deception +22, Intimidation +22, Nature +19,
Stealth +21, Survival +20
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +5, Int +2, Wis +3, Cha +5
AC 33; Fort +24, Ref +19, Will +20; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 185; Immunities paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses sonic 10
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 30
Twisting Tail [reaction] As young crystal dragon.
Speed 50 feet, burrow 35 feet, fly 120 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +24 (sonic, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d8+13 slashing plus 3d6 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +24 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+13 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +22 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 1d10+13 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 30; 3rd color spray (×3), glitterdust, hypnotic pattern; Cantrips
(5th) dancing lights
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (evocation, primal) The dragon breathes a flurry of piercing crystals
that deal 12d6 piercing damage in a 40-foot cone (DC 30 basic Reflex save). They can’t
use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Crystallize Flesh [free-action] (primal, transmutation) Trigger The crystal dragon damages a
creature made of flesh with a jaws Strike; Frequency once per day; Effect The dragon
embeds transformative crystals in the creature’s flesh. The creature must attempt a
DC 30 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target is slowed 1 for 1 round as portions of its flesh turn crystalline.
Failure The target is slowed 1 and must attempt a Fortitude save at the end of each
of its turns; this ongoing save has the incapacitation trait. On a failed save, the
slowed condition value increases by 1 (or by 2 on a critical failure). A successful
save reduces the slowed condition value by 1. A creature unable to act due to the
slowed condition from Crystallize Flesh is petrified permanently, transforming
into a crystalline statue. The effect ends if the creature is petrified or the slowed
condition is removed.
Critical Failure As failure, but the target is initially slowed 2.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young crystal dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young crystal dragon.
ANCIENT CRYSTAL DRAGON CREATURE 16
RARE NG GARGANTUAN DRAGON EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +28; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, tremorsense (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Celestial, Common, Draconic, Terran, Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +22, Athletics +33, Deception +29, Intimidation +29, Nature +27,
Stealth +28, Survival +26
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +6, Int +5, Wis +5, Cha +7
AC 42; Fort +30, Ref +27, Will +29; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 275; Immunities paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses sonic 15
Extra Reaction The dragon gains 2 reactions at the start of each of their turns.
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 37
Scintillating Aura (aura, evocation, incapacitation, primal, visual) 30 feet. A swirling
vortex of reflected color and light shimmers around the crystal dragon. Creatures in 
D
93
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SHARDIZHAD
Still a relatively young crystal
dragon, Shardizhad has already
made a name for herself in the city
of Wati in Osirion. She has taken
on a somewhat unusual role as a
shopkeeper in that city’s necropolis,
where she’s eager to trade magic
items she’s collected for more gems
and valuable stones.
this aura’s emanation are dazzled. Each creature that ends its turn in the emanation
must succeed at a DC 34 Will saving throw or be stunned 1 (or stunned 3 on a critical
failure). Once a creature succeeds at this save, it is temporarily immune to the stunning
effect for 1 minute. The crystal dragon can turn this aura on or off using a single action,
which has the concentrate trait, and it can choose not to affect allies.
Reflect Spell [reaction] Trigger The crystal dragon is targeted by a ranged spell attack roll;
Effect The crystal dragon adjusts a wing to try to reflect the spell and gains a +4
circumstance bonus to AC against the triggering attack. If the attack misses, the spell
is reflected back at the caster, who must roll a second ranged spell attack roll against
their own AC to determine if the spell hits them instead.
Twisting Tail [reaction] As young crystal dragon.
Speed 60 feet, burrow 40 feet, fly 140 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +33 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d8+17
slashing plus 4d6 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +33 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage
3d8+17 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +31 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage
2d10+17 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 37; 7th prismatic spray; 5th
color spray (at will), glitterdust (at will), hypnotic
pattern (at will); Cantrips (7th) dancing lights
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (sonic, evocation, primal)
The dragon breathes a flurry of piercing
crystals that deals 17d6 piercing damage in
a 50-foot cone (DC 38 basic Reflex save).
They can’t use Breath Weapon again for
1d4 rounds.
Crystallize Flesh [free-action] (primal, transmutation)
Frequency three times per day; Effect
As adult crystal dragon, but DC 37.
Draconic Frenzy [two-actions] As young crystal
dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young crystal
dragon.
MAGMA DRAGON
Magma dragons have a reputation
among other dragons for being
unpredictable and brash. Their
temperament and tendency for violent
outbursts ensure that the typical
magma dragon lives a solitary life,
with hatchlings often bickering or
fighting to establish dominance among
themselves before they leave the nest.
A magma dragon always has a reason
for their outbursts and can always justify
their sudden turns in mood, yet they rarely
feel the need to do so.
Magma dragons build lairs within volcanically
active mountains or deep underground amid
vast lakes of bubbling magma. As with all
true dragons, magma dragons keep hoards
of treasure, but the nature of their searing
lairs limits the type of valuables they collect to
metals, gems, and items capable of resisting
the heat of a volcano’s core.
Bestiary 2
94
MAGMA DRAGON SPELLCASTERS
Magma dragon spellcasters tend to
cast the following spells.
YOUNG
Primal Prepared Spells DC 28,
attack +20; 4th stoneskin, wall of fire;
3rd haste, slow, stinking cloud; 2nd
glitterdust, obscuring mist, restore
senses; 1st air bubble, grease, pass
without trace; Cantrips (4th) detect
magic, prestidigitation, produce
flame, read aura, tanglefoot
ADULT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 33,
attack +25; as young magma dragon,
plus 6th fire seeds, true seeing; 5th
cloudkill, elemental form, flame strike;
4th hallucinatory terrain; Cantrips
(6th) detect magic, prestidigitation,
produce flame, read aura, tanglefoot
ANCIENT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 42,
attack +34; as adult magma dragon,
plus 8th earthquake, horrid wilting,
power word stun; 7th fiery body,
plane shift, volcanic eruption; 6th
flesh to stone; Cantrips (8th) detect
magic, prestidigitation, produce
flame, read aura, tanglefoot
YOUNG MAGMA DRAGON CREATURE 9
UNCOMMON CN LARGE DRAGON ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +18; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Ignan
Skills Acrobatics +16, Athletics +19, Deception+14, Intimidation +18, Nature +15, Stealth +16,
Survival +18
Str +6, Dex +1, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +3
AC 28; Fort +19, Ref +16, Will +18
HP 175; Immunities fire, paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold 10
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 24
Wing Deflection [reaction] Trigger The dragon is targeted with an attack; Effect The dragon
raises a wing, gaining a +2 circumstance bonus to AC against the triggering attack. If
the dragon is Flying, they descend 10 feet after the attack.
Speed 30 feet, fly 100 feet, swim 30 feet; magma swim
Melee [one-action] jaws +21 (fire, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+10 piercing plus 2d6 fire
Melee [one-action] claw +21 (agile), Damage 2d10+10 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +19 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+10 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] horns +19 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+10 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 26, attack +18; 4th burning hands (at will); Cantrips (4th)
produce flame
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (evocation, fire, primal) The dragon breathes a blast of magma that
deals 5d6 fire damage and 3d12 bludgeoning damage in a 30-foot cone (DC 28 basic
Reflex save). They can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] The dragon makes two claw Strikes and one horn Strike in any order.
Draconic Momentum The dragon recharges their Breath Weapon whenever they score
a critical hit with a Strike.
Magma Swim A magma dragon’s swim Speed functions only when the dragon is
Swimming through magma or molten lava.
ADULT MAGMA DRAGON CREATURE 13
UNCOMMON CN HUGE DRAGON ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +23; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Ignan, Terran
Skills Acrobatics +21, Athletics +27, Deception +19, Intimidation +25, Nature +21,
Stealth +21, Survival +23
Str +8, Dex +2, Con +5, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +4
AC 34; Fort +26, Ref +21, Will +23; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 270; Immunities fire, paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold 15
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 30
Wing Deflection [reaction] As young magma dragon.
Speed 40 feet, fly 140 feet; magma swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +27 (fire, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+12 piercing plus 3d6 fire
Melee [one-action] claw +27 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d10+12 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +25 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d12+12 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] horns +25 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d10+12 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 31, attack +23; 6th burning hands (at will), wall of fire (at will);
Cantrips (6th) produce flame
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (evocation, fire, primal) The dragon breathes a blast of magma that
deals 9d6 fire damage and 4d12 bludgeoning damage in a 40-foot cone (DC 33 basic
Reflex save). They can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young magma dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young magma dragon.
Magma Swim As young magma dragon.
Volcanic Purge [one-action] If the next action the dragon uses is Breath Weapon, the magma
clings to those it damages. Each creature that fails its save against the Breath Weapon
takes 4d6 persistent fire damage, and as long as it has this persistent fire damage, it
also takes a –10-foot status penalty to its Speeds.
D
95
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MOSCHABBATT
The ancient magma dragon
Moschabbatt dwells in a vast
chamber hidden within Droskar’s
Crag, the largest volcano in the Inner
Sea region. Rumor holds that the
dragon counts at least one legendary
dwarven artifact among the priceless
treasures of his vast hoard.
ANCIENT MAGMA DRAGON CREATURE 18
RARE CN GARGANTUAN DRAGON ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +33; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Ignan, Terran, Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +28, Athletics +36, Deception +28, Intimidation +34, Nature +28,
Stealth +28, Survival +29
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +4, Wis +5, Cha +6
AC 42; Fort +34, Ref +30, Will +31; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 390; Immunities fire, paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold 15
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 37
Wing Deflection [reaction] As young magma dragon.
Speed 50 feet, fly 200 feet; magma swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +36 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d10+16 piercing plus 4d6 fire
Melee [one-action] claw +36 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+16 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +34 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 3d12+16 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] horns +34 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d10+16 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 40, attack +32; 8th burning hands (at will), fireball, wall of fire (at
will); Cantrips (8th) produce flame; Constant (4th) fire shield
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (evocation, fire, primal) The dragon breathes a blast of magma that
deals 10d6 fire damage and 5d12 bludgeoning damage in a 60-foot cone (DC 40 basic
Reflex save). They can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young magma dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young magma dragon.
Magma Swim As young magma dragon.
Magma Tomb [two-actions] Once per day, the
dragon can spit a molten boulder at a
target within 120 feet. This deals 12d6 fire
damage and 5d12 bludgeoning damage, with a DC 42
basic Reflex save. If the creature fails its save,
it’s encased in magma that instantly cools
and has Hardness 10, HP 40, and BT 20.
The encased creature can’t breathe and
is restrained (Escape DC 42).
Volcanic Purge [one-action] As adult magma
dragon, but the persistent damage
is 5d6.
UMBRAL DRAGON
While the other primal dragons
hail from the Elemental Planes, the
cruel and unceasingly malicious
umbral dragons originate in the
depths of the Shadow Plane.
Their sleek black scales and
serpentine grace allow them to
strike from hiding, and they are
known for playing with their
prey before finally finishing
it. These creatures of shadowy energy and unwholesome
appetites prefer the necrotic flesh of undead creatures
to any other meal. This strange hunger can be of
accidental benefit to nearby humanoid societies,
but ultimately they hunt and kill undead creatures
for the taste, rather than out of any desire to
protect others from the undead. The benefit
is always short-lived, however. When umbral dragons
exhaust their preferred prey, they turn on whatever living creatures happen to 
Bestiary 2
96
UMBRAL DRAGON SPELLCASTERS
Umbral dragon spellcasters tend to
cast the following spells.
YOUNG
Primal Prepared Spells DC 29,
attack +24; 4th gaseous form,
hallucinatory terrain, nightmare; 3rd
bind undead, blindness, slow; 2nd
death knell, gentle repose, humanoid
form; 1st charm, item facade, ray of
enfeeblement; Cantrips (4th) chill
touch, ghost sound, ray of frost,
read aura, sigil
ADULT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 35,
attack +30; as young umbral
dragon, plus 6th dominate, true
seeing, vampiric exsanguination;
5th black tentacles, shadow blast,
shadow siphon; Cantrips (6th) chill
touch, ghost sound, ray of frost, read
aura, sigil
ANCIENT
Primal Prepared Spells DC 41,
attack +38; as adult umbral dragon,
plus 9th disjunction, massacre, weird;
8th disappearance, horrid wilting,
maze; 7th eclipse burst, mask of
terror, plane shift; Cantrips (9th) chill
touch, ghost sound, ray of frost, read
aura, sigil
be nearby. Umbral dragons sometimes go to great lengths to obtain their favorite
meals, even creating undead creatures that they then feast upon.
For all their power, umbral dragons are uninterested in fair battles. When faced
with foes that pose any kind of actual danger to them, umbral dragons flee into
the shadows and seek to strike back through pawns or minions rather than risk
their own lives. Their treasure hoards are varied and diverse, often augmented by
loot stolen from crypts the dragons have turned into feeding grounds. They have
a strong respect for and interest in traditions and heirlooms, and they often seek
to augment their hoards with items of great value that have been handed down
through the generations of those whose corpses and ghosts they’ve fed upon.
YOUNG UMBRAL DRAGON CREATURE 11
UNCOMMON NE LARGE DRAGON SHADOW
Perception +22; greater darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Shadowtongue
Skills Acrobatics +18, Athletics +22, Deception +22, Intimidation +22, Nature +20,
Stealth +20, Survival +22
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +5, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 31; Fort +22, Ref +20, Will +22
HP 195; Immunities negative, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 26
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Jaws only.
Speed 40 feet, fly 140 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +24 (negative, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+13 piercing plus 2d6 negative
Melee [one-action] claw +24 (agile), Damage 2d10+13 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +22 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+13 slashing
Melee [one-action] wing +22 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+13 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 30; 4th darkness (×3); Cantrips (4th) detect magic
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (necromancy, negative, primal) The dragon breathes a blast of
darkness that deals 12d6 negative energy damage in a 30-foot cone (DC 30 basic
Reflex save). They can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds. Undead creatures
take 14d6 force damage instead of the negative damage.
Draconic Frenzy [two-actions] The dragon makes two claw Strikes and one wing Strike in
any order.
Draconic Momentum The dragon recharges their Breath Weapon whenever they score
a critical hit with a Strike.
Ghost Bane An umbral dragon’s Strikes affect incorporeal creatures with the effects of a
ghost touch property rune, and an umbral dragon’s jaws deal an additional 4d6 force
damage to undead.
ADULT UMBRAL DRAGON CREATURE 15
UNCOMMON NE HUGE DRAGON SHADOW
Perception +29; greater darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Draconic, Necril, Shadowtongue
Skills Acrobatics +25, Athletics +31, Deception +28, Intimidation +28, Nature +25,
Stealth +27, Survival +28
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +4, Wis +6, Cha +5
AC 37; Fort +27, Ref +25, Will +27; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 275; Immunities negative, paralyzed, sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 34
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Jaws only.
Speed 50 feet, fly 180 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +30 (negative, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+14 piercing plus 3d6 negative
Melee [one-action] claw +30 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d10+14 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +28 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d12+14 slashing
Melee [one-action] wing +28 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d10+14 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 36; 7th darkness (at will), shadow walk, vampiric exsanguination; 
D
97
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
UGOTHOGO
Denizens of the Midnight Mountains
in the Darklands worship the ancient
umbral dragon Ugothogo as a deity.
Cantrips (7th) detect magic
Breath Weapon [two-actions] The umbral dragon breathes in one of two ways. They can’t use
Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
• Negative (necromancy, negative, primal) The dragon breathes a blast of darkness in
a 40-foot cone that deals 16d6 negative damage (DC 36 basic Reflex save). Undead
creatures take 19d6 force damage instead of the negative damage.
• Shadows (necromancy, primal, shadow) The dragon breathes a blast of shadows in
a 40-foot cone. Each creature within the cone must attempt a DC 36 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is enfeebled 2 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is enfeebled 2 for 1 minute.
Critical Failure The creature is enfeebled 2 for 1 minute and blinded for 1 round.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young umbral dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young umbral dragon.
Ghost Bane As young umbral dragon, but 6d6 force
damage to undead.
ANCIENT UMBRAL DRAGON CREATURE 20
RARE NE GARGANTUAN DRAGON SHADOW
Perception +36; greater darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, tremorsense
(imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Common, Daemonic, Draconic, Necril, Shadowtongue
Skills Acrobatics +33, Athletics +38, Deception +34, Intimidation +36, Nature
+34, Stealth +35, Survival +34
Str +10, Dex +5, Con +7, Int +6, Wis +8, Cha +6
AC 45; Fort +35, Ref +33, Will +38;
+1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 375; Immunities negative, paralyzed,
sleep
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental)
90 feet, DC 40
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Jaws only.
Speed 60 feet, fly 200 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +38 (negative, magical, reach 20 feet),
Damage 4d10+18 piercing plus 4d6
negative and drain vigor
Melee [one-action] claw +38 (agile magical, reach 15
feet), Damage 4d10+18 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +36 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage
4d12+18 slashing
Melee [one-action] wing +36 (agile, magical reach 20 feet), Damage
3d10+18 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 42; 10th massacre; 9th darkness (at will),
finger of death; 8th vampiric exsanguination (at will); Cantrips (10th) detect
magic
Rituals DC 42; create undead (shadows only)
Breath Weapon [two-actions] As adult umbral dragon, but a 50-foot cone, DC 42, the
dragon’s negative breath deals 21d6 negative damage or 25d6 force damage to
undead, and the dragon’s shadow breath causes enfeebled 3.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] As young umbral dragon.
Draconic Momentum As young umbral dragon.
Drain Vigor (primal, necromancy) When the dragon deals negative damage to a living
creature with its jaws Strike, the umbral dragon gains 20 temporary Hit Points and
the creature must succeed at a DC 41 Fortitude save or become enfeebled 2. Further
damage dealt by the dragon’s jaws Strike increases the enfeebled condition value
by 2 on a failed save, to a maximum of enfeebled 4.
Ghost Bane As young umbral dragon, but 8d6 force damage to undead.
Bestiary 2
98
DRAGONFLY SPECIES
While dragonflies come in many
colors, the differences between
species sometimes extend beyond
aesthetic variation. Giant blue
dragonflies are larger toxic versions
of the insects with a numbing bite
that boggards use to craft poisons.
Cave dragonflies are slower but
stronger variants that dwell in large
cavern systems. The legendary
storm dragonflies are truly immense
creatures that can use their powerful
wings to stun foes.
Dragonfly
Dragonflies hunt with a combination of agile power and deadly speed. In their
early life stages these insects are entirely aquatic predators, but they take to the air
once they’ve molted. Most live around bodies of water suitable for spawning, but
giant dragonflies have been known to fly many miles when on the hunt. Though
their gossamer wings and colorful bodies are beautiful at first glance, an unwary
adventurer lured in by the display runs a very real risk of becoming lunch.
GIANT DRAGONFLY NYMPH
The aquatic, wingless offspring of dragonflies are called dragonfly nymphs. Giant
dragonfly nymphs can be several feet in length and mostly hunt in shallow waters,
eating carrion and ambushing living creatures with their fully grown counterparts.
They are not daunted by larger creatures, compelled by their instinct to eat as
much as possible to sustain their growth.
GIANT DRAGONFLY NYMPH CREATURE 3
N SMALL ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +8; low-light vision, wavesense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +10, Stealth +9 (+11 in water)
Str +3, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –5
AC 19; Fort +11, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 46
Speed 10 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +12 (agile), Damage 1d10+6 piercing
Extend Mandibles [one-action] The giant dragonfly nymph extends its jaws to a surprising
distance. The dragonfly nymph makes a mandibles Strike with a reach of 10 feet,
but the mandibles lose the agile trait
for this Strike.
GIANT DRAGONFLY
These buzzing insects are
the size of a small horse.
They are ambush predators
known to hunt beasts and
humanoids alike, capable of using
impressive aerial acrobatics to swoop
down from above and snatch away their prey.
GIANT DRAGONFLY CREATURE 4
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +11; darkvision, wavesense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +10 (+12 to Maneuver in Flight), Athletics +12, Stealth +12
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +2, Int –5, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 21; Fort +12, Ref +14, Will +9
HP 60
Speed 20 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +14, Damage 1d12+7 piercing plus Grab
Clutch [one-action] Requirements The giant dragonfly has a Medium or smaller
creature grabbed in its mandibles; Effect The dragonfly tries to transfer the
grabbed creature to be clutched by its legs. The giant dragonfly attempts an
Athletics check against the creature’s Reflex DC. On a success, it transfers the
creature (which remains grabbed) to its legs, freeing its mandibles to attack.
The dragonfly can have only one creature clutched at a time.
Snatch The giant dragonfly can Fly at half Speed while it has a creature grabbed
or restrained by Clutch, carrying that creature along with it.
Swoop [two-actions] The giant dragonfly Flies up to its Speed and makes one mandible Strike at
any point during that movement.
D
99
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DRAINBERRY COLLECTIONS
As drainberry bushes sell their berries
to others, they collect coins and small
curios—such as a cameo depicting a fey
noble, a lock of golden hair knotted in
a complex pattern, or a ring inscribed
“To my dearest Memdaria.” Not all of
these baubles have monetary value,
but those that don’t certainly had
emotional value to the original owner.
Occasionally, drainberry bushes
accept intangible trade goods, such as
odes celebrating the bushes’ grandeur.
Drainberry Bush
Drainberry bushes are floating bushes that originate from the First World, with long,
thorny vines and dense clusters of bright-red berries. Their hollow thorns quickly
siphon blood, which is how these carnivorous plants feed, and they rapidly turn
consumed blood into fresh batches of delicious berries. Drainberry bushes exude a
faint white glow that is a result of stored positive energy.
Drainberry bushes exhibit unusually high intelligence and have an astute sense
of value. They typically become insulted when creatures attempt to harvest their
berries. Creatures that attempt to converse with drainberry bushes finds the plants
telepathically convey only short and simple phrases: most commonly, “Money
please,” “Deal good,” “Deal no good,” “Want that,” (with a gesture toward an
item it covets), “Thank you, customer,” and if necessary, “No refunds.” Though
a drainberry bush considers the market value of its berries to be 25 gp, it greatly
prefers interesting art objects as payment—even ones of significantly lower value.
DRAINBERRY BUSH CREATURE 7
N LARGE PLANT
Perception +16; lifesense 120 feet
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan (can’t speak any language); telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +11, Athletics +17, Diplomacy +13, Nature +17, Stealth +11 (+15 to appear
as a bush)
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +6, Int –2, Wis +4, Cha +2
Nature Empathy The drainberry bush can use Diplomacy to Make an Impression on
and make very simple Requests of animals and plant creatures.
AC 23; Fort +17, Ref +13, Will +13
HP 135; Weaknesses fire 5; Resistances negative 10
Speed 25 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] vine +17 (reach 20 feet), Damage 2d8+10 bludgeoning plus
Improved Grab
Blood Berries The drainberry bush must drain blood from living
creatures for sustenance. This causes clusters of bright red
berries to grow among its branches. Each cluster of berries lasts
for 1 day, and a drainberry bush typically has 1d6+3 clusters when
encountered. When consumed, a cluster
restores 2d8+10 Hit Points. This effect has
the healing, necromancy, and primal traits.
A creature can pluck a cluster of berries
with a successful unarmed Strike or
Thievery check against the bush’s AC.
Consume Berries [one-action] (healing, necromancy,
positive, primal) The bush draws nourishment
from one cluster of blood berries, regaining
2d8+10 HP. That berry cluster wrinkles and dies.
Drain Blood [one-action] Requirements The drainberry bush
has at least one living creature grabbed with one of its
vines; Effect The bush’s hollow thorns siphon blood
from creatures it has grabbed. Each creature
must succeed at a DC 25 Fortitude save or take
2d8+10 damage and become drained 1 (double
damage and drained 2 on a critical failure). For
every creature damaged this way, a cluster of
blood berries (see above) immediately grows
along the bush’s branches.
Storm of Vines [two-actions] The drainberry bush makes up to
four vine Strikes, each against a different target. These
attacks count toward the bush’s multiple attack penalty, but the multiple attack
penalty doesn’t increase until after the bush makes all these attacks.
Bestiary 2
100
DRAKES AND DRAGONS
Although drakes and dragons are
related to one another, little love is
lost between them, and even the
most territorial drakes know better
than to remain in a dragon’s territory
longer than they have to. In rare
cases, large rampages of drakes band
together to attack an encroaching
dragon, especially if the dragon is
young and inexperienced.
Drake
Distant cousins to dragons, drakes menace and terrorize settlements.
SHADOW DRAKE
Shadow drakes are typically among the smallest and least powerful of their
species. Most stand as tall and long as house cats and have charcoal-colored scales
and membranous wings just translucent enough to pass for shadows. Attracted
to shiny materials, they employ deception, teamwork, and even rudimentary traps
to create opportunities to make off with ill-gotten gains. Shadow drakes have a
particular fascination and admiration for umbral dragons—a notable exception
to the norm for drakes and dragons.
SHADOW DRAKE CREATURE 2
CE TINY DRAGON SHADOW
Perception +6; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Draconic
Skills Acrobatics +8, Stealth +8, Thievery +8
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +1, Int –1, Wis +0, Cha +2
Light Blindness
Shadow Blend The shadow drake’s form shifts and blends reflexively with surrounding
shadows. A shadow drake gains an additional reaction each round, but it can use this
reaction only for Shadow Evade.
Shadow Evade [reaction] Trigger A creature attacks the shadow drake while it is in an area of
dim light; Effect The shadow drake further obscures its position. The attacker must
succeed at a DC 11 flat check in order to affect the shadow drake, as if the drake were
Hidden for the triggering attack.
AC 17; Fort +7, Ref +10, Will +6
HP 28; Immunities paralyzed, sleep;
Weaknesses fire 5
Speed 15 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +11 (finesse),
Damage 1d10+3 piercing
Melee [one-action] tail +11 (agile,
finesse), Damage 1d8+3
bludgeoning
Draconic Frenzy [two-actions] The
shadow drake makes one
bite Strike and two tail
Strikes in any order.
Shadow Breath [two-actions] (arcane,
cold, evocation, shadow) A
shadow drake spits a ball of black
liquid that explodes into a cloud of
frigid black shadow. This attack has a range
of 40 feet and explodes in a
5-foot-radius burst. 
D
101
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DRAKE LOCATIONS
While the different species of drakes
are adapted to different climates and
environments, many drakes share
similar preferences regarding nest
location, searching out high places
that offer cover from above, such
as cliffside or mountaintop caverns,
jungle canopies, and so on.
Creatures within the burst take 3d6 cold damage (DC 18 basic Reflex save). The explosion
of shadow also snuffs out mundane light sources the size of a torch, lantern, or smaller,
and attempts to counteract magical light with a +10 counteract modifier. The shadow
drake can’t use Shadow Breath again for 1d6 rounds.
Speed Surge [one-action] Frequency three times per day; Effect The shadow drake Strides or
Flies twice.
SEA DRAKE
Long and slender, sea drakes have fins
down the length of their backs and
webbing between their talons, making
them just as adapted for gliding through
ocean waves as the skies above. More
solitary than most drakes, they hunt and
live alone. Although most sea drakes make
their roosts high on ocean-facing cliffs, it isn’t
unheard of for them to dwell in underwater
caves, living entirely aquatic lives.
SEA DRAKE CREATURE 6
NE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS DRAGON WATER
Perception +14; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Draconic
Skills Acrobatics +14, Athletics +16, Stealth +12
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –1, Wis +2, Cha +0
AC 24; Fort +16, Ref +14, Will +12
HP 95; Immunities electricity, paralyzed, sleep
Electrified Blood [reaction] (electricity) Trigger An adjacent creature deals
piercing or slashing damage to the sea drake; Effect An arc of electricity
courses through the sea drake’s blood. The triggering creature takes 1d6
electricity damage.
Speed 15 feet, fly 40 feet, swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +17, Damage 2d8+9 piercing plus briny wound
Melee [one-action] tail +17 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+9 bludgeoning
Ball Lightning Breath [two-actions] (arcane, electricity, evocation) The sea drake spews a
ball of electricity that strikes a primary target within 100 feet, dealing 7d6
electricity damage (DC 24 basic Reflex save). The lightning then arcs to up
to three secondary targets within 30 feet of the primary target, striking
the closest available targets first. The secondary bolts each strike one
secondary target and deal the same rolled damage value as the
primary bolt (DC 22 basic Reflex save). The sea drake
can’t use Ball Lightning Breath again for 1d6 rounds.
Briny Wound A sea drake’s saliva carries a large quantity of
salt, making its bite wounds even more painful. When a
creature takes damage from a sea drake’s jaws Strike, the
creature must attempt a DC 24 Fortitude save; the creature is
then temporarily immune to briny wound for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is sickened 1.
Failure The creature is sickened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is sickened 2 and slowed 1 as long as it’s sickened.
Capsize [one-action] (attack) The drake tries to capsize an adjacent aquatic vessel of its size or
smaller. The drake must succeed at an Athletics check with a DC of 25 (reduced by 5 for each
size smaller the vessel is than the drake) or the pilot’s Sailing Lore DC, whichever is higher.
Draconic Frenzy[two-actions] The sea drake makes one jaws Strike and two tail Strikes in any order.
Speed Surge [one-action] Frequency three times per day; Effect The sea drake Strides, Flies, or
Swims twice.
Bestiary 2
102
DRAUGR SHIPS
When an entire ship’s crew dies
in one calamity, they might rise
simultaneously, bound together in
death. Tirelessly plaguing the seas,
these draugr crews slowly corrupt
their vessels. The cursed ships often
exhibit unsettling phenomena, such
as being able to sail against the wind
or leaving schools of dead fish in
their wake. Sea shanties tell of draugr
raiders approaching during the night,
wreathed in fog pierced only by the
green glow emanating from their eyes.
Draugr
Risen corpses of sailors who died at sea, draugr reek of the rot and decay of
the briny deep. Their eyes glow with ghastly green light, and rotting seaweed,
barnacles, and dead sea creatures cling to their bodies. Draugr can’t speak, but
expresses their malicious emotions with gurgles, as though they were eternally
drowning with lungs full of water. They desire little more than to attack living
creatures, especially those who sail the sea. Even when they go upon land, draugrs
often drag the corpses of those they strike down back to the water, populating the
depths with even more dead.
Draugr rise in the haunted places of the sea, where restless spirits, swells of negative
energy, or supernatural storms deliver death. A corpse might rest at the bottom of the
sea for some time before awakening as a draugr. Collecting detritus and organisms, a
corpse becomes increasingly disgusting before it finally rises. Proximity to intelligent
life can expedite this process, and an underwater explorer who happens upon a
shipwreck might cause a body to snap to unlife as a draugr suddenly. The creatures
don’t take intrusions lightly, especially upon their place of death.
Though steeped in evil, draugr are susceptible to reminders of their lives as
mariners. In particular, a well-performed sea shanty or call-and-response work
song might cause a draugr to become lost in reverie for a moment. The creatures
have even been witnessed moaning along, unable to sing the words but
providing haunting accompaniment. The lull rarely lasts long, though, as the
beauty of the song quickly becomes a reminder of the tragedy that befell the
draugr, reaffirming their desire for blood and death.
More powerful draugr with burning red eyes are called draugr
captains. They’re 3rd-level creatures with elite adjustments
(page 6) that can cast obscuring mist as an innate divine spell
three times per day.
DRAUGR CREATURE 2
CE MEDIUM UNDEAD WATER
Perception +7; darkvision
Languages Common (can’t speak any language)
Skills Athletics +10, Stealth +8
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –1, Wis +1, Cha +1
Items greataxe, leather armor
AC 17; Fort +11, Ref +6, Will +7
HP 35; negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed,
poison, unconscious; Weaknesses positive 5; Resistances fire 3
The Sea’s Revenge (curse, divine, necromancy) A creature that slays a
draugr is subjected to a mariner’s curse spell with a save DC of 17. The
curse ends if the draugr is buried in a calm sea or after 1 week passes.
Speed 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] greataxe +10 (sweep), Damage 1d12+4 slashing plus
grotesque gift
Melee [one-action] fist +10 (agile), Damage 1d4+4 slashing plus
grotesque gift
Grotesque Gift (olfactory) A draugr’s attacks spatter
their targets with rancid flesh and rotting seaweed.
A creature damaged by a draugr’s Strike must
succeed at a DC 15 Fortitude save or become
sickened 1 (sickened 2 on a critical failure).
Swipe [two-actions] The draugr makes a melee Strike and
compares the attack roll result to the AC of up to two
foes, each of whom must be within its melee reach
and adjacent to each other. Roll damage only once and
apply it to each creature hit. A Swipe counts as two
attacks for the draugr’s multiple attack penalty.
D
103
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DWEOMERCAT FAMILIARS
Particularly powerful spellcasters
sometimes take young dweomercat
cubs as familiars. Their
independence and flightiness makes
dweomercats somewhat unreliable
allies, though, so one is never
sure whether their bond with a
dweomercat will be long-lasting or a
temporary affair.
Dweomercat
Dweomercats are magically gifted felines from the First World, where they prey
upon other creatures and feed upon their primal energy. They are sometimes
encountered in areas of the Material Plane where the veil to the First World is
thin, or in regions where magic has been irreparably warped. Dweomercats are
famous for their ability to twist the metaphorical strings of spells cast on or near
them, which they can transform into their own defensive magic or tap into to
instantly teleport across the battlefield.
DWEOMERCAT CREATURE 7
UNCOMMON CN MEDIUM BEAST
Perception +15; darkvision, detect magic, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +17, Arcana +16, Nature +15, Stealth +17, Survival +15
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +3, Int +3, Wis +4, Cha +5
AC 25; Fort +12, Ref +17, Will +17; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 100
Alter Dweomer [reaction] (abjuration, arcane) Trigger The dweomercat is targeted by a
spell or is within the area of a spell as it is cast; Effect The dweomercat gains an
effect related to the school of the triggering spell. This effect occurs before the
dweomercat is affected by the triggering spell. The effect lasts for 1 minute, until the
dweomercat uses this ability again, or until the dweomercat Dismisses the effect,
whichever comes first.
Abjuration The dweomercat gains a +1 status bonus to AC.
Conjuration A cloud of fog appears in a 5-foot burst centered on a corner
of the dweomercat’s space. Anything in the cloud is concealed.
Divination The dweomercat gains a +1 status bonus to all skill
checks.
Enchantment The dweomercat gains a +1 status bonus
to all saves.
Evocation Magical feedback deals 4d6 force damage
to the triggering spellcaster (DC 22 basic
Reflex save).
Illusion The dweomercat becomes invisible. This
effect ends if the dweomercat uses a hostile action,
in addition to the normal end conditions.
Necromancy The dweomercat gains 10 temporary HP.
Transmutation The dweomercat gains a +1 status bonus to
all attack rolls.
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +17 (magical), Damage 2d10+7 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile, magical), Damage 2d8+7 slashing
Arcane Innate Spells DC 26; 4th dimension door (×3), dispel magic
(at will), globe of invulnerability; Constant (4th) detect magic
Dweomer Leap [two-actions] (arcane, conjuration, teleportation)
Prerequisites The dweomercat has at least one dimension
door spell remaining; Effect The dweomercat casts
dimension door, then can make a melee Strike against
one creature adjacent to it at the end of its teleport.
If the dweomercat ends its teleport adjacent to a
creature under an ongoing spell effect or who cast a
spell since the dweomercat’s last turn, this does not
expend a casting of dimension door.
Pounce [one-action] The dweomercat Strides and makes
a Strike at the end of that movement. If the
dweomercat began this action hidden, it remains
hidden until after this ability’s Strike.
Bestiary 2
104
D’ziriak
These strange creatures are native to the Plane of Shadows, where their colorful
nature is in opposition to that realm’s overwhelmingly monochromatic palette.
Averaging 7 feet in height, d’ziriaks have four arms, two legs, and a termitelike abdomen. The larger pair of arms, used for most tasks, have five-fingered
hands with sharp, insectile claws. The smaller pair of arms are reserved for fine
manipulations and are not effective in combat.
D’ziriaks’ otherwise dull brown carapaces are decorated with numerous
runes glowing in bright colors. These tattoo-like runes indicate an individual’s
role in d’ziriak society, and set them apart from their home plane’s other native
inhabitants. The runes glow with natural bioluminescence, and d’ziriaks can make
them flare brightly for an instant, at the expense of overstressing the biochemical
glands that create and maintain the runes for an extended time. The color and
shape of the runes are partially natural, but can be shaped and customized
carefully over time to fit the individual’s station.
The D’ziriak language is a mix of buzzes and chitters, and is spoken by few
other creatures. D’ziriaks prefer to communicate with other species using telepathy
rather than endure the sound of their language being “butchered by fleshy
throats.” D’ziriaks organize into hive cities led by a king and queen. These
hive cities consist of impressive spires, yet these towers are only the foremost
part of the settlement, with many more chambers reaching deep below for
residences, workshops, and fungus farms. D’ziriak settlements are lit inside
and out with alchemical and magical light sources, often in the shapes of
runes. These dimly glowing towers provide travelers with landmarks, and
perhaps promise safe havens, on the otherwise gloomy Shadow Plane.
D’ZIRIAK CREATURE 3
N MEDIUM ABERRATION SHADOW
Perception +10; darkvision
Languages D’ziriak, Shadowtongue; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Arcana +8, Athletics +6, Occultism +10, Stealth +10, Survival +8
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +1, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +4
AC 19; Fort +6, Ref +12, Will +10
HP 45
Glow (aura, light) 20 feet. The colorful runes that decorate a d’ziriak’s
body create dim light. The natural bioluminescence is specially
adapted to the Shadow Plane, able to overcome magical darkness
as if it were magical light of the d’ziriak’s level.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +12 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d10+4 piercing
Occult Innate Spells DC 19; 7th plane shift (self only, to Shadow
Plane only)
Dazzling Burst [two-actions] (light, visual) The d’ziriak causes its body
to flare with intense colorful light. Non-d’ziriaks in a 20-foot
emanation must attempt a DC 20 Fortitude save. After using this
ability, the d’ziriak loses its glow for 24 hours; during this time it can’t use
Dazzling Burst again. A creature that attempts this save is immune to all
Dazzling Bursts for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is dazzled for 1 round.
Failure The creature is dazzled for 1 minute.
Critical Failure The creature is blinded for 1 round and dazzled for 1 minute.
Double Claw [one-action] Frequency once per round; Effect The d’ziriak makes
two claw Strikes. If both hit the same creature, combine their
damage for the purpose of resistances and weaknesses. This
counts as two attacks for the d’ziriak’s multiple attack penalty,
and the penalty doesn’t increase until after both attacks.
LIGHT WEAVERS
The masters of the d’ziriaks’
light-weaving craft are occult
practitioners, almost always sorcerers
of the aberrant bloodline. Light
weavers prefer spells that provide
light or create magical writing. In their
hive cities, light weavers create art,
lighting, signage, and magic wards.
They also use their light weaving for
entertainment and education.
E-G
105
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OTHER AQUATIC REPTILES
The elasmosaurus is but one of
many types of aquatic reptiles found
in primeval oceans or lost worlds.
Some, like the ichthyosaurus, are
almost fishlike in appearance.
Others, such as the mosasaurus,
are truly massive beasts capable of
killing and eating whales.
Elasmosaurus
Elasmosauruses are long-necked, primeval reptiles that dwell in deep oceans and
seas. Although not truly a dinosaur, elasmosauruses are often found in similar
locations and are similarly titanic creatures. Keeping their massive bodies
underwater, elasmosauruses use their long necks to catch prey and snorkel air to
their massive lungs while remaining mostly hidden from the surface above. An
elasmosaurus is 30 feet long and weighs 6,000 pounds.
As rare and reclusive as they are, elasmosauruses are sometimes mistaken for
even rarer creatures called water orms, legendary aquatic denizens of remote
lakes known for their elusiveness and craftiness. Whereas elasmosauruses are
mundane creatures of animalistic intelligence, water orms are magical beings with
near-humanoid intelligence and a curious fascination with mortals, and they seem
to delight in confounding onlookers. As a result, it’s theorized that a typical water
orm is more than happy to lead a group of spectators to a lost elasmosaurus, both
to throw its pursuers off its tail and for the hilarity that will inevitably ensue.
While elasmosauruses are often found in lost worlds and unsettled regions,
those who dwell in the oceans of the world do not contain their hunting grounds
to specific regions. As a result, it’s not unheard of for a wandering specimen to
find its way to coastal waters. Those that do often find the ports of small towns
or even large cities to be wondrous banquets and are usually hunted down by
coastal guards or adventurers. When a wayward
elasmosaurus like this finds its way into a city’s
sewer system or reservoirs, though, it can become
the stuff of urban legends.
ELASMOSAURUS CREATURE 7
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +16; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +17
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +6, Int –4, Wis +5, Cha –1
Deep Breath The elasmosaurus can hold its breath for 2 hours.
AC 25; Fort +17, Ref +13, Will +16
HP 125
Long Neck An elasmosaurus’s long neck allows it to interact with the surface while
its body remains submerged underwater. While submerged no deeper than 15 feet
underwater, an elasmosaurus can still stick its head up to breathe. An elasmosaurus
gains cover against attacks made against creatures who are above the water’s
surface while it is underwater, even if its head is above the surface.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Jaws only.
Speed 5 feet, swim 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +17 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+10 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] paddle +17, Damage 2d6+10 bludgeoning
Drag Below [one-action] (attack) The elasmosaurus attempts an Athletics check against a
grabbed foe’s Fortitude DC. If the elasmosaurus succeeds, the foe is forcibly moved
5 feet toward the elasmosaurus’s body. If the elasmosaurus
critically succeeds, the foe is moved 10 feet towards the
elasmosaurus’s body.
Thrashing Retreat [two-actions] A swimming
elasmosaurus thrashes the area
around it as it attempts to flee.
It makes two paddle Strikes, each
of which must be against
separate targets, and
each of which takes the
normal multiple attack penalty. It then Swims up
to its swim Speed. This Swim does not trigger
reactions based on movement.
Bestiary 2
106
DIVERSE ELEMENTALS
The Elemental Planes are more
than expanses of sky, rock, fire,
and ocean. Clouds of fog, dust, and
storms float through the Plane of Air.
The Plane of Earth includes verdant
groves, shining metal and crystal,
and irradiated wastelands. The Plane
of Fire features magma, suffocating
smoke, and radiant firelight. Amid the
endless sea of the Plane of Water are
pockets of ooze and brine, plus the
otherworldly environs of the deep.
Elemental, Air
Some elementals embody aspects of air such as smoke, lightning, and fog.
SPARK BAT
Spark bats congregate around volatile weather in the Plane of Air.
SPARK BAT CREATURE 2
N TINY AIR ELEMENTAL
Perception +7; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +9, Stealth +9
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha +0
AC 19; Fort +5, Ref +11, Will +7
HP 18; Immunities bleed, electricity, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Speed 5 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +11 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d4+5 electricity
Arc Lightning (move, electricity, primal, transmutation) The spark bat transforms into
lightning that arcs to a large piece of metal within 100 feet, such as a suit of metal
armor or a metal weapon. The bat then returns to its normal form in a space adjacent
to the metal. This movement doesn’t trigger reactions.
LIVING THUNDERCLAP
A living thunderclap is a humanoid-shaped storm cloud
that cracks and booms with thunder.
LIVING THUNDERCLAP CREATURE 4
N MEDIUM AIR ELEMENTAL
Perception +9; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +12, Stealth +12
Languages Auran
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +2, Int –3, Wis +1, Cha +0
AC 22; Fort +10, Ref +12, Will +9
HP 50; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep, sonic
Speed fly 50 feet; swiftness
Melee [one-action] gust +14 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6+6 bludgeoning plus Push
5 feet
Ranged [one-action] lightning bolt +14 (electricity, range increment 50 feet), Damage 2d12
electricity
Swiftness The living thunderclap doesn’t trigger reactions when it moves.
Thunderbolt [two-actions] (electricity, evocation, primal, sonic) The living thunderclap emits a
bolt of lightning that crashes with deafening thunder. The living thunderclap makes
a lightning bolt Strike that deals 1d12 electricity damage. If it hits, the target and any
creatures within a 15-foot emanation around the target take 2d6 sonic damage and
must attempt a DC 18 basic Fortitude save. Any creature that fails its save is also
deafened for 1d4 rounds.
BELKER
These reclusive elementals have glowing red eyes, leathery wings,
and long, sharp claws. While they always retain their shape,
belkers can control the solidity of their forms at will,
transforming into clouds of smoke, ash, and dust.
BELKER CREATURE 6
NE LARGE AIR ELEMENTAL
Perception +14; darkvision, smoke vision
Skills Acrobatics +15, Stealth +15 (+17 in smoke)
Languages Auran
Str +2, Dex +5, Con +3, Int –2, Wis +4, Cha +0
E-G
107
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
BELKER LORE
Fiercely territorial, belkers attack
trespassers into their lands without
mercy, slithering inside their lungs
and raking their bodies from the
inside. Many belkers are loyal to
the Elemental Lord of Air, Hshura,
but some hold secret allegiances to
Ymeri, who holds domain over fire
and smoke.
Smoke Vision The belker ignores the concealed condition from smoke.
AC 25; Fort +13, Ref +17, Will +12
HP 78; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, precision, sleep
Smoke Form The belker can occupy the same space as other creatures.
Speed 25 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d10+5 slashing
Melee [one-action] wing +17 (agile, finesse, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+5 bludgeoning
Noxious Fumes [two-actions] Requirement The belker occupies the same space as a Medium
or smaller creature; Effect The belker attempts to flow into the creature’s lungs; the
creature must attempt a DC 23 Fortitude save. On a failure, the creature partially
inhales the belker and is immobilized by the pain of the smoke rasping in its throat and
lungs. The creature can attempt to exhale the belker by spending an action coughing
and succeeding at a DC 23 Fortitude save. Most of the belker remains outside the
creature, so the belker can still act normally. If the belker moves out of the creature’s
space or uses Noxious Fumes again, the creature automatically exhales it.
Smoke Slash [one-action] Requirement The belker is partially inhaled by a creature; Effect The
belker automatically deals its claw damage to the inhaling creature by forming a claw
to slash and scrape the creature from within.
MELODY ON THE WIND
This cloud of song and sound has been caught
by the wind and carried across the air. While
the melody on the wind (known by some as a song
elemental, despite the fact that no such place as a plane of song
exists in the known multiverse) might enjoy the beauty of music, it is
by nature a destructive elemental force.
MELODY ON THE WIND CREATURE 10
N HUGE AIR ELEMENTAL
Perception +21; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +22, Performance +22, Stealth +22
Languages Auran
Str +4, Dex +6, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +5, Cha +6
AC 30; Fort +16, Ref +22, Will +19
HP 170; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Hostile Duet [reaction] Trigger A hostile creature within 30 feet
creates an effect with the auditory trait that provides bonuses
to itself or its allies; Effect The melody on the wind recreates the
auditory effect, gaining the bonuses for itself and its allies as long as the
original effect persists.
Retune [reaction] Trigger The melody on the wind is targeted by a spell with the
auditory trait; Effect The melody on the wind attempts to counteract the spell.
If it succeeds, the spell effect is caught in a blast of wind that sweeps it back to its
origin, affecting the caster. Targets of the triggering effect other than the melody
on the wind are still affected normally.
Speed fly 100 feet; swiftness
Melee [one-action] wind gust +23 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d10+10 bludgeoning plus Push
Ranged [one-action] solid refrain +23 (range increment 70 feet), Damage 2d8+10 sonic
Mesmerizing Melody [one-action] (auditory, concentrate, enchantment, mental, primal) The
melody on the wind sings in a sonorous chorus. Any creature in a 30-foot
emanation must attempt a DC 30 Will save to resist becoming fascinated by
the melody on the wind. A creature that succeeds at its save is temporarily
immune for 24 hours.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is fascinated for 1 round.
Failure The creature is fascinated for 1d4 rounds.
Swiftness The melody on the wind’s movement doesn’t trigger reactions.
Bestiary 2
108
LOOTING EARTH ELEMENTALS
Earth elementals sometimes have
valuable gemstones or minerals
incorporated into their bodies,
and once they are slain, these
valuables can be scavenged as
treasure. Gemstones, precious
metals such as silver or gold ore,
or rarer materials such as mithral
or adamantine can be harvested
from these creatures, although the
more expensive finds tend to be
incorporated into only the most
powerful earth elementals.
Elemental, Earth
Certain earth elementals manifest as specific types of material, be they boulders,
sand, or crystals.
LIVING BOULDER
Living boulders roll and glide through the Plane of Earth, gathering gemstones
and metal shards until their surfaces resemble a ship’s hull covered in barnacles.
Barely more intelligent than many animals, living boulders fill much the same role
on the Plane of Earth as the great herd animals found on Material Plane worlds.
LIVING BOULDER CREATURE 2
N SMALL EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +6; darkvision, tremorsense 30 feet
Skills Athletics +8, Stealth +5 (+7 in rocky areas)
Str +4, Dex –1, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –1
AC 17; Fort +10, Ref +5, Will +8
HP 36; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Speed 20 feet, burrow 20 feet; earth glide
Melee [one-action] jaws +10, Damage 1d8+6 piercing
Earth Glide A living boulder can Burrow through earthen matter, including rock.
When it does so, it moves at its full burrow Speed, leaving no tunnels or signs
of its passing.
Rolling Charge[two-actions] The living boulder Strides twice, and can then make a Strike
with its jaws. This jaws Strike gains Knockdown.
EARTHEN DESTRIER
This wave of dirt takes the crude likeness of the melded
forequarters of a charging warhorse and a rocky knight
wielding a rudimentary lance of gray stone.
EARTHEN DESTRIER CREATURE 4
N LARGE EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +10; darkvision, tremorsense
(imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Athletics +12
Languages Terran
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +4, Int –1, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 20; Fort +14, Ref +9, Will +10
HP 72; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Speed 50 feet, burrow 30 feet; earth glide
Melee [one-action] lance arm +14 (deadly d8, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d8+6 piercing and lancing charge
Melee [one-action] hoof +14, Damage 2d6+6 bludgeoning
Earth Glide As living boulder above.
Lancing Charge If the destrier moved at least 10 feet directly before its lance arm Strike,
it gains a +2 circumstance bonus to its damage roll.
Tilting Strike [reaction] Trigger The earthen destrier tramples a creature; Effect The earthen
destrier makes a lance arm Strike against the creature it’s trampling at a –5
penalty.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, hoof, DC 20
SAND SENTRY
Shifting back and forth between a detailed likeness of a human and a muted and
featureless bipedal form, this creature of pure sand moves with an eerie grace.
The sand sentry is often called upon by spellcasters to stand guard over an area
of great importance—these elementals are patient participants in such roles,
making them well suited for long-term service.
E-G
109
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SAND MIMICS
Sand sentries have no true culture
or society of their own, but they
are endlessly fascinated with the
society and culture of humanoids
they encounter. They can shape their
appearance to mimic any similarly
sized humanoids, and although
they always remain obviously
composed of sand, they do their best
to mimic the day-to-day activities
they observe other humanoids
performing. Of course, structures
and objects sand sentries build from
sand never last, but this never seems
to stifle their obsession.
SAND SENTRY CREATURE 6
N MEDIUM EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +14; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Acrobatics +14, Stealth +14 (+17 in sand)
Languages Terran
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +1
AC 24; Fort +16, Ref +12, Will +14
HP 94; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Glass ArmorWhen the sand sentry takes fire or lightning damage, its outer layer of sand
fuses into sheets of hardened glass for 1 minute. This increases the sand sentry’s AC to
26 and grants it resistance 5 to acid, cold, electricity, fire, force, piercing, and slashing
damage. A sand sentry can’t use earth glide while glass armor is active.
Speed 25 feet, burrow 50 feet; earth glide
Melee [one-action] fist +17, Damage 2d8+8 bludgeoning plus blinding sand
Earth Glide As living boulder.
Blinding Sand When the sand sentry critically hits with a fist Strike, the target is blinded
for 1 round.
GRANITE GLYPTODONT
This squat and stony creature looks like an armadillo with a large raised back
and a flail-like tail. The granite glyptodont has no true need to feed, as with
all elementals, yet it does seem to linger after transforming the flesh of those it
calcifies, as if the mere proximity of flesh fossilizing into stone pleases it somehow.
GRANITE GLYPTODONT CREATURE 8
N LARGE EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +17; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 90 feet
Skills Athletics +18
Str +6, Dex +1, Con +6, Int +0, Wis +5, Cha +0
AC 28; Fort +18, Ref +13, Will +17
HP 145; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Speed 30 feet, burrow 20 feet; earth glide
Melee [one-action] tail +20 (forceful, reach 10 feet, versatile piercing), Damage 2d12+9
bludgeoning plus calcification
Calcification (incapacitation, primal, transmutation) A blow from a granite
glyptodont’s tail hardens the flesh of the creature struck. The target must
succeed at a DC 26 Fortitude saving throw or become slowed 1 (or
slowed 2 on a critical failure). Further failed saves
against calcification increase the value of the
slowed condition. Once a creature’s actions are
reduced to 0 by calcification, that creature
becomes petrified. If the creature isn’t
petrified, the slowed conditions end once 1
minute passes without the creature failing a
save against calcification.
Every 24 hours after it was petrified,
the creature can attempt a DC 26
Fortitude save to recover. On a success, it
becomes flesh again, but is slowed 1 for
the next 24 hours. On a critical success,
the creature recovers and isn’t slowed.
On a failure, the creature remains
petrified, but can try again in 24 hours.
On a critical failure, the petrification
is permanent, and the creature can’t
attempt any more saves.
Earth Glide As living boulder.
Bestiary 2
110
FIRE ELEMENTAL TREASURE
Often, nothing remains after
defeating a fire elemental but a pile
of ashes and the fading smell of
smoke. But sometimes, fragments
of their elemental power remain
behind. At the GM’s discretion, a fire
elemental can leave behind ashes,
lumps of charcoal, or ever-smoldering
cinders that are valuable components
for the construction of fire-themed
magic items.
Elemental, Fire
Fire elementals sometimes incorporate burning materials into their being, or
possibly superheated materials such as molten rock or searing smoke.
EMBER FOX
Ember foxes resemble their canid namesakes, save for the flames that make their
fur and the tips of their long whiskers flicker and glow.
EMBER FOX CREATURE 2
NG SMALL ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +8; darkvision
Languages Ignan (can’t speak any language)
Skills Acrobatics +8, Athletics +5, Stealth +8
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +2, Int –2, Wis +2, Cha +1
AC 18; Fort +6, Ref +10, Will +8
HP 35; Immunities bleed, fire, paralyzed, poison, sleep; Weaknesses cold 5
Cloak in Embers [reaction] Trigger An adjacent ally is targeted by an effect that deals fire
damage; Effect The ember fox drapes itself across its ally, granting the ally fire
resistance 10 against the incoming attack.
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +10 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d4+3 piercing plus 1d4 persistent fire
FILTH FIRE
These creatures look like roiling clouds of black smoke churning above a
mound of burning refuse. Leering faces form and fade in the smoke above,
while the burning trash writhes in spasmodic lurches, obviously alive.
FILTH FIRE CREATURE 4
NE MEDIUM ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +11; darkvision, smoke vision
Languages Ignan (can’t speak any language)
Skills Acrobatics +13, Athletics +9
Str +1, Dex +5, Con +4, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +0
Smoke Vision The filth fire ignores the concealed condition from
smoke.
AC 21; Fort +12, Ref +13, Will +9
HP 70; Immunities bleed, fire, paralyzed, poison, sleep;
Weaknesses cold 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] burning lash +13 (finesse),
Damage 2d6+3 bludgeoning plus 1d6
persistent fire
Ranged [one-action] ember ball +13 (fire, range
increment 20 feet), Damage 1d6+3
bludgeoning plus 1d6 persistent fire
Noxious Burst [two-actions] Toxic materials and
churning rubbish within the filth fire’s
body explode in one of three ways. The filth fire
chooses the effect, but it can’t make the same choice
twice in a row.
• Fiery Beam (evocation, fire, primal) The filth fire
expels a 30-foot line of flame that deals 3d6 fire damage
with a DC 21 basic Reflex save.
• Shrapnel Blast (evocation, primal) The filth fire shoots
jagged rubbish out in a 5-foot emanation that deals 2d12
piercing damage with a DC 21 basic Reflex save.
• Toxic Fumes (evocation, poison, primal) The filth 
E-G
111
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ELEMENTAL ALIGNMENTS
More than other elementals, fire
elementals tend to deviate from
neutrality, and are often good, evil,
or chaotic in nature. Lawful fire
elementals are rare. Fire’s inherently
capricious nature seems to prevent
these creatures from succumbing to
the influence of order.
fire belches a 15-foot cone of toxic smoke that deals 2d6 poison damage (DC 21 basic
Fortitude save). A creature that fails is also sickened 1 (or sickened 2 on a critical failure).
STRIDING FIRE
An embodiment of the speed and chaos of a spreading blaze, a striding fire
appears as a lithe and long-limbed humanoid composed of shifting-hued flames
churning within a skeleton-like framework.
STRIDING FIRE CREATURE 6
CN MEDIUM ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +14; darkvision, smoke vision
Languages Ignan
Skills Acrobatics +15, Athletics +12
Str +2, Dex +5, Con +3, Int +0, Wis +4, Cha +1
Smoke Vision The striding fire ignores the concealed condition from smoke.
AC 24; Fort +11, Ref +17, Will +14
HP 115; Immunities bleed, fire, paralyzed, poison, sleep; Weaknesses cold 10
Speed 50 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +17 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d8+5 bludgeoning plus 1d6
persistent fire
Burning Rush [two-actions] (evocation, fire, primal) The striding fire Strides up
to double its Speed in a straight line. Its movement during this
Stride doesn’t trigger reactions. Any creature the striding
fire was adjacent to at any point during this Stride must
attempt a DC 24 basic Reflex save. If it critically
fails, it is knocked prone by a wave of heated
air. The striding fire can’t use Burning Rush for
1d4 rounds.
MAGMA SCORPION
Whether skittering through Abyssal wastelands
or basking in the searing sand of the deepest
deserts, magma scorpions have charred carapaces
constantly emitting vision-warping waves of heat.
MAGMA SCORPION CREATURE 8
N LARGE ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +18; darkvision, smoke vision
Skills Athletics +18
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha +0
Smoke Vision The magma scorpion ignores the
concealed condition from smoke.
AC 28; Fort +19, Ref +14, Will +16
HP 155; Immunities bleed, fire, paralyzed, poison,
sleep; Weaknesses cold 10
Speed 40 feet, climb 30 feet
Melee [one-action] pincer +20 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+9
bludgeoning plus 1d6 persistent fire and Grab
Melee [one-action] tail sting +20 (reach 10 feet), Damage
1d10+9 piercing plus 1d6 persistent fire and magma
scorpion venom
Ranged [one-action] magma spit +17 (fire, range increment 40
feet); Damage 1d6+9 fire plus 1d6 persistent fire
Magma Scorpion Venom (fire, injury, poison) Saving Throw
DC 26 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1
2d6 fire damage (1 round) and enfeebled 1; Stage 2 3d6 fire
damage and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
Bestiary 2
112
MEPHIT INTERACTIONS
Different types of mephits that can
be found on the same elemental
plane often develop friendly (or, in
some cases, fierce) rivalries with
one another. While mephits from
elementally opposed planes (such
as fire and water) may have strong
opinions about the superiority of
their own element, the fact that they
rarely see such mephits means that
when they do encounter them, they
often get along better than they do
with their close neighbors.
Elemental, Mephit
Mephits are small, weak creatures that serve at the whims of other elemental entities.
The mephits presented here are less common than air mephits, earth mephits, and the
like, as they are a blend of two different elements rather than focusing on one alone.
DUST MEPHIT
Whining and self-important creatures, dust mephits are known for their tendency
to pronounce doom and gloom at every opportunity, lamenting every insignificant
and minor difficulty as though it were an insurmountable obstacle and making
themselves out to be heroes for struggling valiantly against their cruel fates. They
tend to be thin and gaunt, with dusky brown and gray skin and wings.
DUST MEPHIT CREATURE 1
UNCOMMON N SMALL AIR EARTH ELEMENTAL
Perception +3; darkvision
Languages Auran, Terran
Skills Acrobatics +7, Stealth +7
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +1, Int –2, Wis +0, Cha –1
AC 17; Fort +6, Ref +9, Will +5
HP 16, fast healing 2 (in dust or sand); Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Speed 20 feet, fly 35 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +9 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6+1 slashing
Arcane Innate Spells DC 17; 2nd glitterdust
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (air, arcane, earth) The dust mephit breathes a cloud of dust in a
15-foot cone that deals 2d6 slashing damage to each creature within the area (DC 17
basic Reflex save). The dust mephit can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
ICE MEPHIT
Though capable of the same depths of cruelty as their fire mephit kin, ice
mephits carry theirs out in a more calculating way. Unlike most
mephits, these pale blue mephits prefer solitude to company.
Lacking in empathy, they are known for their callousness,
and have a reputation for brutal honesty. They also have
few moral qualms about acting selfishly
and exploiting weakness for their own gain,
should the chance arise.
ICE MEPHIT CREATURE 1
UNCOMMON N SMALL AIR ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +3; darkvision
Languages Aquan, Auran
Skills Acrobatics +7, Intimidation +5
Str +0, Dex +4, Con +0, Int –2, Wis +0, Cha +2
AC 17; Fort +5, Ref +9, Will +3
HP 18, fast healing 2 (while touching ice or
snow); Immunities bleed, cold, paralyzed,
poison, sleep; Weaknesses fire 3
Speed 20 feet, fly 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +9 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d4
slashing and 1d4 cold
Arcane Innate Spells DC 17, attack +9; Cantrips (1st)
chill touch, ray of frost
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (arcane, cold) The ice mephit
breathes shards of ice in a 15-foot cone that deals 1d6 cold
damage and 1d6 piercing damage to each creature within the
area (DC 17 basic Reflex save). The ice mephit can’t use Breath Weapon
again for 1d4 rounds.
E-G
113
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OOZE MEPHIT
Slick in every sense of the word, ooze mephits are unapologetic sycophants,
shamelessly flattering anyone they may be able to con a favor out of, although
their lack of intelligence and subtlety means that only the most vain or trusting
targets fail to see through their honeyed words. Lacking proper bones, these ochercolored mephits have bodies consisting primarily of ooze and muck. They smell
disgusting, and their touch leaves stains that are almost impossible to get out.
OOZE MEPHIT CREATURE 1
UNCOMMON N SMALL AMPHIBIOUS EARTH ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +3; darkvision
Languages Aquan, Terran
Skills Athletics +6, Diplomacy +7
Str +3, Dex +1, Con +2, Int –2, Wis +0, Cha +2
AC 14; Fort +7, Ref +4, Will +3
HP 24, fast healing 2 (while touching mud or slime); Immunities bleed, paralyzed,
poison, sleep
Speed 20 feet, fly 20 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +8, Damage 1d6+3 bludgeoning
Arcane Innate Spells DC 17; 1st grease
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (arcane, poison) The ooze mephit spits toxic slime in a 15-foot cone
that deals 2d6 poison damage to each creature within the area (DC 17 basic Reflex
save). The ooze mephit can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
STEAM MEPHIT
These brash and arrogant creatures are among the more energetic mephits. They
are quick to nominate themselves the leaders of any group, barking out orders in
shrill, high-pitched voices and insisting on having everything done their way. Even
when they aren’t bossing others around, the constant hiss of steam escaping from
their pores ensures that there is never a quiet moment.
STEAM MEPHIT CREATURE 1
UNCOMMON N SMALL ELEMENTAL FIRE WATER
Perception +3; darkvision, steam vision
Languages Aquan, Ignan
Skills Acrobatics +7, Intimidation +6
Str +1, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –2, Wis +0, Cha +0
Steam Vision The steam mephit ignores the concealed
condition from mist and steam.
AC 16; Fort +9, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 19, fast healing 2 (in boiling
water or steam); Immunities
bleed, fire, paralyzed, poison, sleep;
Weaknesses cold 3
Speed 20 feet, fly 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6+1
slashing
Arcane Innate Spells DC 17; 2nd obscuring mist
Boiling Rain [two-actions] (arcane, conjuration, fire, water) Frequency
once per day; Effect The steam mephit calls down a rain
boiling water that surrounds them in a 10-foot emanation.
Creatures in the area take 2d8 fire damage (DC 17 basic Reflex save),
and small unattended flames (such as torches) are extinguished.
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (arcane, fire) The steam mephit spits a cloud of
steam in a 15-foot cone that deals 2d6 fire damage to each creature
within the area (DC 17 basic Reflex save). The steam mephit can’t use
Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
MEPHIT NAMES
Perhaps because they’re so often
compelled into service by mortal
conjurers and more powerful
elementals, mephits tend to adopt long
names peppered with self-proclaimed
titles and imagined or exaggerated
accomplishments to alleviate their
feelings of inadequacy. Some examples
of mephit names follow.
• Anothoraxia, Lurker in Dark Places,
the Tragic Hero, One Against All
• Silothiscil the Embittered, Rimelord
of the Eternal Chill, Lord of Icicles
• Oglophax, Prince of Pungency, the
Viscous One, the Forever Stain
• Zarnozath the Magnificent, First
of His Name, Boiler of Kettles, the
Teapot Terror
Bestiary 2
114
FLAME AND FATHOM MEET
Though fire and water classically
oppose one another, in the right
mixture they can become a dangerous
combination. Water elementals heated
to a scalding temperature through
natural factors such as underwater
volcanoes might deal 1d6 persistent
fire damage with their Strikes, while
fire elementals infused with moisture
might exude clouds of obscuring or
even blinding steam.
Elemental, Water
Water elementals that become infused with cold or mist have increased mobility
in regions outside of bodies of water.
ICICLE SNAKE
Translucent and capable of hanging suspended and near motionless, icicle snakes
sense the heat of living creatures as a threat and attempt to use their camouflage
and chilling bite against foes.
ICICLE SNAKE CREATURE 2
N SMALL COLD ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +7; darkvision
Skills Athletics +7, Stealth +7
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +2, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha +0
AC 18; Fort +8, Ref +9, Will +5
HP 35; Immunities bleed, cold, paralyzed, poison, sleep; Weaknesses fire 5
Speed 25 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +9 (finesse), Damage 1d6+1 piercing plus 1d6 persistent cold
Icicle [one-action] (concentrate) Until the next time it acts, the icicle snake appears
to be an unassuming icicle. It has an automatic result of 27 on Deception
checks and DCs to pass as an icicle.
MIST STALKER
The tentacled mist stalker shrouds itself in a cloak of mist through
which its single, never-blinking eye can see with clarity, allowing it an
advantage when stalking its prey.
MIST STALKER CREATURE 4
N MEDIUM AMPHIBIOUS ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +13; darkvision, mist vision
Languages Aquan
Skills Athletics +11, Stealth +12
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +1, Wis
+5, Cha +0
Mist Cloud (aura, conjuration, primal,
water) 15 feet. The mist stalker is
surrounded by mist. Creatures in the aura
are concealed. If wind disperses the aura, it
returns automatically at the start of the mist
stalker’s turn. This cloud is suppressed in water.
Mist Vision The mist stalker ignores the concealed condition from
mist and fog.
AC 20; Fort +10, Ref +12, Will +11
HP 58; Immunities bleed, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee[one-action] tentacle +14 (finesse, sweep, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+4 bludgeoning
plus Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d8+4 bludgeoning, DC 21
Solidify Mist [one-action] (primal, transmutation, water) The mist stalker makes its mist cloud
congeal, causing the aura to be difficult terrain until the start of the mist stalker’s next turn.
In addition, the mist stalker can make the mist even thicker around a single Medium or
smaller creature within the cloud. The creature must succeed at a DC 20 Reflex save
or become immobilized until it Escapes or it is no longer in the mist cloud’s emanation.
BLIZZARDBORN
Freezing and thawing in a near-constant loop, blizzardborn resemble humanoid
forms composed of a mixture of partially melted snow and sleet. These elementals 
E-G
115
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ELEMENTAL WYRMS
The icewyrm is the most widely
encountered elemental wyrm, but
others exist as well, including the
blazing firewyrm, the sleek but
somewhat smaller sparkwyrm, and
the largest of them all, the immense
and acidic sludgewyrm.
move with crunching strides, their bodies constantly sloshing and sloughing off
shards of ice. Because of their ability to refreeze, blizzardborn can travel into warmer
environments safely, though they tend to look more like slush in these areas.
BLIZZARDBORN CREATURE 6
N MEDIUM COLD ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +14; darkvision, snow vision
Languages Aquan
Skills Athletics +15, Stealth +14 (+16 in ice or snow)
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +4, Cha +0
Snow Vision The blizzardborn ignores the concealed condition from falling snow.
AC 24; Fort +16, Ref +12, Will +14
HP 105; Immunities bleed, cold, paralyzed, poison, sleep; Weaknesses fire 5
Shattering Ice [reaction] Trigger An enemy hits the blizzardborn with an attack that
deals physical damage; Effect A portion of the blizzardborn’s body
shatters into an explosion of razor sharp ice crystals and blinding
snow that deals 2d6 piercing damage to opponents in a 5-foot
emanation (DC 24 basic Reflex save). Anyone who fails is also
blinded for 1 round (or 3 rounds on a critical failure).
Speed 25 feet, ice burrow 20 feet
Melee [one-action] ice claw +17 (versatile bludgeoning), Damage
2d6+8 slashing plus 1d6 persistent cold
Ice Burrow The blizzardborn can Burrow through ice or snow with a
Speed of 20 feet. It moves at its full burrow Speed, leaving
no tunnels or signs of its passing.
ICEWYRM
Resembling wingless, serpentine dragons formed of jagged
ice and shot through with veins of nearly frozen water, these
elementals dwell within icebergs and enjoy striking out at
passing ships or creatures. They’re especially common in frigid
stretches of ocean in the Plane of Water, where icebergs cluster
together into enormous islands of ice.
ICEWYRM CREATURE 10
N HUGE AMPHIBIOUS COLD ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +19; darkvision
Languages Aquan
Skills Athletics +21
Str +7, Dex +7, Con +5, Int –1, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 30; Fort +20, Ref +21, Will +17
HP 185; Immunities bleed, cold, paralyzed, poison, sleep;
Weaknesses fire 10
Explosion (cold) When the icewyrm dies, it explodes, dealing
8d6 cold damage to each creature in a 10-foot emanation
(DC 27 basic Reflex save).
Speed 25 feet, ice burrow 20 feet, swim 60 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+13 piercing
Melee [one-action] tail +23 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d6+13 slashing
plus 1d6 persistent cold
Ranged [one-action] ice shard +23 (range increment 60 feet), Damage
1d6+13 piercing plus 1d6 persistent cold
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (cold, evocation, primal) The icewyrm breathes
a 60-foot line of freezing shards of razor-sharp ice, dealing 3d12 cold
damage and 3d12 piercing damage to every creature in the line (DC 29 basic
Reflex save). The icewyrm can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Ice Burrow As blizzardborn.
Bestiary 2
116
ROGUE ELEPHANTS
Elephants of all species are, by
nature, social creatures who form
strong bonds with one another, but
when an elephant separates from
its herd—either due to tragedy or an
individual streak of viciousness—they
become known as rogue elephants.
These dangerous solitary creatures
are ill-tempered and quick to attack
anything that approaches them, and
often have the elite adjustments to
their statistics.
Elephant
Primeval variants of the elephant dwell in remote regions of the world.
ANANCUS
The anancus is an ancient species of elephant with unusually long tusks and a
trunk shorter than its more modern cousins.
ANANCUS CREATURE 8
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +16; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +19, Survival +16
Str +7, Dex +0, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 25; Fort +19, Ref +14, Will +16
HP 170
Speed 40 feet
Melee [one-action] tusk +19 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+11 piercing
Melee [one-action] foot +17 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+9 bludgeoning
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target takes half damage.
Failure The target takes full damage and is knocked prone.
Critical Failure The target takes double damage, is knocked
prone, and is pushed 5 feet away from the anancus.
Trample[three-actions] Large or smaller, foot, DC 25
Tusk Sweep [two-actions] The anancus sweeps its long tusks
back and forth, dealing 4d6
bludgeoning damage to all
creatures in a 15-foot cone,
who must make a DC 27
basic Reflex save.
MASTODON
Not to be confused with the
larger mammoth, mastodons
are primeval elephants who dwell
predominantly in temperate forests.
There, they travel in close-knit social groups
and feed on the forest vegetation.
MASTODON CREATURE 9
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +17; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +21, Survival +17
Str +8, Dex +0, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 26; Fort +20, Ref +13, Will +17
HP 175
Speed 45 feet
Melee [one-action] tusk +21 (reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+12 piercing
Melee [one-action] trunk +21 (reach 15 feet), Effect grabbing trunk
Melee [one-action] foot +21 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+12 bludgeoning
Dual Tusks [one-action] The mastodon makes two tusk Strikes, each against a different
creature. This counts as one attack for the mastodon’s multiple attack
penalty, and the penalty doesn’t increase until after both
attacks.
Grabbing Trunk A Medium or smaller creature hit by the
mastodon’s trunk is grabbed. If the mastodon moves, it can
bring the grabbed creature along with it.
Trample[three-actions] Large or smaller, foot, DC 27
E-G
117
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MASTERS OF ADAPTATION
Kayals understand that many
Material Plane cultures view them
with suspicion or even fear, and
take pains to adapt to cultures with
which they seek to establish trade.
Unfortunately, kayals’ mastery
at cultural adaptation can often
backfire, leading to fears that the
so-called “fetchlings” are an invading
force that seeks to duplicate and
replace those with whom they
merely wish to do business.
Fetchling
The people known today as fetchlings are a distinct ancestry descended from
generations of humans who became trapped ages ago on the Shadow Plane. No longer
human at all, these people, who call themselves kayals, have become monochromatic
in coloration, with flesh tones and hair colors varying between white, black, and all
shades of gray. Their limbs are lithe and willowy, and their eyes are generally solid
yellow, yellow-green, or white, though a rare few have a purple or blue glow.
Fetchlings have developed their own complex societies in the Shadow Plane,
often under the tolerance of or in servitude to the strange, malignant creatures
there, such as the sinister velstracs or the enigmatic d’ziriaks. While individual
fetchlings can be any alignment, they are all survivors in a harsh environment,
which leads to a tendency toward pragmatism. Fetchling clothing mimics the
regions they dwell in, with drab colors tending toward darker shades. When they
trade with humans or other societies on the Material Plane, they often wear masks
or concealing clothing to hide their appearance.
Typical fetchling communities are insular and swiftly close ranks in the
event of an intruder. Though individual fetchlings don’t mind traveling to and
blending in with other societies to facilitate trade, they often hide or even react
defensively if they have their own visitors. When one considers the nature of
the other denizens of the Shadow Plane, however, this tendency to assume the
worst of interlopers might make sense to some.
Fetchlings are not as common on the Material Plane;
most of those who dwell there are loners by choice who
have left their home to seek out adventure elsewhere,
exiles who were banished from their homelands,
or planar castaways with no ability to return to the
Shadow Plane. This last category, the lost and stranded,
are the most likely to be found in larger groups. In cities
of significant size, one can sometimes even find a small community of
a few dozen or more fetchlings living among humans, although they often do so
subtly by dyeing their hair, wearing brightly colored clothing, and utilizing
layers of makeup to hide their pallid complexions.
FETCHLING SCOUT CREATURE 1
N MEDIUM FETCHLING HUMANOID SHADOW
Perception +5; darkvision
Languages Common, Shadowtongue
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +4, Deception +5, Diplomacy +5, Society +3, Stealth +7,
Thievery +7
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +0, Cha +2
Items chain shirt, dagger
AC 18; Fort +5, Ref +9, Will +5
HP 18
Shadow Blending When the fetchling scout is concealed as a result of dim
light, the flat check to target them has a DC of 7, not 5.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] dagger +9 (agile, finesse, versatile S), Damage 1d4+1 piercing
Ranged [one-action] dagger +9 (agile, finesse, thrown 10 feet, versatile S), Damage 1d4+1
piercing
Occult Innate Spells DC 15; 1st illusory disguise
Shadow Stride [one-action] (illusion, occult, shadow) Requirement The fetchling is in dim
light; Effect The fetchling Strides. They have a +10-foot status bonus to their
Speed during this Stride. The DC from shadow blending increases to 11 during
this Stride, and the fetchling remains concealed by dim light until the end of
the movement, even if they leave dim light during the Stride.
Sneak Attack The fetchling scout’s Strikes deal an additional 1d6
precision damage to flat-footed creatures.
Bestiary 2
118
IRNAKURSE MOCKERIES
When drow capture a particularly
hated surface elf, or one with a large
following, they inflict even greater pain
upon them during the fleshwarping
process than most other victims. The
resulting irnakurse are known as
“mockeries,” and always have elite
adjustments. Rather than using them,
drow keep them close at hand as living
“art” akin to a pet or trophy.
Fleshwarp
Horrid abominations reshaped by vile alchemical magic, the two fleshwarps
presented here were created by drow, who transform captured elves or xulgaths
into twisted monstrosities that can then be loosed to cause havoc and terror.
IRNAKURSE
Irnakurse are surface elves who drow have subjected to particularly cruel and
humiliating fleshwarping practices, as drow take special delight in the torment
of their surface-dwelling kin. The process of crafting an irnakurse involves
twisting an unfortunate elf into a deformed mass of misplaced limbs, loose flesh,
and bony protrusions—parts that should be internal are often left on full display
to the world. Irnakurse are subject to mental conditioning that causes them to
hate their prior forms, and these creatures prefer to attack surface elves over all
other targets.
IRNAKURSE CREATURE 9
CE LARGE ABERRATION
Perception +18; darkvision
Languages Abyssal, Elven, Undercommon (can’t speak
any language)
Skills Athletics +20, Acrobatics +20, Stealth +20
Str +5, Dex +5, Con +3, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +4
AC 28; Fort +20, Ref +18, Will +16
HP 152
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +20 (reach 10 feet), Damage
2d12+11 piercing
Melee [one-action] tentacle +20 (agile, reach 20
feet), Damage 2d8+11 slashing plus
mind lash
Mind Lash (emotion, enchantment,
mental, occult) A non-evil creature
hit by an irnakurse’s tentacle is
overwhelmed with corrupted images
of a ruined life and must succeed at a
DC 28 Will save or be stunned
2 (or stunned 4 on a critical
failure). After attempting
this save, a creature is
temporarily immune to Mind
Lash for 24 hours.
Rend [one-action] tentacle
Soul Scream [two-actions] (auditory,
concentrate, emotion, enchantment,
mental, occult) Frequency once per day;
Effect The irnakurse unleashes an alien
shriek of nightmarish horror and
pain. All non-evil creatures within a
10-foot emanation must attempt a
DC 28 Will save. The irnakurse can
Sustain Soul Scream for up to 6
rounds; each time it does, it repeats
the effect.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected,
and is temporarily immune to Soul Scream for 24 hours.
Success The creature is stupefied 1 for 1 round.
E-G
119
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ZEVGAVIZEB’S FAVORED
The demonic patron of many
xulgaths, Zevgavizeb, spends most
of his time slumbering in the Abyssal
realm of Gluttondark. However, his
vile priests actively pursue what
they insist are their dormant god’s
goals. Some xulgath high priests
practice fleshwarping upon their own
acolytes, creating ghonhatine zealots
to serve in their legions and guard
their evil temples.
Failure The creature is stupefied 1. Further failed saves against Soul Scream increase
the condition value by 1, to a maximum of stupefied 4. Each time the character gets
a full night’s rest, the stupefied condition gained from Soul Scream decreases by 1.
Critical Failure As failure, except the stupefied value increases by 2 instead of by 1.
Storm of Tentacles [two-actions] The irnakurse makes up to four tentacle Strikes, each against a
different target. These attacks count toward the irnakurse’s multiple attack penalty, but
the multiple attack penalty doesn’t increase until after it makes all of its attacks.
GHONHATINE
In transforming xulgaths, drow fleshwarpers sought not to create a new type of
creature but to recapture a form of xulgath predecessor believed entirely vanished
from Golarion. Ghonhatines are the result—hulking reptilian beasts who prefer to
crawl on all fours and tear at their foes with bestial fury.
GHONHATINE CREATURE 10
CE LARGE ABERRATION
Perception +19; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Undercommon
Skills Athletics +21, Intimidation +19, Stealth +19
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +6, Int –2, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 30; Fort +22, Ref +17, Will +19
HP 175; Immunities disease; Resistances acid 10
Stench (aura, olfactory) 30 feet. A creature entering the aura or starting
its turn in the aura must succeed at a DC 26 Fortitude save or
become sickened 1 (plus slowed 1 for as long as it’s sickened on
a critical failure). While within the aura, affected creatures take a
–2 circumstance penalty to saves against disease and to recover
from the sickened condition. A creature that succeeds at
its save is temporarily immune for 1 minute.
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (reach 10 feet), Damage
2d12+10 piercing plus 1d6 persistent acid
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (agile, reach 10 feet),
Damage 2d10+10 slashing
Ranged [one-action] vomit +19 (acid, range
increment 20 feet), Damage 5d6 acid
plus fleshgout
Feed [one-action] (manipulate) Requirement The
ghonhatine is adjacent to the corpse of
a creature that died within the last hour;
Effect The ghonhatine devours a chunk of
the corpse. For 1 minute, the ghonhatine
gains fast healing 5 and a +2 status bonus
to damage rolls. It can gain these benefits
from any given corpse only once.
Fleshgout (disease) A ghonhatine’s vomit
carries an awful disease that, over time,
can cause a suffering creature’s flesh to
develop painful boils that eventually
slough away, leaving gaping wounds;
Saving Throw DC 28 Fortitude; Stage 1
carrier with no ill effect (1d4 hours); Stage
2 enfeebled 1 and drained 1 (1 day); Stage
3 enfeebled 2 and drained 2 (1 day); Stage 4
enfeebled 2 and drained 3 (1 day); Stage 5
drained 4, enfeebled 2, and unconscious (1
day); Stage 6 dead
Bestiary 2
120
FLY SPECIES
The giant fly presented here is
but the most common of these
unsettlingly oversized pests. Others
can grow much larger, such as the
blood-drinking glutton fly, the highly
toxic and foul-smelling blight fly,
and the immensely bloated plague
fly—a nauseating creature ironically
incapable of flight that fattens itself
on undead flesh and carries a host of
awful diseases.
Fly
Giant flies are pony-sized insects that have massive compound eyes and bodies
bristling with short, stiff hairs. Their lairs are notorious for the rotting meat
they stockpile to lay their eggs into. Their maggot-dens are also prime breeding
grounds for virulent diseases.
GIANT MAGGOT
Giant flies lay their eggs on the bodies of larger monsters or livestock. When they
hatch, these eggs release squirming maggots the size of human children, ravenous
young who voraciously consume any flesh in the immediate vicinity—typically
starting with the body upon which they were born.
GIANT MAGGOT CREATURE 0
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +3; no vision, tremorsense 30 feet
Skills Athletics +4
Str +2, Dex –1, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –5
AC 13; Fort +9, Ref +3, Will +3
HP 18; Immune visual
Regurgitation [reaction] Trigger The giant maggot takes damage; Effect The giant maggot
regurgitates its rancid, foul meal. All creatures in a 5-foot emanation must succeed at a
DC 16 Fortitude save or become sickened 1 (or sickened 2 on a critical failure). The giant
maggot can’t use Regurgitation again until it spends at least an hour feeding on a corpse.
Speed 10 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +6, Damage 1d8+2 piercing plus Grab
Gnaw Flesh [one-action] Requirement The giant maggot has Grabbed a creature; Effect The
giant maggot deals 1d8+2 slashing damage to the grabbed creature as it chews the
creature’s flesh (DC 19 basic Reflex save).
GIANT FLY
This pony-sized fly’s twitching limbs seem to never stop moving as it constantly
cleans itself and scoops anything edible into its mouthparts. While primarily carrion
eaters, giant flies sometimes prey on livestock or other animals too slow to get away.
GIANT FLY CREATURE 1
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +8; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +6
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +3, Cha –5
AC 17; Fort +6, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 20
Avoid the Swat[reaction]Trigger The giant fly is targeted with a melee or
ranged attack by an attacker it can see; Effect The
giant fly gains a +2 circumstance bonus against
the triggering attack. If the attack misses, the
giant insect can Fly up to its fly Speed.
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] mandibles +8, Damage 1d6+3
piercing plus fly pox
Fly Pox (disease, virulent) A giant fly could
carry any disease, but most transmit a
virulent but not fatal infection called Fly
Pox with their bite; Saving Throw DC 16
Fortitude; Onset 1 day; Stage 1 enfeebled 1
(1 day); Stage 2 as stage 1 (1 day); Stage
3 enfeebled 2 (1 day); Stage 4 as stage 3;
Stage 5 enfeebled 2 and fatigued (1 day)
E-G
121
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FROG SPECIES
While all frogs are amphibious, some
frogs spend more of their time out of
the water. Even those usually found
near lakes and streams are adapted
for climbing. You can add variety
to frog encounters by replacing a
frog’s swim Speed with a climb Speed
(or even allowing it to have both).
Likewise, for frogs that are poisonous
or venomous, the specific effects
of their toxin can vary by species,
with exposure to some frog poison
causing a creature to become clumsy
or stupefied instead of enfeebled.
Frog
Frogs that are poisonous or grow to monstrous size can be a menace to adventurers.
SPEAR FROG
The spear frog is named for its toxin, which is traditionally used to envenom
thrown projectiles like spears and daggers.
SPEAR FROG CREATURE 0
N TINY ANIMAL
Perception +6; low-light vision
Skills Acrobatics +5, Athletics +0 (+6 to Climb, High Jump, Long Jump, and Swim)
Str –2, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha +0
AC 14; Fort +5, Ref +7, Will +6
HP 12
Toxic Skin Anytime a creature touches the spear frog or an adjacent creature Strikes the
spear frog with a melee attack, that creature is exposed to spear frog venom.
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6 piercing plus spear frog venom
Spear Frog Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 15 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds;
Stage 1 1d4 poison damage (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and enfeebled 1 (1 round)
Sticky Feet Spear frogs are not flat-footed when Balancing on a narrow surface, and they
gain a +4 bonus to Reflex saves to avoid falling.
SPEAR FROG POISON
A single spear frog yields enough toxin to Craft 1 dose of spear frog poison.
SPEAR FROG POISON ITEM 1
ALCHEMICAL CONSUMABLE INJURY POISON
Price 3 gp
Usage held, 2 hands; Bulk L
Activation[two-actions] Interact
Saving Throw DC 15 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d4 poison damage
(1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and enfeebled 1 (1 round)
GIANT FROG
Giant frogs can grow up to 6 feet long and weigh over 200 pounds, with rows of
razor-sharp teeth lining their gaping mouths.
GIANT FROG CREATURE 1
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +7; low-light vision
Skills Acrobatics +5, Athletics +6 (+10 to High Jump or Long
Jump), Stealth +7
Str +3, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –1
AC 15; Fort +8, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 30
Speed 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +8, Damage 1d6+3 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] tongue +8 (reach 15 feet), Effect tongue grab
Sticky Feet As spear frog.
Tongue Grab A creature hit by the giant frog’s tongue becomes
grabbed by the giant frog. The creature isn’t immobilized, but it
can’t move beyond the reach of the frog’s tongue. A creature
can sever the tongue with a Strike against AC 13 that
deals at least 2 slashing damage. This deals no damage
to the frog but prevents it from using its tongue Strike
until it regrows its tongue, which takes a week.
Bestiary 2
122
ALIEN ORIGINS
Froghemoths have been known to
suddenly abandon an established lair
to seek a new home, as if in response
to some cosmic convergence or
subspace signal imperceptible to
other creatures. Some argue that
the froghemoth is never fully
comfortable in any environment
because it isn’t from this world at
all, and that these wanderings are
instinctual urges to seek out its true
home—a home not represented by
the strange world in which the beast
finds itself trapped.
Froghemoth
A terrifying abomination of teeth, tentacles, and unbridled rage, the froghemoth
is thankfully rarely encountered even in the deepest swamplands or most remote
Darklands caverns. Capable of devouring dinosaurs and even dragons, it is a
frighteningly effective ambush hunter, immersing itself in the mire with only its
eyestalk protruding and watching in every direction at once with uncanny precision.
FROGHEMOTH CREATURE 13
UNCOMMON N HUGE ABERRATION AMPHIBIOUS
Perception +25; darkvision, otherworldly vision 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +23, Athletics +27, Stealth +27 (+30 in swamps)
Str +8, Dex +6, Con +7, Int –4, Wis +6, Cha +4
Otherworldly Vision A froghemoth’s alien eyes allow it to perceive creatures within 30
feet, even if they are invisible or ethereal. It can still be fooled by successful Stealth
checks to Hide, but it has Perception DC 38 in such cases. It also sees through and is
unaffected by illusions with the visual trait if they are within 30 feet.
AC 32, all-around vision; Fort +26, Ref +21, Will +23
HP 285; Immunities electricity
Electric Torpor Though a froghemoth is immune to electricity damage, it is slowed 1 for
1 round whenever it would have otherwise taken electricity damage.
Speed 20 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +27 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+14 piercing
plus Improved Grab
Melee [one-action] tentacle +27 (agile, reach 15
feet), Damage 3d8+14 bludgeoning
plus Improved Grab
Melee[one-action] tongue +27 (agile, reach
30 feet), Damage 2d10+14
piercing plus barbed tongue
Aquatic Ambush [one-action]
Barbed Tongue A creature hit
by the froghemoth’s tongue
becomes grabbed by the
froghemoth. The creature
isn’t immobilized, but it can’t
move beyond the reach of the
froghemoth’s tongue. A creature
can sever the tongue with a successful
Strike against AC 31 that deals at least 15
slashing damage. This deals no damage
to the froghemoth but prevents it
from using its tongue Strike until
it regrows its tongue, which
takes 1 minute.
Flailing Tentacles [two-actions] The
froghemoth makes up to four
tentacle Strikes, each against a
different target. These count toward the froghemoth’s
multiple attack penalty, but the multiple attack penalty doesn’t
increase until after all the attacks.
Greater Constrict [one-action] 3d6+12, DC 33
Retract Tongue[two-actions] The froghemoth pulls a creature grabbed by its
tongue toward itself. The froghemoth rolls an Athletics check against
the creature’s Fortitude DC. On a success, the froghemoth pulls the
creature into an adjacent space, and if it critically succeeds it can
also make a bite Strike against the creature after the pull.
Swallow Whole[one-action] (attack) Large, 3d6+9 bludgeoning, Rupture 24
E-G
123
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
UNKNOWN ORIGINS
Frost worms are clearly supernatural
in origin, though the source of their
magical abilities remains unclear.
Research is hampered by the fact
that neither the corpse nor its magic
survive the creature’s death, and live
frost worms are notoriously difficult
and dangerous to keep or transport.
Evidence exists that the winter
witches of Irrisen may have created
the first frost worms, while other
clues suggest they hail from the
distant planet of Triaxus.
Frost Worm
The frost worm’s single round, red eye gleams prominently at the head of its monstrous
mass, white as a winter snowfall. What appears to be a bifurcated lower jaw is actually
two spiky parapodia that the worm uses to shovel food into its lamprey-like mouth.
An adult frost worm measures 35 feet long and weighs 8,000 pounds.
A frost worm is an apex predator that uses camouflage, burrowing, and
deceit to ambush its prey. When it attacks, a frost worm produces a distinctive,
high-pitched trill. Though some survivors of frost worm attacks have compared
it to a wailing lament, the trill has a captivating effect on nearby creatures,
causing them to stop and listen even as the monstrous creature approaches.
The cold shed by a frost worm is as dangerous as its trill or its jaws, and while
it is not fond of warmer climates, neither is it particularly hampered in such
regions. A frost worm that somehow finds itself in temperate or even tropical
environs causes the immediate area to chill and ice over with frost over time,
creating seemingly impossible pockets of frozen terrain.
FROST WORM CREATURE 12
N HUGE ANIMAL COLD
Perception +22; darkvision
Skills Athletics +25, Stealth +20 (+24 in ice and snow)
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +6, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha +0
AC 33; Fort +24, Ref +22, Will +20
HP 225; Immunities cold; Weaknesses fire 15
Death Throes (cold, evocation, primal) When a frost worm dies, it
explodes in a 100-foot burst of searing cold blood. All creatures
and objects in range take 10d8 cold damage (DC 29 basic
Reflex save).
Worm Chill (aura, cold, evocation, primal) 5 feet. A creature
that enters or begins its turn in the emanation takes 3d6
cold damage (DC 29 basic Reflex save).
Freezing Blood [reaction] (cold) Trigger The frost worm takes
piercing or slashing damage; Effect The frost worm’s
freezing blood sprays out on a random creature within
10 feet of the frost worm. That creature takes 7d6 cold
damage (DC 29 basic Reflex save).
Speed 25 feet, burrow 10 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +25, Damage 3d8+10 piercing plus 2d6
persistent cold
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (cold, evocation, primal) The frost
worm exhales a blast of frost, dealing 13d6 cold damage
to creatures in a 50-foot cone (DC 32 basic Reflex save). It
can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Worm Trill [one-action] (auditory, concentrate, enchantment,
mental, primal) The frost worm emits a hypnotic
trill. Each non–frost worm creature within 100
feet must attempt a DC 32 Will save. The
effects of Worm Trill last for 1 round, but if the
frost worm uses this ability again on subsequent
rounds, it extends this duration by 1 round for any
creature already affected.
Success The creature is unaffected and is
immune to Worm Trill for 24 hours.
Failure The creature is fascinated by the frost
worm.
Critical Failure As failure, but the fascinated
condition doesn’t end if the frost worm uses
hostile actions against the creature.
Bestiary 2
124
WOOD GIANT CELEBRATIONS
Despite the seriousness with which
wood giants approach their duties,
or perhaps because of it, wood giant
gatherings are joyous occasions.
Wood giants most often gather to
sing, dance, seek life partners, and
celebrate their hard work.
Giant
Giants prosper in many environments, and although they are quite diverse, they
all tend to have equally larger-than-life personalities.
WOOD GIANT
Wood giants are the denizens and protectors of the deepest, most primeval
forests in the world. They dedicate their entire lives to the preservation of
nature—a role that they believe nature itself has selected them to carry out.
Wood giants are patient and kind to those who show respect and care for wild
places. Although most wood giants consider civilization as simply another part
of the world, they value places untouched by permanent structures and dense
humanoid settlements.
Wood giants have long, drooping ears and more slender builds than most
giants. Despite their size, they are graceful and agile, able to move through dense
forests and brush with little sound. They have been known to work closely
with druids and others who share their respect for the sanctity of wilderness
regions. Wood giants spend their days patrolling vast swaths of territory,
foraging, and keeping an eye out for any who would despoil their lands.
While they respect the connection to nature they share with many fey
creatures and remain on good terms with them, wood giants see most
fey as far too flighty to take part in any long-term plans.
An average wood giant stands 14 feet tall and weighs 1,200
pounds.
WOOD GIANT CREATURE 6
CG LARGE GIANT HUMANOID
Perception +15; low-light vision
Languages Common, Jotun, Sylvan; speak with animals
Skills Acrobatics +13, Athletics +15, Forest Lore +14, Nature +14,
Stealth +13 (+15 in forests), Survival +13
Str +5, Dex +5, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +3, Cha +1
Items hide armor, +1 composite longbow (20 arrows),
shortsword
AC 24; Fort +17, Ref +14, Will +13
HP 120
Catch Rock[reaction]
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] shortsword +17 (agile, reach 10 feet, versatile S),
Damage 1d8+11 piercing
Melee [one-action] fist +17 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 1d6+11 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] composite longbow +18 (deadly d10, range increment 100
feet, reload 0, volley 30 feet), Damage 1d8+8 piercing
Ranged [one-action] rock +17 (brutal, range increment 120 feet), Damage
2d6+11 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 23; 4th speak with plants; 3rd earthbind; 2nd
entangle, tree shape; Constant (2nd) pass without trace, speak
with animals
Piercing Shot [one-action] The wood giant shoots an arrow at a target so that it
glances off the first target to strike another target behind the first
one. The wood giant chooses two targets in a direct line, one of which
must be giving lesser cover to the other, then makes a single ranged
Strike with its longbow against both targets. This attack ignores
the lesser cover the first target provides to the second. The wood
giant rolls damage only once, and applies it to each creature it hits.
Piercing Shot counts as two attacks for the wood giant’s multiple
attack penalty.
Throw Rock [one-action]
E-G
125
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
GAFFS
Many marsh giants fight with
oversized gaffs—lengths of wood
with a single metal spike affixed
to the tip. Used often by fisherfolk
to land fish, marsh giants use their
gaffs as weapons. A gaff sized for
a Medium creature is a common
martial weapon in the club group.
It deals 1d6 bludgeoning damage
and has 1 Bulk. It requires one
hand to use and has the trip and
versatile P weapon traits. Gaffs are
readily available in fishing or coastal
settlements for 1 gp.
MARSH GIANT
Dwellers of brackish coastal salt marshes and fetid bogs and swamps, marsh giants
are hideous in appearance indeed, with fishlike mouths, slimy gray-green skin, and
dark, beady eyes. They prefer to eat the flesh of those they slay in battle, but many
are also cannibals. It is perhaps this vicious behavior that keeps the creatures in
check, for if a fellow marsh giant becomes too dangerous and powerful, it runs the
risk of being ambushed and consumed by its clan.
Marsh giants are insular and mysterious, dedicating much of their lives to
zealous worship of sea-dwelling deities or stranger entities. While there is no
central religion followed by all marsh giants, many are known to venerate the
demon lord Dagon, while others worship even more powerful monstrosities from
the Elder Mythos, such as distant, dreaming Cthulhu.
Only rarely do more than a dozen marsh giants settle together in a location,
but when they do it is often for a religious purpose. Whatever call from the deep
draws them together also tugs at nearby creatures such as boggards or skum, who
look upon marsh giants in fear and reverence. The grim, terrifying chants and
screams coming from such an encampment are a sure sign of terror to come for
any other residents of the area.
Barely topping 11 feet tall and 1,000 pounds, marsh giants are small
for giants but make up for their relatively diminutive stature with
their zealotry.
MARSH GIANT CREATURE 8
CE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS GIANT HUMANOID
Perception +16; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Jotun
Skills Athletics +18, Intimidation +15, Religion +17
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +1
Items +1 striking gaff, sack with 5 rocks
AC 27; Fort +18, Ref +13, Will +17
HP 150
Catch Rock[reaction]
Speed 35 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] gaff +20 (magical, reach 10 feet, trip, versatile P),
Damage 2d6+14 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] fist +20 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+14
bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] rock +20 (brutal, range increment 120 feet),
Damage 2d6+14 bludgeoning
Occult Innate Spells DC 23; 5th mariner’s curse; 2nd
augury, obscuring mist
Hook Shake [one-action] Requirements A creature adjacent to the
marsh giant is prone in water at least 1 foot deep; Effect The
marsh giant uses its gaff to shake the creature back and forth and
hold it underwater. The giant attempts an Athletics check against the
target’s Fortitude DC.
Critical Success The target takes 6d6+14 piercing damage and
loses 5 rounds’ worth of air if they were holding their breath.
Success The target takes 3d6+14 piercing damage and loses 3
rounds’ worth of air if they were holding their breath.
Failure The target is unaffected.
Critical Failure As failure, but the giant drops its gaff as well.
Throw Rock [one-action]
Twist the Hook [two-actions] The marsh giant makes a melee Strike
with its gaff. If it hits, it twists and yanks the gaff to
create an awful wound, dealing 3d6 persistent bleed
damage to the creature.
Bestiary 2
126
TAIGA GIANT CLANS
Each taiga giant clan links its identity
to the deeds of their most famous
ancestors and heroes. Names such
as Cliffsmiter and Mountainripper
hint at legendary accomplishments,
though the stories are rarely shared
with outsiders.
TAIGA GIANT
Taiga giants prefer a nomadic lifestyle, both to keep from depleting any one
area’s resources while satiating their massive appetites and to satisfy a constant
wanderlust. They are deeply spiritual and frequently commune with their
ancestors’ spirits for guidance and knowledge. Taiga giants are happiest when
they are left alone to live out their traditional lives, and their impressive size and
strength are enough to persuade all but the most dangerous foes to do so.
Taiga giants subsist on migratory herds of aurochs, mammoths, and elk. They
occasionally raid humanoid villages, but such cases are opportunistic rather than
malicious, with a focus on stealing away livestock for food rather than people.
Nevertheless, the arrival of a group of taiga giants is a potentially devastating
event to any town or village, so many communities attempt to placate the giants
by creating a yearly offering at those times when they know the giants are
scheduled to come close.
Most taiga giants venerate their ancestors and seek to honor their works in
everything they do. This deep connection makes them ferociously proud of
those legacies, and little can compel taiga giants to go to war more swiftly
than insulting their ancestors. Merely mentioning the false rumors that
ancient taiga giant spellcasters were responsible for the creation of the
first rune giants is a surefire way to earn a taiga giant’s unending wrath.
A taiga giant stands 20 feet tall and weighs 10,000 pounds.
TAIGA GIANT CREATURE 12
CN HUGE GIANT HUMANOID
Perception +23; low-light vision, see invisibility
Languages Common, Jotun
Skills Athletics +22, Genealogy Lore +16, Religion +20, Stealth +10
(+22 in undergrowth), Survival +25
Str +7, Dex +1, Con +5, Int +1, Wis +4, Cha +2
Items +1 striking longspear, sack with 5 rocks
See Invisibility A taiga giant can see invisible creatures and objects as
translucent shapes, and they are concealed to the taiga giant.
AC 32; Fort +25, Ref +20, Will +22; +2 status to all saves vs. enchantment
and illusion effects
HP 230; Immunities controlled
Catch Rock[reaction]
Guardian Spirit[reaction] Trigger The taiga giant has Ancestral Guardian active
and would take energy or mental damage; Effect The taiga giant’s ancestral
spirits intervene and protect the giant from taking up to 20 energy damage
or 30 mental damage. The giant takes any remaining damage; if it does, the
spirits depart and the giant is no longer protected by the ancestors.
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] longspear +26 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 2d8+15 piercing
Melee [one-action] fist +25 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d6+15 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] rock +25 (brutal, range increment 120 feet), Damage 2d10+15
bludgeoning
Ancestral Guardian [one-action] (concentrate) Requirements The taiga giant must
be protected by the ancestors; Effect The taiga giant calls upon their
ancestors’ spirits to rise up and protect them, causing a cloak of
spectral faces to shimmer and swirl around them. The taiga giant’s AC
increases to 34 until the start of its next turn.
Protected by the Ancestors (divine) A taiga giant’s prayers to their
ancestors grant them spiritual protection. If a taiga giant loses this
protection (such as by taking too much damage when using Guardian
Spirit, or if the ancestors are counteracted by dispel magic), it loses
its immunity to the controlled condition and its status bonus to saving
throws against enchantment and illusion effects. A taiga giant can once again be 
E-G
127
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SHADOW GIANT LOCATIONS
Some shadow giants travel to the
Material Plane to serve as agents
in Nidal’s Umbral Court. Rumors of
these massive shock troops deployed
by the court’s mysterious members
are common, and such rumors often
place them in the mountains near
Cheliax and Molthune.
Protected by the Ancestors by performing a 10-minute prayer as an activity that has
the concentrate trait.
Throw Rock [one-action]
SHADOW GIANT
Shadow giants are fierce natives of the Shadow Plane, where they have dwelled in
perpetual twilight for millennia. Their cultures vary greatly depending on whether
the giants reside in their land of origin or have relocated to the Material Plane. On
the Shadow Plane, they live in familiar groups and uphold a nomadic way of life
as they roam across ancestral lands between shadowy forests and misty chasms.
These hunter-gatherers pass down lore through oral histories, conduct pilgrimages
to unholy ziggurats of black stone, and bathe in the blood of their long-standing
foes, including rival shadow giant clans and velstracs intent on enslaving their
kind. On the Material Plane, conversely, they are secretive and isolationist,
keeping apart from other peoples in forbidding structures of black stone in
high, isolated mountain valleys.
Standing 15 feet tall, with gray skin and hair only a shade lighter,
shadow giants are fearsome foes with a well-earned reputation as zealous
warmongers and ruthless combatants. They rarely interact with
outsiders, though they may treat with proven warriors
who show the giants the respect and deference they feel
they deserve. Only a small subset of shadow giants
worship Zon-Kuthon, and most of these Kuthites are
so firmly entrenched in the culture of Nidal that their
Shadow Plane-dwelling kin would hardly recognize
them. Most shadow giants instead practice an ancient
religion, unique to their people, with its own bloody themes
of sacrifice and self-mutilation.
SHADOW GIANT CREATURE 13
LE LARGE GIANT HUMANOID SHADOW
Perception +20; darkvision
Languages Common, Jotun, Shadowtongue
Skills Athletics +27, Intimidation +22, Stealth +21
(+23 to Hide in dim light)
Str +8, Dex +2, Con +5, Int +0, Wis +1, Cha +3
Items +1 resilient breastplate, sack with 5 rocks, +1
striking spiked chain
AC 33; Fort +25, Ref +20, Will +23
HP 275
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Catch Rock[reaction]
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] spiked chain +27 (disarm, reach 10 feet, trip), Damage 3d8+18 slashing plus
pall of shadow
Melee [one-action] fist +26 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+18 bludgeoning plus pall of shadow
Ranged [one-action] rock +26 (brutal, range increment 120 feet), Damage 2d8+18 bludgeoning
Pall of Shadow (divine, necromancy, shadow) When a shadow giant hits with a melee
Strike, the target must succeed at a DC 30 Fortitude save or become
drained 1 and take a –1 status penalty to Perception checks involving
sight as long as they remain drained. On a critical failure, this condition
doesn’t heal naturally and can be removed only with magic.
Shadowcloak [one-action] (divine, illusion, shadow) The shadow giant becomes shrouded in
shadows and becomes concealed. As the nature of this effect leaves the giant’s
location obvious, it can’t use this concealment to Hide or Sneak. This effect lasts for 1
minute or until it is exposed to direct sunlight, whichever comes first.
Throw Rock [one-action]
Bestiary 2
128
CARRION GOLEM COMPONENTS
The decaying body parts that make
up a carrion golem are of little
value in most cultures. However,
the magic used to preserve them
and infuse them with disease can
still be harnessed by unscrupulous
necromancers and other practitioners
of foul arts. Such creatures may
be willing to purchase a destroyed
carrion golem, but the processes
used to extract the power within the
pieces are difficult and inefficient, so
they won’t pay much.
Golems
The shape and structure of a golem are limited only by the power and creativity
of its crafter. Over the ages, skilled minds and hands have refined the formulas
for creating specific types of golems, resulting in the development of common
forms. The secrets of creating the types of golems presented here may be
guarded within the halls of famous golemworks or the forgotten libraries of
many worlds.
GOLEM ANTIMAGIC
A golem is immune to spells and magical abilities other than its own, but each
type of golem is affected by a few types of magic in special ways. These exceptions
are listed in shortened form in the golem’s stat block, with the full rules appearing
here. If an entry lists multiple types (such as “cold and water”), either type of spell
can affect the golem.
• Harmed By Any magic of this type that targets the golem causes it to take the
listed amount of damage (this damage has no type) instead of the usual effect. If the
golem starts its turn in an area of magic of this type or is affected by a persistent
effect of the appropriate type, it takes the damage listed in the parenthetical.
• Healed By Any magic of this type that targets the golem makes the golem lose the
slowed condition and gain Hit Points equal to half the damage the spell would have
dealt. If the golem starts its turn in an area of this type of magic, it gains the Hit
Points listed in the parenthetical.
• Slowed By Any magic of this type that targets the golem causes it to be slowed 1
for 2d6 rounds instead of the usual effect. If the golem starts its turn in an area of
this type of magic, it’s slowed 1 for that round.
• Vulnerable To Each golem is vulnerable to one or more specific spells, with the
effects described in its stat block.
CARRION GOLEM
Carrion golems are foul-smelling and flyswarmed amalgams of putrefied parts
stitched together from many different
creatures. Unlike most golems, carrion
golems only rarely are given a humanoid
form, instead appearing more twisted and
bestial in frame. As a result, some students of
golem crafting claim that the carrion golem isn’t
a “true golem,” but regardless of those claims these
foul constructs certainly share other golem-like traits,
including their significant immunities. What is true is
that most who craft carrion golems don’t do so out
of true interest in the technique of golem crafting, but
for the golem’s ability to spread disease. The crafters
of carrion golems send their mindless minions to cause
immediate destruction and leave wakes of illness and
death behind them.
CARRION GOLEM CREATURE 4
UNCOMMON N MEDIUM CONSTRUCT GOLEM MINDLESS
Perception +6; darkvision
Skills Athletics +14
Str +4, Dex –2, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 19; Fort +13, Ref +8, Will +10
HP 60; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease,
doomed, drained, electricity, fatigued,
healing, magic (see Golem
Antimagic below), mental, 
E-G
129
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ICE GOLEM COMPONENTS
When destroyed, the magic
sustaining an ice golem’s form
quickly dissipates. Unless it is in a
freezing environment, the golem’s
shattered remains soon melt
completely away. Still, the animating
magic can linger in shards of ice
that resist melting; these may fetch
a good price from wealthy folk to
preserve foods or chill beverages.
Pieces of ice that are captured and
magically preserved or allowed to
melt in sealed containers can also be
sold to scholars who may be able to
divine arcane secrets from the once
magically animated materials.
necromancy, nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison, sickened, unconscious; Resistances
physical 5 (except adamantine or slashing)
Golem Antimagic harmed by fire (4d6, 1d8 from areas or persistent damage); healed by
electricity (area 1d6 HP); slowed by cold
Stench (aura, olfactory) 40 feet. A creature entering the aura or starting its turn in the
aura must succeed at a DC 19 Fortitude save or become sickened 1 (plus slowed 1 for as
long as it’s sickened on a critical failure). While within the aura, affected creatures take
a –2 circumstance penalty to saves against disease and to recover from the sickened
condition. A creature that succeeds at its save is temporarily immune for 1 minute.
Vulnerable to Gentle Repose Casting a gentle repose spell on a carrion golem causes it
to grow stiff. The golem attempts a DC 19 Fortitude save. It’s unaffected on a critical
success, slowed 1 for 1d4 rounds on a success, and on a failure is immobilized and
slowed for 1d4 rounds.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +14 (magical), Damage 2d10+4 piercing plus filth fever
Melee [one-action] claw +14 (agile, magical), Damage 2d6+4 slashing plus filth fever
Filth Fever (disease) The sickened and unconscious conditions from filth fever can’t
end or be reduced until the disease is cured; Saving Throw DC 19 Fortitude; Stage 1
carrier with no ill effect (1d4 hours); Stage 2 sickened 1 (1 day); Stage 3 sickened 1
and slowed 1 as long as it remains sickened (1 day); Stage 4 unconscious (1 day);
Stage 5 dead
ICE GOLEM
Ice golems are either carved from massive blocks of ice, or pieced together from
individual components that are then fused together through heat and refreezing.
In most cases, the resulting shape is little more than a crude approximation of a
humanoid form, but given the right talent, an ice golem could be an exquisitely
carved statue of a mythical creature, famous persona, or even a deity.
While ice golems most frequently serve as guardians in freezing climates,
the magic that holds an ice golem together keeps it from melting in warmer
temperatures. This, combined with the fact that ice golems lie on the lower
end of the scale as far as cost and difficulty to create, gives these constructs
unusual features that puts them in great demand. The rich and powerful
in hot, arid regions often commission ice golems not only as guardians
for their estates and vaults, but for comfort—the presence of an ice golem
standing quietly sentinel in the corner of a room can help to keep the
chamber at a comfortable temperature. The truly decadent use ice
golems as servants to keep drinks cold.
ICE GOLEM CREATURE 5
UNCOMMON N MEDIUM COLD CONSTRUCT GOLEM MINDLESS
Perception +9; darkvision
Skills Athletics +15
Str +5, Dex +0, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 21; Fort +15, Ref +11, Will +9
HP 80; Immunities bleed, cold, death effects, disease, doomed,
drained, electricity, fatigued, healing, magic (see Golem
Antimagic below), mental, necromancy, nonlethal attacks,
paralyzed, poison, sickened, unconscious; Resistances physical
5 (except adamantine and bludgeoning)
Golem Antimagic harmed by fire (4d6, 1d10 from areas or persistent
damage); healed by cold (area 1d6 HP); slowed by water
Icy Demise (arcane, cold, evocation) When an ice golem
is destroyed, its body explodes in a blast of frigid air
and razor-sharp ice, dealing 2d6 slashing damage
and 2d6 cold damage to creatures in a 20-foot
emanation, with a DC 19 basic Reflex save.
Bestiary 2
130
WOOD GOLEM COMPONENTS
Unless they are badly damaged by
magical fire, the rare woods and
exquisitely carved blocks used to
craft a wood golem retain much
of their value after the golem’s
destruction. Carpenters, sculptors,
and even some merchants will pay
a fair price for the remains of a
defeated wood golem. However, if
the golem belonged to a rich and
powerful person and its fragments
are thus recognizable, it may be more
difficult to find willing buyers.
Vulnerable to Endure Elements An ice golem can be targeted with endure elements
even if it’s not willing. If it is targeted, for 1 round it can’t use Breath Weapon or
benefit from creeping cold, and its fist attack doesn’t deal cold damage.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +15 (magical, versatile P), Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning plus 1d6 cold
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (arcane, cold, evocation) The ice golem exhales a blast of freezing
mist that deals 6d6 cold damage in a 30-foot cone (DC 22 basic Reflex save). It can’t
use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Creeping Cold (arcane, cold, evocation) When the ice golem gets a critical hit with a fist
Strike, the target also takes 2d6 persistent cold damage and is slowed 1 for 1 round.
WOOD GOLEM
Wood golems are often given vaguely humanoid shapes, almost as if cobbled
together from scraps of firewood and discarded burls. It’s less common for
wood golems to have artistic embellishments such as engraved patterns, or to
be carved in the shapes of different types of creatures to meet the tastes of their
owners. While wealthy patrons have been known to commission wood golems
to be painstakingly carved to resemble themselves or their ancestors, to serve
dual purposes of protection and ego bolstering, most wood golem crafters don’t
bother. Druids and creatures who protect woodlands, such as arboreals, typically
see wood golems as an affront or an abomination, akin to the horror humanoids
often feel when facing a carrion or flesh golem. As a result, it is rare to see such
creatures serving as guardians for fey or druidic holy sites, despite the thematic
match between the wood golem’s appearance and such locations.
WOOD GOLEM CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON N MEDIUM CONSTRUCT GOLEM MINDLESS
Perception +12; darkvision
Skills Athletics +17
Str +5, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 23; Fort +15, Ref +16, Will +12
HP 95; Immunities bleed, death effects,
disease, doomed, drained, fatigued, healing,
magic (see Golem Antimagic below), mental,
necromancy, nonlethal attacks, paralyzed,
poison, sickened, unconscious; Resistances
physical 5 (except adamantine)
Golem Antimagic harmed by fire (4d8, 2d6 from
areas or persistent damage); healed by plant
(area 2d6 HP); slowed by earth
Vulnerable to Shape Wood A wood golem targeted by
shape wood takes 2d8 damage per spell level, with
a basic Fortitude save against the caster’s spell
DC. On a critical failure, the golem is also
immobilized for 1d4 rounds.
Splinter [reaction] (arcane, transmutation) Trigger
The wood golem takes physical damage;
Effect A jagged, sizable splinter of
wood lances out at the golem’s
attacker. The golem makes a
splinter Strike against an
adjacent creature without
triggering reactions.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +17
(magical), Damage 2d8+8
bludgeoning
E-G
131
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
GLASS GOLEM COMPONENTS
The destruction of a glass golem
often leaves nothing behind but a
pile of tiny shards of crystal and lead.
However, if larger pieces survive, the
crystal can be sold to glass merchants
or skilled crafters who can turn them
into glittering works of art.
Ranged [one-action] splinter +16 (magical, range increment 30 feet), Damage 2d4+8 piercing
Splinter Volley [two-actions] (arcane, evocation) The wood golem makes up to four splinter
Strikes, each against a different target. These attacks count toward the wood golem’s
multiple attack penalty, but the multiple attack penalty doesn’t increase until after the
wood golem makes all of its attacks.
GLASS GOLEM
Crafted of hardened glass and held together by magically treated lead, glass golems
are both deadly guardians and works of exquisite art. Glass golems most often
protect grand cathedrals or opulent palaces—testaments to the wealth and power
of those they serve, or once served. Once spurred into action by the commands of
their creators, glass golems are quicker and more agile than most other golems.
Their sharp, blade-like limbs can easily sever veins and arteries, creating wounds
that bleed profusely.
Of all the various types of golems, the glass golem is the one most akin to a
work of art. Just as powerful aristocrats might use an ice golem for temperature
regulation or a wood golem as an ego-boosting statue, a glass golem’s colorful
glass construction can elevate the beauty of any chamber by its mere presence.
GLASS GOLEM CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON N LARGE CONSTRUCT GOLEM MINDLESS
Perception +14; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +16, Athletics +19, Stealth +14
Str +5, Dex +4, Con +5, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 26; Fort +17, Ref +16, Will +14
HP 135; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease, doomed, drained, fatigued,
healing, magic (see Golem Antimagic below), mental, necromancy,
nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison, sickened, unconscious;
Resistances physical 10 (except adamantine or bludgeoning)
Golem Antimagic harmed by sonic (6d6, 2d6 from areas or
persistent damage); healed by fire (area 2d6 HP); slowed
by cold
Vulnerable to Shatter A glass golem is affected by
the shatter spell as though the golem were an
unattended object.
Spell Reflection [reaction] (abjuration, arcane) Trigger
The glass golem is targeted by a spell; Effect
The glass golem positions its magical, reflective
surfaces to turn the spell back on the caster. It
tries to counteract the spell by attempting an
Acrobatics check for its counteract check. If it
successfully counteract the spell, the effect is
turned back on the caster.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] bladed limb +20 (agile, magical,
versatile P), Damage 2d6+8 slashing plus
1d6 bleed
Dazzling Brilliance[two-actions] (evocation, light, visual) The glass golem creates waves of
scintillating luminosity that cast bright light in a 60-foot emanation (and dim
light for the next 60 feet). The light lasts until the start of the glass golem’s
next turn, after which the glass golem can’t use Dazzling Brilliance for 1d4 rounds. A
creature within the bright light or that enters the bright light must attempt a DC 23
Will save.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is dazzled for 1 round.
Critical Failure The creature is blinded for 1 round and then dazzled for an additional
4 rounds.
Bestiary 2
132
ILL-ADVISED TRAININGS
While many have tried to train
gorgons as mounts or beasts of war,
the combination of their notoriously
short tempers and the difficulty
in containing the effects of their
petrifying breath make this a difficult
task. In most cases, those who
attempt to domesticate gorgons
end up creating untamed gorgon
breeding grounds.
Gorgon
Though they may resemble constructs to the untrained eye due to their metallic,
interlocking armor plates that look and feel like polished stone, gorgons are a
creature of flesh and bone. These ill-tempered beasts greet interlopers with a
charge or trample accompanied with belches of petrifying breath. Gorgons are
dangerous on their own, and when they band together in herds, they become
especially deadly.
Gorgons typically subsist on petrified flesh or fossils. These supernatural
beasts can gain sustenance from natural stone if they must, though they find
raw stone flavorless, so it’s not a preferred food source. In battle, gorgons
use their petrifying breath to turn their prey into stone. They break up the
resulting statues with their hooves or horns and swallow the stony chunks
with loud chewing bites. Gorgons cannot digest unpetrified organic material,
and if they try, they experience sickness and great gastrointestinal peril. Such
discomforts are not life threatening to gorgons, but they do make the creatures
even more ill tempered than usual—much to the chagrin of anyone they
subsequently encounter.
Gorgon flesh tastes vaguely like beef, but with a gritty, earthy texture and
aftertaste that most meat connoisseurs find off-putting. Creatures with a close
association to earth and stone are more likely to find the flavor appetizing;
stone giants in particular consider gorgon steaks to be
delicacies. Some cultures, notably dwarven cultures,
consider the preparation of gorgon for meals as both a
physical and a culinary challenge. Chefs who work with
gorgon flesh can find renown for their skill in creating
palatable dishes from such naturally unpalatable meat.
GORGON CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON N LARGE BEAST
Perception +19; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +19
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +6, Int –4, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 28; Fort +18, Ref +13, Will +17
HP 135; Immunities petrification
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] horn +20, Damage 2d12+10 piercing
Melee [one-action] hoof +18, Damage 2d6+10 bludgeoning
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (earth, incapacitation, primal,
transmutation) The gorgon breathes a 60-foot cone of
green gas. Each creature in the area must attempt
a DC 25 Fortitude save. The gorgon
can’t use Breath Weapon again
for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature
is unaffected.
Success The creature’s body
hardens and stiffens,
causing it to become
slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature becomes
petrified for 1 minute. It can attempt a new save at the end
of each of its turns.
Critical Failure The creature becomes petrified permanently.
Powerful Charge[two-actions] The gorgon Strides twice, then makes a horn
Strike. If it moved at least 20 feet from its starting position, the
Strike’s damage is increased to 3d12+12.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, hoof, DC 26
E-G
133
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DOMINION PLOTS
While Golarion largely survived
the events of the Doomsday Dawn,
the threat of the Dominion of the
Black is far from over. This alien
conglomerate recognizes that it
needs to understand the vastness
of humanoids in the universe to
better enact their plans, and certain
nihilistic scholars suggest that the
Doomsday Dawn was never intended
to end the world, but instead served
its primary goal of setting the
stage for an even more devastating
invasion from the Dominion in the
near future.
Gosreg
Gosregs are agents of the Dominion of the Black that insinuate themselves into
humanoid societies to foster the goals of their sinister alien masters. They act as
spies and special forces that can mingle with humanoid society while enacting
plans for the rest of the Dominion in secret.
In their natural forms, gosregs dart about in a jerky gallop due to their stumpy
legs and gangly arms. They take on the appearances of humanoids to infiltrate
societies, and they drop their disguises only when they feel they are ultimately
compromised and must resort to physical violence to protect their agendas. Their
brain-like heads and bestial legs suggest a potential link with a similar Dominion of
the Black agent: the dreaded intellect devourer.
GOSREG CREATURE 11
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM ABERRATION
Perception +21; darkvision, thoughtsense
60 feet
Languages Aklo, Common, Undercommon;
telepathy 100 feet
Skills Deception +24, Diplomacy +22,
Occultism +23, Society +19, Stealth +23
Str +3, Dex +6, Con +3, Int +6, Wis +5, Cha +7
Thoughtsense (divination, mental, occult) The
gosreg senses a creature’s mental essence as
a precise sense with the listed range; it cannot
sense mindless creatures with thoughtsense.
AC 31; Fort +18, Ref +23, Will +22; +1 status to all
saves vs. magic
HP 195; Immunities confused; Resistances mental 10
Unsettled Aura (aura, mental, occult) 30 feet. Gosregs project a
field of discordant energy that unsettles the minds of thinking
creatures. Any non-mindless creature within 30 feet of a gosreg
takes a –1 status penalty to Will saves.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +21 (finesse), Damage 2d10+7 piercing plus 1d10 mental
Melee [one-action] claw +21 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d8+7 slashing
Occult Innate Spells DC 30, attack +22; 6th phantasmal calamity,
phantom pain; 5th mind probe, sending, subconscious
suggestion, synaptic pulse; 4th nightmare, suggestion
(×3); 2nd undetectable alignment; Cantrips (6th)
mage hand, telekinetic projectile
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, occult, polymorph,
transmutation) The gosreg takes on the
appearance of any Small or Medium humanoid.
This doesn’t change its Speed or its attack
and damage modifiers with its Strikes, but
it might change the damage type its Strikes
deal (typically to bludgeoning).
Mind Bolt [two-actions] (illusion, mental, occult)
A gosreg concentrates its field of
discordant mental energy and projects
it into the mind of an enemy within
60 feet. The target takes 6d6
mental damage (DC 30
basic Will save). On
a critical failure,
the creature is also
confused for 1d4 rounds.
Bestiary 2
134
GREMLIN MINIONS
Most know better than to employ
gremlins, so when the fey creatures
live side‑by‑side with others, it’s often
as parasites and unwelcome guests.
Imaginative and sinister folk who find
themselves infested sometimes catch
the gremlins and release them in the
homes of their enemies.
Gremlin
The mischievous fey known as gremlins seem to come in endless varieties with
differing appearances. Preferring to destroy rather than to build, gremlins almost
never construct their own homes, instead infesting tunnels and abandoned buildings.
They augment these lairs with cruel traps, and sometimes trained animals (often
ones considered pests by humanoids). Gremlin lairs are generally near a city or
village (whether on the surface or in the Darklands) that provides them with a ready
source of food, trap-building materials, and, of course, victims for entertainment.
There is little difference in appearance between male and female gremlins, and
many observers wrongly assume that they are single-gender or genderless. Gremlins
are prolific breeders, and a handful can quickly become a mob. Young gremlins are
raised communally—a necessity, as they exhibit the urge to cause mischief from
birth. They grow quickly and reach full size in a matter of weeks.
VEXGIT
These gremlins are covered head-to-toe by a crustacean-like exoskeleton that
clacks and rattles whenever a vexgit moves. They delight in sabotaging the
works of other creatures, often turning these works into dangerous traps. An
individual vexgit might jam a door lock, loosen the wheels on a carriage, or
remove nails from a boat hull. Buildings infested by vexgits become filled
with traps like portcullises descending suddenly, water pipes exploding
violently, and clock towers disgorging an avalanches of gears.
Aware of their own physical weakness, vexgits carry hammers and
other tools to leverage pieces apart or smash whatever they’re unable
to disassemble. Indeed, a hammer sized for a human becomes a
maul in the tiny hands of a vexgit.
Vexgit infestations range from one to a score. Larger
groups are often led by a more powerful vexgit with
additional skill in thievery or primal magic. Trained
giant rats, vipers, and rat swarms are common in
vexgit lairs.
VEXGIT CREATURE 1
LE TINY FEY GREMLIN
Perception +6; darkvision
Languages Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +6, Crafting +6 (+8 traps), Nature +6, Stealth +5 (see
clacking exoskeleton), Thievery +7
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +1, Cha +0
Items maul
Clacking Exoskeleton A creature that can hear gains a +2 circumstance bonus
to its Perception DC against a vexgit’s attempts to Sneak.
AC 16; Fort +5, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 24; Weaknesses cold iron 2
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] maul +8 (shove), Damage 1d12+1 bludgeoning plus
Destructive Smash
Melee [one-action] bite +11 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6+1 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 17; 1st alarm; Cantrips (1st) prestidigitation
Destructive Smash A vexgit’s maul Strike against an object deals
ignores up to 5 of the object’s Hardness.
Gremlin Snare[three-actions] (conjuration, primal) Frequency once per
hour; Effect The vexgit creates a snare of their level or
lower that normally takes 1 minute to craft at no cost.
A single vexgit can maintain one gremlin snare at
a time—if they create a new snare, the previously
created one vanishes.
E-G
135
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
GREMLIN FAITH
Lawful evil gremlins are sometimes
drawn to the worship of archdevils,
though not in an orthodox fashion.
Dispater is revered as the archdevil
of cities—playgrounds to engage in
thievery and sabotage. Mammon is
worshipped as the bringer of wealth
and protector of gremlin warrens
that, like his domain of Erebus,
are dark and trap‑filled. Neutral
evil gremlins have been known to
worship Norgorber in his aspect as a
patron of thieves, but pugwampis in
particular prefer to worship gnolls (or
at least, worship whoever the local
gnolls worship). Chaotic evil gremlins
often revere Andirifkhu, demon lord
of illusions, knives, and traps. Those
that retain a connection to the First
World may swear allegiance to the
Lantern King, Eldest of laughter,
mischief, and transmutation.
Rusting Grasp[two-actions] (primal, transmutation) Frequency once per hour; Effect The vexgit
makes a +9 spell attack against a creature or unattended object. If they succeed,
the vexgit deals 1d6 damage (doubled on a critical hit) to a metal item the target is
wearing or holding, ignoring its Hardness. If they hit an unattended metal item, the
item takes this damage automatically. If a creature uses Shield Block with a metal
shield against this attack, the shield is automatically broken, but no other item is
rusted on that attack.
Speedy Sabotage When a vexgit succeeds or critically succeeds at a check to Disable a
Device, they gain an additional success toward disabling a complex device.
NUGLUB
The “towering” hunchbacked nuglubs are among the largest gremlins, though
they’re not quite three feet tall. Nuglubs have three glowing blue eyes and black,
oily hair on their head and back that covers them like a cloak. Nuglubs enjoy
killing with a glee that other gremlins reserve for sabotage. Indeed, they spend
long hours preparing ambushes for unwary travelers or plotting the murders of
sleeping villagers. Though less technically inclined than their kin, nuglubs do enjoy
building traps. They delight in stealthily constructing traps in places their victims
consider familiar, such as front doors and the floors around beds. If someone else
gets blamed for the mayhem the nuglub creates, all the better.
In combat, nuglubs focus on targets wearing metal armor. Some attribute this to
envy on the part of the nuglubs, who find it difficult to fit armor on their twisted
bodies. Nuglubs are particularly talented at causing those nearby to stumble over
them and fall prone. Once an enemy falls to the ground, all the nuglubs descend
upon the target, biting and scratching until nothing remains.
Nuglubs rarely gather in groups larger than half a dozen, as quarrels often lead to
violence and cannibalism. A lone nuglub who bullies a group of smaller gremlins is
more likely to get their way, and thus less likely to attack their allies.
NUGLUB CREATURE 2
CE SMALL FEY GREMLIN
Perception +5; darkvision
Languages Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +8, Crafting +5 (+7 traps), Intimidation +7, Stealth +8
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –1, Wis –1, Cha +1
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +10, Will +5
HP 34; Weaknesses cold iron 2
Kneecapper[reaction]Trigger A Medium
creature within the nuglub’s
reach leaves a square during its
move action; Effect The nuglub lashes
out at the triggering creature’s knees and
tries to knock them prone. The nuglub makes
an Acrobatics check against the creature’s Reflex
DC. On a success, the target falls and lands prone.
Speed 30 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +11 (finesse), Damage 1d8+1 piercing
plus Grab
Melee[one-action] claw +11 (agile, finesse), Damage
1d6+1 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 18, attack
+8; 2nd shatter; 1st grease,
shocking grasp; Cantrips (1st)
prestidigitation
Sneak Attack A nuglub’s Strikes deal
an additional 1d6 precision damage to
flat‑footed targets, or 1d10 if the target is prone.
Bestiary 2
136
GRENDEL’S MOTHER
At the bottom of a remote mountain
lake filled with sea serpents is a
magical house—the lair of Grendel’s
mother. Among her many treasures is
a sword so big and heavy that only a
supernaturally strong individual can
wield it. When Grendel is injured, he
retreats here to heal.
Grendel
This reaver of the cold marsh is not just a monster; he is a force of nature. Where there
is peace and prosperity in the world, Grendel strikes, eager to prove that tranquility
is transitory and death is the only constant. He stalks the edge of his fens, seeking
settlements where joy holds sway. He strikes under cover of night, primarily targeting
celebrations or festivals. The more happiness or joy he can extinguish, the better.
Although Grendel is a unique creature, killing him won’t save the world from his
ravages for long. Once Grendel’s mother instinctively feels the pain of her violent
son’s death, she soon births a replacement. The new Grendel seems to avoid the
sites his elder brothers terrorized, as if he instinctively knows that such a place hosts
heroes powerful enough to defeat him.
GRENDEL CREATURE 19
UNIQUE CE LARGE HUMANOID
Perception +35; darkvision, keen hearing 120 feet
Languages Common
Skills Acrobatics +34, Athletics +39, Intimidation +34, Stealth +34, Survival +33
Str +10, Dex +5, Con +7, Int +0, Wis +6, Cha +5
Keen Hearing Grendel’s hearing is a precise sense to a range of 120 feet.
AC 44; Fort +36, Ref +32, Will +31
HP 360; Resistances all 15 (except unarmed attacks)
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 60 feet, DC 38.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Grendel gains an extra reaction at the start of each of
his turns that he can use only to make an Attack of Opportunity with his
claw. He can’t use more than one Attack of Opportunity triggered by the
same action.
Ferocity[reaction]
Unstoppable[reaction] Trigger Grendel would take persistent damage or gain one of
the following conditions: blinded, clumsy, confused, controlled, dazzled,
deafened, doomed, drained, enfeebled, fascinated, fatigued, fleeing,
frightened, paralyzed, petrified, sickened, slowed, stunned, or
stupefied; Effect The persistent damage or condition from
the triggering effect doesn’t affect Grendel.
Speed 40 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +37 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet),
Damage 4d8+18 bludgeoning plus Improved Grab
Melee[one-action] jaws +37 (magical, reach 10 feet, versatile B),
Damage 4d10+18 piercing
Ranged [one-action] rock +37 (brutal, range increment
150 feet), Damage 2d12+18 bludgeoning
Hands of the Murderer Grendel’s fist Strikes
deal 18 bludgeoning damage on a failure
(but no damage on a critical failure).
Tooth Grind [one-action] Requirements Grendel
is grabbing a creature; Effect Grendel
makes a bludgeoning jaws Strike against
the creature he’s grabbing. On a hit, the
creature also takes 2d6 persistent bleed damage
and becomes wounded 1, or increases its wounded
value by 1 if already wounded. On a critical hit,
the creature instead becomes wounded 2, or
increases its wounded value by 2 if already
wounded. If a creature dies from
Tooth Grind, Grendel
regains 40 HP; this
is a healing effect.
Throw Rock [one-action]
E-G
137
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
GRIMSTALKER FORESTRY
Grimstalkers often harvest the seeds
of carnivorous plants, particularly
assassin vines, which they sow
during their wanderings. Typically
they seed their territory’s borders
with these dangerous plants as a
defense tactic, but they also sow
gardens and fields, weaponizing
these plots of land against hapless
gardeners and farmers.
Grimstalker
These violently murderous fey have one purpose: to stealthily hunt down and
slay humanoids brazen enough to dare set foot in the wilderness. Though they
prefer to hunt from the shadows, grimstalkers do not fear taking their grisly work
to the very edges of civilization. This boldness serves as a reminder that nature
can be cruel, capricious, and owes no debt to humanity. Grimstalkers are happy
to perform nature’s dirty work and particularly enjoy targeting loggers, hunters,
and explorers, regardless of whether they respect the natural setting they work or
travel within.
Grimstalkers are gaunt and hairless, and their mottled, green and brown flesh
gives them the appearance of moss-draped bark. When damaged, they bleed a
thick, sap-like blood. They mark their territories by lopping off the heads of
their victims and stringing them up in the surrounding trees, a practice that
often lures dangerous scavengers into their lands. Carnivorous and thorny
plants are often found in wilds where grimstalkers dwell, filling roles that
pets might in human society, though grimstalkers tend to treat these “pets”
poorly at best.
There are few accounts of grimstalkers working with other fey—for the
most part, grimstalkers see their kin from the First World as cowards or
weaklings, or perhaps both. Even notoriously violent fey such as redcaps
shy from them, as grimstalkers consider their own kind the only company
worth keeping.
Grimstalkers hunt in small bands, using stealth to approach their targets.
They surround enemies first, then work to unnerve them by knocking on
trees or howling out threats in Aklo to distract and panic their quarry.
Of course, a band of grimstalkers won’t stay together for long, quickly
succumbing to bickering and infighting. These violent arguments
are common pastimes among grimstalkers, often ending with each
grimstalker going its own way. Not even the presence of more
powerful fey or commanding creatures can keep grimstalkers
from their predisposed bickering. Some scholars theorize that
this quality speaks to an ancient curse that once afflicted fey
who were judged too cantankerous, but in truth, it’s just
part of what makes a grimstalker what it is: ill-tempered,
confrontational, and bitter.
GRIMSTALKER CREATURE 5
CE MEDIUM FEY
Perception +12; low‑light vision
Languages Aklo, Common
Skills Acrobatics +13, Intimidation +13, Nature +11,
Stealth +13, Survival +12
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +3, Cha +2
Camouflage A grimstalker can Hide in natural environments, even if it doesn’t
have cover.
AC 22; Fort +9, Ref +15, Will +12
HP 60; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Speed 40 feet, climb 20 feet; woodland stride
Melee [one-action] claw +15 (agile), Damage 2d6+7 slashing plus grimstalker sap
Primal Innate Spells DC 22, attack +14; 3rd earthbind, wall of thorns; 2nd entangle, pass
without trace, tree shape; Cantrips (3rd) tanglefoot
Grimstalker Sap (poison); Saving Throw DC 22 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds;
Stage 1 1d6 poison damage (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and clumsy 1
(1 round), Stage 3 2d6 poison damage and clumsy 2 (1 round)
Woodland Stride A grimstalker can always find a path, almost as if foliage parts before
it. A grimstalker ignores difficult terrain caused by plants, such as bushes, vines, and
undergrowth. Even plants manipulated by magic don’t impede its progress.
Bestiary 2
138
GIANT GRINDYLOWS
While most grindylows are Small, a
minute percentage of these creatures
keep growing throughout their lives.
Those that become Large or larger
gain the giant trait and often become
champions of their schools.
Grindylow
The top half of a grindylow looks vaguely like that of a goblin, but from the waist
down, their bodies split into a tangle of suckered, wriggling tentacles. They dwell
mostly in shallow waters both fresh and briny, including lakes, rivers, coastal
regions, and near coral reefs. Grindylows generally organize into schools ranging
from a few individuals to a few hundred. Smaller schools can sometimes be
brought under the leadership of a powerful aquatic creature, though such alliances
last only until the school faces a major setback, at which point the surviving
grindylows scatter and form smaller schools of their own.
Grindylows aren’t territorial, but they are pragmatic; while they rarely build
permanent structures, they will adopt a good hunting ground for generations until
driven away by predators. They often lair in mobile shelters, such as a sargasso of
seaweed or the hull of an abandoned ship. They are skilled scavengers and hunters
that eat anything they can sink their teeth into.
Grindylows respect the power of bigger sea predators but have a special hatred
for squids (or anything they believe looks like a squid). Sailors plying grindylowinfested waters often paint the images of squids on the bottoms of their hulls in
hopes of warding the little terrors off. While this can keep smaller schools at bay,
it can also backfire, potentially inciting larger groups to gather for a coordinated
attack; this becomes especially more likely if the ship’s route becomes predictable.
This hatred of squids does not extend to
other tentacled creatures; grindylows
consider octopuses to be the
epitome of grace and power.
GRINDYLOW CREATURE 0
CE SMALL ABERRATION AMPHIBIOUS
Perception +5; darkvision
Languages Aquan
Skills Athletics +5, Stealth +7, Survival +5
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +2, Int –1, Wis +3, Cha +0
Items spear
AC 15; Fort +6, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 14
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] A grindylow gains
1 extra reaction at the start of each of its
turns that it can use only to make an Attack
of Opportunity with a tentacle. It can’t use more than one
Attack of Opportunity triggered by the same choice.
Speed 10 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +7 (finesse), Damage 1d6+1 piercing
Melee [one-action] tentacle +7 (agile, finesse, trip), Damage 1d4+1
bludgeoning plus Grab
Melee [one-action] spear +5, Damage 1d6+1 piercing
Ranged [one-action] spear +7 (thrown 20 feet), Damage 1d6+1
piercing
Clinging Suckers When a grindylow Grabs a
creature larger than itself, it attaches to
that creature. The grabbed creature is not
immobilized, but if it moves, the grindylow
moves with it. If the creature is Medium or
smaller, it takes a –5‑foot status penalty
to its Speeds while the grindylow is
attached. The grindylow is flat‑footed
while it is attached to a creature.
Jet [two-actions] (move) The grindylow moves up to 60 feet in a straight
line through the water without triggering reactions.
E-G
139
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
A HISTORY OF NEUTRALITY
Grippli villages rarely get involved in
the concerns of other communities,
preferring to focus on maintaining
relative peace within their own
small societies. Legends explain
this attitude with a tale of a grippli
champion who dragged his people
into a war between humans and
charau‑kas. The stories differ as to
which side the gripplis took, but every
version ends with the bloody deaths
of the hero and his family. Since that
time, village elders claim, gripplis have
done their best to remain far from the
conflicts of others.
Grippli
Gripplis make their homes in the treetops of tropical jungles and forests. These
frog-like humanoids are uniquely adapted to their environment, with oversized
eyes that give them keen vision in both light and dark and large toes that allow
them to easily scale trees. Gripplis vary widely in physical appearance, with
their physiologies influenced by their surrounding environment. Those who live
in verdant forests, for example, typically have bright green skin and red eyes.
In contrast, gripplis who live in regions of rot and decay have mottled-brown
coloration, and those who dwell near lakes or streams may bear bright blue and
orange stripes. Typical gripplis stand just over 2 feet tall and weigh approximately
30 pounds.
Whatever region they come from, gripplis tend to be peaceful hunter-gatherers.
Due to their modest understanding of agriculture, gripplis don’t maintain typical
farms like other humanoids do. Rather, they cultivate mushroom patches and
gather a wide array of fruits from the surrounding wilderness. While most gripplis
hunt insects, some societies also capture and breed them, nurturing herds of
giant dragonflies or beetles that they eventually slaughter for food. Particularly
enterprising gripplis might even seek out and tame larger
flying insects to use as mounts during their hunts. The
rearing of such massive insects is no easy feat, however,
so gripplis who manage to do so are often heralded as
local heroes.
Gripplis usually construct their villages in particularly
dense copses, stringing thin rope bridges between wide wooden
platforms built around each trunk. They make use of broad
leaves and thick branches to further obscure their villages,
making them especially difficult to spot from the forest floor,
and riddle the surrounding forest with labyrinthine trails that
only they can navigate.
Grippli scouts typically keep watch on the outskirts
of grippli settlements. More potent gripplis inhabit the
settlements, be they religious leaders, powerful druids, or
agile warriors that, due to their small size, focus more on
finesse weapons and ranged attacks than on melee tactics.
GRIPPLI SCOUT CREATURE 1
N SMALL GRIPPLI HUMANOID
Perception +8; darkvision
Languages Common, Grippli
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +4, Nature +6,
Stealth +7 (+9 in forests), Survival +6
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha –1
Items dart (5), leather armor, net, sickle
AC 18; Fort +7, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 20
Speed 25 feet, climb 20 feet; jungle stride
Melee [one-action] sickle +9 (agile, finesse, trip), Damage
1d4+1 slashing
Ranged [one-action] dart +9 (agile, thrown 20 feet), Damage
1d4+1 piercing
Hurl Net [one-action] Requirements The grippli is wielding a net in two hands; Effect The grippli
makes a ranged Strike (with a +9 modifier) against a Medium or smaller creature
within 20 feet. On a hit, the target is flat‑footed and takes a –10‑foot circumstance
penalty to its Speeds. On a critical hit, the creature is restrained instead. The DC to
Escape the net is 16. A creature adjacent to the target can Interact with the net to
remove it.
Jungle Stride Gripplis ignore difficult terrain in forests and jungles.
Bestiary 2
140
GRODAIR TREASURE
Amid the vile, rubbery entrails of
an exploded grodair is a bizarre
cluster of tubular organs about the
size of a melon that serves as its
extradimensional water storage.
Harvesting the organ cluster
takes 5 minutes and a successful
DC 22 Survival check. For the next
2d6 hours, the cluster can then be
used produce either the “stream” or
the “fountain” effect of a decanter of
endless water (Core Rulebook 573).
On a critical failure to harvest the
organ cluster, it bursts and deals 2d6
bludgeoning damage to the harvester.
Grodair
Grodairs are bizarre fishlike creature native to the First World. Their supernatural
physiology includes a strange organ with an extradimensional space capable of
storing thousands of gallons of water. This grants grodairs the ability to create
a suitable environment for themselves anywhere by releasing the water, quickly
transforming any surrounding land into a shallow bog. When grodairs wish
to leave for a new location, they simply suck up all the water back up. When
necessary, grodairs can also travel on land by walking upon the tangle of long,
fleshy tentacles that dangle from their bellies.
Grodairs have two sets of eyes that function independently. While this makes
the creatures difficult to surprise, it also makes them easy to distract. During
conversations, they have a tendency to lose focus quickly and have difficulty
remembering things. Still, they are avid conversationalists and enjoy hearing
tales about the world. While this quality makes grodairs quite likable, they
aren’t reliable. They have difficulty following plans or schedules, and they can
keep a secret only if they happen to forget it first. For these reasons, grodairs
don’t always make the best allies.
Grodairs are voracious and curious omnivores who love trying new foods—in
fact, the pursuit of new and interesting food is the most common reason that
they venture out of First World. They can also capture and store within their
throats any small animals and plants easily suspended in water, and eject them
for consumption at a later time.
GRODAIR CREATURE 5
CN MEDIUM AMPHIBIOUS BEAST FEY WATER
Perception +13; darkvision
Languages Aquan, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +13, Nature +13, Survival +11
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +1, Wis +2, Cha +2
AC 20; Fort +15, Ref +9, Will +11
HP 88
Death Flood (conjuration, primal, water) When a
grodair dies, its body explodes in a blast of
pressurized water that deals 4d6 bludgeoning
damage to creatures within a 15‑foot
emanation (DC 22 basic Reflex save). A
creature that fails its save is pushed 5 feet
(or 10 feet on a critical failure).
Speed 25 feet, swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +15, Damage 2d8+7 piercing
Melee [one-action] tentacle +15, Damage 1d10+7
bludgeoning plus Knockdown
Ranged [one-action] water jet +13 (range increment
60 feet), Damage 3d6 bludgeoning
plus Push 10 feet
Primal Innate Spells DC 22; 5th control
water
Muddy Field [one-action] (primal, transmutation,
water) The grodair transforms all soil,
sand, or similar sediment in a 10‑foot
emanation into mud for 1 round. This mud is
difficult terrain for creatures other than grodairs.
Organ of Endless Water [one-action] (conjuration, manipulate, primal,
water) The grodair causes water to pour from a magical sac on its
spine, either a stream of water at a rate of 1 gallon per round, or a fountain in a
5‑foot‑long stream at a rate of 5 gallons per round. It can stop the flow of water as
a single action. 
H-K
141
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
CATS AND DOGS
If there’s one thing more certain to
infuriate a hellcat other than to treat
it as a mere animal, that is to compare
it in any way to a hell hound. Hellcats
consider hell hounds little more than
vermin infesting the hellscapes they
call home, and enjoy torturing them
more than any other creature.
Hellcat
Hellcats are devious predators native to the fiery pits of Hell. While the fiendish
creatures appears as skeletal smilodons, their bones smoking with heat and
dripping with boiling blood, they are not undead. They are living hellspawn with
transparent flesh that reveals their burning skeletons. A typical hellcat is 9 feet
long and weighs 1,000 pounds.
Left to their own devices, hellcats spend their time hunting—that is, seeking and
stalking prey just for the thrill of the chase. As fiendish creatures, they do not require
mortal sustenance, but they do devour their prey for the sheer pleasure of inflicting
pain. They are also far more intelligent than most assume, and they resent being
treated as unintelligent animals; those who treat a hellcat as a one may find themself
made into a trophy for its pack, as a hellcat goes to great lengths to coordinate
elaborate revenge upon those who fail to show proper respect.
Though they can’t speak, hellcats know Infernal and can communicate
by telepathy with any creature capable of speech. They rarely say much
except to make whispered threats and to acknowledge the orders of
their diabolic masters.
Hellcats are quick to retreat if they are clearly outmatched or up
against foes they’re unable to reach, but they never forget prey that
escapes them. They often track potential victims and recruit allies,
including other hellcats, to make coordinated attacks or ambushes
against their foes.
HELLCAT CREATURE 7
LE LARGE BEAST FIEND
Perception +16; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +17, Athletics +17, Intimidation +14, Stealth +17,
Survival +14
Languages Infernal (can’t speak any language); telepathy 100 feet
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +1
AC 25; Fort +15, Ref +17, Will +12; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 110; Weaknesses good 5; Resistances fire 10, physical 5
(except silver)
Fade into the Light [reaction] (divine, illusion) Trigger The hellcat begins
its turn in bright light; Effect The hellcat becomes
invisible until its no longer in bright light. If the
hellcat uses a hostile action, the invisibility ends
after that hostile action is completed.
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +18, Damage 2d12+7 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +18 (agile), Damage 2d8+7 slashing
Fearful Attack The hellcat deals an additional 1d6 precision damage to frightened
creatures.
Infernal Mindlink [one-action] (concentrate, divine, divination) The hellcat telepathically link its
senses to all other hellcats within 100 feet for 10 minutes. It loses this contact with
any hellcat that moves out of a 100‑foot radius. While linked to at least one ally, the
hellcat can’t be flanked and gains a +2 status bonus to Will saving throws.
Menacing Growl [two-actions] (auditory, emotion, fear, mental) The hellcat produces a low growl
to disorient and frighten foes. The hellcat can cause this vocalization to originate from
somewhere else within 30 feet. Non‑fiends in a 15‑foot burst must attempt a DC 25
Will save. The hellcat can’t issue another Menacing Growl for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune for 24 hours.
Success The creature is frightened 1.
Failure The creature is frightened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is frightened 4.
Pounce [one-action] The hellcat Strides and makes a Strike at the end of that movement. If the
hellcat began this action hidden, it remains hidden until after the ability’s Strike. 
Bestiary 2
142
AQUATIC CAVALRY
Protecting the harbor of Absalom
and the shores of Starstone Isle,
the elite Wave Riders use combat‑
trained hippocampi as mounts. The
Wave Riders harass enemy ships,
defend against aquatic foes, and
intercept smugglers.
Hippocampus
The strange beasts known as hippocampi resemble terrestrial horses from head
to midbody, but on their legs, they have splayed fins instead of hooves, and in
place of horses’ hindquarters, they have powerful tails resembling those of fish.
Hippocampi have colorful scales ranging from pearly white to seaweed green, and
brilliant ribbed dorsal sails as manes. In the wild oceans, most types of hippocampi
tend to congregate in the shallows near the beds of seaweed and kelp forests that
provide them with food and shelter from predators. They form huge schools to
provide safety in numbers, like land-bound horses form herds.
Hippocampi are highly prized by undersea societies and surface dwellers alike,
as they are as easy to train as horses and serve many of the same functions, be
that as beasts of burden, war-trained mounts, transportation, or as pets. Though
hippocampi are able to wear barding, it hampers them considerably, so most
handlers outfit them with the lightest options available. More often they are
trained to pull specially designed underwater chariots or sleds. Hippocampi
do not to leave the water, as they are clumsy on land, can’t bear riders while
flopping about on the ground, and can’t breathe air for long.
Numerous variant species of hippocampi exist, although most of them
differ from the common hippocampus only in coloration. Heartier species,
such as polar hippocampi, dwell exclusively in arctic waters and are best
presented as hippocampi with elite adjustments.
HIPPOCAMPUS
Hippocampi serve as steeds for aquatic humanoids or roam wild in the sea.
HIPPOCAMPUS CREATURE 1
N LARGE ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +6, darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +4, Athletics +7
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +1
AC 16; Fort +9, Ref +4, Will +6
HP 24
Buck [reaction] DC 17
Speed 5 feet, swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] tail +7 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d6+4 bludgeoning
Sudden Retreat[two-actions] The hippocampus makes a tail Strike, then Swims
with a +10‑foot circumstance bonus to its swim Speed. It
gains a +2 circumstance bonus to AC against
reactions triggered by this movement.
GIANT HIPPOCAMPUS
Living in the deepest reaches of
the ocean, giant hippocampi haven’t
been sighted near the shore and are often
regarded as legends made up by sailors.
GIANT HIPPOCAMPUS CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON N HUGE ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +16, darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +14, Athletics +20
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +7, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha +1
AC 27; Fort +18, Ref +16, Will +14
HP 170
Buck [reaction] DC 28
Speed 10 feet, swim 80 feet
Melee [one-action] tail +18 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d6+10 bludgeoning
Sudden Retreat[two-actions] As hippocampus.
H-K
143
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
HIPPOGRIFF EGGS
Rather than birthing live young,
hippogriffs lay a clutch consisting of
only a single egg. Hippogriff eggs are
sought after by potential trainers and
opportunists alike.
Hippogriff
With the proud bearing of a great raptor and the magnificence of a powerful
horse, hippogriffs are thought to be an accidental fusion of creatures or perhaps
the creation of a flesh-warping wizard with a keen aesthetic sense. Regardless of
their original source, these animals are now a common sight in the skies above
their favored plains or hill country.
Hippogriffs bear the wings, forelegs, and head of a bird of prey, with feather
coloration similar to that of a hawk or eagle, though some breeders have
managed to produce specimens with stark-white or coal-black feathers. Their
torso, hindquarters, and tail resemble those of a horse and usually are
colored bay, chestnut, or gray, with some coats bearing black, pinto, or
even palomino coloration.
Hippogriffs are similar in size to large horses. Much like their
equine cousins, hippogriffs often have to keep wary eyes on the skies
above them, as both are preferred meals for hungry griffons and
wyverns. Only hippogriffs’ superior speed helps protect them from
these predators.
Hippogriffs are exceptionally territorial and fiercely protect the
lands under their domain. They typically favor sweeping grasslands,
rolling hills, and prairies. Exceptionally hardy hippogriffs make their
homes nestled into niches on canyon walls, from which they comb
the rocky deserts for coyotes, deer, and the occasional humanoid.
Hippogriffs prefer mammalian prey, but they graze after every meal
to aid in digestion.
Since hippogriff hunting habits can be dangerous to both
ranchers and their livestock, such communities often set
bounties on hippogriffs. As a result, preserved hippogriffs
frequently decorate frontier taverns and remote
outposts alongside the taxidermic remains of deer,
elk, and bears.
However, other communities train hippogriffs from
hatching to be ridden by elite soldiers in combat—
the most notable among these groups in the Inner
Sea region is the Sable Company Mercenaries in the citystate of Korvosa. Attempts are sometimes made to train adult
hippogriffs in the same manner, but this often proves far more
difficult. Hippogriff riders must use special saddles and combat
techniques that allow them to act in concert with their mount,
fighting effectively while avoiding interfering with the movement
of their companion’s wings.
HIPPOGRIFF CREATURE 2
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +8; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +7, Survival +6
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +2, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha +0
AC 18; Fort +8, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 32
Buck[reaction] DC 17
Speed 30 feet, fly 65 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +9, Damage 1d10+3 piercing
Melee [one-action] talon +9 (agile), Damage 1d6+3 slashing
Melee [one-action] wing +9 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d6+3 bludgeoning
Flying Strafe [two-actions] The hippogriff Flies up to its fly speed and makes two
talon Strikes at any point during that movement. Each Strike must
target a different creature. The attacks take the normal multiple
attack penalty.
Bestiary 2
144
HIPPO SWEAT
A hippopotamus’s sweat is an
unusual reddish color that can lend
them an even more frightening
appearance that evokes the visage of
a blood‑coated monster. This sweat
helps to protect the hippopotamus
from becoming overheated, but it
also bolsters their resistance to all
manner of diseases.
Hippopotamus
Hippopotamuses, or hippos for short, are semiaquatic animals that spend most of
their time in rivers and lakes, but they also can thrive on land.
HIPPOPOTAMUS
Typical adult hippos move quickly on land and attack stealthily in the water.
Though herbivorous, hippos are notoriously aggressive and territorial.
HIPPOPOTAMUS CREATURE 5
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +11; low‑light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +13, Stealth +11 (+13 in water), Survival +11
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +6, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha –2
Deep Breath The hippopotamus can hold its breath for 5 minutes.
AC 21; Fort +15, Ref +9, Will +11
HP 85
Speed 25 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +15 (deadly d10), Damage 2d8+8 piercing
Melee [one-action] foot +13, Damage 1d10+8 bludgeoning
Aquatic Ambush [one-action] 30 feet
Capsize [one-action] (attack) The hippopotamus tries to capsize an adjacent aquatic vessel of its
size or smaller. The hippopotamus must succeed at an Athletics check with a DC of 25
(reduced by 5 for each size smaller the vessel is than the hippo) or the pilot’s Sailing
Lore DC, whichever is higher.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, foot, DC 23
BEHEMOTH HIPPOPOTAMUS
Behemoth hippopotamuses stand taller than elephants.
They spend less time out of water than their smaller
kin. Behemoth hippos are omnivorous, and many
enjoy the taste of meat.
BEHEMOTH HIPPOPOTAMUS CREATURE 10
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +19; low‑light vision, scent
(imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +23, Stealth +18 (+20 in water),
Survival +17
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +7, Int –4, Wis +5, Cha –2
Deep Breath The behemoth hippopotamus can
hold its breath for 1 hour.
AC 29; Fort +22, Ref +17, Will +19
HP 190
Speed 35 feet, swim 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (deadly d12, reach 10 feet),
Damage 2d12+10 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] foot +21, Damage 2d8+9 bludgeoning
Aquatic Ambush [one-action] 40 feet
Capsize [one-action] (attack) As hippopotamus (DC 30 for a Huge vessel).
Double Chomp [one-action] The behemoth hippo makes a jaws Strike
targeting two creatures adjacent to each other. Roll the attack
and damage once, and apply it to each creature separately.
An Engulfing Chomp counts as two attacks for the
multiple attack penalty.
Swallow Whole [one-action] Medium, 2d12+10 bludgeoning,
Rupture 26.
Trample[three-actions] Large or smaller, foot, DC 29
H-K
145
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
HODAG TALES
Those who’ve encountered hodags
tend to create larger‑than‑life
reports of the sighting. In the
dense Verduran Forest, lumberjacks
working for the Lumber Consortium
regale each other with competing
stories about Big Marna, a legendary
hodag who the loggers claim has
killed two dozen people. Inhabitants
of Echo Wood in the River Kingdoms
spin lore about Black Shiv, a hodag
spotted haunting the outskirts of
small settlements, and in recent
months, hunters and miners in the
southwestern reaches of Ravounel
speak of a frightening undead hodag
called Ghouliegut.
Hodag
Because they are often described only in drunken retellings of loggers’ or miners’
tales, hodags are considered by many to exist only in the local folklore of remote
areas. However, some individuals have actually encountered these dangerous
beasts firsthand, and even fewer have lived to tell their tales.
Hodags are reptilian creatures the size of bulls. These vicious predators’ long
claws can tear creatures apart in seconds. Their backs sport dozens of long spines
that run from their snouts all the way down the length of their powerful tails. Their
wide mouths are full of sharp and twisted rows of teeth not unlike those of a shark.
The hodags’ rough, scaly hides carry hues of green and brown, allowing them to
blend into their forest surroundings where they ambush prey. Only their glowing red
eyes reveal their presence, though hodags have learned to use this to their advantage
by drawing attention to their eyes in one area, then closing their eyes and stealthily
moving to another area to cause their prey to misconstrue their location.
In the wintertime, when snow and ice blankets a region, hodags grow a
foul-smelling coat of greasy, dark-brown fur that sprouts in tufts from between
their scales. A typical hodag measures over 10 feet long from snout to tail and
weighs upward of 700 pounds.
HODAG CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON N LARGE BEAST
Perception +14; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common (can’t speak any language)
Skills Athletics +15, Stealth +14 (+16 in forests), Survival +12
Str +5, Dex +4, Con +5, Int –2, Wis +4, Cha +0
Trackless A hodag sweeps the ground behind it with its tail as it moves, obscuring its
tracks. The DCs of checks to Track a hodag are increased by 10.
AC 24, Fort +17, Ref +14, Will +12
HP 90
Ferocity[reaction]
Speed 25 feet, burrow 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +17, Damage 2d8+8 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile), Damage 2d6+8 slashing
Melee [one-action] spiked tail +17 (reach 10 feet, versatile P),
Damage 2d6+8 bludgeoning plus Knockdown
Rip and Tear[two-actions] The hodag makes two claw Strikes and one
jaws Strike in any order.
Toss [two-actions] The hodag Strides, then
makes a Strike against
a target in reach. If it
moves at least 20 feet
and succeeds at its
Strike, the hodag
deals damage normally
and then attempts an
Athletics check against
the creature’s Fortitude DC to
toss the enemy into the air. On
a success, the tossed creature is thrown
10 feet in a straight line in the direction of the hodag’s
choice and then lands prone. If the creature is knocked
into a solid object, it takes 1d6 bludgeoning damage as
well before landing prone. The hodag can instead toss
a creature straight up in the air. The creature lands in
the same square where it started, takes
1d6 bludgeoning damage, and
lands prone.
Bestiary 2
146
TINDALOS
Ancient texts refer to these
relentless temporal hunters as the
hounds of Tindalos, yet they never
seem to explore what Tindalos
actually is. In some references, the
implication is that Tindalos is one of
the Great Old Ones or Outer Gods,
but if this is the case, it is among the
most obscure of these entities. Other
tomes refer as Tindalos as a location,
perhaps even a city or nation that
once existed before time began and
that can be reached only by methods
impossible for any creature bound
by the laws of time. In all likelihood,
both and neither are right—what
Tindalos is may simply be impossible
for mortal minds to comprehend.
Hound of Tindalos
Lean and athirst, the hounds of Tindalos are drawn to those who tamper with the
flow of time, travel through time, or use magic or rare alchemical drugs to send
their thoughts or perception back or forward in time. Powerful spellcasters can
draw them from the Dimension of Time via rare rituals, but doing so attracts the
hounds’ ire, so few who traffic in such rituals live long enough to spread their
knowledge. While the hounds possess great cunning and cruel intellect, they rarely
interact with other creatures—other than to hunt and destroy those who have
attracted their unblinking attention.
Once a hound catches scent of a mortal to hunt, it calls others of its ilk. The
pack then pursues its victim through all space and time until it catches, slays and
devours them. Those pursued can escape only by avoiding all angles, as hounds of
Tindalos could step through them from nothingness at any time.
HOUND OF TINDALOS CREATURE 7
RARE NE MEDIUM ABERRATION TIME
Perception +17, greater darkvision
Languages Aklo
Skills Acrobatics +17, Athletics +15, Occultism +17, Stealth +17, Survival +13 (+17 to Track)
Str +4, Dex +6, Con +2, Int +6, Wis +4, Cha +2
AC 25; Fort +13, Ref +17, Will +15
HP 90; Immunities controlled, emotion; Resistances mental 10, poison 10, physical 10
Otherworldly Mind(mental) Whenever a creature targets the hound with a mental effect,
that creature takes 4d6 mental damage (DC 25 basic Will save). On a critical failure, it
also becomes confused for 1d4 rounds.
Ripping Gaze (aura, evocation, occult, visual) 30 feet. The hound of Tindalos’s eyes glow
balefully, causing painful but bloodless wounds to rip open in the body of a creature that
meets its awful gaze. When a creature ends its turn in the aura’s emanation, it
takes 4d6 slashing damage (DC 25 basic Fortitude save). A creature that
critically succeeds at its save is temporarily immune for 24 hours.
Vulnerable to Curved Space When a hound of Tindalos is not
adjacent to a structural angle of 90º (or more acute), its
resistance to physical damage is suppressed and it
becomes sickened 1. It can’t recover from this sickened
condition, but the condition ends automatically once
the hound is again adjacent to a suitable angle.
Speed 30 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +17, Damage 2d10+7 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile), Damage 2d8+7
slashing
Occult Innate Spells DC 21; 8th discern
location; 4th dimensional anchor; 3rd
haste, slow; 2nd invisibility (self only)
Angled Entry [one-action] The hound of Tindalos casts
a 4th‑level dimension door spell, but it must
transport itself into a space adjacent to an
angle of 90º (or more acute) in the structure or
environment around it. For example, it could teleport
to a space adjacent to a wall (using the angle
between the wall and floor) or a corner in a room, or
adjacent to a sizable tree growing straight up out of
the ground, but not to a flat plain or a room
with only curved corners and edges.
Once per day, the hound can use
this ability to plane shift to or from
the Dimension of Time, with the
same restrictions on what angles it can appear next to.
H-K
147
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SENSATION SEEKERS
Intellect devourers steal bodies to
experience the physical sensations
denied their nearly invulnerable
natural forms. Each new body
brings the opportunity to explore
new vistas of taste, touch, and pain.
Intellect devourers occupying a
body fear little but discovery, and
even that simply puts a temporary
end to their games. Harm to the
host is just another sensation to
experience, and replacement bodies
are easy to find.
Intellect Devourer
Intellect devourers serve as advance scouts and infiltrators for the powerful
force of alien beings called the Dominion of the Black. These monsters roam the
Darklands, from which they mount secret invasions of the world above. When
an intellect devourer infiltrates a society, its first priority is to acquire a body. It
might first seek out a graveyard for a fresh corpse, as this is easier than fighting
and killing someone. When the aberration compresses itself into the host’s brain
cavity, its real body goes dull to sensation as it connects to the nervous system of
its host. If found out, an intellect devourer might quickly inhabit a new body to
make its escape, preferably something inconspicuous such as a domestic animal.
INTELLECT DEVOURER CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON CE SMALL ABERRATION
Perception +16, darkvision, lifesense 60 feet
Languages Aklo, Common, Undercommon (can’t speak any languages); telepathy 100 feet
Skills Athletics +14, Deception +20, Diplomacy +16, Occultism +17, Society +17, Stealth +18
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +5, Wis +4, Cha +6
AC 26, Fort +14, Ref +16, Will +18
HP 130; Immunities blinded, controlled, emotion, possession
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] talon +18 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d10+5 slashing
Occult Innate Spells DC 27; 4th confusion, globe of invulnerability; 3rd soothe (×3); 2nd
gentle repose, invisibility (at will, self only), paranoia (at will); Cantrips (4th) daze,
detect magic, read aura
Body Thief[three-actions] (manipulate, necromancy, occult, possession) The intellect devourer
reduces in size and burrows into the brain of a creature dead for no longer than 1 day.
At the start of the intellect devourer’s next turn, the body revives at its maximum Hit
Points, controlled by the devourer. The intellect devourer is conscious and can sense
everything the possessed body could. Any effect that ends the possession kills the host
body with the same effects as Exit Body. The intellect devourer can’t use any of the host
creature’s spells with Body Thief but can use its own spells. The host body slowly decays
while inhabited by the intellect devourer, becoming uninhabitable after
7 days unless preserved with gentle repose or a similar effect.
Exit Body [one-action] (move) Requirements The intellect devourer is
controlling a body with Body Thief; Effect The intellect
devourer leaves its host body, which dies instantly
and is no longer a suitable host for any Body
Thief ability. The intellect devourer appears
at full size in an adjacent space.
Ravage[three-actions] The intellect devourer makes
two talon Strikes against a paralyzed,
restrained, or unconscious creature,
using the same attack modifier as its
highest attack modifier. These Strikes
gain the death trait. If Ravage kills the
target, the intellect devourer may use Body
Thief against it as a free action.
Stolen Identity While an intellect devourer
uses Body Thief, it gains the ability to
understand and speak all languages
known by the host, as well as knowledge
of the host body’s abilities, identity, role
in society, and personality. However,
it does not gain the
specific memories
or knowledge of
the host body.
Bestiary 2
148
IRLGAUNT RELIGION
A small number of irlgaunts actively
worship Rovagug, whom they believe
to be the progenitor of their species.
Instead of living solitary lives,
these chaotic evil irlgaunts form
cabals that inhabit deep fissures,
transforming them into grisly
temples by decorating them with
the corpses of their sacrifices. They
also decorate their own bodies by
carving prayers into their chitin and
painting themselves with crude and
disturbing images. Some claim these
runes grant them divine powers of
protection and the ability to summon
Rovagug’s otherworldly kin.
Irlgaunt
Irlgaunts resemble titanic spiders or crabs, but with cephalopod-like tendrils
erupting from the tips of their chitin-armored legs. Their jagged gray shells allow
them to blend into the rocky walls of the high mountain passes and deep ravines
that serve as their hunting grounds. Despite their size, they move with incredible
alacrity, bounding across chasms and skittering up sheer mountain cliffs without
pause. Though they are formidable in melee, irlgaunts have an even more powerful
ranged attack. These creatures can pelt their opponents by forcefully regurgitating
gastroliths—melon-sized clusters of rocks enveloped in coagulated digestive
enzymes strong enough to break down flesh and bone. Gastroliths are fragile and
explode on contact, spraying the area with shards of rock and caustic acid.
While one might easily mistake an irlgaunt for a simple brutish beast, they have
a keen intelligence and use devious hunting strategies. They set traps for travelers
and are fond of using gems and magical items taken from previous victims as bait.
They have been known to start rockslides or otherwise block passages to reroute
explorers into their clutches. They also use their gastroliths to direct the movements
of their prey, forcing victims into dead ends at the edge of chasms or cliffs.
For the most part, irlgaunts live solitary lives, likely because finding enough food
to sustain a community tends to be difficult. However, they still maintain a sense
of extended, regional community, actively gathering when organizing for war or to
discuss other issues that affect their species or shared territories. They have been
known to occasionally ally with giants, but these truces are usually nebulous.
IRLGAUNT CREATURE 13
NE LARGE ABERRATION EARTH
Perception +24, darkvision
Languages Aklo, Common, Jotun, Terran
Skills Acrobatics +25, Athletics +26, Deception +23, Stealth +27, Survival +22
Str +7, Dex +8, Con +5, Int +4, Wis +5,
Cha +4
AC 34; Fort +22, Ref +25, Will +24
HP 265, Immunities acid; Weaknesses
bludgeoning 10
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet;
stone step
Melee [one-action] jaws +26, Damage
3d8+13 piercing plus 2d6 acid
Melee[one-action] legs +26 (agile), Damage
3d10+13 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 31; 6th stone tell;
4th meld into stone (at will), shape stone
(at will)
Regurgitate Gastrolith [two-actions] (acid,
evocation, primal) The irlgaunt
violently regurgitates a melon‑
sized clot of brittle stone
supernaturally infused with
digestive enzymes. The
stone and acid explode on
impact within a range of
30 feet, dealing 7d6
piercing damage
and 7d6 acid
damage to creatures
in a 20‑foot burst (DC 33 basic Reflex
save). The irlgaunt can’t Regurgitate Gastroliths for 1d4 rounds.
Stone Step The irlgaunt ignores difficult terrain composed of rocks and stone.
H-K
149
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
EXILES FROM BEYOND
These disgusting parasites originally
manifested in the First World, but
the fey denizens of that realm found
them too awful to endure and exiled
them to the Material Plane. Over
time, the isqulugs sloughed off their
fey features for new, more powerful
bodies of their own. Reports of
stranger variants flourishing in areas
such as demon‑defiled Tanglebriar
and remote fungi‑ridden vaults in Orv,
however, suggest their foothold on
Golarion has become more established
than previously thought.
Isqulug
The isqulug’s appearance, though unsettling, might be its least awful aspect.
The creature resembles a bipedal amphibian with tentacles instead of arms and
a head composed of an undulant mass of what appear to be shifting, slimy
transparent eggs filled with writhing larvae. In truth, these larvae constitute
the mind and consciousness of the isqulug—its “body” is little more than an
organic suit manufactured from the flesh of those it has consumed, analogous to
the complex web of a spider or the hive of a colony of bees, but fully capable of
movement and violence.
ISQULUG CREATURE 11
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM ABERRATION AMPHIBIOUS
Perception +24, greater darkvision, host scent 30 feet
Languages Aklo
Skills Acrobatics +22, Athletics +24, Nature +22, Survival +22
Str +7, Dex +5, Con +7, Int +3, Wis +7, Cha +5
Host Scent An isqulug can precisely sense any creature infected with isqulugia within
30 feet, and knows the current stage of the disease.
AC 31, all‑around vision; Fort +24, Ref +20, Will +18
HP 230, regeneration 10 (deactivated by cold); Immunities swarm mind;
Weaknesses cold 10; Resistances fire 10
Speed 25 feet, swim 25 feet; swamp stride
Melee [one-action] tentacle +22 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d12+11 bludgeoning
plus isqulugia
Primal Innate Spells DC 30, attack +22; 6th tangling creepers; 5th
control water, entangle (at will), hallucinatory terrain, obscuring
mist (at will); 4th fly; Cantrips (5th) dancing lights; Constant
(1st) pass without trace
Expel Infestation [two-actions] The isqulug expels larvae
from the hivemind in its head in a 30‑foot
cone. Creatures in this area take 6d10
piercing damage as the swarm feeds on their
flesh (DC 30 basic Reflex save). Any creature
that takes damage is exposed to isqulugia.
The isqulug becomes stupefied 1 for 1d4 rounds,
during which it can’t Expel Infestation.
Isqulugia (disease, incapacitation, primal, transmutation,
virulent) Isqulugia’s sickened, slowed, and paralyzed
conditions can’t be removed until this affliction is removed;
Saving Throw DC 30 Fortitude; Stage 1 sickened 1 (1 hour);
Stage 2 fatigued and sickened 2 (1 day); Stage 3 fatigued
and slowed 1 (1 day); Stage 4 paralyzed (1 day); Stage 5
the creature dies, and its body violently transforms into a
new isqulug. Wish, similar magic, or a 9th‑level resurrect
ritual can return the victim to life. The new isqulug
remains even if the victim is brought back to life.
Malleability The isqulug can Squeeze through
tight spaces as if it were a Small creature. While
Squeezing, it can move at its full Speed. The isqulug
can even Squeeze through spaces that typically fit
only a Tiny creature, but does so at the standard speed
for Squeezing.
Swamp Stride An isqulug
ignores difficult
terrain that’s caused
by typical features
of swamps.
Bestiary 2
150
JABBERWOCK TREASURE
Jabberwocks have no interest
in treasure for its own sake, but
they gather objects of great value
or power specifically to entice
mortals into seeking it out. As a
result, jabberwocks quickly amass
impressive hoards of treasures taken
from nearby areas.
Jabberwock
Few beasts have inspired as many legends, poems, songs, and myths in as many
cultures, as this bizarre draconic creature. The jabberwock hails from the fey
realm of the First World and is part of a group of powerful First World creatures
known collectively as the Tane.
Like all members of the Tane, jabberwocks are living creatures that age, eat,
drink, and sleep, but do not reproduce normally. Instead, they are created directly
by the godlike Eldest who rule the First World, and they serve at the pleasure (or
frustration) of these capricious and mysterious entities. Believed to be the most
powerful of all the Tane, jabberwocks are typically only ever created with one
purpose: to wreak destruction and havoc upon the Material Plane. One of the
Eldest might send a jabberwock to devastate a country, continent, or even
entire world in order to get revenge for some slight made against them by a
single mortal. Sometimes, no specific insult or injury is required, as some of
the Eldest resent the very existence of the Material Plane and periodically
create jabberwocks simply to express the wrath of the First World against its
younger and less chaotic sibling.
Once a jabberwock arrives on the Material Plane, its first order of business
is to seek out a lair. It prefers dwelling in remote forest locations about a day’s
flight from civilization—the more dangerous the woodland is to those who might
eventually come hunting it, the better!
The relationship between jabberwocks
and vorpal weapons is the subject
of much debate and speculation
among scholars, and the various
poems, songs, and legends about the
jabberwock do little to clarify the issue,
conflicting and diverging on this point.
Some believe that vorpal weapons
were first created specifically
to combat jabberwocks, but
others take the story one step
further. They cite evidence
in certain ancient myths that
there may once have been only
a single, unique jabberwock,
so powerful that nothing
could so much as scratch
it—nothing, that is, except
for the first vorpal sword,
crafted for that very purpose.
So epic was the resulting battle
that it created strange echoes
throughout reality, and as a result,
these echoes, in the form of vorpal
weapons, can now be found on
many worlds. Those who subscribe to this
belief claim that the jabberwocks seen today
are but pale imitations of this proto‑jabberwock,
and they speculate that only the combined efforts of
several Eldest would be sufficient to create such a
creature again.
VARIANT JABBERWOCKS
The Eldest have sometimes altered certain aspects of the
jabberwocks they create. Some of the more notorious or
legendary variant jabberwocks include the following.
H-K
151
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
JABBERWOCKS AND DRAGONS
Although jabberwocks may fear
vorpal weapons and are filled with
rage against all mortal creatures,
few things invite a jabberwock’s
wrath more than a Material Plane
dragon. Some scholars believe that
in the same way the First World is
believed to have been a template or
“first draft” of the Material Plane,
dragons were created in the likeness
of jabberwocks. A jabberwock
that learns of a nearby dragon will
attempt to kill it to the exclusion of
all other priorities.
Frumious Jabberwock: Frumious jabberwocks have two heads. They are level
24 and gain an extra action on each of their turns they can use only to make a
jaws Strike.
Mimsy Jabberwock: Typically hailing from wintry regions of the First World,
mimsy jabberwocks have glowing blue‑white scales, resist cold instead of fire, and
have eyes that burn with blue flames that deal cold damage instead of fire damage.
Slithy Jabberwock: Wreaking destruction beneath the waves, these sinuous and
slimy jabberwocks are amphibious, have a swim Speed of 80 feet instead of the
normal fly Speed, and do not have a wing Strike. A slithy jabberwock’s whiffling
aura is activated whenever it swims, makes a tail Strike, or Burbles.
JABBERWOCK CREATURE 23
RARE CE HUGE DRAGON TANE
Perception +40; darkvision, scent 120 feet, true seeing
Languages Aklo, Common, Draconic, Gnomish, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +40, Athletics +44, Intimidation +41, Nature +38, Survival +40
Str +11, Dex +7, Con +10, Int +4, Wis +9, Cha +8
Planar Acclimation The jabberwock always treats the plane it is currently located on as
its home plane.
AC 49; Fort +39, Ref +37, Will +40
HP 500, regeneration 25 (deactivated by vorpal weapons); Immunities paralyzed, sleep;
Weaknesses vorpal weapons 20, vorpal fear; Resistances fire 20
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 100 feet, DC 43
Vorpal Fear A jabberwock damaged by a vorpal weapon becomes frightened 2 (or
frightened 4 on a critical hit).
Claws That Catch [reaction] Trigger A creature within the jabberwock’s reach uses a
manipulate action or a move action, leaves a square during a move action, makes a
ranged attack, or uses a concentrate action; Effect The jabberwock makes a claw
Strike against the triggering creature. If the Strike hits, the jabberwock disrupts
the triggering action.
Speed 35 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +42 (deadly 2d12, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d12+19 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +42 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d8+19 slashing plus Improved
Grab
Melee [one-action] tail +42 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d10+19 bludgeoning plus Improved
Knockdown
Melee [one-action] wing +40 (magical, agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d8+19 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] eyes of flame +42 (fire, magical, range increment 60 feet), Damage 10d6 fire
plus 4d6 persistent fire
Primal Innate Spells DC 43; Constant (10th) true seeing
Burble [two-actions] The jabberwock creates a blast of strange noises and shouted nonsense
in the various languages it knows (and invariably some languages it doesn’t know),
creating one of two effects. The jabberwock can’t Burble again for 1d4 rounds.
• Confusion (aura, emotion, enchantment, mental, primal) 60 feet. Each creature in the
emanation must succeed at a DC 46 Will save or become confused for 1d4 rounds.
• Sonic Beam (evocation, primal, sonic) The jabberwock focuses its Burbling into a
60‑foot line of sonic energy that deals 24d6 sonic damage to creatures in the area
(DC 46 basic Reflex save).
Jaws That Bite If the jabberwock makes a jaws attack and rolls a natural 19 on the d20
roll, the attack is a critical hit. This has no effect if the 19 would be a failure.
Whiffling [reaction] (aura) Trigger The jabberwock Flies or makes a wing Strike; Effect The
jabberwock’s wings whiffle, creating severe winds within a 30‑foot emanation. These
winds move outward from the jabberwock, and they persist until the start of the
jabberwock’s next turn. During this time, flight of any kind in the emanation requires a
successful DC 43 Acrobatics check to Maneuver in Flight, and creatures flying toward
the jabberwock are moving through greater difficult terrain. Creatures on the ground
in the emanation must succeed at a DC 43 Athletics check to approach the jabberwock.
Bestiary 2
152
JELLYFISH SPECIES
A large number of types of
monstrous jellyfish dwell in the
world’s oceans, each with their
own unusual specialty in hunting.
The immense vampire jellyfish is a
blood‑drinking monster that often
attacks sailors aboard ships. Among
the largest are the dreaded whaler
jellyfish, colossal creatures that feed
on whales or even krakens.
Jellyfish
Many varieties of jellyfish drift through the world’s oceans, feeding on fish and
other tiny marine creatures. However, deadly species of monstrous jellyfish pose a
threat to unwary swimmers and sailors alike. Note that while jellyfish are animals,
they also have the mindless trait because they lack a centralized nervous system.
FIRE JELLYFISH SWARM
While individually one of these fist‑sized jellyfish is merely a nuisance, in great
numbers, fire jellyfish can form into dangerous swarms. Bobbing in the water,
they create a cloud of stinging tentacles. They were named in part for their
bright coloration, but those who are stung by fire jellyfish learn the larger reason
for their name—the pain of their stings is comparable to being burned alive.
FIRE JELLYFISH SWARM CREATURE 6
N LARGE ANIMAL AQUATIC MINDLESS SWARM
Perception +10; low‑light vision
Skills Acrobatics +15
Str –4 Dex +5, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 13; Fort +16, Ref +15, Will +10
HP 155; Immunities mental, precision, swarm mind; Weaknesses area damage 7, splash
damage 7; Resistances bludgeoning 9, piercing 9, poison 10, slashing 5
Speed swim 20 feet
Agile Swimmer Fire jellyfish swarms use Acrobatics to Swim.
Burning Swarm [one-action] (poison) Each enemy in the swarm’s space takes 3d8 poison damage
(DC 24 basic Reflex save) and is exposed to fire jelly venom.
Fire Jelly Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 24 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6
rounds; Stage 1 clumsy 1 (1 round); Stage 2 clumsy 2 (1 round); Stage 3 clumsy
3 (1 round)
GIANT JELLYFISH
Unlike its smaller cousins, the giant jellyfish is an active
predator that chases down its prey through reefs or
open water. It can even squeeze its enormous
bell‑shaped body into the tight confines of
shipwrecks to drape its mane of tentacles
across the exposed flesh of its prey.
GIANT JELLYFISH CREATURE 7
N LARGE ANIMAL AQUATIC MINDLESS
Perception +12; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +15, Athletics +17, Stealth +15
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +6, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 15; Fort +17, Ref +15, Will +1
HP 165; Immunities mental, precision;
Weaknesses piercing 5, slashing 5; Resistances
bludgeoning 10, poison 10
Speed swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] tentacle +18 (agile, reach 20 feet), Damage
2d8+8 bludgeoning plus jellyfish venom
Jellyfish Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 25 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 2d8 poison
damage and clumsy 1 (1 round); Stage 2 3d6
poison damage and clumsy 2 (1 round); Stage 3
2d10 poison damage and paralyzed (1 round)
Squeeze A giant jellyfish can fit into tight spaces
as if it were a Medium creature. It can move at
its full Speed while Squeezing.
H-K
153
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
CRYSTAL VAULTS
Jyoti make ideal guardians for artifacts
too dangerous to be left where those
hungry for power might seize them.
Only they know what items of myth
and legend, long thought lost or
destroyed, lie within their crystal
vaults. They are unreliable guardians
of religious artifacts, however, which
usually disgust them.
Jyoti
Jyotis are sometimes called “false phoenixes” (a term they find insulting) by the
ignorant or willful. These avian humanoids are native to the Positive Energy Plane.
They rarely leave this enigmatic realm and view visitors from other planes as stains
on the purity of their home. Jyotis particularly distrust divine spellcasters and
religious warriors, seeing them as inclined to take credit for manifesting a life force
that, from the jyotis’ perspective, is as plentiful and ubiquitous as water is to fish.
Despite their distrust of intruders, jyotis rarely attack unprovoked when their
homes are not threatened. They are intolerant, however, of those who intrude on the
palaces of crystallized light and captured flame in which they dwell. They often chase
even those who come bearing gifts away; few visitors have anything they desire,
for what they desire most is to be left alone. The jyotis’ full wrath is reserved for
natives of the Shadow Plane and the Negative Energy Plane. Historically, the promise
of battle with the gargoyle‑like sceaduinars, whom they consider it their duty to
oppose, has been the only thing to lure jyoti armies beyond the Positive Energy Plane.
JYOTI CREATURE 9
N MEDIUM FIRE HUMANOID POSITIVE
Perception +21; darkvision
Languages Common, Jyoti
Skills Acrobatics +20, Intimidation +18, Occultism +20,
Society +18
Str +3, Dex +5, Con +4, Int +5, Wis +6, Cha +3
Items +1 striking longspear
AC 28; Fort +15, Ref +18, Will +21; +1 status to all
saves vs. magic (+2 vs. divine magic)
HP 155; Immunities death effects, disease,
poison; Resistances fire 10, negative 10
Positive Energy Affinity Positive healing
effects always heal the jyoti for the
maximum amount. It doesn’t gain the
automatic Hit Points or temporary Hit
Points from being on a plane with the
positive planar essence.
Speed 25 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] flaming ghost touch longspear +20
(magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+6
piercing plus 1d6 fire
Melee [one-action] beak +21 (finesse), Damage 2d12+6
piercing plus 1d6 fire
Melee [one-action] talon +21 (agile, finesse), Damage
2d8+6 slashing plus 1d6 fire
Occult Innate Spells DC 28, attack +20; 5th
banishment, breath of life; 4th dimension
door, heal, searing light; 3rd heal (×3); 2nd
restoration (×3); Cantrips (5th) disrupt
undead, light
Breath Weapon (evocation, fire, occult) The
jyoti breathes a blast of searing flame
infused with positive energy in a 40‑foot
cone that deals 8d6 fire damage plus
4d6 positive damage to creatures in
the area (DC 28 basic Reflex save).
The jyoti can’t use Breath Weapon
again for 1d4 rounds.
Infuse Weapons (occult, evocation) Any weapon a jyoti wields becomes a flaming ghost
touch weapon while the jyoti holds it.
Bestiary 2
154
KELPIE FOLKTALES
Some fanciful stories about kelpies
speak of them appearing in equine
form wearing riding tack, complete
with silver stirrups and bridle bit.
These folktales claim that cutting
the harness from the kelpie’s body
grants the bearer power over it, or
causes the kelpie to sicken and die.
In truth, doing so has no ill effect
on a kelpie, suggesting these stories
are spread by kelpies themselves
to further trick prey into making
foolish mistakes.
Kelpie
Kelpies are malevolent amphibious fey shapechangers intent on luring mortals
to their doom. These cruel predators lurk in and around areas of water, slightly
preferring freshwater over saltwater. Kelpies lure or drag their prey underwater
then drown and devour them, leaving behind only the victim’s heart and liver—
the only parts of a meal kelpies find unpleasant. Kelpies are fond of magically
disguising itself as fine steeds or attractive strangers to draw in victims, but
its true appearance takes the form of a hideous equine with slimy, green flesh
resembling aquatic plants.
KELPIE CREATURE 4
NE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS FEY
Perception +11; low‑light vision
Languages Aquan, Common, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +11, Deception +14, Stealth +10
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –1, Wis +3, Cha +4
AC 21; Fort +11, Ref +12, Will +14
HP 60; Weaknesses cold iron 5; Resistances fire 5
Speed 35 feet, swim 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +13, Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning plus Grab
Captivating Lure [two-actions] (concentrate, emotion, enchantment, incapacitation, mental,
primal) The kelpie instills an overwhelming attraction to itself within the mind of a
single creature within 60 feet. The target perceives the kelpie as a desirable person (if
the kelpie is in humanoid form) or a valuable steed (if the kelpie is in equine form) and
must attempt a DC 23 Will saving throw.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune to Captivating
Lure for 24 hours.
Success The creature is stupefied 1 for 1 round and is then temporarily immune to
Captivating Lure for 24 hours.
Failure The creature is fascinated, and it must spend each of its actions to move closer to
the kelpie as expediently as possible while avoiding obvious dangers. If a captivated
creature is adjacent to the kelpie, it either attempts to mount the kelpie
(if the kelpie is in equine form) or stays still and
doesn’t act. If the creature is attacked by the
kelpie, or if it can’t breathe water and enters
an area of water, the creature is freed from
captivation at the end of the kelpie’s turn.
Critical Failure As failure, but the target
doesn’t consider water a danger and
will enter an area of water even if
it can’t swim or breathe water.
If it is attacked by the kelpie or
starts to drown, it can attempt
a new save at the start of its
next turn, but it isn’t freed
automatically.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate,
polymorph, primal,
transmutation) The
kelpie can take on
the appearance of any
Medium or Large animal
of an equine nature (such as
a horse, hippocampus, or pony), or
any Small or Medium humanoid. This doesn’t
change its Speeds or its attack and damage
modifiers with its Strikes.
H-K
155
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
KORRED DANCES
Despite their insular nature, korreds
love to dance. On certain auspicious
dates, korreds hold great festivals
of music and dance in ancient stone
circles deep within forest glades.
A few non‑korred fey sometimes
receive invitations to these dances,
but any non‑fey who interrupts the
dance is berated at best or attacked
at worst.
Korred
Korreds are reclusive fey in the form of small, hirsute individuals with long,
animated manes of hair. While korreds have a natural affinity and admiration for
stones and boulders, they prefer to dwell aboveground in areas of rocky forest or
wooded hills rather than in caves. Korreds are a private people who don’t take
kindly to intruders, and they invariably work to drive off or kill any non‑fey who
stumble into their territory. Staunchly proud of their hair, korreds choose their
minimal attire so as to allow their body hair to flow freely, often wearing only a
belt with a pouch for throwing rocks and trimming shears—though this belt and
pouch are rarely visible under their wild manes.
KORRED CREATURE 4
UNCOMMON CN SMALL FEY
Perception +12; low‑light vision
Languages Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +11, Crafting +11, Deception +13, Performance +13, Stealth +11
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +2, Cha +5
Items club, pouch with 5 rocks
AC 21; Fort +10, Ref +13, Will +10; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 65; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Animated Hair (aura, primal, transmutation) 5 feet.
The korred’s long, animated hair reaches out
and interferes with creatures in the area. The
korred can select which targets are affected by their
animated hair. An affected creature that ends its turn in the
emanation must succeed at a DC 18 Reflex save or become clumsy 1
(clumsy 2 on a critical failure) as long as it remains in the aura.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] club +14, Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] rock +14 (brutal, range increment 20 feet), Damage 1d6+7
bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] club +14 (thrown 10 feet), Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 21; 6th stone tell; 4th shape stone (at will), shatter
(at will)
Hair Snare [one-action] (incapacitation, primal, transmutation) The korred causes a
long, tangled length of their hair to detach from their body and snake out
to coil around an adjacent creature. The creature must attempt a DC 21
Reflex save. The korred cannot use Hair Snare again for 1d4 rounds.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The hair wraps around the creature. The creature takes a –10‑foot
circumstance penalty to all of its Speeds until it Escapes (DC 21) or until
the korred uses Hair Snare again (at which point the previous snare drops to
the ground, no longer animated).
Critical Failure The creature is immobilized until it Escapes (DC 21) or the korred
uses Hair Snare again.
Otherworldly Laugh [two-actions] (auditory, evocation, incapacitation, primal, sonic) Frequency
three times per day; Effect The korred unleashes an otherworldly laugh. Each non‑fey
creature within a 30‑foot burst must attempt a DC 21 Fortitude save. On a failure, the
creature is slowed 1 for 1 round (or stunned 1 on a critical failure).
Stone Stride[two-actions] (conjuration, earth, primal, teleportation) The korred steps into a block
of stone large enough for them to fit inside and instantly teleports to any other stone
within 30 feet that has the same minimum size. Once the korred enters the stone, they
instantly know the rough locations of other sufficiently large stones within 30 feet.
They can exit from the original stone, if they prefer. They can’t carry extradimensional
spaces with them when they Stone Stride; if the korred attempts to do so, Stone
Stride fails.
Throw Rock [one-action]
Bestiary 2
156
LEECH SPECIES
The spotted hooktooth leech is
often found in areas frequented
by trolls, who sometimes wear
them as awful decorations, relying
on their regeneration to control
the bleeding effects. The gigantic
elephant leech feeds on immense
beasts of the swamplands or jungles,
like elephants, froghemoths, and
dinosaurs, attacking from unexpected
range. But it’s the relatively small
gutleech that provides the most fuel
for nightmares, due to its awful habit
of feeding on victims from inside.
Leech
Though valued by apothecaries and field medics as methods to reduce swelling
or drain blood, leeches are despised by most who encounter them, regardless
of the setting.
GIANT LEECH
Capable of growing to lengths of nearly 5 feet, giant leeches have circular maws
filled with hook‑like teeth. They prefer to dwell in stagnant or slow‑moving
shallow water or in damp, moist undergrowth. Horses and larger animals are
their favorite prey, but they won’t balk at a chance to latch onto a human‑ or
halfling‑sized meal.
GIANT LEECH CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM AMPHIBIOUS ANIMAL
Perception +5; tremorsense 30 feet
Skills Athletics +8, Stealth +7
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –5
AC 17; Fort +9, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 32; Weaknesses salt 5
Speed 5 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] mouth +10, Damage 1d4+6 piercing plus Grab
Blood Drain [one-action] Requirements The giant leech has a creature grabbed or restrained;
Effect The giant leech drains blood from the creature it has grabbed. This
deals 2d4 damage. A creature that has its blood drained by a giant leech
is drained 1 until it receives any kind or amount of healing.
BROOD LEECH SWARM
Most smaller species of leeches do not tend to swarm, but
brood leeches are prone to gathering in seething, undulant
mats of squirming gluttony. When they gather in sufficient
numbers to swarm, they eschew the stealth of a lone leech’s
feeding methods in favor of swift and merciless feeding.
In these situations, their mild venom can affect much
larger creatures than their usual prey.
BROOD LEECH SWARM CREATURE 4
N LARGE AMPHIBIOUS ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +9; tremorsense 30 feet
Skills Athletics +8, Stealth +11
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –5
AC 19; Fort +12, Ref +11, Will +9
HP 40; Immunities precision, swarm mind;
Weaknesses area damage 5, salt 5, splash
damage 5; Resistances bludgeoning 2,
piercing 5, slashing 5
Speed 5 feet, swim 20 feet
Blood Draining Bites [one-action] Each enemy in
the swarm’s space takes 2d6 bleed
damage and is exposed to brood leech
swarm venom.
Brood Leech Swarm Venom (poison) Saving
Throw DC 21 Fortitude; Maximum Duration
6 rounds; Stage 1 clumsy 1, sickened 1,
and –5‑foot status penalty to Speed (1
round); Stage 2 clumsy 1, sickened
1, and –10‑foot status penalty
to Speed (1 round)
L-N
157
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
WEB TEMPLES
Leng spiders build complex lairs out
of their webs, many of which serve a
dual purpose as temples to the eldritch
gods they venerate. Most Leng spiders
worship deities of the Elder Mythos,
such as Hastur, Nyarlathotep, or
Yog‑Sothoth, among others.
Leng Spider
The monstrous, bloated spiders from the windswept realm of Leng build eerie,
dangerous lairs with the aid of magically compelled slaves. Leng spiders have
anywhere from five to 13 legs, but never an even number.
LENG SPIDER CREATURE 13
UNCOMMON CE HUGE ABERRATION DREAM
Perception +24; darkvision, detect magic, greater web sense
Languages Aklo; tongues
Skills Acrobatics +24, Athletics +27, Crafting +22 (+26 to make traps), Deception +22,
Religion +24, Occultism +26, Stealth +26
Str +6, Dex +7, Con +5, Int +7, Wis +5, Cha +5
Greater Web Sense While touching its webs, the Leng spider has precise tremorsense to
detect the vibrations of creatures touching its web.
AC 34; Fort +22, Ref +26, Will +24; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 235, fast healing 10; Immunities cold, confused; Resistances poison 15, sonic 15
Speed 40 feet, climb 40 feet; air walk
Melee [one-action] web war flail +27 (disarm, magical, reach 15 feet, sweep, trip), Damage 3d10+14
bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] fangs +27 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+14 piercing plus
Leng spider venom
Melee [one-action] leg +27 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+14 slashing
Ranged [one-action] web bola +28 (magical, nonlethal, ranged trip, thrown
20 feet), Damage 2d6+14 bludgeoning
Occult Innate Spells DC 33; 7th dispel magic, veil, warp
mind; 6th illusory scene, mislead; 4th charm (×3),
freedom of movement; Cantrips (7th) detect magic;
Constant (7th) air walk, tongues
Create Web Weaponry [one-action] (manipulate) The Leng spider
creates a weapon by applying a cord of webbing to
heavy objects, such as rocks or chunks of metal, either
attaching two heavy objects together to create a web
bola or fastening one to its leg to create a web war flail.
Descend on a Web [one-action] (move) The Leng spider moves
straight down up to 120 feet, suspended by a web line. It can
hang from the web or drop off. The distance it Descends
on a Web doesn’t count when calculating falling
damage. The web can be severed by a Strike that
deals slashing damage (AC 30, Hardness 15,
25 HP), causing the Leng spider to fall.
Lay Web Trap [one-action] (manipulate) Frequency
three times per day; Effect The Leng spider
spins a web within 20 feet of itself to
create a grasping snare, stunning snare,
or warning snare. The Leng spider’s web
provides all the raw materials it needs. All
save and Escape DCs associated with web
traps use the Leng spider’s Crafting DC for traps
(DC 36). A web trap decays after 24 hours.
Leng Spider Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 33
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1
2d6 poison damage and drained 1 (1 round); Stage 2 2d6
poison damage, confused, and drained 2 (1 round); the
confused effect has the emotion and mental traits.
Ranged Trip A Leng spider can use a web bola to Trip a target
with the Athletics skill. The skill check takes a –2 circumstance
penalty. A web bola deals no damage when used to Trip.
Bestiary 2
158
POTS OF GOLD
While it’s true that leprechauns
typically return items they steal,
they particularly love gold and often
hoard gold coins and treasures in
pots tucked away in hidden places.
It’s rumored that a person who finds
a gold coin in the forest and returns
it to the leprechaun who dropped it
will be granted a wish as a reward.
Unfortunately, this rumor is false—a
deception perpetrated by leprechauns
to trick others into bringing them even
more gold for their pots.
Leprechaun
Leprechauns are mostly jovial tricksters who prefer mischief over conflict. They
fill their days with as much fun, wine, and food as possible. Mostly found in
forested regions, leprechauns respect nature and those who protect it.
Leprechauns do not attack on sight. Rather, they engage in conversation and
try to charm, cajole, or trick those they meet into doing favors for them or freely
giving over a treasured item, usually in return for illusory wealth or false promises
of wealth and success. These small tricksters are masters at discerning the desires of
those they meet—a knack that puts them in a powerful position when bargaining
for goods or favors. They aren’t above turning people against each other for their
own benefit but generally not to an extent that causes harm.
In most cases, a leprechaun doesn’t keep a purloined possession for long. The
leprechaun most often returns such stolen prizes just in time to defuse tensions,
often as they point out the humor of the situation, hoping to share their amusement
and mirth with the victim. In cases where a leprechaun’s trick goes too far and
results in an incensed victim, the leprechaun quickly flees the conflict rather
than engage in combat. This willingness to return stolen goods or to flee from
battles fades as leprechauns grow older. Ancient leprechauns who have lived for
thousands of years often spiral into dark bitterness and increasingly use their
powers and illusions to lure those who offend them or fail to appreciate a
joke into danger... or even death.
LEPRECHAUN CREATURE 2
CN SMALL FEY
Perception +11; low‑light vision
Languages Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +8, Deception +9, Gold Lore +7, Nature +7,
Performance +9, Thievery +8
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +3, Wis +3, Cha +4
AC 18; Fort +8, Ref +11, Will +10
HP 25
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] club +7, Damage 1d6+3 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 18, attack +10; 2nd illusory
creature, illusory object, invisibility (self only);
1st color spray, shillelagh, ventriloquism;
Cantrips (2nd) dancing lights, ghost
sound, mage hand, prestidigitation,
telekinetic projectile
Create Object [two-actions] (conjuration,
manipulate, primal) Frequency three
times per day; Effect The leprechaun
produces an item out of their hat,
from behind their jacket, from within
a hole in a tree stump, or from any other
unexpected location. This conjured item must be no more than 1 Bulk
and must be made of relatively commonplace material (such as cloth,
wood, stone, or even low‑value metal like iron or lead). It can’t rely on
intricate artistry or complex moving parts, never fulfills a
Cost or the like, and can’t be made of precious materials
or materials with a rarity of uncommon or higher. The
created object is temporary and lasts for 1 hour or
until the leprechaun creates a new item, whichever
comes first.
Leprechaun Magic When a leprechaun uses their innate spells
to deceive, trick, or humiliate a creature, the spell DC
increases to 20 and the attack modifier to +11.
L-N
159
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
LERRITAN CAVALCADES
Every few decades, lerritans gather in
large bands to travel from one volcanic
region to another, razing every sign
of civilization they find along the
way. Lerritan cavalcades contain
up to a dozen lerritans and their
lackeys: crimson worms, powerful fire
elementals, and fire giants.
Lerritan
Lerritans are unstoppable giants with skin of volcanic glass and blood of roiling
lava. These malicious arsonists would see the world burned to a cinder. They pay
homage to Ymeri, the evil elemental demigod of fire, and they bully other fiery
creatures. When the urge to immolate grows too great to ignore, lerritans burn
forests, destroy villages, and boil rivers, but they avoid large bodies of water.
LERRITAN CREATURE 21
NE GARGANTUAN EARTH ELEMENTAL FIRE
Perception +35; low‑light vision
Languages Common, Ignan, Jotun, Terran
Skills Athletics +41, Crafting +33, Intimidation +35, Religion +36, Survival +38
Str +10, Dex +5, Con +7, Int +2, Wis +7, Cha +4
Items +3 greater striking warhammer
AC 46; Fort +38, Ref +34, Will +36
HP 490; Immunities fire, paralyzed, poison, sleep; Weaknesses cold 20; Resistances
piercing 20, slashing 20
Tenacious Flames (aura, evocation, fire, primal) 100 feet. Creatures in the emanation
cannot recover from persistent fire damage.
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed 50 feet
Melee [one-action] warhammer +40 (magical, reach 25 feet, shove), Damage 4d12+18
bludgeoning plus 2d6 persistent fire damage
Melee [one-action] jaws +39 (agile, reach 25 feet), Damage 4d10+18 piercing plus
2d6 persistent fire damage
Ranged [one-action] rock +39 (brutal, range increment 120 feet), Damage
4d6+18 bludgeoning plus 2d6 persistent fire
Primal Innate Spells DC 46; 10th cataclysm; 9th meteor swarm,
fireball; 8th earthquake; 7th plane shift (to the Material
Plane, Plane of Fire, or Plane of Earth only); Cantrips (10th)
produce flame
Throw Rock [one-action] A lerritan can break stony scales off its body to
throw; these scales reform at the end of each round, so the
lerritan is never without a supply of rocks to hurl.
Volcanic Eruption [two-actions] (earth, evocation, fire, primal) The volcano
on the lerritan’s back erupts and sends lava bombs raining
down in a 30‑foot emanation, dealing 12d12 fire damage.
Each creature in the area must attempt a DC 46 Reflex
saving throw. The lava globules quickly cool into heavy
stones, transforming the area into greater difficult
terrain for non‑lerritans. The lerritan can’t use
Volcanic Eruption for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage and is
encumbered for 1 round.
Failure The creature takes full damage and is immobilized
(Escape DC 46).
Critical Failure The creature takes double damage and is encased
in a rocky crust with lava on
the inside. The creature is
restrained (Escape DC
46), can’t breathe, takes
3d12 persistent fire
damage, and can’t
recover from this
persistent fire damage
until freed.
Bestiary 2
160
LESHY COMMUNITIES
Leshys are fairly egalitarian when
interacting with their own kind.
Most communities are meritocracies,
rewarding leshys who defend their
communities and help each other
succeed, and they see working together
as the best path to a successful future.
Leshy
These intelligent plant creatures maintain complex societies in remote wildernesses
and places of primal power. By working together, leshys help to defend powerful
fey and druidic sites from interloping humanoids. They often have good relations
with local fey and druidic orders but distrust most other humanoids.
A primal spell caster, often a druid, can create a leshy by binding a nature spirit
to a carefully crafted body grown from specific vegetation. The details of these
rites vary based on the type of leshy, but all are carefully guarded secrets and tend
to take place in sacred areas associated with nature or primal magic, such as a
druid circle or dryad grove.
SUNFLOWER LESHY
Sunflower leshys are the ambassadors and social leaders of their kind.
Their petals radiate from their heads in various hues with a
serrated, leafy, beard‑like ruff. When particularly excited, their
eyes and petals glow with collected sunlight, and when they
become depressed or saddened, their usually vibrant
coloration grows correspondingly muted. These shifts
in coloration are echoed in sunflower leshy art, which
can lead to unexpected color palettes for artworks. For
example, a human artist might illustrate Hell as a place
of glowing lava and flickering flames, drawing upon
many vibrant colors, but to a sunflower leshy, the only
proper way to depict a place like Hell is in morose grays,
blacks, and whites.
The more adventurous sunflower leshys leave their
communities to grow bonds with nearby settlements of
humanoids. When interacting with humanoids,
sunflower leshys are some of the most likely
to act friendly and give strangers a chance to
prove their good intentions, though they remain
cautious. They’re often accompanied by other,
more powerful leshys.
SUNFLOWER LESHY CREATURE 1
N SMALL LESHY PLANT
Perception +7; darkvision
Languages Common, Druidic, Sylvan; speak with plants (sunflowers only)
Skills Acrobatics +6, Diplomacy +8, Nature +5, Stealth +7 (+9 in plains)
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +1, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +3
AC 16; Fort +4, Ref +10, Will +7
HP 20
Heliotrope [free-action] (aura, evocation, light, primal) 20 feet; Requirements The sunflower
leshy begins its turn in an area of bright light; Effect The sunflower leshy
reflects the sun or another source of bright light from their face. Each
creature that ends its turn in the emanation must attempt a DC 16 Will save.
Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune to heliotrope for
24 hours.
Failure The creature is distracted by the light, becoming flat‑footed for 1 round.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature is also dazzled for 1 round.
Verdant Burst (healing) When a sunflower leshy dies, a burst of primal energy explodes
from its body, restoring 1d8 Hit Points to each plant creature in a 30‑foot emanation.
This area immediately fills with sunflowers, becoming difficult terrain. If the terrain is
not a viable environment for these sunflowers, they wither after 24 hours.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] tendril +6 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d8 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] seed +6 (range increment 20 feet), Damage 1d6 bludgeoning
L-N
161
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
LESHY HEROES
Occasionally, a leshy proves so
valuable to their community that
they’re uplifted as a hero. These
admired leshys are not all warriors;
outstanding artisans, caretakers,
or diplomats might also be lauded
as heroes.
Primal Innate Spells DC 17; 4th speak with plants
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) The sunflower leshy
transforms into a Small flower. This ability otherwise uses the effects of tree shape.
Seed Spray [two-actions] (conjuration, primal) The sunflower leshy launches a deluge of seeds
from their head in a 15‑foot cone, dealing 2d6 bludgeoning damage to creatures within
the area (DC 16 basic Reflex save). It gains a +2 status bonus to this damage against
dazzled creatures. The sunflower leshy can’t use Seed Spray again for 1d4 rounds.
FLYTRAP LESHY
While often seen as unfriendly by non‑leshys, flytrap leshys get along well with other
leshys. Nonetheless, they’re among the most aggressive leshys, often guarding the
most vulnerable places in the natural world with their flytrap mouths and hands.
When a large threat emerges, pairs of flytrap leshys band together to create
amalgams capable of driving back powerful foes. This unusual form of communal
defense suffuses flytrap leshy society, and they often form relationships between
multiple individuals that would confuse or even scandalize more uptight
humanoids—to a flytrap leshy, though, there’s nothing strange about sharing your
innermost secrets with people you literally merged together with to defend your
home from an enemy.
FLYTRAP LESHY CREATURE 4
N SMALL LESHY PLANT
Perception +11; darkvision
Languages Common, Druidic, Sylvan; speak with plants (carnivorous plants only)
Skills Athletics +12, Nature +10, Stealth +12
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +1, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +2
AC 20; Fort +9, Ref +12, Will +13
HP 72; Resistances acid 5
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Verdant Burst (healing) As sunflower leshy, except plants
regain 3d6 Hit Points and the area sprouts flytraps
instead of sunflowers.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] flytrap mouth +13 (versatile S), Damage 1d8+6 piercing plus 1d6
acid and flytrap toxin
Melee [one-action] flytrap hand +13 (agile, versatile S), Damage 1d6+6 piercing plus 1d6
acid and flytrap toxin
Ranged [one-action] spittle +11 (acid, range increment 10 feet), Damage
1d6+6 acid plus flytrap toxin
Primal Innate Spells DC 21; 4th speak with plants; 2nd pass
without trace
Amalgam [one-action] (polymorph, primal, transmutation) A
flytrap leshy can combine itself with an adjacent and
willing flytrap leshy that is not currently affected
by Amalgam. The leshy using Amalgam physically
merges with the target, restoring 3d8 Hit Points to the target. The
leshy can Sustain a Spell to continue Amalgam, but once they stop,
the target leshy takes 3d8 damage. If the target leshy dies, Amalgam ends at once
and the original leshy gains the dying condition or increases their dying condition
value by 1 if they were already dying. As long as Amalgam is sustained, the target
leshy gains a +1 status bonus to attack rolls and saving throws, its AC increases to 21,
and it gains an additional reaction at the start of each turn.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) The
flytrap leshy transforms into a Small flytrap. This ability otherwise
uses the effects of tree shape.
Flytrap Toxin (poison) Saving Throw DC 19 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6
rounds; Stage 1 sickened 1 (1 round), Stage 2 sickened 2 (1 round)
Bestiary 2
162
GNOLL MASTERS
Leucrottas often associate with
gnolls. They never submit to serve
others as beasts of burden, but they
sometimes permit gnoll leaders who
impress them to ride them into battle
as steeds. More often, a leucrotta
considers itself to be the true leader
of a gnoll clan, whispering and
manipulating a gnoll warchief into
doing its bidding or (if it tires of the
game) goading them into challenging
the leucrotta for leadership and then
taking over the clan directly after
eliminating its rival.
Leucrotta
The vile and vicious offspring of a demon lord and a monstrous species of hyenas,
leucrottas are intelligent and cruel beasts. They use their astounding vocal mimicry
to lure unsuspecting creatures near so that they can first torment and then devour
them. Leucrottas measure 5 feet at the shoulder and weigh 800 pounds, and they
are perpetually filthy. A leucrotta’s oversized jaws are lined with rows of jagged,
hardened bony ridges rather than teeth, and it can shear through flesh, bone, and
even steel with ease.
LEUCROTTA CREATURE 5
CE LARGE BEAST
Perception +11; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common, one additional language (usually Gnoll)
Skills Athletics +13, Deception +13, Stealth +11
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +4
Language Adaptation A leucrotta can learn any language it hears spoken for at least 10
minutes, adding it to its languages known and replacing the language it previously
learned using this ability. Typically, a leucrotta knows Gnoll as the language granted
by this ability.
AC 21; Fort +15, Ref +9, Will +11
HP 85
Speed 50 feet, climb 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jagged jaws +15 (fatal d10), Damage
2d8+8 slashing
Melee [one-action] hoof +13 (agile), Damage 2d4+8
bludgeoning
Luring Cry [two-actions] (aura, enchantment,
incapacitation, linguistic, mental,
primal) 60 feet; Requirements
The leucrotta’s last action was
Sound Mimicry; Effect The
leucrotta utters a plaintive cry to
draw its prey closer. Each creature
within the emanation that was
deceived by Sound Mimicry must
succeed at a DC 19 Will save or become
fascinated and compelled to move toward the sound of the
leucrotta’s voice on their turn. Fascinated creatures are
also flat‑footed. If the leucrotta attacks, the fascinated
condition ends only for the creature that is attacked.
If the leucrotta speaks a creature’s name while
using its Luring Cry, that creature takes a –2
circumstance penalty to their saving throw to
resist the ability. On a successful save, a creature
is temporarily immune to Luring Cry for 24 hours.
Sound Mimicry [one-action] The leucrotta perfectly imitates
voices and speech and attempts a Deception check
against listeners’ Will DC to fool them. The leucrotta
gains a +4 bonus to this Deception check if it has
listened to the creature it’s imitating for at least
10 minutes at any point in the last 24 hours. The
leucrotta can’t duplicate voice‑based abilities or
spells, though it can perfectly mimic the sound
of verbal spellcasting and can attempt to
deceive constructs or undead that respond to
voice commands. The leucrotta can’t imitate
speech in languages it doesn’t know.
L-N
163
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
LEYDROTH LEGACY
On Golarion, the first leydroths
were created by a secret society of
Azlanti sorcerers who drew their
powers from elemental bloodlines.
These sorcerers clashed often
against various wizardly guilds who
held power throughout the various
regions of Azlant, and intended
for leydroths to serve as weapons
of terror against their foes. Today,
leydroths remain isolated on certain
particularly dangerous islands
among the remnants of the shattered
continent of Azlant, but now and
then foolish explorers seek to
transport them back to the mainland.
Leydroth
In ancient times, a cabal of primalists imbued an amalgam of beasts with both
supernatural might and a hatred of magic itself, hoping to achieve a potent
weapon for use against arcane spellcasters. Effective beyond expectation, the first
leydroths broke free and turned on their creators. Worse, the leydroths bred true,
and these reclusive predators have long outlived their original creators.
Leydroths look like distorted, apelike felines with many‑branching horns growing
from the backs of their heads. Their thickly muscled limbs end in glowing claws.
LEYDROTH CREATURE 17
UNCOMMON NE LARGE BEAST
Perception +30; darkvision, magic sense (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Aklo
Skills Acrobatics +32, Athletics + 33, Deception +28, Intimidation +28, Stealth +32,
Survival +30
Str +8, Dex +7, Con +9, Int –3, Wis +5, Cha +5
Magic Sense (primal) The leydroth detects the source and school of
each source of magic within 60 feet as an imprecise sense.
AC 40, or 36 vs. non‑magical; Fort +32, Ref +30, Will +28; +2 status
to all saves vs. magic
HP 315; Resistances all 15 (except
non‑magical)
Menace to Magic[reaction] (abjuration,
primal) Trigger A creature
within 60 feet Casts a Spell;
Effect The leydroth attempts an
Intimidation check to counteract
the triggering spell.
Speed 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +33 (magical, reach 10 feet),
Damage 3d10+16 piercing plus 1d10 persistent bleed
Melee [one-action] claw +33 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet),
Damage 3d10+16 slashing
Melee [one-action] horn sweep +33 (magical, reach 10 feet,
sweep, versatile P), Damage 3d12+16 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 38; 9th disjunction (×2); 7th dispel
magic (at will)
Dispelling Roar [two-actions] (abjuration, auditory, emotion, fear,
mental, primal) The leydroth unleashes a bestial roar
that reverberates within a 30‑foot emanation. It rolls
an Intimidation check and compares the result to the
Will DC of each creature in the area, with the effects
of Demoralize. It also uses this result to attempt
to counteract each spell or magical effect in the
area, plus one item or effect on each creature in
the area, with the effects of dispel magic. The
leydroth can’t use Dispelling Roar again for
1d4 rounds.
Dispelling Strike [free-action] (abjuration, primal) Frequency
once per round; Trigger The leydroth hits a
creature, object, or spell effect with a Strike;
Effect The leydroth casts its innate dispel magic,
targeting one effect on the creature struck.
Spell Feedback (primal) Any time a leydroth
counteracts a spell or item, the spell’s caster
or the creature holding the item takes 8d6
mental damage (DC 38 basic Will save).
Bestiary 2
164
LINNORM LEGENDS
Creatures as powerful as linnorms
tend to spawn stories of their own,
accurate or not. Critical failure on
a check to Recall Knowledge on
linnorms might suggest that you
can avoid a linnorm’s death curse by
closing your eyes as you deliver the
fatal blow, or that rubbing poison
oak on yourself can ward off a
linnorm’s attention.
Linnorm
The powerful, serpentine beings known as linnorms may be distantly related
to the more well-known chromatic and metallic dragons, but their draconic
physiologies are where any such similarities end. Whereas true dragons boast
incredible intellectual capabilities and far-reaching plans, linnorms are driven
only by their insatiable hunger and desire to inflict cruelty on others. Linnorms
are exceptionally difficult to outwit due to their strong wills, and it’s not wise
to try bargaining with them—when faced with one of these legendary beasts,
one’s best option is flight, pure and simple. Failing that, a noble death is a viable
back-up plan.
Extremely powerful linnorms dwell in remote parts of the world. One such
creature is the legendary Fafnheir, the Father of All Linnorms, said to be the oldest
and mightiest linnorm of them all. Fafnheir’s death curse causes anyone who
would slay him to slowly erode away physically and mentally until they die, at
which point the cursed victim’s body fuels Fafnheir’s resurrection.
SHOAL LINNORM
Shoal linnorms occupy rocky shoreline shallows and slither
along lonely coastlines. While they do not intentionally seek
out large settlements, these linnorms nonetheless beleaguer
fishers headed out from small coastal towns, and they may
even follow skiffs back to their home port to appraise the
town’s defenses and plan a raid. Shoal linnorms tend to hunt
large prey, both underwater and on land. Their preferred
quarries includes giant squid and grizzly bears—meals rich
in fat, which the linnorms metabolize into the fiery steam that
courses through their veins.
SHOAL LINNORM CREATURE 15
UNCOMMON CE GARGANTUAN AMPHIBIOUS DRAGON
Perception +27; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, true
seeing
Languages Aklo, Draconic, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +28, Athletics +31, Stealth +28
Str +8, Dex +5, Con +7, Int –3, Wis +6, Cha +7
AC 38; Fort +29, Ref +25, Will +22; +1 status
to all saves vs. magic
HP 295, regeneration 10 (deactivated
by cold iron); Immunities curse, fire,
paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold iron 10
Curse of Drowning (curse, primal, water)
When a creature slays a shoal linnorm, it
must succeed at a DC 38 Will save or become
cursed. As long as the curse of drowning
persists, the character must spend 3
actions when drinking any liquid.
Attempting to drink liquid
faster causes the victim
to begin drowning,
immediately running out
of air and falling unconscious.
Attack of Opportunity[reaction] Tail only.
Speed 35 feet, fly 100 feet, swim 100
feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +31 (magical, reach 20
feet), Damage 3d12+16 piercing plus
shoal linnorm venom
L-N
165
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
NEWBORN LINNORMS
Almost all linnorms lead solitary
lives; they are too reprehensible for
even their own kind to tolerate for
any length of time. Most species do
not even meet to reproduce; rather,
female linnorms usually deposit a
solitary egg in a remote location,
which a wandering male linnorm
then fertilizes and places in a nook
suitable for incubation. Newborn
linnorms range in size from that of
adult crocodiles to full-grown bulls,
and their growth is rapid. Even a
juvenile linnorm is strong enough to
wreak havoc on a small settlement—
though most don’t dare to commit
such audacious pillaging, for fear of
evoking the anger of another, larger
linnorm in the area.
Melee [one-action] claw +31 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+16 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +31 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 4d6+16 bludgeoning plus Improved Grab
Primal Innate Spells DC 36; Constant (7th) freedom of movement; (6th) true seeing
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (evocation, fire, primal, water) The shoal linnorm exhales scalding
steam that deals 12d8 fire damage in a 60-foot cone (DC 36 basic Reflex save). The
steam lingers until the end of the linnorm’s next turn; anyone who enters the area
or begins their turn in the area takes 6d8 fire damage (DC 36 Reflex save negates).
During this time, the steam is so thick that it impedes movement as well as sight,
turning the area into difficult terrain. All creatures in the steam become concealed,
and all creatures outside the steam become concealed to creatures within it. The shoal
linnorm can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Shoal Linnorm Venom (fire, poison) Saving Throw DC 36 Fortitude; Maximum Duration
10 rounds; Stage 1 4d6 fire damage and enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 6d6 fire damage
and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
FJORD LINNORM
Fjord linnorms make their homes in damp caves behind ice-cold waterfalls in
the river-veined coastal reaches of the north. While they may appear graceful as
they swim up the fjords for which they’re named, they are as vile as any other of
their species and take pleasures in capsizing river boats before gobbling up their
terrified crews.
FJORD LINNORM CREATURE 16
UNCOMMON CE GARGANTUAN AMPHIBIOUS DRAGON
Perception +28; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, true seeing
Languages Aklo, Draconic, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +27, Athletics +33, Stealth +29
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +8, Int –3, Wis +6, Cha +7
AC 40; Fort +30, Ref +28, Will +24; +1
status to all saves vs. magic
HP 315, regeneration 10 (deactivated
by cold iron); Immunities cold, curse,
paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold
iron 15
Curse of Stolen Breath (curse, primal,
water) When a creature slays a fjord
linnorm, it must succeed at a DC 41 Will
save or become unable to ever breathe
underwater (either via a natural ability or
a spell such as water breathing). In addition,
the victim can hold its breath only half as long as
normal, and whenever it holds its breath it becomes
sickened 2.
Attack of Opportunity[reaction] Tail only.
Speed 35 feet, fly 75 feet, swim 50 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +33 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d12+17
piercing plus fjord linnorm venom
Melee [one-action] claw +33 (agile, magical, reach 20 feet),
Damage 3d10+17 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +33 (agile, magical, reach
25 feet), Damage 3d6+15 bludgeoning
plus Improved Grab
Primal Innate Spells DC 37; Constant (7th)
freedom of movement; (6th) true seeing
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (cold, evocation, primal) The fjord linnorm expels a 120-foot line of
icy bile, dealing 17d6 cold damage to creatures within the area (DC 37 basic Reflex save).
Any creature that fails its save is covered by the ice, which freezes and fuses with the 
Bestiary 2
166
FIRST WORLD CONNECTIONS
Linnorms have a deep connection to
the First World, the primordial home
of the fey. While linnorms typically
won’t think twice before devouring
a gnome or other fey, they do have
an unusual respect for wielders of
powerful primal magic. The only
way to cow a linnorm, according
to common wisdom, is to remind it
that there are forces of nature even
stronger than itself.
creature’s skin, giving it a –10-foot penalty to Speed. A creature can Escape or Force
Open the ice (DC 34) to free itself; otherwise, the ice remains for 1 minute. The fjord
linnorm can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Fjord Linnorm Venom (cold, poison) Saving Throw DC 37 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 10
rounds; Stage 1 4d6 cold damage and clumsy 1 (1 round); Stage 2 6d6 cold damage and
clumsy 2 (1 round)
CAIRN LINNORM
Cairn linnorms are disturbing, even by linnorm standards. They make their homes
in necropolises, burial grounds, and the sites of immense and gory battles. Some
point out that cairn linnorms feast on shambling undead and thus provide a
service to the living, but these beasts are not choosy and will happily consume any
creature, whether or not it draws breath.
Some tales state that cairn linnorms will not—or cannot—enter a tomb
without the permission of a descendant of the deceased (or the permission of the
deceased itself, in the instance that it has risen from the dead). Likewise, once a
cairn linnorm has entered a tomb, it won’t leave until it has secured permission
to do so. Whether such legends are true or not is anyone’s guess; nevertheless,
reports of a cairn linnorm in the vicinity are harrowing enough to dissuade
even the most foolhardy grave robber from peeking into too many crypts
or mausoleums.
CAIRN LINNORM CREATURE 18
UNCOMMON CE GARGANTUAN DRAGON
Perception +30; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, true seeing
Languages Aklo, Draconic, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +32, Athletics +35
Str +9, Dex +6, Con +8, Int –2, Wis +6, Cha +7
AC 43; Fort +34, Ref +30, Will +26; +1 status to all saves vs.
magic
HP 360, regeneration 15 (deactivated by cold iron); Immunities
acid, curse, paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold iron 15
Curse of the Crooked Cane (curse, primal) When a creature slays a
cairn linnorm, it must succeed at a DC 44 Will save or become permanently enfeebled 2.
In addition, the victim ages at an accelerated rate, aging 1 year every day, eventually
causing it to die of old age if the curse is left untended.
Attack of Opportunity[reaction] Tail only.
Speed 35 feet, climb 40 feet, fly 100 feet, swim 40 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +35 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 3d12+17 piercing plus cairn
linnorm venom
Melee [one-action] claw +35 (agile, magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 3d8+17 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +35 (agile, magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 3d10+17 bludgeoning plus
Improved Grab
Primal Innate Spells DC 40; Constant (8th) freedom of movement;
(7th) true seeing
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (acid, evocation, primal) The cairn linnorm expels
a 60-foot cone of negative energy–infused acid, dealing 19d6 acid
damage to creatures in the area (DC 40 basic Reflex save).
The acid also saps the life out of affected creatures. At
the beginning of the linnorm’s next turn, each creature
that failed the Reflex save must succeed at a
DC 40 Fortitude save or become
drained 1 (drained 2 on
a critical failure). The
cairn linnorm can’t use
Breath Weapon again
for 1d4 rounds.
L-N
167
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RARER LINNORMS
While the linnorms presented here
and in the first Bestiary constitute the
majority of these creatures, others
exist, particularly in the remote
regions of the First World. It may be
that these rare linnorms simply find
the Material Plane too constraining
for their might!
Cairn Linnorm Venom (acid, poison) Saving Throw DC 41 Fortitude; Maximum Duration
10 rounds; Stage 1 6d6 acid damage and drained 1 (1 round); Stage 2 8d6 acid damage
and drained 2 (1 round)
TAIGA LINNORM
Taiga linnorms are covered in hundreds of quill-like black spines as sharp as spears.
Wise hunters native to linnorm-infested lands know to watch for spines stuck in
the bark of conifers—a sure sign that a taiga linnorm has recently passed through.
Sometimes this means of tracking isn’t enough to avoid an encounter, however; taiga
linnorms, like their tarn and tor brethren, are skilled stalkers. They prefer to lurk
in half-frozen bogs or swampy marshlands with their heads poking just above the
water’s surface, ever watchful for unwary prey.
TAIGA LINNORM CREATURE 19
UNCOMMON CE GARGANTUAN DRAGON
Perception +33; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, true seeing
Languages Aklo, Draconic, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +33, Athletics +37, Stealth +35
Str +10, Dex +6, Con +8, Int –2, Wis +6, Cha +7
AC 44; Fort +35, Ref +31, Will +29; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 385, regeneration 15 (deactivated by cold iron); Immunities
curse, electricity, paralyzed, sleep; Weaknesses cold iron 15
Curse of Endless Storms (curse, electricity, primal)
When a creature slays a taiga linnorm, it must
succeed at a DC 46 Will save or permanently
gain weakness 20 to electricity.
Spines Any creature that makes a melee attack
against a taiga linnorm is stabbed by the taiga linnorm’s spines and takes 1d6
piercing damage per attack. A melee weapon with reach protects the user
against these spines.
Attack of Opportunity[reaction] Tail only.
Speed 40 feet, fly 100 feet, swim 50 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +37 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 4d12+18 piercing plus taiga
linnorm venom
Melee [one-action] claw +37 (agile, magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 4d8+18 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +37 (agile, magical, reach 30 feet), Damage 5d6+18 bludgeoning plus
Improved Grab
Primal Innate Spells DC 41; Constant (9th) freedom
of movement; (8th) true seeing
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (electricity, evocation,
primal) The taiga linnorm breathes
a 60-foot cone of electrified vapor,
dealing 20d6 electricity damage to
creatures in the area (DC 41 basic
Reflex save). The electrified mist
persists for 1d4 rounds, dealing
6d6 electricity damage (DC 41
basic Reflex save) to each creature
that ends its turn in the mist. The taiga
linnorm can’t use Breath Weapon again for
1d4 rounds.
Taiga Linnorm Venom (electricity, poison)
Saving Throw DC 42 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 10 rounds; Stage
1 7d6 electricity damage and drained
1 (1 round); Stage 2 10d6 electricity
damage and drained 2 (1 round)
Bestiary 2
168
LIZARD LOCATIONS
Giant lizards can be found in all
temperate or tropical climates, often
in relatively close proximity to smaller
villages or rural regions where they
can be a dangerous threat to livestock
or travelers. The two lizards presented
here tend to dwell in warmer regions—
jungles for giant chameleons, and
savannas for megalanias.
Lizard
Giant lizards come in a wide variety of species, but they all tend to be voracious
hunters and quick to anger—particularly when they’re molting.
GIANT CHAMELEON
Giant chameleons are legendary for their ability to change their skin color in
response to their surroundings. Their eyes are capable of peering in different
directions independently, making them almost as difficult to sneak up on as they
are to notice in the first place.
GIANT CHAMELEON CREATURE 3
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +10; low-light vision
Skills Athletics +10, Stealth +10 (+13 to Hide)
Str +5, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha –2
Camouflage The giant chameleon can change its coloration to match its surroundings. It
doesn’t need cover to attempt to Hide with a Stealth check.
AC 18, all-around vision; Fort +8, Ref +12, Will +8
HP 60
Speed 30 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee jaws +12 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+7 piercing
Melee tongue +12 (agile, reach 15 feet) Effect tongue grab
Tongue Grab If the giant chameleon hits a creature with a
tongue Strike, that creature becomes grabbed by the
giant chameleon. The target isn’t immobilized, but it
can’t move beyond the reach of the giant chameleon’s
tongue. A creature can sever the tongue with an
attack that hits AC 15 and deals at least 4 slashing
damage. Though this doesn’t deal any damage to the
giant chameleon, it prevents it from using its tongue Strike
until it regrows its tongue, which takes a week.
MEGALANIA
Megalanias, like their smaller cousins the giant
monitor lizards, strike fast and use their powerful
bite to grip their prey. They prefer to swallow
their prey whole rather than risk others getting
a bite of a hard-won meal.
MEGALANIA CREATURE 7
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +15; low-light vision, scent (imprecise)
60 feet
Skills Athletics +18, Stealth +15 (+17 in undergrowth)
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 25; Fort +17, Ref +15, Will +13
HP 125
Speed 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee jaws +18 (reach 10 feet), Damage
2d10+9 piercing plus Grab and megalania venom
Megalania Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 25
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1
1d6 poison damage and clumsy 1 (1 round); Stage
2 2d6 poison damage, clumsy 2, and flat-footed (1
round); Stage 3 2d6 poison damage, clumsy 3, and
flat-footed (1 round)
Swallow Whole (attack) Large, 2d10+7 bludgeoning, Rupture 16
L-N
169
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
GREATER RITUAL GATES
Well-versed and knowledgeable lurkers
in light can lead groups of their kind in
a more advanced Ritual Gate to enable
travel to other planes, rather than
just summoning. Doing so requires
the sacrifice of a creature of equal or
greater size to the lurker in light who
wishes to travel the planes. Multiple
lurkers in light can travel in this way,
but this requires multiple sacrifices.
The creation of a greater Ritual Gate is
a 1-hour activity, at the end of which
all affected lurkers in light travel to the
same plane, chosen from the Material
Plane, one of the Elemental Planes, or
the First World.
Lurker in Light
These malicious and strange fey appear as fairies about 2 feet tall, with insectile
wings, large eyes, and bulbous heads. They slaughter and cause mischief in
a pattern only their alien intellect understands, but they’ve been seen to take
particular umbrage against dwarves, gnomes, and creatures who live in darkness.
With their grudges and pursuit of their own wicked and sadistic whims, lurkers in
light deftly overturn the conventional wisdom that creatures associated with light
are benign and friendly.
While lurkers in light are fey and have ties to the First World, these creatures are
often found elsewhere in the Great Beyond. They are particularly fond of invading
the Shadow Plane to bring light to those who dwell there—not to help, but to
spread misery and pain among those to whom light is agonizing.
LURKER IN LIGHT CREATURE 5
NE SMALL FEY
Perception +13; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +14, Nature +11, Occultism +11, Stealth +14, Survival +13
Str +0, Dex +5, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +2
AC 22; Fort +9, Ref +14, Will +13
HP 72; Immunities blinded; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Speed 25 feet, fly 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +14 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6+2 slashing
Ranged [one-action] mote of light +14 (agile, magical, range increment 10 feet), Damage 2d4+2
force plus lurker’s glow
Primal Innate Spells DC 22, attack +14; 4th dimension door (only when in
bright light, and only to an area in bright light), summon fey; 3rd blindness,
searing light, summon fey; Cantrips (3rd) dancing lights, ghost sound, light,
mage hand
Blend with Light [reaction] Trigger The lurker in light uses a move action; Requirements The
lurker in light is in an area of bright light; Effect The lurker in light becomes invisible
until it enters an area of dim light or darkness, or until it uses a hostile action.
Lurker’s Glow (evocation, light, primal) A creature that takes damage
from a lurker in light’s mote of light must attempt a DC 22
Will save.
Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily
immune to lurker’s glow for 24 hours.
Failure The creature is lined in golden light for
1 minute and can’t be concealed during
this time. If the creature becomes
invisible, it is concealed rather
than being undetected.
Critical Failure As failure, but the
creature sheds bright light in
a 20-foot emanation for the
duration of the effect. In addition, the creature is dazzled on its
first turn after failing this save.
Ritual Gate [one-action] (conjuration, primal) Requirements The lurker
in light has reduced a living creature to 0 Hit Points on
this turn or its previous turn and has a summon fey innate
spell available; Effect The lurker in light casts summon fey
with only a verbal component, using the act of slaughter to
replace the normal material and somatic components for the spell. If the fey creature
summoned has the same alignment as the lurker in light, the lurker in light can sustain
the summon fey spell for up to 1 hour instead of 1 minute.
Sneak Attack A lurker in light’s Strikes deal an additional 2d6 precision damage to
flat-footed creatures.
Bestiary 2
170
MANDRAGORA SUCKLINGS
Sometimes a mandragora offers its
services to a spellcaster in exchange
for sustenance. Tales tell of sorcerers
or other magical creatures who keep
mandragora “familiars” whose loyalty
is sustained by feeding the little beasts
with their own blood. These tales
generally have gruesome endings
wherein the mandragora is overcome
with bloodlust and, unable to control
itself, devours its master.
Mandragora
A mandragora looks like a freshly pulled tuber that has grown into the malformed
shape of a child with a grotesque face and hideously bloated body. These insidious
little plants typically form when a mandrake root is watered with a demon’s
blood. Upon absorbing the otherworldly properties of the demon’s blood, the
root animates and is forced to seek out blood to feast from, lest it die of thirst.
Always famished and in search for sustenance, mandragoras live haunted, pained
lives and perform vile and desperate acts to acquire the blood they crave. While
they prefer magically infused blood such as that of unicorns, fey, or sorcerers, and
they can also feed off of potions, alchemical bombs, and other magical elixirs,
a mandragora can subsist on the blood of non-magical creatures. They find the
flavor of mundane blood to be bland and bitter, and they do not blanch at voicing
these complaints to the creatures from which they drink.
While the typical mandragora is the size of a human child, some of these evil
plants continue to grow and grow, reaching sizes more comparable to those of
giants. Sometimes as they grow, they form additional limbs or rudimentary faces,
eventually transforming into truly hideous mockeries of the human form.
MANDRAGORA CREATURE 4
CE SMALL PLANT
Perception +11; blood scent, low-light vision
Languages Abyssal, Common
Skills Acrobatics +10, Athletics +10, Stealth +12 (+20 in vegetation)
Str +2, Dex +5, Con +3, Int –1, Wis +2, Cha +0
Blood Scent A mandragora can smell creatures with blood as an imprecise
sense at a range of 30 feet, and it can smell demons, fey, and sorcerers
with blood as a precise sense at a range of 30 feet.
AC 21; Fort +11, Ref +13, Will +8
HP 60; Weaknesses fire 5; Resistances bludgeoning 5, electricity 5
Vulnerability to Supernatural Darkness Whenever a mandragora
begins its turn in an area of magical darkness, it is slowed 1 on
that turn.
Speed 30 feet, burrow 10 feet, climb 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +14 (finesse), Damage 2d8+4 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] thorny vine +14 (agile, finesse, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d4+4 slashing plus mandragora venom
Blood Drain [one-action] Requirements The mandragora has a creature
grabbed; Effect The mandragora drains blood from the creature it
has grabbed, dealing 2d6 damage. If the creature is a demon, fey, or
sorcerer, the mandragora gains temporary Hit Points equal to the
damage dealt. A creature that has its blood drained by a mandragora
is drained 1 until it receives healing of any kind or amount.
Mandragora Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 21 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison damage and
stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage, confused, and
stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 3 2d6 poison damage, confused, and
stupefied 1 (1 round)
Piercing Shriek [one-action] (auditory, evocation, mental, primal) Frequency
once per day; Effect The mandragora emits an unsettling shriek.
Each non-mandragora creature within 30 feet must attempt a
DC 25 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is sickened 1.
Failure The creature is sickened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is sickened 2 and slowed 1. As
long as the creature remains sickened, this slowed condition
value can’t be reduced below 1.
L-N
171
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FEY MANIPULATORS
Marrmoras exert a strange and
subtle dominance over other fey.
The fey under their control are filled
with both horror at the destruction
wrought by marrmoras and
fascination with their fiery power.
Marrmora
On the First World, marrmoras dwell in ruined wildlands perpetually scourged
by fire and rarely, if ever, travel elsewhere. When a wildfire devastates a wilderness
region on the Material Plane and results in the death of other fey, marrmoras
can be drawn across the planar boundary to revel in the resulting destruction.
They seek to reignite the fires that beckoned them, to gather up and feed upon
the charred remains of those who perished within (particularly the bodies of
dead fey), though they do grow homesick if they spend too much time away
from the First World. They are burdened by a capricious but persistent rage
and are unfailingly cruel. While they are capable of negotiation and intelligent
interaction, they almost never bargain in good faith and typically interact with
others only as a means to more efficiently spread their fiery devastation.
A marmorra’s twisted appearance evokes the look of an arboreal whose bark
has been burnt down to charcoal. They have nearly featureless faces and hands
ending in long, sharp claws. Their broken flesh looks like charcoal-burnt
wood, riddled with cracks that still glow with an unwholesome heat. They
trail ash wherever they walk, and wisps of smoke curl off of their bodies.
Though marrmoras enjoy the sight of any woodland and its inhabitants
roasting in the flames of their carefully curated fires, there is little that
brings more pleasure to a marrmora than the sight of good-aligned plant
creatures cooking to a crisp.
MARRMORA CREATURE 15
NE MEDIUM FEY FIRE
Perception +27; low-light vision
Languages Common, Elven, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +25, Athletics +25, Deception +30, Intimidation +30, Nature
+30, Stealth +27, Survival +27
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +8, Int +4, Wis +6, Cha +8
AC 37; Fort +29, Ref +25, Will +27
HP 280; Immunities fire; Weaknesses cold iron 15; Resistances physical 10
(except slashing)
Fascination of Flame (aura, emotion, enchantment, mental, primal) 30 feet.
A creature that enters or begins its turn in this aura’s emanation must
attempt a DC 33 Will save. Regardless of the result of the saving throw,
the creature is temporarily immune for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature loses any resistance to fire for 1 round.
Failure The creature loses any resistance to fire for 1 hour.
Critical Failure The creature loses any resistance to fire for 1
hour and gains weakness 15 to fire for the same duration.
Absorb Flame [reaction] Trigger The marrmora is targeted by a fire spell
or effect, or is in the area of a fire effect; Effect The marrmora
is healed by the fire damage, regaining Hit Points equal to
half the damage the fire effect would have dealt.
Speed 30 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +29, Damage 3d6+14 slashing plus 3d6 fire and
1d6 persistent fire
Ranged [one-action] flame jet +29 (fire, range increment 40 feet), Damage 6d6 fire plus 2d6
persistent fire
Primal Innate Spells DC 36, attack +28; 8th fire shield, fireball; 7th elemental
form (fire elemental only), volcanic eruption, wall of fire; 6th fire shield (×3),
fireball (×3), tree shape (at will; appears as a burnt, dead tree); Cantrips (8th)
produce flame
Igniting Assault [one-action] Requirement The marrmora is not under the effect of fire
shield; Effect The marrmora makes a claw Strike. If it hits, it can immediately
cast one of its available fire shield innate spells as a free action.
Bestiary 2
172
INHUMAN MURDERERS
While it’s true that most mohrgs
seem to rise from the corpses of
humanoid killers, the capacity to
murder is not limited to humanoids.
Mohrgs of other sorts could certainly
exist—as long as they come from a
society that has the capacity not
only to judge and execute, but also to
harbor murder within their hearts.
Mohrg
The weight of murder wears heavy on the soul. With souls marked by a lifetime
of dealing death, these killers, whether mass murderers, bloodthirsty soldiers, or
sadistic executioners, sometimes do not let judgment and lawful execution stanch
their slaying sprees. When such individuals are brought to justice, they may rise
after death as mohrgs to continue their ruinous work.
Drawn to others of their kind, mohrgs prefer to hunt in small groups, occasionally
in partnership with weaker free-willed undead such as shadows and wights. They
seek out weak prey and revel in causing drawn-out suffering. Some mohrgs haunt
locations they favored in life, reenacting old crimes on new victims. They may even
skulk about in public, wearing rags, cloaks, or freshly harvested skins to hide their
nature. The most dangerous mohrgs are those who grow powerful enough to no
longer fear being struck down again and openly assault settlements in an attempt to
turn living towns into mass graves.
Since those slain by a mohrg rise soon thereafter as mohrg spawn, the murders of
a mohrg rarely go unnoticed for long, even when they take extra care to prey only
on a society’s dregs. Since mohrg spawn remain under a mohrg’s control, a canny
mohrg might order its spawn to remain in hiding to keep its presence secret until a
point where it feels confident unleashing its undead army upon a doomed settlement.
Mohrgs retain a twisted sentimentality for the crimes of their mortal life, seeking
out trinkets that remind them of favorite murders. When not out hunting,
mohrgs arrange their mementos into disturbing shrines. Often, these trinkets are
valuable objects, and might even provide important clues to ongoing mysteries.
MOHRG CREATURE 8
CE MEDIUM UNDEAD
Perception +17; darkvision
Languages Common, Necril
Skills Acrobatics +16, Athletics +18, Intimidation +19, Society +15, Stealth +18
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +5
AC 28; Fort +18, Ref +16, Will +13
HP 120, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison,
unconscious; Resistances piercing 10, slashing 5
Mohrg Spawn (occult, necromancy) A living creature slain by a mohrg
that had a lower level than the mohrg rises as a mohrg spawn after
1d4 rounds, on its turn. This mohrg spawn is under the command
of the mohrg that created it. If the creator of the mohrg spawn
is destroyed, the mohrg spawn is destroyed as well, immediately
collapsing into a pile of decayed flesh and bones.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +20, Damage 2d10+9 slashing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] tongue +20 (agile), Effect paralysis
Paralysis (occult, incapacitation, necromancy) A living creature hit by a mohrg’s tongue
Strike must succeed at a DC 26 Fortitude save or become paralyzed. The creature can
attempt a new save at the end of each of its turns, and the DC cumulatively decreases
by 1 on each attempt.
MOHRG SPAWN
When a creature returns after death as a mohrg spawn, its flesh decays away save
for its entrails, and it grows a long, awful tongue. The creature gains the undead
trait and becomes chaotic evil, and it loses any abilities that come from it being a
living creature. It gains darkvision, negative healing, and the mohrg’s immunities
and resistances. If the creature had hands, it gains a claw Strike (an unarmed attack
that deals slashing damage). The creature also gains a tongue Strike, an agile attack
that causes paralysis, as the mohrg ability; the Fortitude save uses the DC for the
mohrg spawn’s level (Pathfinder Core Rulebook 503). Mohrg spawn cannot
create mohrg spawn of their own.
L-N
173
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DOMINION SEEDLINGS
Moonflower seeds are tough and
fibrous, capable of surviving the
fire of reentry into a planet’s
atmosphere. They are often
dropped by agents of the Dominion
of the Black in orbit above
unsuspecting worlds.
Moonflower
These enormous plants have thick, knotted trunks festooned with fanged
blossoms. A gaping mouth sits at the top of the trunk, capable of swallowing most
creatures smaller than the moonflower whole. Moonflowers can move slowly on
their powerful roots or use them to attack, but usually they dig them deeply into
the surrounding ground and remain stationary to await prey.
Though moonflowers can’t speak in the conventional sense, they communicate
telepathically with other moonflowers. Explorers who encounter a single
moonflower can thus be assured that any other moonflowers in the vicinity will
be prepared for them. Those who manage to intercept a moonflower’s telepathic
communications are assaulted by visions of dreadful, primeval jungles ruled over
by titanic plant life. Whether this is some vision of the past or a dream
of the future shared by all moonflowers is unknown.
Moonflowers are alien life-forms from a long-dead planet, but
their proliferation throughout the galaxy has been ensured through the
machinations of the Dominion of the Black, a sinister, alien organization from
the dark places between the stars.
MOONFLOWER CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON N HUGE PLANT
Perception +16; darkvision
Languages telepathy 1 mile (other moonflowers only)
Skills Athletics +19 (can’t Jump or Swim), Stealth +14 (+18 in thick vegetation)
Str +7, Dex +0, Con +4, Int –2, Wis +4, Cha +3
AC 24; Fort +18, Ref +10, Will +16
HP 120, fast healing 10; Immunities electricity; Weaknesses fire 10;
Resistances physical 10 (except slashing)
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +20 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d10+10 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] root +20 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d8+10 bludgeoning
Light Pulse[two-actions] (evocation, light, primal, visual) 50 feet. The moonflower
releases a pulse of bright light. Each non-moonflower creature in the
emanation must attempt a DC 23 Fortitude save. The moonflower
can’t use Light Pulse again for 1d4 rounds.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is dazzled for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Failure The creature is blinded for 1d4 rounds.
Pod Prison [reaction] Trigger The moonflower has swallowed
a creature; Effect The swallowed creature is
wrapped in a tight cocoon and extruded from
the moonflower’s body into an adjacent square.
The creature continues to be Swallowed Whole.
It can’t use Acrobatics to Escape a pod, but other
creatures can attempt to Rupture the pod. The
cocooned creature takes half damage from any
damage dealt to the cocoon. Once the cocoon is
Ruptured, it deflates and decays.
Pod Spawn Should a Small or larger creature die within a
pod prison, the pod transforms into an adult moonflower
with full Hit Points after 1d4 hours of growth. The
newly formed moonflower has its own consciousness,
but some aspect of its trunk or blossoms resembles
the creature that died within. The dead creature’s
equipment remains inside the new moonflower and can
be retrieved if the moonflower is slain.
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Large, 2d10+10 bludgeoning and 2d6
acid, Rupture 21
Bestiary 2
174
MORLOCK MACHINERY
Morlocks tend toward brutish actions
and violent traditions and have little
interest in bettering their societies
or creating art. However, they have
a strange obsession with ancient
machinery and magical items,
particularly clockwork constructions.
Their knack for tinkering helps
keep ancient guardians and traps
functional, even if their work
backfires now and then.
Morlock
Originating from humans long lost from the world of light, morlocks are brutal
monsters that dwell in the tangled tunnels of the upper reaches of the Darklands.
Their wiry frames mask the strength of their limbs and their swift reactions, and
their arms are long enough that they can drop into an uncanny, four-limbed shuffle
for speed or stealth. They no longer remember the lives their ancestors led on the
surface, although many morlocks still dwell in the shattered ruins of their ancient
homes. Some morlocks worship the statues of humans from these bygone eras as
gods, but others now worship Lamashtu, Rovagug, or other violent deities.
Morlock young are insatiable and clamor for even the slightest morsel of food,
even consuming their siblings if no other meal presents itself. Most morlocks
encourage the practice to ensure their ancestral group as a whole grows stronger.
A typical morlock stands just over 5 feet tall and weighs roughly 150 pounds.
MORLOCK CREATURE 2
CE MEDIUM HUMANOID
Perception +7; darkvision
Languages Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +8 (+11 Climbing), Crafting
+8 (Repair only), Stealth +9
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +1
Items club
Light Blindness
AC 17; Fort +7, Ref +11, Will +9; +2 status to all saves vs.
disease and poison
HP 38
Speed 30 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] club +9, Damage 1d6+4 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] jaws +9 (agile), Damage 1d4+4 piercing
Ranged [one-action] club +8 (range increment 10 feet), Damage
1d6+4 bludgeoning
Instinctual Tinker[two-actions] The morlock tinkers with an adjacent
construct or mechanical hazard. They attempt a
Crafting check against the construct’s or
hazard’s Fortitude DC. The morlock can’t
succeed if the target’s level is more than
double the morlock’s.
Critical Success The target gains 4d6 HP and a
+1 circumstance bonus to attack rolls for 1 minute.
Success The target gains 2d6 HP.
Critical Failure The morlock injures
itself, taking 2d6 damage (typically
bludgeoning, piercing, or slashing, but
potentially a different type at the GM’s
discretion).
Leap Attack[two-actions]The morlock Strides up to twice its
Speed, during which it attempts a High Jump or
a Long Jump. At any point during its movement,
the morlock can make a melee Strike against
an enemy in its reach. The morlock then can’t
use Leap Attack for 1 round.
Sneak Attack A morlock’s Strikes deal an extra 1d6
precision damage to flat-footed creatures.
Swarming Stance A morlock can share the same space as
another morlock, but no more than two morlocks can
occupy the same space. When morlocks share the same space,
they gain a +1 circumstance bonus to attack rolls.
L-N
175
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MALARIA STRAINS
This pernicious disease is often
associated with mosquitoes. The
most common version of malaria
is presented on page 118 of the
Pathfinder Gamemastery Guide,
and while the variants inflicted
by mosquito swarms and giant
mosquitoes are deadlier, they don’t
have the chance to recur after
1d4 months. Pyrexic malaria also
causes weakness and fevers, while
septic malaria causes painful and
infected lesions to form on the
body. Regardless of the strain you
contract, you can’t reduce your
sickened condition while you are
affected with malaria.
Mosquito
While the common mosquito is a pest capable of spreading deadly diseases, their
giant kin and the ravenous clouds of mosquito swarms are even more dangerous.
FEN MOSQUITO SWARM
When deadly fen mosquitoes gather in large numbers, they form into lethal
swarms capable of draining blood at a truly alarming rate. Fen mosquito swarms
are typically encountered only in tropical swamps or bogs, but during humid
months in spring or summer they can drift into riverine areas or even through the
waterfront reaches of settlements.
FEN MOSQUITO SWARM CREATURE 3
N LARGE ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +8; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +6, Stealth +8
Str +0, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
AC 19; Fort +8, Ref +11, Will +5
HP 25; Immunities precision, swarm mind; Weaknesses area damage 5, splash damage
5; Resistances bludgeoning 2, piercing 5, slashing 5
Speed 5 feet, fly 25 feet
Pyrexic Malaria (disease) The victim can’t reduce its sickened condition while it’s affected
by pyrexic malaria; Saving Throw DC 20 Fortitude; Onset 4 days; Stage 1 sickened 1
(1 day); Stage 2 enfeebled 1 and sickened 1 (1 day); Stage 3 as stage 2 (1 day); Stage 4
unconscious (1 day); Stage 5 dead
Swarming Bites [one-action] Each enemy in the swarm’s space takes 1d6
piercing damage (DC 20 basic Reflex save) and is exposed to
pyrexic malaria. Creatures that fail the saving throw also take
1d4 persistent bleed damage.
GIANT MOSQUITO
These horrifically enlarged versions of the common mosquito
often prey upon megafauna like dinosaurs and other large
creatures, but they won’t turn down a chance to drink the
blood of a smaller target—such as a humanoid.
GIANT MOSQUITO CREATURE 6
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +17; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Acrobatics +13, Stealth +13
Str +4, Dex +5, Con +2, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –5
AC 24; Fort +14, Ref +17, Will +12
HP 80
Speed 20 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] proboscis +17 (finesse), Damage 2d10+7
piercing plus Grab and septic malaria
Blood Drain [one-action] Requirements The giant mosquito
has a creature grabbed; Effect The giant
mosquito uses its proboscis to drain blood
from the grabbed creature. This deals 3d6
damage, and the giant mosquito gains
temporary Hit Points equal to the damage
dealt. A creature that has its blood drained by a giant mosquito is
drained 1 until it receives healing of any kind or amount.
Septic Malaria (disease) The victim can’t reduce its sickened condition while it’s
affected by septic malaria; Saving Throw DC 24 Fortitude; Onset 1 day; Stage 1
sickened 1 (1 day); Stage 2 drained 1 and sickened 1 (1 day); Stage 3 as stage 2 (1 day);
Stage 4 unconscious (1 day); Stage 5 dead
Bestiary 2
176
MUDWRETCH LIFESTYLES
Mudwretches are rarely encountered
alone. They inhabit swampy patches
in small groups, often gathering
near the ruins of sites that once held
great significance. Mudwretches can
remain dormant for centuries, always
eager to lurch up to attack passersby.
They’re usually more interested
in defending territory than killing
intruders, and they won’t pursue
victims for long if they flee.
Mudwretch
In its resting form, a mudwretch looks like a large puddle of thick, dark mud, heaped
at the center in a slightly drier patch of loam. When a living creature approaches,
though, the mudwretch lurches upward, piling its muddy flesh upon itself to form
a roughly humanoid shape, often in vague mockery of the approaching creature’s
general form in cases where the creature is a humanoid itself.
Mudwretches possess a low level of intellect, and while they do not form societies
or cultures of their own, they are attracted to ruins or abandoned settlements. They
have little need to eat, but without a constant source of moisture, a mudwretch dries
out, suffering from low throbbing aches until it can resaturate. Often, blood from
living creatures has to do—a dried mudwretch is more dangerous to intruders than
one that’s comfortably wallowing on a river bank.
MUDWRETCH CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM EARTH ELEMENTAL WATER
Perception +9; darkvision
Languages Terran
Skills Athletics +8, Stealth +6
Str +4, Dex +0 Con +3, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +0
Muddy Field (aura) 10 feet. The ground in the area
is difficult terrain for all non-mudwretch creatures.
AC 16; Fort +11, Ref +4, Will +9
HP 40; Immunities bleed, critical hits, paralyzed, poison,
sleep; Weaknesses fire 5; Resistances acid 3, physical
3 (except bludgeoning)
Susceptible to Desiccation If a mudwretch takes any
damage from horrid wilting or a similar effect,
takes 10 or more fire damage from a single
effect, or spends more than 24 hours outside
of a source of sufficient hydration (such as
a swamp, river, well, or recent rainfall), it
becomes dehydrated. While dehydrated, the
mudwretch can’t Spew Mud, is sickened 2,
and is slowed 1 until it either fully immerses
in water, spends 1 minute in the rain, or
rehydrates in another way (such as via Gory Hydration).
Speed 20 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +10 (agile), Damage 1d8+4 bludgeoning plus Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d8+2 bludgeoning, DC 18
Gory Hydration [reaction] Requirements The mudwretch is dehydrated;
Trigger The mudwretch deals Constrict damage to a living
creature that has blood; Effect The mudwretch squeezes
harder, dealing 1d6 persistent bleed damage to the
target. The mudwretch absorbs this blood, removing
any penalties it had as a result of being dehydrated.
Mud Puddle [one-action] (concentrate) Until it next acts, the
mudwretch appears to be an ordinary puddle of mud.
It has an automatic result of 20 on Deception checks
to pass as a mud puddle and can make a fist Strike
against a creature that walks onto the mud puddle
as a reaction.
Spew Mud[two-actions] (conjuration, primal) The mudwretch
spews a 20-foot line of pressurized mud that
deals 2d10 bludgeoning damage (DC 18 basic
Reflex save). On a critical failure, a creature also
takes a –10-foot status penalty to its Speeds for 1
round. The mudwretch can’t Spew Mud again for 1d4 rounds.
L-N
177
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
NATURAL WARNINGS
Regions haunted by bog mummies
lack small animals, insects, and
other wildlife. A character who is
Investigating, Searching, or Scouting
during exploration mode can attempt
a secret Nature check against the
bog mummy’s Stealth DC to notice
something sinister. A critical success
is enough to specifically suggest the
presence of undead in the area.
Mummy, Bog
The cultural practice of mummifying the dead is not the only way a body can
become preserved, nor is it the only route that gives rise to these disease-spreading
undead monstrosities.
Bog mummies (also called peat mummies or mire mummies) rarely, if ever,
leave their marshy realms. Less powerful than their more notorious artificially
preserved kin, bog mummies are preserved not by agents introduced during rituals
but by the natural elements present in the airless, acidic morass of a peat bog or
muddy swamp. While corpses preserved in this manner can certainly rise from
the mire as bog mummies as the result of a curse by fell powers or the directed
influence of a necromancer, the vast majority of them animate from a seething
need for vengeance or to pursue some dire agenda left unfinished at the time of
death—often because the creature was slain or otherwise betrayed. The nature of
this emotional tie to life and the emotional power of the deceased compel unlife
beyond death, while the preservative qualities of the bog within which the body
was disposed of does the rest.
Although most bog mummies are motivated by vengeance, many fulfill their
dark yearnings with general violence. Filled with wrath and hatred for the
living, they mercilessly attack any living creatures that dare to venture into
their dismal domains. Their agonized moans echo over their putrid homes,
driving away most natural life dwelling therein and often alerting travelers to
the potential danger that lies beneath the surface.
BOG MUMMY CREATURE 5
LE MEDIUM MUMMY UNDEAD
Perception +12; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common, Necril
Skills Athletics +12, Stealth +11 (+13 while buried in a bog)
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +0, Int +0, Wis +1, Cha +0
AC 21; Fort +13, Ref +9, Will +14
HP 85, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease,
paralyzed, poison, unconscious; Weaknesses cold 5; Resistances
fire 5
Breath of the Bog (aura, divine, enchantment, mental) 30 feet.
A creature that begins its turn within the area feels as if its
lungs were filling with water and must succeed at a DC 19 Fortitude save or
be unable to speak or breathe. The creature can still hold its breath and
can attempt a new saving throw at the end of its turn. A creature that
succeeds is temporarily immune to breath of the bog for 24 hours.
Rise Up[reaction] Trigger A creature walks on top of a bog mummy that lies
buried in the mud or peat below; Requirements Initiative has not
yet been rolled; Effect The bog mummy automatically notices
the creature and Burrows before rolling initiative.
Speed 20 feet; burrow 15 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +14, Damage 2d6+5 plus bog rot
Bog Rot (curse, disease, divine, necromancy, negative)
This affliction can’t be reduced below stage 1, nor can
the damage from it be healed, until it’s successfully
treated with remove curse or a similar effect;
the affliction can then be removed as normal
for a disease. A creature killed by bog rot
melts into a noxious sludge and can’t be
resurrected except by a 7th-level resurrect
ritual or similar magic; Saving Throw DC
21 Fortitude; Stage 1 carrier with no ill
effect (1 minute); Stage 2 3d6 negative
damage and clumsy 1 (1 day)
Bestiary 2
178
LUNAR NAGA ADDICTION
Some people enjoy the effects
of lunar naga venom and have
developed ways to enhance the
euphoric qualities through alchemical
refinement. While some merchants
pay nagas for their venom, most hire
hunters to capture and enslave the
creatures. As a result, nagas despise
any humanoid who sells or buys their
venom for any reason. Refined lunar
naga venom is identical in price and
effect to dreamtime tea (Pathfinder
Gamemastery Guide 121).
Naga
Nagas are identifiable by their serpentine bodies and strange, humanlike heads.
All nagas have magical abilities and great intelligence, which they combine to
advance their own agendas.
LUNAR NAGA
Lunar nagas are skilled diviners and astrologers whose dark scales and white hair
sparkle with motes of light that mimic the night skies to which they are forever
drawn. While they are less physically imposing than other nagas, they possess a
graceful beauty that many find entrancing, even without the help of the naga’s
inherent magical abilities. Earning a lunar naga’s trust is difficult, but not impossible,
especially for someone who shares the creature’s interest in the celestial sphere.
As they have no hands, lunar nagas use mage hand to manipulate delicate
instruments and fine telescopes to observe the night sky. They track the positions
of celestial bodies, recording their discoveries in esoteric journals. At their best,
lunar nagas are wise and mysterious beings who seek to expand their knowledge of
the cosmos. At their worst, after too much exposure to the unfathomable entities
that dwell in the darkness between the stars, they become dark prophets who drive
others to commit terrible deeds in the name of abominable masters.
On Golarion, the lunar nagas of the nation of Nagajor use their abilities to
serve many communities as soothsayers. A few have founded observatories in
which they and their followers explore the night sky. Some nagas even use their
knowledge of the stars as navigators on ships or overland caravans. In the broader
world, where people do not give nagas deference as nearly divine rulers, lunar
nagas try to avoid contact with outsiders or use their magical powers of disguise
to hide their true forms from all but their most worthy allies.
LUNAR NAGA CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON N LARGE ABERRATION
Perception +16; darkvision
Languages Aklo, Celestial, Common
Skills Acrobatics +14, Astronomy Lore +11, Deception +15, Diplomacy +15, Nature +13,
Survival +14
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +1, Wis +4, Cha +3
AC 24, Fort +15, Ref +16, Will +17
HP 100
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +16 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6+8 piercing
plus lunar naga venom
Primal Spontaneous Spells DC 24, attack +16; 3rd (4 slots) heal, lightning bolt, slow; 2nd
(4 slots) humanoid form, glitterdust, invisibility, web; 1st (4 slots) charm, fleet step, heal,
spider sting; Cantrips (3rd) dancing lights, daze, detect magic, mage hand, read aura
Hypnosis [two-actions] (concentrate, enchantment, incapacitation,
mental, primal, visual) Frequency once per day;
Effect The lunar naga twists the coils of their
serpentine body, causing the starlike motes on
their scales to shift and move as they glow
brighter, creating a mesmerizing swirl of light
and darkness. All creatures within a 30-foot
emanation must succeed at a DC 21 Will save
or become fascinated until the end of the naga’s
next turn (on a critical failure, fascinated creatures
drop whatever items they are carrying as well). The lunar
naga can Sustain a Spell on Hypnosis. If the naga moves, affected creatures are
compelled to remain within 30 feet of the naga and must spend each of its actions
moving closer to the naga as expediently as possible on its next turn. If a creature
is unable to end its turn within 30 feet of the naga, the effect ends for that creature.
L-N
179
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SPIRIT NAGA COVENS
Like hags, spirit nagas occasionally
form small groups of their own kind.
They normally do this for mutual
protection against a greater threat
or to accomplish a goal that a single
spirit naga cannot complete on their
own. Sometimes, spirit nagas form
a coven to bring groups of cultists
together or take over a city or other
large community, and in rare cases a
spirit naga might even join a hag or
witch coven.
Lunar Naga Venom (poison, sleep) Saving Throw DC 24; Maximum Duration 6 rounds;
Stage 1 stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 2 as stage 1 (1 round); Stage 3 stupefied 2 (1 round);
Stage 4 unconscious (1 round). Once a creature falls unconscious from lunar naga
venom, they remain asleep for 1d8 hours unless woken.
SPIRIT NAGA
In naga culture, the foul-tempered, unkempt spirit naga holds a contemptible place
similar to that of hags in humanoid cultures. These decrepit creatures live out lives
of solitude, sought out only by those who are foolish or brave enough to think they
can benefit from the spirit naga’s powers without paying a heavy price—for most
who dare to show such hubris, the price is their own lives.
Spirit nagas seek out desolate ruins and places long associated with death and
corruption. These sinister, serpentine beings can be found in abandoned graveyards,
crumbled fortresses, rotting swamps, and blighted woodlands. Though they may
know little of the actual history of such places, the nagas are nonetheless attracted to
the psychic remnants of evil deeds and tormented spirits that remain within the earth
and stones there.
Despite their hideous appearance and treatment as pariahs by other nagas, spirit
nagas feel a profound pride in their abilities and even in their hermetic existences.
They see themselves as connected to a greater force whose mysteries are
revealed only to those who can cast off the trappings and morals of
“civilized” society. Even so, spirit nagas gleefully accept the worship
of other creatures willing to bow to their capricious whims. They
often form cults around themselves, using their charm spells and
rituals to ensnare the minds of a few key individuals who spread
the nagas’ foul influence throughout a community.
SPIRIT NAGA CREATURE 9
UNCOMMON NE LARGE ABERRATION
Perception +18; darkvision
Languages Aklo, Common
Skills Acrobatics +18, Athletics +16, Deception +17,
Intimidation +19, Occultism +20, Stealth +20
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +3, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +5
Coven A spirit naga adds hallucination, mind probe, and
suggestion to their coven’s spells.
AC 28; Fort +15, Ref +20, Will +18
HP 160
Speed 25 feet, swim 15 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +19 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d8+9 piercing
plus spirit naga venom
Occult Spontaneous Spells DC 28, attack +20;
5th (3 slots) black tentacles, sending,
subconscious suggestion; 4th (4 slots)
clairvoyance, confusion, fly, modify
memory; 3rd (4 slots) dream
message, mind reading, paralyze,
vampiric touch; 2nd (4 slots) blur,
humanoid form, mirror image,
telekinetic maneuver; 1st (4 slots)
charm, command, grim tendrils,
unseen servant; Cantrips (5th) daze,
detect magic, mage hand, read aura, sigil
Rituals DC 28; inveigle
Spirit Naga Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 28; Maximum Duration 6
rounds; Stage 1 2d6 poison damage and stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 2 2d6
poison damage and stupefied 2 (1 round)
Bestiary 2
180
OTHER NECROPHIDIUSES
Ultimately, a necrophidius’s abilities
are the result of its creators’
designs. Some have different
immunities or have bites that deal
poison, cold, or negative damage
instead of inflicting paralysis. There
are even rumors of soulbound
necrophidiuses whose creators
arranged for the soul of the skull’s
donor to empower the construct.
These necrophidiuses are not only
sentient but also have the facility to
reason and even cast spells.
Necrophidius
Although the necrophidius is a mindless construct with no particular ability to
comprehend the complexities of good or evil, these sinister-looking constructs are
often crafted by evil or macabre creators seeking to imbue their guardians with a
frightening aesthetic.
Constructed from bones harvested from serpents and humans, a necrophidius
is animated by occult magic, not unlife. Each necrophidius is built from the
skeleton of a large snake, but its skull has been replaced by that of a humanoid
creature. Some death cults or particularly cruel crafters seek out the skulls of
specific individuals against whom they bear grudges to provide the head for their
necrophidius. The final step of the construction is the alteration of the teeth and
jaws to give the creature a more serpentine visage, complete with fangs.
If a necrophidius’s creator dies, the construct follows the last series of commands
it was given. If it cannot do so, the necrophidius aimlessly wanders the area near
where it last served its creator and attacks any creatures it encounters. Some believe
that those who know the secrets of a necrophidius’s origins can command it,
provided its original creator no longer exists and no one else currently commands
it. There are also a number of reports concerning strangely aware and intelligent
necrophidiuses that roam with a purpose and track down or hunt specific living
creatures they interpret as the targets of former assassination missions.
NECROPHIDIUS CREATURE 3
N MEDIUM CONSTRUCT MINDLESS
Perception +9, darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +9, Athletics +10, Stealth +9
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +0, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –5
AC 19; Fort +7, Ref +11, Will +9
HP 50; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease, doomed, drained,
fatigued, healing, mental, necromancy, nonlethal attacks, paralyzed,
poison, sickened, unconscious; Weaknesses bludgeoning 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +8 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d10+3 piercing plus
necrophidic paralysis
Dance of Death[three-actions] (enchantment, mental, occult, visual) The
necrophidius sways, its serpentine form undulating and
clattering in a hypnotic rhythm. Each creature that witnesses
the dance must attempt a DC 18 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is
temporarily immune for 24 hours.
Success The creature is unnerved by the swaying
and becomes flat-footed until the end of the
necrophidius’s next turn.
Failure The creature is distracted by the
swaying, becoming stunned 1. After
it recovers, it is flat-footed until the
end of the necrophidius’s next turn.
Critical Failure As failure, but
stunned 3.
Necrophidic Paralysis (incapacitation,
occult, necromancy) A living creature
bitten by a necrophidius must
succeed at a DC 20 Fortitude save or
become paralyzed. It can attempt a new
save at the end of each of its turns, and the
DC cumulatively decreases by 1 for each save
attempted. A creature that succeeds at this save is
temporarily immune to necrophidic paralysis for 24 hours.
L-N
181
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DENEBRUM
Most neothelids on Golarion reside in
the Vault of Derebrum, deep within
the Darklands. Here, in a vast cavern
of fetid pools of stinking swamps
and surreal forests of poisonous
fungi, neothelid hives nestle among
twisted spires of hardened resin that
look as horrific as the monstrous
worms themselves. Tended by armies
of worm-like minions who worship
them as gods, they endlessly plot,
scheme, and wage war.
Neothelid
This gigantic, mauve worm has a hooked mouth with multiple circular bands of
teeth and four barbed tongues. A wielder of terrible occult powers and a vast alien
intellect, the neothelid serves the ageless horrors that dwell in strange dimensions
beyond known reality—the Outer Gods and Great Old Ones of the Elder Mythos.
Neothelids pass down these mysteries to the eerie wormlike creatures they spawn
and create in preparation for a future where the worms below shall rule—a time
when all other life is nothing more than food.
NEOTHELID CREATURE 15
UNCOMMON CE GARGANTUAN ABERRATION
Perception +29; greater darkvision, thoughtsense 100 feet
Languages Aklo, Alghollthu, Undercommon; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +25, Athletics +28, Deception +29, Diplomacy +27, Intimidation +29,
Occultism +29
Str +9, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +8, Wis +6, Cha +8
Thoughtsense (divination, mental, occult) The neothelid uses its mind as a precise sense
at the listed range to notice all non-mindless creatures.
AC 37; Fort +27, Ref +23, Will +29; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 345; Immunities acid; Weaknesses cold iron 15; Resistances mental 15
Dimensional Wormhole [reaction] (conjuration, occult, teleportation) Trigger
A creature the neothelid is aware of uses a teleportation effect;
Effect The neothelid creates an extradimensional wormhole at the
triggering creature’s initial location that persists for up to 1 minute.
If the neothelid moves into the wormhole’s space, the neothelid
teleports to the same destination as the triggering creature.
Speed 30 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +28 (reach 15 feet), Damage 3d12+13 piercing plus
Improved Grab
Melee [one-action] rasping tongue +28 (agile, fatal d10, reach 25 feet),
Damage 3d8+13 slashing
Occult Innate Spells DC 38, attack +30; 8th charm,
suggestion, summon entity; 7th phantasmal
calamity, teleport; 6th scrying (×3),
suggestion (at will); 5th mind probe (at
will), telekinetic haul (at will); Cantrips
(8th) daze, detect magic, mage
hand, telekinetic projectile
Rituals DC 38; geas, inveigle
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (acid, evocation,
occult) The neothelid breathes a
spray of acid that deals 16d6
acid damage in a 60-foot cone
(DC 38 basic Reflex save). The
neothelid can’t use Breath
Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Instant Suggestion [reaction] Trigger A creature fails a Will save
against a spell or effect created by the neothelid; Effect
The neothelid casts a suggestion spell it has available
on the creature that failed its Will save.
Lashing Tongues [two-actions] The neothelid’s four tongues
lash out in a frenzy at several targets. It makes up to
four rasping tongue Strikes, each against a different
target. These attacks count toward the neothelid’s
multiple attack penalty, but the multiple attack penalty
doesn’t increase until after the neothelid makes all of its attacks.
Swallow Whole [one-action] Large, 2d12 bludgeoning plus 2d12 acid, Rupture 27
Bestiary 2
182
NEREID SHAWLS
A nereid’s shawl has Hardness 1
and 4 Hit Points (BT 2). If the shawl
is broken, it no longer grants the
amphibious trait. If it’s destroyed, it
melts away into water, and the nereid
who created it becomes doomed 1
and drained 1. These conditions
values increase by 1 every 2d6 hours
thereafter until it creates a new shawl.
Nereid
Nereids are aquatic fey with deep ties to water. They share some similarities with
naiads, but they are not guardians and do not bind themselves to a specific body
of water. Although they are primarily aquatic creatures, their unique ability to
imbue their vitality into a supernatural shawl allows them to travel on land as
well. A nereid must be careful when manifesting a shawl, however, as their life
essence is bound to it, so it can be stolen or destroyed to threaten the nereid.
Nereids prefer to exist in isolation. Left to their own devices, they avoid combat,
but when forced to fight, their ability to transform the natural waters in their flesh
into poison serves them as well as any weapon.
Often, ignorant sailors lump all water-dwelling fey into a single category of
“aquatic tempters,” regardless of the fey’s type or gender, using these creatures’
names interchangeably to represent the concept of a beautiful figure who exists to
lure mortals to a drowning death. Whereas naiads have more patience and
often seek to educate the ignorant regarding the harm that stereotypes can
cause, nereids and rusalkas have little patience for such methods. Rusalkas
are the primary source for the legends of fey preying upon sailors, and nereids
loathe them for that, as they prefer to live apart from humanity and enjoy the
beauty of the natural world in peace.
When a nereid learns of a rusalka’s increased activity, it often seeks
out the rusalka to route them—not so much out of an urge to protect
humanoids (in whom nereids traditionally have little interest), but to
prevent the rusalka from inadvertently riling up violent responses from
humanoids who can’t be bothered to note the difference between a
murderous fey and one who just wants to be left alone.
NEREID CREATURE 10
CN MEDIUM AQUATIC FEY WATER
Perception +20; low-light vision
Languages Aquan, Common, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +12 (+18 to Swim), Deception +20, Diplomacy +22, Stealth +22
Str +0, Dex +7, Con +5, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +7
AC 30; Fort +16, Ref +22, Will +18
HP 175; Immunities poison; Weaknesses cold iron 10
Watery Transparency (primal, transmutation, water) When
underwater, the nereid’s body is invisible. The nereid can dismiss or
resume this transparency as an action that has the concentrate trait.
Speed 25 feet, swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] poisonous touch +23 (agile, finesse, magical), Damage 6d6 poison
Primal Innate Spells DC 29; 6th summon elemental (water elementals only); 5th
control water, elemental form (×3, water only) 4th suggestion
Drowning Touch[two-actions] (conjuration, incapacitation, primal, water) The nereid touches
a creature and causes water from its own body to flow into the creature’s lungs. If
the creature cannot breathe water, it must attempt a DC 29 Fortitude save.
Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune to Drowning Touch for
24 hours.
Failure The creature becomes sickened 3 as it chokes on the water.
Critical Failure The creature chokes on the water and runs out of air. It falls unconscious
and starts drowning (Pathfinder Core Rulebook 478). If the creature is above water, it
recovers from drowning as soon as it succeeds at a saving throw against suffocation.
Manifest Shawl[three-actions] (conjuration, primal) The nereid divests themself of part of their
connection to the First World and imbues this essence into a flowing shawl that enables
them to function on land. The nereid can Dismiss this effect as long as they are touching
the shawl. As long as the shawl exists, the nereid gains the amphibious trait. A nonnereid who carries the shawl also gains the amphibious trait. If a
nereid’s shawl is destroyed rather than Dismissed, the nereid can’t
Manifest a Shawl for 24 hours.
L-N
183
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
BOG NIXIES
Nixies who dwell in swampy regions
tend to have fouler attitudes and
are more eager to turn to violence.
Known as bog nixies, these evil fey
prefer dwelling in festering swamps
or blighted fens and delight in using
their ability to grant desires to tempt
visitors into acts of unplanned evil.
Nixie
These aquatic fey often guard ponds, rivers, lakes, and springs, protecting their
bucolic homes from the advances of predators and careless humanoids alike.
Nixies tend to be reclusive and try to keep their presence hidden from humanoids,
hoping trespassers won’t give them cause to act. Stories of minor miracles granted
by nixies to those they befriend encourage humanoids to seek out these reclusive
fey, and ironically make it even more unlikely for a nixie to grant such a boon.
On the other hand, if someone approaches a nixie with respect, or even better,
a positive attitude that displays just the right amount of humility and easygoing
openness, a nixie is far more likely to respond positively to any requests for aid.
Often a nixie will ask those who seek their assistance to perform a task for them
first; such requests can be minor acts of entertainment (such as telling a rousing
story or performing a requested song), but in other cases the nixie might need more
significant aid, such as driving off an unwanted local predator or investigating the
source of pollution near their home.
Nixies resort to violence only if no other tactic works. They much prefer
solutions that rely upon primal magic to defuse conflicts before they can escalate
to bloodshed. In pursuit of such resolutions, nixies rely on their ability to charm
individuals and, when they can establish magical influence, encourage intruders to
leave peacefully. While some nixies try to confuse intruders and subtly guide them
from the area, others use local animals and beasts to scare off trespassers.
Occasionally, nixies recruit charmed humanoids to act as protectors or
help with a task that is simply too big for them to deal with. If this task is
underwater, nixies use their magic to temporarily grant the ability to breathe
water to the charmed creature. Only those who manage to befriend a nixie are
given invitations to return to swim or dine with the fey, and only the most
trusted of allies are granted a minor wish.
Nixies appear as aquatic humanoids the size of a child, with large eyes,
catfish-like whiskers, and webbed fingers and toes. They have scaly skin,
pointed ears, and long hair the color of seaweed. Nixies often form small
communities, even building underwater societies if their numbers are great
enough. In many cultures’ folklore, there are stories of nixie nations hidden
at the bottom of particularly large lakes.
NIXIE CREATURE 1
N SMALL AQUATIC FEY
Perception +6; low-light vision
Languages Aquan, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +6, Nature +5, Stealth +8
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +1, Int +0, Wis +1, Cha +4
Wild Empathy The nixie can use Diplomacy to Make an Impression
on and make very simple Requests of aquatic or amphibious
animals.
AC 16; Fort +6, Ref +10, Will +6; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 25; Weaknesses cold iron 3
Speed 20 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6 slashing
Primal Innate Spells DC 17, attack +9; 2nd water breathing; 1st
charm (×3), hydraulic push
Grant Desire [three-actions] (divination, primal) Frequency once
per day; Effect The nixie can duplicate any 1st-level
spell or produce any effect with a power level in
line with a 1st-level spell, but only in response to
the request or desire of a non-fey creature. The
creature whose desire is granted can never
again benefit from that particular nixie’s Grant
Desire ability.
Bestiary 2
184
NORN TRIUMVIRATES
Norns who visit the Material Plane
often do so in groups of three
known as triumvirates. The norns
of a triumvirate can communicate
with each other telepathically over
a planetary distance. Regardless of
their appearance on the First World,
when a norn becomes part of a
triumvirate on the Material Plane,
her apparent age shifts so that in
each group, there always appears to
be one young adult norn, one middleaged norn, and one elderly norn—a
Maiden, a Mother, and a Matriarch.
Norn
Ancient beyond imagining, norns are powerful fey women who hold in their
hands the physical manifestation of fate and destiny in the form of golden thread.
They watch over all life, intervening with reluctance when called upon—or with a
vengeance when the strands of fate are twisted and abused by lesser beings.
Norns’ relationship with the Eldest of the First World is complex. Many among
norns serve Magdh the Three, the triune Eldest who some norns believe to be the
first norn triumvirate bound together into one entity, as Magdh has three bodies:
a Maiden, a Mother, and a Matriarch. Magdh claims to be watching the threads
of fate for some ominous prophesied cataclysm, and in addition to assisting in
her divinations, Magdh expects the norns who serve her to follow her cryptic
commands to help nudge the future away from the brink. However, norns are
powerful beings in their own right, themselves capable of granting divine power,
and many balk at serving the enigmatic demigod. These norns find the other Eldest
even more alien and challenging to interact with, for they believe that while the
Eldest wield great power, even these powerful beings should not be granted leave
to meddle with fate as much as they desire.
While even the weakest of the Eldest could destroy an unaffiliated norn with
ease, they tend to obey the proclamations and judgments of norns when they are
spoken. These norns, for their part, use their perceived neutrality judiciously. They
know better than to issue too many demands to the Eldest, lest the capricious
demigods grow frustrated and tired of norns’ interference. And so the balance of
power remains tenuous between unaffiliated norns and the Eldest, as it has for
eons. However, norns know that it’s merely a matter of time before the Eldest
lose their respect for this tradition and start acting entirely as they please, despite
norns’ best efforts to rein in their most disruptive actions.
A norn stands 14 feet tall and weighs 800 pounds.
WORSHIPPING NORNS
On the Material Plane, some mortals worship norns as deities, while others,
especially witches and bards, admire them as patrons or muses. Those who
uphold norns as deities are known as Followers of Fate. Norns do little to
discourage this veneration, but neither do they go out of their way to support
such worship. Clerics who venerate norns might worship a specific norn or norn
triumvirate, or all norns as a whole, but they gain the same benefits regardless
of their choice. The religious symbol of Followers of Fate is a pair of shears
cutting a golden thread, and their areas of concern are destiny, fate, and the
aging process.
FOLLOWERS OF FATE (LN)
Edicts make predictions of the future, offer advice and guidance to those in positions of
power, provide comfort to the elderly
Anathema apologize for making an incorrect prediction, disrespect mothers, accept
payment for fortune-telling
Follower Alignments LG, LN, LE
Divine Font harm or heal
Divine Skill Occultism
Favored Weapon shears (These uncommon simple weapons cost 5 sp, deal 1d4 slashing
damage, have light Bulk, and require one hand to use. Shears are in the knife weapon
group. They have the deadly d8, finesse, and versatile P traits.)
Domains family, fate, knowledge, truth
Cleric Spells 1st: mindlink, 2nd: web, 5th: prying eye
NORN CREATURE 20
RARE LN LARGE FEY
Perception +41; detect magic, greater darkvision, lifesense 120 feet, true seeing
Languages Common, Jotun, Sylvan; tongues
L-N
185
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
LOST NORNS
When separated from a triumvirate
for too long, a norn on the Material
Plane can grow confused and weak.
Her powers remain strong, but her
ability to interpret fate becomes
skewed and warped. Lost norns
begin to use their abilities for their
own goals rather than serving fate.
A lost norn’s alignment slowly
shifts from lawful neutral to
either lawful evil or lawful good,
depending on how she interprets
her visions.
Skills Crafting +36, Deception +35, Intimidation +37, Lore (all) +28, Medicine +38,
Occultism +34, Performance +31, Religion +34
Str +7, Dex +6, Con +6, Int +6, Wis +10, Cha +7
Sense Fate (fortune) A norn automatically rolls a 20 when she rolls initiative.
Triumvirate This functions as the coven ability (page 304), except only norns can join
a triumvirate, and it functions only as long as exactly three norns are part of the
triumvirate. A triumvirate grants the following spells: alter reality (once per day),
cataclysm, discern location, foresight, and revival.
AC 46; Fort +34, Ref +30, Will +38; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 375, regeneration 20 (deactivated by cold iron); Immunities flat-footed, negative;
Weaknesses cold iron 20
Speed 35 feet, fly 35 feet
Melee [one-action] norn shears +38 (deadly 2d12, magical, reach 10 feet, versatile P), Damage
4d6+15 slashing plus 5d6 negative and sever fate
Melee [one-action] hand of fate +38 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 4d10+15 negative plus
sever fate
Occult Innate Spells DC 42; 10th time stop; 9th power word kill, retrocognition, weird; 8th
maze, wind walk; 7th dispel magic (at will), read omens (at will), spellwrack (at will);
Constant (10th) detect magic, mind blank, tongues, true seeing
Rituals DC 42; geas, legend lore
Fated When a creature is subject to a fortune effect from a norn and a
misfortune effect from any source other than a norn (or vice versa), the
norn’s effect automatically counteracts the other effect and then takes
place normally, rather than the two effects canceling
each other out. If both the fortune and misfortune
effect are from a norn, then the two cancel each
other out as normal. At the GM’s discretion,
powerful entities related to fate or luck, like
Desna, Magdh, or Pharasma, count as a norn for
the purpose of this ability.
Sever Fate (necromancy, occult) When a norn deals
negative damage with a Strike, she regains 10 Hit
Points. The target must succeed at a DC 39 Fortitude
save or become drained 1 (drained 2 on a critical failure).
Further negative damage dealt by the norn increases
the drained condition value by 1 on a failed save (or by 2
on a critical failure), to a maximum of drained 4.
Shift Fate [reaction] (divination, occult) Trigger A creature within 120
feet attempts a saving throw; Effect The creature rolls the
saving throw twice, and then the norn decides which
result applies. If the norn chooses the lower roll, this is
a misfortune effect; if she chooses the higher roll, it’s
a fortune effect; if they’re the same, she decides
which trait to apply.
Snip Thread [two-actions] (death, manipulate, necromancy,
occult) Frequency three times per day; Effect The
norn produces a golden thread linked to the fate
of a creature within 100 feet of her, then snips
it short with her shears. The target takes 100
negative damage (DC 42 basic Fortitude save). If
the target is reduced to 0 Hit Points from this
damage, the thread is completely severed and the
creature dies immediately. A creature slain by Snip
Thread can’t be restored to life except by miracle, wish,
or similarly powerful magic; or by divine intervention. Regardless of the outcome
of their saving throw, a creature targeted by Snip Thread then becomes temporarily
immune for 24 hours. The norn can’t use Snip Thread again for 1d4 rounds.
Bestiary 2
186
UNFORTUNATE VICTIMS
Nuckelavees are equally delighted to
murder and feed upon both hapless
peasants and altruistic naturalists
engaged in the process of cleaning
up pollution. Indeed, those who
would seek to purify such sites
are often regarded as the greater
threat by a nuckelavee, as without a
befouled land to dwell in, the foul fey
would wither away.
Nuckelavee
When pollution despoils a natural waterway, it draws the dreaded nuckelavee to
it from the First World. This spirit of wrath is a grisly sight to behold: a horselike
monstrosity with the gnarled upper body of a humanoid growing directly from its
back. Further enhancing the awfulness, not a patch of skin exists on the misshapen
hybrid form, as though it survived its own flaying.
When a nuckelavee rides forth from its domain, it wreaks a trail of destruction
across the lands surrounding its path. Nuckelavees are considered among the
cruelest and most monstrous fey, seen by some as just desserts visited upon those
who would befoul the waters of their homes. A nuckelavee, though, doesn’t
discriminate between those who pollute and those who merely have the misfortune
to be in the wrong place at the wrong time.
NUCKELAVEE CREATURE 9
NE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS FEY
Perception +16; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +19, Intimidation +19, Nature +16, Stealth +18,
Survival +16
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +4
Items +1 striking bastard sword
AC 28; Fort +19, Ref +16, Will +20
HP 190; Immunities disease, poison; Weaknesses cold iron 10
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 30 feet, DC 25
Purity Vulnerability Unpolluted fresh water burns a
nuckelavee like acid, dealing 1d6 damage to it and
causing it to be sickened 2. A nuckelavee can’t heal
from damage when it’s in an area that isn’t polluted
(subject to GM discretion).
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed 40 feet, swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] bastard sword +21 (magical, reach 10 feet,
two-hand d12), Damage 2d8+12 slashing plus
1d6 poison and mortasheen
Melee [one-action] jaws +20 (agile), Damage 2d8+12
piercing plus 1d6 poison and mortasheen
Melee [one-action] hoof +20, Damage 2d6+12
bludgeoning plus mortasheen
Primal Innate Spells DC 28; 5th control water; 3rd
stinking cloud
Rituals DC 28; blight
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (disease, necromancy,
poison, primal) The nuckelavee breathes a
30-foot cone of foulness, dealing 8d6
negative damage (DC 28 basic Fortitude
save) to living creatures in the area.
A creature that fails also takes
2d6 persistent bleed damage.
The nuckelavee can’t use Breath
Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Mortasheen (disease) The target can’t recover
from the fatigued condition caused by
mortasheen until the disease is cured. Mortasheen
gains the virulent trait against animals and plants;
Saving Throw DC 28 Fortitude; Stage 1 Carrier with no ill effect (1 day); Stage 2
drained 1 and fatigued (1 day); Stage 3 drained 2 and fatigued (1 day); Stage 4 dead
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, hoof, DC 28
O-R
187
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OCTOPUS SPECIES
The octopuses presented here
are smaller versions of the much
larger giant octopus, but other
species exist as well. The brightly
colored seafire octopus occupies
a predatory niche somewhere
between the reef octopus and giant
octopus—its bite injects a venom
that causes a painful rash and
nausea. The immense grisly octopus
is among the largest of its kind. It
can swallow humans whole and can
squirt particularly sticky crimson
ink to incapacitate prey.
Octopus
These cunning marine animals live in a variety of ocean habitats.
BLUE-RINGED OCTOPUS
While relatively small, the blue-ringed octopus is particularly venomous for its size.
BLUE-RINGED OCTOPUS CREATURE 0
N TINY ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +6; low-light vision
Skills Athletics +6, Stealth +7
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 16; Fort +3, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 15; Resistances cold 2
Speed swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +7 (finesse), Damage 1d6 piercing plus blue-ringed octopus venom
Melee [one-action] arms +6, Effect Grab
Blue-Ringed Octopus Venom (poison); Saving Throw DC 17 Fortitude; Maximum Duration
6 rounds; Stage 1 1d4 poison damage (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage (1 round);
Stage 3 1d6 poison damage and paralyzed (1 round)
Camouflage The blue-ringed octopus can change the color of its skin to Hide even if it
doesn’t have cover.
Jet [two-actions] The blue-ringed octopus moves up to 60 feet in a straight line through the water
without triggering reactions.
Toxic Bite [one-action] Requirements The blue-ringed octopus has a creature grabbed; Effect The
blue-ringed octopus makes a beak Strike against the grabbed creature. If it hits, it
injects additional poison, causing its venom to gain the virulent trait.
REEF OCTOPUS
The common reef octopus is a risky but valuable catch for coastal fishers.
REEF OCTOPUS CREATURE 1
N SMALL ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +7; low-light vision
Skills Athletics +6, Stealth +9
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha +0
AC 17; Fort +6, Ref +9, Will +7
HP 20; Resistances cold 3
Speed 10 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee[one-action] beak +9 (finesse), Damage 1d10+1 piercing plus reef octopus venom
Melee [one-action] arm +9 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6+1 bludgeoning plus Grab
Camouflage As blue-ringed octopus.
Ink Cloud [one-action] The reef octopus emits a cloud of dark-brown ink in a 10-foot
emanation. This cloud has no effect outside of
water. Creatures inside the cloud are hidden
and can’t use their sense of smell. The cloud
dissipates after 1 minute. The octopus can’t
use Ink Cloud again for 2d6 rounds.
Jet[two-actions] As blue-ringed octopus, but 80 feet.
Reef Octopus Venom (poison); Saving Throw DC 17
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage
1 1d4 poison damage and flat-footed (1 round);
Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and flat-footed (1
round); Stage 3 1d8 poison damage and flat-footed (1 round)
Writhing Arms [two-actions] The reef octopus makes up to four arm Strikes
with different arms, each against a different target. These attacks
count toward the octopus’s multiple attack penalty, but the multiple
attack penalty doesn’t increase until after it makes all of its attacks.
Bestiary 2
188
ONI ORIGINS
The first oni originated in the nation
of Minkai on the continent of Tian Xia.
Whether due to prevalent local kami—
particularly in the mist-shrouded
Forest of Spirits—or its peoples’ faiths,
Minkai is a hotbed of oni activity.
Oni
Not all divine creations are meant to live as mortals. Some spirits are created as
guardians instead, tasked as protectors of elements of nature that cannot protect
themselves. When these spirits accept their divine place in the metacosmos and take
on such charges, they become kami. But some of these spirits are willful, obstinate,
or simply rotten, railing against such demands from the gods and becoming bodiless
and unable to interact with the world they can torturously still observe. Others
receive such punishment simply for failing at their duty, and their despair at their
condition twists them like those that began with a seed of darkness. When these
spirits look upon mortal lives and become overcome with envy of the flesh and
pleasure that humanoids can revel in, they form surrogate bodies of their own and
become monsters known collectively as oni.
When an oni manifests, they always do so in a form that parodies a specific
humanoid ancestry closely associated with the oni’s obsessions and envies.
Giants’ over-the-top personalities and sizes are likely the reason why these
humanoids are the most common incarnations chosen by oni; such oni
are known collectively as yai oni. Yet there exist oni
associated with almost every kind of humanoid.
Most oni are capable of supernaturally disguising
themselves as their associated humanoid type and use
this ability to infiltrate societies and seize control
from within. Once established, oni typically reveal
their true form and revel in dominating those they
view as lesser beings fit only to serve their whims.
Oni are nothing if not vain. They typically
choose comely or striking appearances in their
humanoid disguises—forms that are completely
at odds with the ugliness of their true natures. An
oni’s true form is indicative of their innermost
desires and always has features such as oversized
teeth that verge into tusks, sharp claws, unusually
bright skin colors, or a third eye in the forehead. Oni
have desires as varied as those of any being, though
by their nature these desires are almost always for
hedonistic or destructive experiences of the flesh,
typically food, pleasure, or violence.
ONIDOSHI
Onidoshi, or ogre mages, are oni with
the material form of an ogre. Onidoshi’s
supernatural prowess and overwhelming intellect
are enough to awe and cow entire families of
rank-and-file ogres. Because of this, onidoshi are
often found at the head of ogre war parties or
orchestrating these violent campaigns from behind
the scenes. It’s rare for onidoshi to lead solitary
existences, but those who do prefer to maraud the
countryside or exploit villages and hoard the spoils
for themselves.
ONIDOSHI CREATURE 8
LE LARGE FIEND GIANT HUMANOID ONI
Perception +17; darkvision
Languages Common, Jotun
Skills Acrobatics +15, Arcana +13, Athletics +16, Deception +18,
Intimidation +18, Nature +17
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +3, Wis +3, Cha +4
O-R
189
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ONI SHAPECHANGERS
Oni humanoid forms are limited to one
specific appearance. An ogre mage can
assume only one specific ogre form,
while an ice yai can appear only as
one specific frost giant. Some oni have
greater control over their shapeshifting
power and can assume the form of any
humanoid creature, and these oni tend
to be the most dangerous.
Items breastplate, composite shortbow with 20 arrows, +1 striking falchion
AC 27; Fort +18, Ref +15, Will +15; +1 status on all saves vs. magic
HP 125, regeneration 7 (deactivated by acid or fire)
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed 30 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] falchion +21 (forceful, magical, reach 10 feet, sweep), Damage 2d10+9 slashing
Melee [one-action] fist +20 (agile, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+9 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] composite shortbow +17 (deadly 1d10, range increment 100 feet, reload 0),
Damage 2d6+9 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 24; 5th cone of cold; 4th charm, gaseous form, sleep; 3rd fear;
2nd darkness, invisibility (at will, self only)
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) The onidoshi takes on
the appearance of an ogre. This doesn’t change their Speed or Strike attack and damage.
ICE YAI
Ice yai combine the brutality of frost giants with the grace of martial artists. More
than any other oni, ice yai delight not in the pleasures of the flesh, but in flesh
itself—rather than indulging in oft-destructive mortal vices like drink or lust, ice
yai pursue physical perfection, reveling in the process of turning their bodies into
powerful fighting machines.
ICE YAI CREATURE 13
CE LARGE COLD FIEND GIANT HUMANOID ONI
Perception +26; greater darkvision
Languages Common, Jotun
Skills Acrobatics +24, Arcana +23, Athletics +25, Deception +27,
Intimidation +27, Nature +24, Stealth +26
Str +8, Dex +5, Con +5, Int +4, Wis +5, Cha +8
AC 34; Fort +21, Ref +25, Will +23; +1 status on all saves vs. magic
HP 230, regeneration 15 (deactivated by acid or fire); Immunities
cold; Weaknesses fire 15
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Icy Deflection[reaction] Trigger The ice yai is targeted by a ranged Strike
or spell attack roll that doesn’t have the fire trait; Effect The ice
yai creates a reflective blockade of ice, gaining a +4 circumstance
bonus to AC against the triggering attack roll. If the attack misses,
the ice yai redirects the attack to another creature within 20 feet
of the yai. The attacker rerolls the attack roll against the new target.
Speed 40 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +27 (agile, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+16
bludgeoning plus 2d6 cold and frozen strike
Ranged [one-action] ice missile +25 (cold, evil, magical, range increment 60 feet),
Damage 2d10+12 cold and frozen strike
Primal Innate Spells DC 33; 7th cone of cold, wall of ice; 6th cone of
cold (×3); 4th charm (×3), darkness, gaseous form, solid fog; 2nd
invisibility (at will, self only)
Change Shape[one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation)
As onidoshi, but into a frost giant.
Double Punch [one-action] Frequency once per round; Effect The ice
yai makes two fist Strikes.
Frozen Strike On a critical hit with a fist Strike or a hit
with an ice missile Strike, the target creature must
attempt a DC 33 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is slowed 2 for 1 round.
Critical Failure The creature is slowed 3 for 1 round.
Bestiary 2
190
OTHER ONI
Different oni exist for nearly every
humanoid ancestry. Kuwa oni mask
their golden skin and four-fingered
claws in human form, while ja oni
hide as hobgoblins. Other yai include
wind yai (who take their form from
cloud giants) and the immensely
powerful void yai (who form from
other yai and ascend to rule over
rune giants).
FIRE YAI
Fire yai take the form of fire giants. Like fire giants, fire yai are shrewd and
militaristic and have an incredible appetite for the thrill of war. While they engage
in battle to conquer and control others, fire yai also love the thrill of war, fighting
for the sheer joy of it. Presenting a fire yai with a true challenge in combat can
potentially earn their mercy and an offer to join and serve at their side. Fire yai’s
third eyes shoot forth burning missiles of fire.
FIRE YAI CREATURE 14
NE LARGE FIEND FIRE GIANT HUMANOID ONI
Perception +26; greater darkvision
Languages Common, Jotun
Skills Acrobatics +23, Arcana +23, Athletics +27, Crafting +25, Deception +27,
Intimidation +27, Nature +25
Str +8, Dex +6, Con +6, Int +4, Wis +6, Cha +8
Items +1 resilient breastplate, +2 striking katana
AC 36; Fort +28, Ref +26, Will +24; +1 status on all saves vs. magic
HP 250, regeneration 15 (deactivated by acid or cold); Immunities fire; Weaknesses
cold 15
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed 40 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] katana +30 (deadly 1d8, magical, reach 10 feet, two-hand
d10, versatile P), Damage 2d6+16 slashing plus 2d6 fire
Melee [one-action] fist +28 (agile, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d6+16 bludgeoning plus 2d6 fire and 2d6 persistent fire
Ranged [one-action] fire missile +26 (evil, fire, magical, range
increment 60 feet), Damage 2d10+16 fire plus 2d6
persistent fire
Primal Innate Spells DC 34; 7th fireball, fiery body,
flame strike, wall of fire; 6th fireball (×3); 4th
charm (×3), darkness, gaseous form; 2nd
invisibility (at will, self only)
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph,
primal, transmutation) As onidoshi,
but into a fire giant.
Impaling Push [two-actions] The fire yai attempts
a katana Strike. If it hits, the fire yai attempts an Athletics check
against the target creature’s Fortitude DC.
Critical Success The fire yai Strides or Flies up to half its Speed in
any direction. The struck creature takes 4d6 persistent
bleed damage and is pushed along with the yai an equal
distance. The creature is grabbed until the yai’s next
turn or until the yai makes a katana Strike.
Success As critical success, but the creature
takes 2d6 persistent bleed damage.
Failure The struck creature is pushed back 5 feet.
Critical Failure The struck creature is unaffected.
Smoke Form [two-actions] (concentrate, primal, transmutation)
The fire yai transforms into a cloud of smoke and then
Flies up to its fly speed. This movement does not trigger
reactions, and the fire yai can move through spaces occupied
by other creatures. The fire yai returns to its physical form
after this move, and must end the movement in a space in which
it can fit. All creatures in spaces through which the fire yai moves
with Smoke Form must succeed at a DC 34 Fortitude save or
become sickened 3. The fire yai cannot use Smoke Form
for 1d4 rounds.
O-R
191
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ONI DAIMYO
Oni daimyo are quasi-deities with
isolated mortal domains. The most
powerful is Inma, the Empress of the
World, but Akuma the Horned King,
Murona the Dark Mother, and Nataka
the Red King are also worshipped.
WATER YAI
Among the most powerful yai are those who emulate the form of storm giants.
Rather than lord over their giant-kin like most oni, though, water yai prefer to
lurk alone in the world’s oceans (or, much more rarely, large and remote freshwater lakes). When a water yai must interact with mortals beneath the waves, they
prefer to do so while disguised as a storm giant. Water yai pursue the acquisition
of material wealth and riches above all other interests, garbing themselves in
richly colored, magically waterproofed kimonos and adorning their monstrous
faces with all manner of jewelry. These yai can infuse their kimonos with eerie
magical properties, and in combat, they can also fire bolts of electricity from their
third eye.
WATER YAI CREATURE 17
CE HUGE FIEND GIANT HUMANOID ONI WATER
Perception +32; greater darkvision
Languages Common, Jotun
Skills Acrobatics +30, Arcana +29, Athletics +33, Deception
+32, Intimidation +32, Nature +29, Performance +33
Str +9, Dex +6, Con +6, Int +5, Wis +9, Cha +6
Items +2 greater striking longspear
AC 40; Fort +27, Ref +29, Will +34; +1 status on all saves vs.
magical
HP 295, regeneration 15 (deactivated by acid and fire); Immunities
electricity
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Shocking Douse [reaction] Trigger A creature within 100 feet casts a fire
spell; Effect The water yai flourishes their kimono and attempts a
Performance check to counteract the spell before it comes into effect. If
the yai counters the spell, the triggering creature takes 9d6 electricity
damage from electrified water that sprays from the kimono (DC 35
basic Reflex save).
Speed 40 feet, fly 40 feet, swim 50 feet; water walk
Melee [one-action] longspear +35 (evil, magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d8+15
piercing plus 2d6 electricity
Melee [one-action] kimono +33 (electricity, evil, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage
3d12+12 electricity plus Enveloping Kimono
Melee [one-action] fist +33 (agile, evil, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+15
bludgeoning plus 2d6 electricity
Ranged [one-action] electric missile +30 (electricity, evil, magical, range increment
60 feet), Damage 3d12+12 electricity plus flat-footed for 1 round
Primal Innate Spells DC 38; 9th chain lightning, horrid wilting; 8th hydraulic
torrent; 5th control water (at will); 4th charm (×3), darkness; 2nd invisibility
(at will, self only); Constant (9th) water walk
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) As onidoshi,
but into a storm giant. The yai can also turn into a puddle of water, with the
effects of gaseous form except they retain their land Speed, double their swim
Speed, and can’t fly.
Enveloping Kimono [one-action] (electricity, manipulate, primal, transmutation, water)
Requirements The water yai’s last action was a successful kimono Strike;
Effect The water yai extends a portion of their kimono to attempt to envelop
a creature within 15 feet. The water yai must attempt a Performance check
against the creature’s Reflex DC.
Critical Success The creature takes 20d6 electricity damage and is grabbed
until the end of its next turn.
Success As critical success, but only 10d6 electricity damage.
Failure The target takes 5d6 electricity damage but is not grabbed.
Critical Failure The target is unaffected.
Bestiary 2
192
AMOEBAS LARGE AND SMALL
Giant amoebas and amoeba swarms
are usually found near each other,
as the two oozes are part of the
same life cycle. When a giant
amoeba grows large enough, it can
spontaneously split apart into two
separate amoeba swarms, and when
an amoeba swarm feeds enough,
its individual components can fuse
together into a single creature.
Ooze
Due to their bizarre physical structures and ability to break down and feed on a
wide variety of materials, oozes are able to adapt to nearly any climate, especially
when assisted by magical or alchemical tinkering. As a result, explorers frequently
encounter new and terrifying varieties of these amorphous creatures.
AMOEBA SWARM
An amoeba swarm consists of thousands of individual single-celled organisms
held together by acrid-smelling slime. As ravenous as they are mindless, amoeba
swarms use no tactics.
AMOEBA SWARM CREATURE 1
N LARGE AMPHIBIOUS MINDLESS OOZE SWARM
Perception +3; motion sense 60 feet, no vision
Skills Stealth +1 (+3 in water)
Str +0, Dex –2, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Motion Sense An amoeba swarm can sense nearby creatures through vibration and air
or water movement.
AC 9; Fort +8, Ref +1, Will +3
HP 35; Immunities acid, critical hits, mental, precision, unconscious, visual; Weaknesses
area 3, fire 3, splash damage 3; Resistances slashing 4, piercing 4
Speed 5 feet, climb 5 feet, swim 10 feet
Swarming Slither [one-action] The amoeba swarm slithers over each creature in its space, dealing
1d6 acid damage (DC 14 basic Reflex save). A creature that critically fails is sickened 1.
Weak Acid An amoeba’s acid damages only organic material—not metal, stone, or other
inorganic substances.
GIANT AMOEBA
These blobs of nearly transparent protoplasm are identical in form and behavior
to the microscopic creatures from which they have evolved, except their
outlandish size makes them all the more dangerous. Unlike slimes, puddings, and
other deadly oozes, giant amoebas have an outer membrane that contains their
internal structures, making them more susceptible to slashing weapons than their
amorphous kin. However, this membrane is also extremely flexible and permeable,
allowing them to surround prey and absorb it, suffocating and slowly digesting it
in the amoeba’s acidic fluids.
GIANT AMOEBA CREATURE 1
N SMALL AMPHIBIOUS MINDLESS OOZE
Perception +4; motion sense 60 feet, no vision
Skills Athletics +6, Stealth +3
Str +3, Dex –2, Con +2, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Motion Sense As amoeba swarm.
AC 8; Fort +7, Ref +3, Will +5
HP 45; Immunities acid, critical hits,
mental, precision, unconscious, visual;
Weaknesses slashing 5
Speed 10 feet, climb 10 feet, swim 10 feet
Melee [one-action] pseudopod +8, Damage 1d6 acid
plus Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d4 bludgeoning plus 1d4 acid,
DC 17
Envelop [three-actions] Requirements The giant
amoeba begins its turn with a target its
size or smaller grabbed; Effect The giant
amoeba maintains the Grab and extends
pseudopods to surround the creature and pull it inside 
O-R
193
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SLIME MOLD FUNGI
The particularly foul environments
in which slime molds dwell are
conducive to the growth of extremely
potent and dangerous mushrooms
and other fungi. A dead slime mold
can be a source of enough materials
to produce a few doses of deathcap
powder or other types of poison.
Some creatures, such as deros or
those with inherent immunity to
disease, cultivate slime molds in order
to harvest these materials.
the amoeba’s body. This thereafter has the same effect as if the amoeba had Engulfed
the creature (DC 17, 1d6 acid, Escape DC 17, Rupture 3).
Weak Acid As amoeba swarm.
SLIME MOLD
A slime mold appears as a mound of earth and detritus covered in a thick
layer of fungus that exudes a faint stink of decay. The fungus actually shares
a symbiotic relationship with the slime mold, serving as an external digestive
system while gaining access to the nutrients it needs. The ooze remains
perfectly still until living prey passes within reach, then it lashes out with
disgusting pseudopods. With a touch, a slime mold can infect its prey with
a foul contagion known as slime rot, a horrific disease that painfully breaks
down a victim’s flesh. At first, the disease manifests as painful rashes and
agonized joints. In the later stages, though, the flesh of the affected creature
actually begins to liquefy and run in rivulets as the creature’s spores continue
to work. Death, when it occurs, swiftly causes the resulting body to split open
and release a brand new slime mold.
SLIME MOLD CREATURE 2
N LARGE FUNGUS MINDLESS OOZE
Perception +6; motion sense 60 feet, no vision
Skills Athletics +7, Stealth +6 (+8 amid decaying plant matter or fungus)
Str +3, Dex +0, Con +5, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Motion Sense As amoeba swarm.
AC 12; Fort +11, Ref +3, Will +4
HP 60; Immunities critical hits, mental, precision, unconscious, visual
Speed 10 feet, climb 10 feet
Melee [one-action] pseudopod +8, Damage 1d8+3 bludgeoning plus slime rot
Slime Rot (disease) Saving Throw DC 18 Fortitude; Onset 1d4 days; Stage 1 enfeebled 1
and sickened 1 (1 day); Stage 2 as stage 1 (1 day); Stage 3 drained 1, enfeebled 2, and
sickened 2 (1 day); Stage 4 as stage 3 (1 day); Stage 5 drained 2 plus unconscious (no
Perception check to wake up) (1 day); Stage 6 dead, and the body erupts to release a
new slime mold
GRAY OOZE
These dangerous oozes are the bane of any who travel through swamps, marshes,
or damp caves. Easily masquerading as pools of clear water or
patches of wet stone, gray oozes lie in wait for unwary victims
to reach down for a drink or step into what
appears to be a puddle, then lash out
with whiplike pseudopods to ensnare
and consume their hapless prey.
Bestiary 2
194
GRAY OOZE ADAPTABILITY
Gray oozes have shown the astounding
ability to overcome environmental
challenges by changing their qualities.
For example, some gray oozes have
adapted to fully aquatic environments,
replacing their movement with a swim
speed and gaining a paralytic poison
similar to that of gelatinous cubes.
Other gray oozes have become charged
with psychic energy, gaining the ability
to cause nearby creatures to become
confused, fascinated, or frightened for
a short time.
GRAY OOZE CREATURE 4
N MEDIUM MINDLESS OOZE
Perception +8; motion sense 60 feet, no vision
Skills Athletics +11, Stealth +10 (+12 in moist environments)
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Motion Sense As amoeba swarm.
Puddled Ambush [reaction] Trigger A creature enters a space occupied by a gray ooze;
Requirements Initiative has not yet been rolled; Effect The gray ooze automatically
notices the creature, then makes a pseudopod Strike against one creature adjacent to
itself before rolling initiative.
AC 14; Fort +12, Ref +10, Will +8
HP 60; Immunities acid, critical hits, mental, precision, unconscious, visual; Resistances
slashing 5, piercing 5
Speed 10 feet, climb 10 feet
Melee [one-action] pseudopod +13 (agile), Damage 1d6+5 bludgeoning plus 1d6 acid and Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d6 bludgeoning plus 1d6 acid, DC 21
Gray Ooze Acid A gray ooze’s acid damages only metal and organic materials, not stone.
VERDUROUS OOZE
Verdurous oozes are found in temperate forests, warm jungles, or other places
where plant life grows in abundance. Unlike many types of oozes, verdurous oozes
are not particularly good climbers and have been known to get trapped in natural or
artificial chasms. Warlords and wizards sometimes make use of that fact and keep
verdurous oozes as guardians in pits around the walls of their fortresses or towers.
VERDUROUS OOZE CREATURE 6
N MEDIUM MINDLESS OOZE
Perception +8; motion sense 60 feet, no vision
Skills Athletics +15, Stealth +4 (+10 in tall grass or undergrowth)
Str +5, Dex –4, Con +5, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Motion Sense As amoeba swarm.
AC 12; Fort +17, Ref +8, Will +10
HP 157; Immunities acid, critical hits, mental, piercing, precision,
slashing, unconscious, visual
Corrosive Surface A creature that hits a verdurous ooze with a
metal weapon or unarmed attack must attempt a DC 21 Reflex
save. On a failure, the weapon or creature takes 2d4 acid damage
(after dealing damage to the ooze as normal). Thrown weapons
take this damage automatically with no save.
Enliven Foliage (aura, primal, transmutation) 20 feet. The verdurous
ooze constantly emits supernatural vapors that cause nearby plants
to grow rapidly and writhe and grasp at anything and everything
within the emanation. This area becomes difficult terrain for
non–verdurous ooze creatures. When a creature starts its
turn in this aura, it must succeed at a DC 21 Reflex save
or take a –10-foot circumstance penalty to its Speeds
until it leaves the emanation.
Split When a verdurous ooze that has 10 or more
HP is hit by an attack that would deal piercing or
slashing damage, it splits into two identical oozes,
each with half the original’s HP. One ooze is in the
same space as the original, and the other is in an adjacent,
unoccupied space. If no adjacent space is unoccupied, it
automatically pushes creatures and objects out of the way to fill a
space (the GM decides if an object or creature is too big or heavy to push).
Speed 15 feet
Melee [one-action] pseudopod +15, Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning plus 1d6 acid and Grab
O-R
195
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
VERDUROUS CONGREGATION
When verdurous oozes gather in
sufficient number, they can merge
together into conjoined forms.
These enlarged blobs develop red
and white connecting vessels that
pulse hideously as thick, green fluid
moves within them. While conjoined,
the oozes move as one creature.
Their usual enliven foliage and
sleep gas auras double in size, and
they become even more aggressive,
feeding voraciously on any metal or
flesh they can find.
Constrict [one-action] 2d6 bludgeoning plus 1d6 acid, DC 24
Sleep Gas[two-actions] (incapacitation, mental, poison, sleep) The verdurous ooze adjusts its aura
of supernatural vapors to affect living creatures within a 20-foot emanation, forcing
them to attempt a DC 24 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and becomes temporarily immune to Sleep
Gas for 24 hours.
Success The creature is stupefied 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature falls unconscious. If it’s still unconscious after 1 minute, it wakes
up automatically.
Critical Failure The creature falls unconscious. If it’s still unconscious after 1 hour, it
wakes up automatically.
Verdurous Ooze Acid A verdurous ooze’s acid damages only metal and flesh—not bone,
stone, or other materials.
CARNIVOROUS BLOB
Carnivorous blobs are the ravenous spawn of shattered worlds far beyond the
stars, born across the galaxy in inert form until they fall like meteorites onto
unsuspecting worlds. These massive beings can lie dormant
for years in desolate caverns or barren wastelands. When
a carnivorous blob perceives living creatures nearby, it
lurches to gelatinous life, seeking out and consuming
every creature it can catch until it is destroyed or until
it has been unable to locate food for 24 hours, at
which point it returns to hibernation. Often, keeping
food away from a carnivorous blob is the safest way
to defeat it. The blob’s ability to split into smaller
oozes that might stay hidden after a fight means it can
be hard to fully eradicate these mindless predators.
CARNIVOROUS BLOB CREATURE 13
N GARGANTUAN MINDLESS OOZE
Perception +23; motion sense 240 feet, no vision
Skills Athletics +27
Str +8, Dex –3, Con +6, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –5
Motion Sense As amoeba swarm.
AC 20; Fort +25, Ref +14, Will +19
HP 300; Immunities acid, critical hits, mental, piercing,
precision, slashing, sonic, unconscious, visual
Split As verdurous ooze.
Reactive Strikes [reaction] Trigger The carnivorous blob takes
damage from any source; Effect The blob makes a
pseudopod Strike against an adjacent target. If an
adjacent creature dealt the triggering damage, that
creature is the target of this Reactive Strike.
Speed 20 feet, climb 20 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee [one-action] pseudopod +26 (reach 30 feet), Damage
2d12+12 bludgeoning plus 2d6 acid and Grab
Carnivorous Blob Acid A carnivorous blob’s acid damages
only flesh—not bone, stone, wood, or other materials—
but is nonetheless devastating. Whenever a creature
takes damage from this acid, it must succeed at a
DC 33 Fortitude save or become drained 1 (drained 2
on a critical failure). On each subsequent failure, the
drained condition value increases by 1 (or by 2 on a
critical failure), to a maximum of drained 4.
Constrict [one-action] 2d12 bludgeoning plus 2d6 acid, DC 33
Engulf[two-actions] DC 33, 4d10 acid, Escape DC 33, Rupture 20
Bestiary 2
196
PELUDA PATRONS
Occasionally a particularly cunning
band of humanoids—typically
lizardfolk or orcs—finds a way to
assuage a local peluda’s temper
and then elevate the dragon to the
status of a local liege, patron, or even
object of worship. Although peludas
rarely have any actual affection
for such servants, they revel in
the submission of these weaker
creatures and the gifts of gold and
food they bring.
Peluda
Peludas are wild and savage dragons that favor reedy marshlands, sparsely
forested bogs, and river valleys for lairs. A single peluda typically claims a stretch
of waterways a few miles in length, then systematically drives off any potential
rivals so that the peluda can despoil the land as they please, leaving clawed
footprints on muddy riverbanks, toppling trees, and impaling half-eaten corpses
on their quills as trophies left to rot. They venture beyond their domains to hunt,
roasting prey with their breath or pulverizing them with their tails, burning and
killing for cruel sport before slithering, sated, back to their mucky lairs.
Peludas despise weakness and loathe creatures smaller than themselves,
especially humanoids, whom they see as fragile and soft, good only for eating or
breaking. In contrast, peludas have a massive inferiority complex regarding more
impressive creatures—especially larger and stronger dragons. Peludas will try
anything to become stronger, including ingesting shiny coins, gems, and jewelry,
which old folk tales claim will strengthen their quills and fire breath.
PELUDA CREATURE 10
LE LARGE DRAGON FIRE
Perception +21; darkvision
Languages Draconic
Skills Athletics +23, Intimidation +19
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +5, Int –2, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 30; Fort +21, Ref +17, Will +19; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 170; Immunities fire, paralyzed, sleep
Vulnerable Tail If the peluda takes 30 or more slashing damage from a critical
hit, the attacker severs the peluda’s tail. The peluda takes 2d6 persistent bleed
damage and can’t make tail attacks until their tail grows back (in about 1 week).
Quill Thrust [reaction] Trigger A creature within 10 feet attempts a melee Strike
against the peluda; Effect The peluda shifts their position and
makes a quill Strike against the attacking creature. This Strike
doesn’t count toward the peluda’s multiple attack penalty, and
the peluda’s multiple attack penalty doesn’t apply to this Strike.
Speed 30 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d12+13 piercing
Melee [one-action] quill +23 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6 piercing plus
peluda venom
Melee [one-action] tail +23 (reach 15 feet, versatile piercing), Damage
2d6+13 bludgeoning plus Improved Knockdown
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (evocation, fire, primal) The peluda breathes a torrent of
flames that deals 7d10 fire damage in a 60-foot line (DC 29 basic Reflex
save). They can’t use their Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Peluda Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 29 Fortitude; Maximum
Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 2d6 poison and flat-footed (1 round);
Stage 2 2d6 poison, enfeebled 1, and flat-footed (1 round); Stage
3 2d6 poison, enfeebled 2, and flat-footed (1 round)
Quill Barrage [two-actions] The peluda bristles their quills and shakes,
sending dozens of spear-like barbs in every direction. All
creatures within 30 feet
take 11d6 piercing damage
(DC 29 basic Reflex save) and
are exposed to
peluda venom
if they take
any damage. The
peluda can’t use
Quill Barrage again
for 1 minute.
O-R
197
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
PERYTON FLOCKS
On rare occasions, a peryton flock
forms at the lead of an alpha female. It
lasts until the alpha makes a mistake
that erodes her perceived power. Then
the rest of the flock tears her apart.
Peryton
The peryton is an amalgam of horror, merging the features of a stag, wolf, and
hawk. They love using shadows to stalk their victims before ripping out their stillbeating hearts and relishing the dying pulse as they swallow them whole, so the
doomed victims spends their last moments watching as their flesh is consumed.
Despite perytons’ animalistic appearance and brutal behavior, they are viciously
cunning and as intelligent as humans. Their preferred tactic is to find a lone
traveler and stalk it from on high. Most perytons are loners who loathe all other
creatures. These feelings extend to other perytons as well, and adult
males attack each other on sight as surely as they attack anything else.
Once per year, perytons mate. The males offer up hearts they have
collected from humanoids to attract females. Those that manage to
secure a mate rarely survive long though, as their mating
ritual is short and violent. Female perytons generally
abandon their eggs after laying them, so newly hatched
perytons must fend for themselves from the moment
they emerge.
A lone peryton typically builds a nest in a rocky
overhang or an exceptionally tall and strong tree
where they can observe nearby lands. Although they
aren’t particularly interested in wealth, perytons do
like to collect small objects from their victims. During
those times between hunts, they sometimes study these
trophies in order to relive the memories of victims’ last
moments and the taste of victims’ hearts.
PERYTON CREATURE 4
CE MEDIUM BEAST
Perception +13; darkvision
Languages Common
Skills Acrobatics +11, Intimidation +11, Stealth +11
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 21; Fort +8, Ref +11, Will +13
HP 60
Speed 25 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] antler +14 (deadly d8), Damage 1d12+7 piercing
Melee [one-action] fangs +14 (agile), Damage 1d8+7 slashing
Heart Ripper [one-action] (attack, emotion, fear, visual) The peryton
rips out the heart of an adjacent corpse with their jaws.
The creature must have died in the last minute. As the
peryton rips the heart free and swallows it whole,
they regain 2d6 HP, and any non-peryton that
witnesses this event must succeed at a DC 21 Will
save or become frightened 1 (or frightened 2 on
a critical failure).
Mimic Shadow [one-action] (necromancy, occult, shadow)
Requirements The target must be casting a
shadow; Effect The peryton Flies, going no
higher than 20 feet over the target creature. The target creature must succeed
at a DC 21 Will save or the peryton’s shadow changes to match that cast by the
target creature. With their shadow so transformed, the peryton gains a +2 status
bonus to attack and damage rolls against that creature. In addition, each time
the peryton successfully Strikes that creature, the creature must succeed at a DC
21 Will save or become frightened 1, or increase its frightened condition by 1 if
it’s already frightened. This is an emotion and fear effect. The shadow remains
transformed for 1 hour or until the peryton Mimics a Shadow again, whichever
comes first.
Bestiary 2
198
OTHER PETITIONERS
Each plane (save the Negative
Energy Plane) has its own category
of petitioner, but not every plane or
demiplane present in the Pathfinder
setting is listed here. Certainly,
planes of your own design aren’t
represented! You can use the wide
range of petitioner types and
descriptions here as templates or
inspiration for creating new types
of petitioners: each needs a name,
appearance, alignment, language,
additional ability, and attack.
For instance, Desna maintains a
demiplane called Cynosure that
straddles the Material Plane and
Elysium. Petitioners on Cynosure are
known as the chosen dreamers, and
they appear as idealized and softly
glowing versions of their mortal
selves; they are chaotic good, speak
Celestial, are immune to confusion
and stupefied, and deal bludgeoning
damage with their fists.
Petitioner
When a mortal dies, their soul travels to the Boneyard in the Outer Planes where
they are judged by Pharasma, the goddess of the dead. Once they have been judged,
their soul is sent on to their final reward or punishment in the afterlife, and in the
process is transformed into a creature known as a petitioner. This process grants
the soul a new body, one whose shape is the result of the prevailing philosophical
forces of the plane to which it is sent. The petitioner’s memories from their life are
typically wiped nearly clean, allowing them to retain only a few hazy fragments
akin to half-remembered dreams. Regardless of the petitioner’s size, power, or
nature in life, they’re a Medium creature in their afterlife.
Existence as a petitioner can last for eons, but this state is not necessarily
eternal. Deities, powerful denizens of the Great Beyond, or even the outer planes
themselves can further change the petitioner’s nature by transforming them
into raw quintessence, spiritual essence that is then used to expand a plane’s
physical manifestation, or by transforming the petitioner into a new form of
supernatural life such as a celestial, monitor, or fiend. Should a petitioner die,
their body breaks down in a process akin to decay, their nature reverting back
to the quintessence or elements that make up their plane. This represents the
true end of a soul’s journey: their associated life essence travels back to the heart
of the Great Beyond to be recycled into the Positive Energy plane, fueling the
creation of entirely new souls.
PETITIONER CREATURE 1
VARIES MEDIUM PETITIONER
Perception +7, darkvision
Languages see Planar Incarnation
Skills Athletics +7, Planar Lore +7
Str +2, Dex +2, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +2, Cha +2
AC 15; Fort +7, Ref +7, Will +7
HP 22
Speed 25 feet
Planar Incarnation All petitioners are formed from and personify the nature of the plane
on which they manifest, and their statistics are adjusted as summarized below. They
also gain any trait associated with creatures from their plane.
Abaddon (the Hunted) The hunted appear as Medium sized versions of themselves
from their prior lives, and they exist to be pursued and consumed by daemons;
Alignment NE; Language Daemonic; Additional Ability fast healing 5; Melee fist +7,
Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Abyss (the Larvae) The larvae appear as maggot-like grubs with the face the petitioners
had in life; Alignment CE; Language Abyssal; Additional Ability immune to disease
and poison; Melee jaws +7, Damage 1d8+2 piercing
Astral Plane (the Untethered) The untethered appear as astrally projected versions of
their mortal forms, yet they lack a silver cord; Alignment any; Language any one
spoken in life (such as Common); Additional Ability fly Speed 20 feet; Melee fist +7,
Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Axis (the Unmade) The unmade appear as parchment-skinned humanoids covered
in lines of close black script; Alignment LN; Language Utopian; Additional Ability
immune to emotion and fear; Melee fist +7, Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Boneyard (the Dead) The dead appear as animated skeletons of the type of creature
they were when they were alive; Alignment N; Language Requian; Additional
Ability resist piercing and slashing 3; Melee claw +7, Damage 1d8+2 slashing
Dead Vault (the Caged) The caged are sent to Rovagug’s prison plane, the Dead Vault;
they appear as chained versions of their mortal bodies, save that their faces are
hideous insectile visages; Alignment CE; Language Abyssal; Additional Ability
Rend [one-action] bite; Melee bite +7, Damage 1d8+2 piercing
Dimension of Dreams (the Dreamers) The dreamers appear as their ideal appearance,
age, and gender from their mortal bodies; Alignment any; Language Aklo; 
O-R
199
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FIRST WORLD PETITIONERS
A soul sent to the First World does
not become a petitioner. Rather, they
immediately reincarnate into a fey
creature whose temperament and
role match their mortal personalities.
This process tends to leave souls
who incarnate into the First World
with slightly more fragments of
memories than most petitioners, yet
still not enough that they remember
who they once were.
Additional Ability +1 circumstance bonus on all saving throws; Melee fist +7,
Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Elysium (the Chosen) The chosen appear as idealized versions of their mortal selves
with glowing eyes; Alignment CG; Language Celestial; Additional Ability immune
to blindness and dazzled; Melee fist +7, Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Ethereal Plane (the Terrorized) The terrorized appear as sickly, haunted-looking
versions of their mortal selves; Alignment any; Language any one spoken in life
(such as Common); Additional Ability immune to bleed and death effects; Melee
fist +7, Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Heaven (the Elect) The elect have golden halos and ghostly wings, but they otherwise
appear as their mortal forms; Alignment LG; Language Celestial; Additional Ability
fly Speed 20 feet; Melee wing +7, Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Hell (the Damned) The damned look like terribly scarred or mutilated versions of their
mortal selves; Alignment LE; Language Infernal; Additional Ability immune to fire;
Melee jaws +7, Damage 1d8+2 piercing
Maelstrom (the Shapeless) The shapeless appear as half-melted reflections of their
former mortal selves; Alignment CN; Language Protean; Additional Ability immune
to critical hits and precision; Melee fist +7, Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Material Plane (the Remnants) The remnants are among the rarest of petitioners; they
appear as plain, bland versions of the ancestry of their mortal lives; Alignment any;
Language any one spoken in life (such as Common); Additional Ability ferocity;
Melee fist +7, Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Nirvana (the Cleansed) The cleansed take on animal forms that match their
personalities in life; Alignment NG; Language Celestial; Additional Ability speed 35
feet; Melee claw +7, Damage 1d8+2 slashing
 Plane of Air (the Air Pneuma) Air pneuma appear as versions of their mortal selves
composed of air; Alignment any; Language Auran; Additional Ability fly Speed 20
feet; Melee gust +7 (air), Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Plane of Earth (the Earth Pneuma) Earth pneuma appear as versions of their mortal
selves built of earth or stone; Alignment any; Language Terran; Additional Ability
burrow Speed 20 feet; Melee fist +7 (earth), Damage 1d8+2 bludgeoning
Plane of Fire (the Fire Pneuma) Fire pneuma appear as versions of their mortal
selves shaped from flame; Alignment any; Language Ignan; Additional
Ability immunity to fire; Melee cinder +7 (fire),
Damage 1d8+2 fire
Plane of Water (the Water Pneuma) Water
pneuma appear as versions of their mortal
selves formed of flowing water; Alignment
any; Language Aquan; Additional Ability
amphibious, swim Speed 20 feet; Melee
current +7 (water), Damage 1d8+2
bludgeoning
Positive Energy Plane (the Enlightened) The
enlightened appear as diaphanous, radiant
versions of their mortal selves; Alignment
any good; Language Jyoti; Additional
Ability fast healing 5; Melee glowing
touch +7, Damage 1d8+2 positive
Shadow Plane (the Mutilated) The
mutilated appear as they did in
their mortal lives, yet are covered
in wounds or partially adorned or
wrapped in chains; Alignment any
evil; Language Shadowtongue;
Additional Ability immune to bleed
and fear; Melee chain +7, Damage
1d8+2 bludgeoning
Bestiary 2
200
GENIEKIN PARENTAGE
Planar scions from the elemental
planes are known as geniekin because
they are overwhelmingly born from
couplings between mortals and
genies: ifrits are born of efreet, oreads
of shaitans, sulis of jann, sylphs of
djinn, and undines of marids. Despite
this distinguished ancestry, geniekin
do not display most of their parents’
exceptional talents, such as their
ability to grant wishes.
Planar Scion, Geniekin
Geniekin are mortals whose ancestry has become entangled with that of genies,
causing them to exhibit elemental powers drawn from the Elemental Planes. Though
the geniekin found here are all of human descent and have example alignments,
geniekin and other planar scions can descend from other ancestries and have any
alignment. More information on genies can be found on page 162 of the Bestiary.
IFRIT
Ifrits’ blood blazes with elemental fire. Most ifrits are second-class citizens who
serve under the iron heel of the efreeti and their Dominion of Flame, but those
born outside the efreet hierarchy or who choose to flee it live
lives of passion in search of fame, glory, and power.
Ifrits are fond of fire, but this doesn’t mean they all
embrace fire’s destructive nature. Those who seek
more productive roles in a society find inspiration in
the way flames flit and dance, and they pride themselves
in their skills as acrobats or dancers. The church of
Sarenrae particularly welcomes ifrit fire dancers, both in
appreciation of their skill and to help ensure these ifrits
have a safe place apart from their more violent kin.
But by and large, ifrits are drawn to professions and
callings that allow them to wallow in the glories of fire.
Ifrit pyrochemists apply this calling to alchemical
teachings, seeing purity in every single bomb thrown
or conflagration lit.
IFRIT PYROCHEMIST CREATURE 1
LE MEDIUM HUMAN HUMANOID IFRIT
Perception +3
Languages Common, Ignan
Skills Acrobatics +6, Crafting +6, Intimidation +4,
Nature +3, Survival +3, Thievery +6
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +3, Wis +0, Cha +1
Items alchemist’s tools, dagger, flint and steel, formula book,
studded leather
Infused Items An ifrit pyrochemist carries the following
infused items, which last for 24 hours or until the next time
the pyrochemist makes their daily preparations: lesser
alchemist’s fire (5), lesser elixir of life (2), lesser smokestick.
AC 18; Fort +5, Ref +6, Will +3
HP 18; Resistances fire 1
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] dagger +8 (agile, finesse, thrown 10 feet, versatile S),
Damage 1d4 piercing
Ranged [one-action] lesser alchemist’s fire +8 (range increment 30 feet), Damage 1d8
fire plus 1 persistent fire damage and 1 fire splash damage
Primal Innate Spells DC 16, attack +8; Cantrips (1st) produce flame
Quick Bomber [one-action] The ifrit pyrochemist draws an alchemical bomb with an Interact
action and throws it as a ranged Strike.
OREAD
Elemental earth laces through the bones of oreads, who appear similar to stone
statues of their mortal ancestry, with delicate crystals in place of hair, fur, or
scales. Oreads are stoic and slow to plan but are of steadfast resolve and
unwavering in their convictions.
The typical oread cherishes quiet seclusion. Yet as they age, many
oreads find themselves inexplicably drawn to some far-flung location 
O-R
201
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
EXTRAPLANAR HUMANOIDS
An important distinction exists
between planar scions and extraplanar
humanoids, such as fetchlings.
Fetchlings and other extraplanar
humanoids represent true ancestral
groups with their own physical and
cultural identities and traditions.
Planar scions are members of diverse
ancestries who share a similar
inheritance from extraplanar beings
and, with exception of marids, typically
integrate into other humanoid societies
instead of building their own.
with a pull like that exerted on the needle of a compass—intangible, constant, and
ultimately irresistible. The destination of this mysterious pilgrimage is unique to
each oread, though it usually ends in some place of great mystical power, natural
splendor, or esoteric learning. Most oreads are drawn to a place with which they
are somewhat familiar, but a rare few feel drawn to travel in a seemingly random
direction, departing with only their hope that they’ll discover whatever mystery
lies at the end of their invisible path.
Many oreads find that the role of a guard suits their personality well, for in
such a role they can feel as if they are helping to promote order but also find time
to stand vigil as lone sentinels over a specific portion of a fortification or a remote
location on a wilderness trail.
OREAD GUARD CREATURE 1
LN MEDIUM HUMAN HUMANOID OREAD
Perception +7
Languages Common, Terran
Skills Athletics +7, Crafting +3, Medicine +5, Society +3, Survival +5
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +0
Items bastard sword, full plate, light hammer, steel shield (Hardness 5, HP 20, BT 10)
AC 19 (21 with shield raised); Fort +7, Ref +6, Will +5
HP 20
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Shield Block[reaction]
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] bastard sword +9 (two-hand d12), Damage 1d8+4
slashing
Ranged [one-action] light hammer +6 (agile, thrown 20 feet), Damage
1d6+4 bludgeoning
Power Attack [two-actions] Frequency once per round; Effect The
guard makes a melee Strike. This counts as two attacks
when calculating the guard’s multiple attack penalty. If this
Strike hits, the guard deals an extra die of weapon damage.
SULI
Because their genie forebears are native to the Material
Plane, sulis (scions of mortals and jann) are by and large
the most common geniekin on the Material Plane. They are
often artisans and peace brokers, compelled to try and bring
harmony and balance in a world wrought with discord.
Sulis have a natural charm that often eludes other
geniekin, but tend to layer on a level of boastful
pride or even arrogance as a personal quirk or
humorous facade. Few non-sulis realize that
bragging is not simply the symptom of a puffedup ego for sulis, but instead is a cultural institution
easily comparable to human poetry. Sulis’ boasts not
only glorify themselves, but also secure their
companions’ and families’ accomplishments
in history, with the ultimate goal of
spinning stories that will be retold for
generations. This is especially true
for sulis who have lived with other
geniekin and have been seen as lesser for not having a
strong connection to an Elemental Plane.
Suli dune dancers are but one way these geniekin seek
to integrate with other humanoid societies. They work
to hone their skills at boasting to an extent that their 
Bestiary 2
202
GENIEKIN ON GOLARION
While most geniekin planar scions
live on their genie parent’s ancestral
plane, rare fonts of elemental power
or genie activity sometimes give
rise to geniekin on Golarion. By far,
geniekin are most commonly found
in Katapesh, as genies are more
prevalent there than other regions
due to the influence of genie binders.
claims help to bolster those they travel with. Suli from regions other than deserts
adjust their names to match their terrains, but regardless of whether they prefer
forests, hills, or arctic plains, their boasts remain as compelling.
SULI DUNE DANCER CREATURE 1
N MEDIUM HUMAN HUMANOID SULI
Perception +5
Languages Aquan, Auran, Common, Ignan, Terran
Skills Acrobatics +5, Deception +6, Diplomacy +7, Occultism +4, Performance +7,
Society +4
Str +2, Dex +2, Con +0, Int +1, Wis +0, Cha +4
Items scimitar, tambourine
AC 15; Fort +3, Ref +5, Will +5
HP 16
Elemental Bulwark[reaction] Trigger An enemy is about to damage the dune dancer with cold,
electricity, or fire, or with a spell that has the air, earth, fire, or water trait; Effect The
dune dancer gain resistance 2 against the triggering damage.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] scimitar +7 (forceful, sweep), Damage 1d6+2 slashing
Occult Spontaneous Spells DC 17, attack +9; 1st (2 slots) color spray, soothe, true strike;
Cantrips (1st) detect magic, guidance, inspire courage (Core Rulebook 386), mage
hand, shield, telekinetic projectile
Elemental Assault [two-actions] Elemental magic fills the dune dancer’s body or
weapon. The dune dancer chooses one element and makes a melee Strike.
The Strike deals an additional 1d4 damage of the indicated type and has the
trait corresponding to the element: Air electricity, Earth bludgeoning, Fire fire, or
Water cold.
SYLPH
Born with elemental gales coursing through their breath, sylphs are wispy planar
scions whose bodies seem caught in a perpetual, gentle breeze. Born of unions
between mortals and djinn, sylphs are quick-witted and creative, but
they are prone to flights of fancy and tend to be easily distracted.
Sylphs are notorious for their practice of “listening to the wind,” which
most others dismiss as a fancy name for eavesdropping. Yet this custom means
much more to sylphs, who spend hours listening to the stories brought to
them on the proverbial breeze. While some less scrupulous sylphs
may use the information they learn to blackmail or abuse others,
most of them see listening to the wind as their way of staying
connected to the world around them while still keeping it
comfortably at arm’s length. Certainly the typical sylph
sneak doesn’t seek to use what they learn for ill, but
instead tries to warn others of dangers yet unrealized
or to prepare themself for a dangerous task.
SYLPH SNEAK CREATURE 1
CG MEDIUM HUMAN HUMANOID SYLPH
Perception +5
Languages Auran, Common
Skills Acrobatics +7, Deception +6, Diplomacy +6, Society +4, Stealth +7,
Thievery +7
Str +0, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +1, Wis +0, Cha +3
Items leather armor, starknife
AC 18; Fort +4, Ref +9, Will +8
HP 17
Deflecting Gale [reaction] (air, evocation, primal) Trigger The sylph sneak is the target of a
physical ranged attack; Requirements The sylph sneak is aware of the attack; 
O-R
203
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OTHER PLANAR SCIONS
Two other planar scions are the
entropy-infused ganzi and their polar
opposites, the orderly aphorites,
scions of chaos and law respectively.
Effect A swift gale whips up between the sylph sneak and the source of the ranged
attack, giving the sneak a +3 status bonus to AC against the triggering attack. If the
attack misses, the wind deflected it. The wind can’t deflect unusually large or heavy
ranged projectiles (such as boulders or ballista bolts).
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] starknife +9 (agile, deadly d6, finesse, versatile S), Damage 1d4+4
Ranged [one-action] starknife +9 (agile, deadly d6, thrown 30 feet, versatile S), Damage 1d4+1
Sneak Attack The sylph sneak’s Strikes deal 1d6 extra precision damage to
flat-footed creatures.
Surprise Attacker On the first round of combat, creatures that haven’t acted yet
are flat-footed to the sylph sneak.
Wind’s Guidance When the sylph sneak attacks with a thrown weapon, the range
increment increases by 10 feet.
UNDINE
Undines are infused with elemental water—the churning power of the
briny deep flows through them. These planar scions are often athletic and
lithe, but they are easily distracted by auditory sensations because of how
much louder and clearer sound rings above the waves.
Undines are perhaps the most settled of all geniekin, often forming
communities along the coast or even on the water itself. In the latter
case, they prefer to settle in ship-towns that sometimes number
dozens of vessels in all shapes and sizes.
The undines who fill these communities
are similarly diverse, bringing aspects
of multiple cultures together to
form one whole. Ship-towns are
permanent, but fluid—they grow,
recede, and migrate constantly as undine families add
their ships to or remove them from the flotilla. An
undine town like this may remain at sea for years, its
residents coming ashore only on rare occasions
to collect wood for cookfires or to repair their
homes. The paradoxically ever-shifting permanence
of these communities reflects the undine virtues of adaptability and
freedom, while also maintaining the prime importance of the community.
Undine hydromancers are quite valued on these floating settlements, if only
for their ability to create fresh drinking water while adrift on the sea.
UNDINE HYDROMANCER CREATURE 1
CG MEDIUM AMPHIBIOUS HUMAN HUMANOID UNDINE
Perception +5
Languages Aquan, Common
Skills Arcana +3, Athletics +3, Diplomacy +7, Intimidation +7, Nature +5,
Survival +5
Str +0, Dex +2, Con +1, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +4
Items dagger
AC 16; Fort +4, Ref +5, Will +7
HP 15
Speed 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] dagger +7 (agile, finesse, versatile S), Damage 1d4 piercing
Ranged [one-action] dagger +7 (agile, thrown 10 feet, versatile S), Damage 1d4 piercing
Primal Spontaneous Spells DC 17, attack +9; 1st create water, heal, hydraulic
push; Cantrips (1st) acid splash, detect magic, know direction, stabilize,
tanglefoot
Sorcerer Bloodline Spells DC 17, attack +9; 1st (1 Focus Point) elemental toss
(Core Rulebook 404)
Bestiary 2
204
VANDALS OF CHAOS
Those who seek secret knowledge
beyond their means to purchase can
bargain with akizendris to provide
them with rare tomes in exchange
for delivering the immersed akizendri
into a library via another book. From
there, the akizendri can vandalize
books to its heart’s content without
being detected.
Protean
Proteans are manifestations of chaos made flesh, natives of the Maelstrom that
embody the primeval potency of entropy in their serpentine forms. They follow
a loose, confusing, and ever-shifting caste system and form choruses based on
malleable and evanescent shared philosophies.
WARPWAVES
Many proteans can use the forces of chaos to distort reality in their foes’ minds,
creating mental ripples called warpwaves. When a creature fails its saving throw
and is affected by a warpwave, roll 1d8 and consult the table below for the
specific effect on that creature. Unless indicated otherwise, a warpwave effect
lasts for 1d4 rounds, and a new warpwave effect negates any previous warpwave
effect already affecting a creature.
d8 Warpwave Effect
1 Clumsy 2 (3 on a critical failure)
2 Confused and gains 4d6 temporary Hit Points
3 Dazzled (permanent on a critical failure)
4 Enfeebled 2 (3 on a critical failure)
5 Immobilized by filaments of energy
6 Quickened (Stride, Strike, or Step only)
7 Slowed 1
8 Stupefied 2 (3 on a critical failure)
AKIZENDRI
Akizendris gnaw at sources of knowledge and lore, gleefully corrupting and
altering them to vex scholars and sages across the planes with contradictions
and untruths. These proteans appear as cackling, serpentine creatures with
elongated crocodilian faces, luminous eyes, and arms that vanish at the elbows
into swirling clouds of runes before reforming into solid talons.
Akizendris amuse themselves by rearranging or deleting texts, placing
insulting acrostics in poetic verses, and penning crude insults upon title pages.
Libraries in such places as Heaven, Axis, and Hell are especially keen to avoid
such contamination, knowing that their records are choice targets for every
akizendri in existence.
AKIZENDRI CREATURE 3
CN SMALL MONITOR PROTEAN
Perception +8; darkvision, entropy sense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Protean; telepathy (touch)
Skills Acrobatics +9, Deception +10, Occultism +11, Society +10, Stealth +9, Thievery +9
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +4, Wis +3, Cha +1
Entropy Sense (divination, divine, prediction) An akizendri can anticipate the most
likely location of a creature through their supernatural insight into the forces of
chaotic probabilities and chance. This grants the akizendri the ability to sense
creatures within the listed range. A creature under the effects of nondetection or
that is otherwise shielded from divinations and predictions cannot be noticed via
entropy sense.
AC 19; Fort +6, Ref +11, Will +10
HP 42, fast healing 1; Weaknesses lawful 3; Resistances precision 3, protean
anatomy 6
Protean Anatomy (divine, transmutation) An akizendri’s vital organs shift and
change shape and position constantly. Immediately after the akizendri takes
acid, electricity, or sonic damage, it gains the listed amount of resistance to that
damage type. This lasts for 1 hour or until the next time the protean takes damage
of one of the other types (in which case its resistance changes to match that type),
whichever comes first. 
O-R
205
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MOCK CHORUSES
Azuretzis form mock choruses in
emulation of their more powerful
kindred, aping the shifting
philosophies of proper choruses. While
mischievous or outright malevolent
to hostile or lawful creatures,
they interact amiably with chaotic
creatures, who run the risk of being
promptly followed–willingly or not–by
a serpentine gaggle of self-appointed
understudies.
The akizendri is immune to polymorph effects unless it is a willing target. If blinded
or deafened, the akizendri automatically recovers at the end of its next turn as new
sensory organs grow to replace the compromised ones.
Speed 25 feet, fly 25 feet, swim 25 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +12 (chaotic, finesse, magical), Damage 2d8+3 piercing plus 1d4 chaotic
and garbled thoughts
Melee [one-action] tail +12 (chaotic, finesse, magical), Damage 2d6+3 bludgeoning plus 1d4 chaotic
and Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 20, attack +12; 3rd glyph of warding, secret page; 1st detect
alignment (at will, lawful only); Cantrips (2nd) acid splash, daze, ghost sound, mage
hand, sigil; Constant (4th) freedom of movement
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph, transmutation) The akizendri takes
on the appearance of any Small or smaller creature. This doesn’t change its Speed or
its attack and damage bonuses with its Strikes, but might change the damage type
its Strikes deal.
Constrict [one-action] 1d8+3 bludgeoning, DC 20
Garbled Thoughts (divine, emotion, enchantment, mental) A creature hit by the akizendri’s
bite Strike must attempt a DC 20 Will save.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is stupefied 1 for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature is also confused for 1 round.
Text Immersion (divine, transmutation) When the akizendri casts
secret page, it can physically immerse itself in the text, changing
the message of the text in the process. It can exit the book
at any point by Dismissing secret page, at which point it
appears in a space adjacent to the text. If it does so to
begin combat, it rolls a Deception check for initiative. As
long as it remains immersed in the text, the akizendri
has no body. It can communicate telepathically with
a creature as long as the creature touches the book
or scroll that contains the secret page. It can sense
nearby creatures using its entropy sense, but not in any
other way, nor can it use any attack, manipulate, or
move actions or speak aloud. If the object it is
immersed in is destroyed, the akizendri reappears
in an adjacent square and is stunned 1.
AZURETZI
Azuretzis are sinuous, serpentine creatures
with dagger-sharp teeth, covered in brilliant
blue scales with mottled purple and pink
highlights that shimmer in a pareidolic
approximation of leering, laughing faces.
The Maelstrom’s chaotic forces spawn
these small proteans from a variety of
sources: physical mating between older
azuretzis, the paradoxical promotion
of bestial naunets, and possibly from
mortal petitioners, though azuretzis may
just be confusing putative mortal memories
with experiences gained from games of
mimicry. Never expect azuretzis to operate by
any rational, self-consistent rules.
Azuretzis represent the humor of chaos,
particularly in the form of mockery and
parody via exaggerated mimicry, twisting
a target’s features into a laughingstock.
Bestiary 2
206
GALISEMNI
Only powerful magic can
stabilize the Maelstrom for a
time, allowing stable islands to
form. Most prominent among
these is the massive planar
trade city of Galisemni, which
lies in the Borderlands, a
somewhat-more-stable region of
the Maelstrom where it brushes up
against the other Outer Planes.
AZURETZI CREATURE 5
CN SMALL MONITOR PROTEAN
Perception +11; darkvision, entropy sense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Protean
Skills Acrobatics +11, Arcana +11, Athletics +9, Deception +13, Performance +13, Stealth
+13, Survival +11, Thievery +13
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +4, Wis +2, Cha +4
Entropy Sense (divination, divine, prediction) As akizendri.
AC 22; Fort +11, Ref +15, Will +11; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 75, fast healing 2; Weaknesses lawful 5; Resistances precision 5, protean anatomy 8
Protean Anatomy (divine, transmutation) As akizendri.
Spell Pilfer[reaction] Trigger A creature with an active spell effect within 30 feet of the azuretzi
fails to resist another azuretzi’s Mocking Touch; Effect The azuretzi attempts to
counteract one ongoing spell effect on the target creature with a Thievery check. If it
is successful, it transfers the ongoing spell effect to itself. The creature then becomes
temporarily immune to Spell Pilfer for 24 hours.
Speed 25 feet, fly 25 feet, swim 25 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +15 (chaotic, finesse, magical), Damage 2d10+4 piercing plus 1d6 chaotic
Melee [one-action] claw +15 (agile, chaotic, finesse, magical), Damage 2d8+4 slashing plus
1d6 chaotic
Melee [one-action] tail +13 (chaotic, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d12+4 bludgeoning plus
1d6 chaotic and Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 22; 4th dimension door; 3rd crisis of faith, dispel magic,
shatter; 2nd hideous laughter; 1st detect alignment (at will, lawful only);
Constant (4th) freedom of movement
Constrict [one-action] 1d12+4 bludgeoning,
DC 22
Mimic Form[two-actions] (concentrate,
divine, polymorph,
transmutation) As Change
Shape, but an azuretzi can
assume the specific form of a
Medium or smaller creature it
Seeks with a successful DC 25
Perception check. It can return
to its true form as a free action.
It can retain access to only one
exact appearance at a time.
Mocking Touch [two-actions] (abjuration, divine)
Requirement The azuretzi is not currently using Mocking Touch on a
spell; Effect The azuretzi mocks a creature’s magical ability with
a touch. The azuretzi must attempt a Thievery
check against the target’s Will DC.
Critical Success The azuretzi chooses
one spell of up to 3rd level
that the target creature has
available to cast. The azuretzi
gains that spell as a mock
divine innate spell, and it
can cast that spell once as an
innate divine spell using its own
DC and spell attack. It must do so
before 24 hours pass or the mock spell is
lost. The creature touched cannot cast the mock
spell until the azuretzi casts it first or the 24 hour
period passes, whichever comes first.
Success As critical success, but the azuretzi has 1 hour 
O-R
207
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MOUTHPIECES OF CHAOS
While rarely found on the Material
Plane, imenteshes frequent interplanar
hubs of culture and commerce.
Imenteshes act as diplomats on
behalf of any chorus they claim
allegiance to. They can offer safe
travel through the Maelstrom or even
act as guides through the Maelstrom’s
ever-shifting Borderlands.
to cast the mock spell before it is lost, and the creature touched can cast the
spell normally.
Failure As critical success, but the azuretzi must cast the mock spell before the end
of its next turn or it is lost, and the creature touched can cast the spell normally.
Critical Failure Mocking Touch has no effect.
IMENTESH
The loquacious proteans known as imenteshes serve as missionaries, spies, and
heralds of chaos to further the protean goal of reality’s dissolution. Imenteshes
are cunning, curiously diplomatic, and profoundly whimsical. They travel
beyond the Maelstrom for their work, frequently adopting extravagant
personal attire and decorations that often border upon the garish, all to curry
favor with less chaotic beings.
IMENTESH CREATURE 10
CN LARGE MONITOR PROTEAN
Perception +19; darkvision, entropy sense (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Protean; tongues
Skills Acrobatics +17, Athletics +19, Deception +21,
Diplomacy +19, Performance +21, Stealth +21,
Thievery +17
Str +7, Dex +5, Con +5, Int +7, Wis +3, Cha +5
Entropy Sense (divination, divine, prediction) As akizendri.
AC 30; Fort +21, Ref +19, Will +17; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 175, fast healing 5; Weaknesses lawful 10; Resistances precision 10, protean
anatomy 15
Protean Anatomy (divine, transmutation) As akizendri.
Speed 25 feet, fly 25 feet, swim 25 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (chaotic, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+11 piercing
plus 1d6 chaotic and warpwave strike
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (agile, chaotic, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+11
slashing plus 1d6 chaotic
Melee [one-action] tail +23 (chaotic, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d10+11
bludgeoning plus 1d6 chaotic and Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 5th dimension door, dispel magic, divine
wrath (chaotic), sending; 4th creation, dimension door (at
will), shatter; 3rd haste, mending, shrink item, slow;
1st detect alignment (at will; lawful only); Constant
(5th) tongues; (4th) freedom of movement
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine,
polymorph, transmutation) The imentesh
takes the appearance of any Large or
smaller creature. This doesn’t change
its Speed or its attack and
damage bonuses with its
Strikes, but might change the
damage type its Strikes deal.
Constrict [one-action] 1d10+11 bludgeoning,
DC 29
Inflict Warpwave [one-action] (divine, transmutation)
An imentesh inflicts a warpwave on a creature within 100 feet (page 204; (DC 29
Fortitude save to resist).
Sneak Attack An imentesh’s Strikes deal an additional 2d6 precision damage to
flat-footed targets.
Warpwave Strike (divine, transmutation) Any creature struck and
damaged by an imentesh’s jaws Strike must succeed at a DC 29
Fortitude save or be subject to a warpwave (page 204).
Bestiary 2
208
PSYCHOPOMP TRAITORS
Some psychopomps view their task
of sorting souls as ultimately hollow
and meaningless, since the multiverse
itself must one day end. Eons ago,
these rebels shirked their duties
and fled to the empty corners of
the planes, becoming a new type of
evil creature called a sahkil. Sahkils
feed on mortal fears, particularly
fears of death, and enjoy tormenting
those who must die. Psychopomps
generally leave these malcontents
alone, except when sahkils interfere
with the proper flow of souls.
Psychopomp
Many psychopomps are intimately involved with the Boneyard’s massive
bureaucracy. Few pursue mercy, justice, or personal gain; their duties to Pharasma
and her Boneyard are supreme. Nevertheless, individual psychopomps interpret
their duties in different ways, which might put them in conflict with mortals or even
with each other.
ESOBOK
Esoboks are brute hunters and pugnacious sentinels that serve as the guard dogs of
the Boneyard. These squat, powerful quadrupeds have a frill of dark feathers around
their distinctive heads which resemble a crocodile skull. Esoboks rarely bother with
those who are truly dead, allowing the dead of the Boneyard to go about their
business while remaining watchful for danger. Though cunning when sniffing out
threats to the Boneyard or to their psychopomp handlers, they’re among the least
intelligent of the psychopomps and rarely speak except to utter growling threats.
The wise listen when an esobok makes a threat, as it won’t do so twice.
ESOBOK CREATURE 3
N MEDIUM MONITOR PSYCHOPOMP
Perception +12; darkvision, lifesense 60 feet, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Infernal, Requian
Skills Acrobatics +8, Athletics +10, Intimidation +9, Religion +4, Stealth +8, Survival +10
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +4, Int –3, Wis +3, Cha +2
AC 18; Fort +11, Ref +8, Will +8
HP 55; Immunities death effects, disease; Resistances negative 5, poison 5
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +12 (magical), Damage 1d10+3 piercing plus Grab
and spirit touch
Melee [one-action] claw +12 (agile, magical), Damage 1d6+3 slashing
plus spirit touch
Divine Innate Spells DC 17; 2nd invisibility (×3; self only)
Pounce [one-action] The esobok Strides and then makes a
Strike. If it began this action hidden, it remains
hidden until after the Strike.
Spirit Touch An esobok’s
Strikes affect incorporeal
creatures with the
effects of a ghost touch
property rune and deal
1d6 negative damage to
living creatures and 1d6 positive damage to undead.
Wrench Spirit[one-action] (attack, divine, incapacitation, necromancy) Requirement
A creature is grabbed by the esobok’s jaws; Effect The esobok releases
the target from the Grab but wrenches its spirit free as it does so. The creature
must attempt a DC 20 Will save. Creatures without souls (such as most constructs)
and creatures whose bodies and souls are one (such as most celestials, fiends, and
monitors) that roll a failure or critical failure on the save get a success instead.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The target is stunned 1.
Failure The esobok wrenches the target’s soul from its body
into its jaws. Mindless undead creatures of level 2 or lower are
destroyed, other undead creatures are stunned for 1 round, and all
other creatures are paralyzed. At the end of each of its turns, a creature
paralyzed by this effect can attempt a new save to end the effect. The
paralysis ends automatically if the esobok attempts a jaws Strike or speaks.
Critical Failure As failure, but as long as a creature is stunned or paralyzed, it is
also stupefied 2.
O-R
209
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
PSYCHOPOMP FOES
Psychopomps’ greatest enemies are
creatures that devour or steal souls,
such as astradaemons and night
hags. Their other opponents include
necromancers, proteans, and those
who have unnaturally extended their
lifespan, such as liches.
CATRINA
Not all spirits who enter the Boneyard realize they have died. Catrinas meet these
souls, helping to convince them of the finality of their fate to ease a spirit’s passing.
Catrinas are more likely to intervene when a mortal can’t accept their death. They
perform their task to keep the afterlife calm, rather than out of true compassion
for a mortal’s grief. Catrinas only rarely visit the Material Plane, typically to help
an extremely important mortal pass on.
Catrinas resemble skeletons dressed in bright flowers and colorful dresses,
giving them a simultaneously festive and macabre appearance. Though most
catrinas present as feminine, masculine catrinas still dress in bright colors and
carry garlands of flowers.
CATRINA CREATURE 5
N MEDIUM MONITOR PSYCHOPOMP
Perception +13; darkvision, lifesense 60 feet
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Infernal, Requian; telepathy 120 feet, tongues
Skills Acrobatics +14, Boneyard Lore +11, Diplomacy +14, Intimidation +14,
Medicine +12, Occultism +11, Religion +12
Str +0, Dex +5, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +5
AC 22; Fort +11, Ref +12, Will +13; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 75; Immunities death effects, disease; Resistances negative 5, poison 5
Calming Presence (aura, divine, emotion, enchantment, incapacitation) 30 feet. A
creature that begins its turn within the area must attempt a DC 18 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune to calming
presence for 24 hours.
Success The creature’s attack rolls take a –1 status penalty for 1 round.
Failure Any emotion effects that would affect the creature are suppressed and the
creature can’t use hostile actions. If the creature is subjected to hostility from any
other creature, it ceases to be affected by calming presence and is temporarily
immune to calming presence for 24 hours.
Critical Failure As failure, but hostility doesn’t end the effect.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +14 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d8+2 bludgeoning plus
spirit touch
Divine Innate Spells DC 22; 4th dimension door, talking
corpse (at will); 3rd illusory disguise; 2nd invisibility (at
will, self only); Cantrips (3rd) dancing lights; Constant
(5th) tongues
Compel Condemned [one-action] (divine, enchantment, incapacitation,
mental) The catrina telepathically compels a creature
within 30 feet to approach and allow the catrina to kiss
them, in preparation for using Kiss of Death. The target
must attempt a DC 22 Will save.
Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune
to Compel Condemned for 24 hours.
Failure The creature must spend each of its actions to move closer to the catrina as
quickly as possible, while avoiding obvious dangers. If the compelled creature is
adjacent to the catrina, it stays still and doesn’t act. If the creature takes any damage,
the effect ends and the creature is temporarily immune to Compel Condemned for
24 hours. This effect lasts for 1 round, but if the catrina uses this ability again on
subsequent rounds, it extend the duration by 1 round for all affected creatures.
Critical Failure As failure, but damage does not end the effect.
Kiss of Death [two-actions] (death, divine, manipulate, necromancy) The catrina gives a long,
passionate kiss to an unconscious or willing creature, dealing 3d6 negative damage.
Any creature damaged by the same catrina’s Kiss of Death for 3 consecutive rounds
becomes unconscious and is dying 1.
Spirit Touch As esobok.
Bestiary 2
210
VANTH SCYTHES
Vanths’ favored weapon is the scythe,
a choice that even further adds to
their fearsome appearance and can
lead to unfortunate associations with
the Grim Reaper or Urgathoa among
more superstitious mortals. Vanths
find such comparisons to be ignorant
at best or insulting at worst. Some
vanths infuse their scythes with
different qualities, such as cold iron
or silver, depending on the nature of
their most common enemies.
VANTH
Protecting the Boneyard are the stern and resolute guardians of the dead known as
vanths, psychopomps who resemble skeletons with raven-like wings and a mask
resembling a vulture’s skull. Vanths carry black scythes to fight against those who
would disturb the natural progression of souls, and they consider any visitor to
the Boneyard a potential troublemaker. When the psychopomp armies go to war,
vanths serve as front-line soldiers. They rarely speak and even more rarely show any
emotion other than a grim adherence to duty.
VANTH CREATURE 7
N MEDIUM MONITOR PSYCHOPOMP
Perception +15; darkvision, lifesense 60 feet
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Infernal, Requian
Skills Acrobatics +17, Athletics +17, Boneyard Lore +15, Intimidation +15,
Occultism +13, Religion +13, Stealth +17
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +2
Items +1 scythe
AC 27; Fort +15, Ref +13, Will +17; +1 status to all saves
vs. magic
HP 105; Immunities death effects, disease;
Resistances negative 10, poison 10
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear,
mental) 20 feet, DC 22
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed 25 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] scythe +18 (deadly d10,
magical, trip), Damage 1d10+8
slashing plus spirit touch
Melee [one-action] jaws +17 (agile),
Damage 1d6+8 slashing plus
spirit touch
Divine Innate Spells DC 22; 5th
dimension door; 4th dimension
door (at will); 3rd locate (×3),
searing light (×3); 2nd invisibility
(at will, self only)
Infuse Weapon (divine, evocation)
A vanth’s scythe is its symbol of
office and gains a measure of its
personal power. This scythe becomes
a +1 scythe and is treated as if it were
adamantine while the vanth wields it. A
vanth whose scythe is taken or destroyed
can infuse a new one with an hour of work.
Spirit Touch As esobok, but 2d6.
Vanth’s Curse [two-actions] (curse, divine, enchantment,
misfortune) Frequency three times per day; Effect The
vanth bestows a curse on a creature by touching it with its scythe.
The creature must attempt a DC 25 Will save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected and is temporarily
immune to Vanth’s Curse for 24 hours.
Success The target feels a momentary shudder of doom and is
stupefied 1 for 1 minute by the distracting sensation.
Failure The target becomes morose and glum as it accepts its own inevitable fate. For
1 hour, the target is stupefied 2. Each time the target gains the dying condition, the
stupefied condition value increases by 1, to a maximum value of stupefied 4.
Critical Failure As failure, but the effect is permanent.
O-R
211
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
PSYCHOPOMP COURTS
Psychopomps rarely oppose
celestials or fiends. In fact, they
frequently host such creatures in
the Boneyard, particularly in the
sprawling psychopomp courts where
these outsiders petition for one
soul or another to be remanded to
their jurisdiction. Complicated cases
are judged by yamarajes, while the
thorniest or most politically delicate
are handed by Pharasma herself.
YAMARAJ
The greatest judges among the psychopomps are the massive yamarajes, whose
wisdom is legendary and whose edicts are unappealable except to ushers or Pharasma
herself. A yamaraj resembles an immense dragon with dark, feathery scales and an
emotionless, dispassionate gaze behind a feathered mask. When not serving as the
senior magistrates, lords, and generals of the Boneyard, yamarajes pursue highly
individualistic hobbies, such as gardening or literature. They are willing to halt in
their duties to converse with mortals whose expertise matches their interests.
YAMARAJ CREATURE 20
UNCOMMON N HUGE MONITOR PSYCHOPOMP
Perception +37; darkvision, lifesense 240 feet, true seeing
Languages Abyssal, Celestial, Infernal, Requian; telepathy 120 feet, tongues
Skills Acrobatics +33, Athletics +36, Boneyard Lore +40, Deception +34, Diplomacy +34,
Intimidation +36, Legal Lore +40, Occultism +38, Religion +38, Society +38
Str +10, Dex +7, Con +7, Int +10, Wis +7, Cha +6
AC 45; Fort +33, Ref +31, Will +35; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 375, fast healing 20, lightning drinker; Immunities death effects, disease, electricity
(see lightning drinker); Resistances negative 20, poison 20
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 60 feet, DC 39
Lightning Drinker Whenever a yamaraj would take electricity damage if
not for its immunity, its fast healing increases to 40 on its next turn.
During that turn, if it uses its breath weapon, the beetles crackle with
electricity and deal 2d12 additional electricity damage.
Speed 35 feet, fly 50 feet, swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +38 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d8+18 piercing
plus Improved Grab and yamaraj venom and spirit touch
Melee [one-action] claw +38 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d4+18
slashing plus spirit touch
Melee [one-action] tail +38 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage
4d10+18 bludgeoning plus spirit touch
Divine Innate Spells DC 44; 10th miracle, revival;
9th bind soul, harm, heal, wail of the banshee; 8th
chain lightning (×3), dispel magic (×3), spirit song,
wall of force; 5th dimension door (at will), mind
probe (at will); Constant (10th) true seeing
Rituals DC 44; call spirit, resurrect
Breath Weapon[two-actions] (divine, evocation) The yamaraj breathes
a blast of beetles in a 50-foot cone that deals 14d8 slashing
damage and 4d8 persistent slashing damage to creatures in the area
(DC 42 Reflex save). It can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature takes no damage.
Success The creature takes half damage and is sickened 1.
Failure The creature takes full damage and is sickened 2.
Critical Failure The creature takes double damage and is sickened 3.
Final Judgment A yamaraj’s miracle spells are used only to
pronounce judgment, typically either to restore a dead or
destroyed creature to life, bind a creature to the Boneyard, or
banish a creature from the Boneyard.
Spirit Touch As esobok, but 3d6.
Yamaraj Venom (poison) While a creature is clumsy from this poison,
it is doomed with the same value; Saving Throw DC 42
Fortitude; Maximum Duration 10 rounds; Stage 1
3d8 poison damage and clumsy 1 (1 round);
Stage 2 5d8 poison damage and clumsy 2
(1 round); Stage 3 7d8 poison damage and
clumsy 3 (1 round)
Bestiary 2
212
QLIPPOTH AND DEMONS
Qlippoth ruled the Abyss for eons
and still see themselves as its rightful
rulers. When the Abyss first began to
spawn demons from the souls of sinful
humanoids, the realm was plunged
into a brutal war spanning untold
millennia, in which qlippoth, though
more powerful and established, were
slowly but surely driven back by the
endless demonic hordes who spawned
far more quickly than qlippoth could
ever hope to match. Today, qlippoth
have been driven to the deepest,
darkest corners of the Abyss where
they cling tightly to the crumbling
remains of their territory.
Qlippoth
Long before the creatures known as demons came to be the dominant force in
the Abyss, qlippoth ruled the Outer Rifts. These inimical creatures are a form of
primordial and alien evil that predates mortal life, and most immortal life as well.
Since the rise of mortal sin and the associated expansion of demonic life through
the Abyss, qlippoth have been driven to the deepest reaches of the Abyss, and
they seethe with rancor at the loss of their realms. Yet rather than directly oppose
demons, qlippoth instead turn to the source—mortal sin—and wage an endless
war to eradicate all creatures capable of sinful acts so that the demonic tide might
be turned back.
CYTHNIGOT
The cythnigot is a foul fungal parasite that grows and thrives in the corpses of
small creatures. It wears these bodies like a suit, but also adjusts and tailors the
fleshy covering to suit its needs, and the body ends up looking as alien as anything
else spawned from the Abyssal depths. The cythnigot’s most identifying feature is
the long stalk of fungal material that extends from creature’s body, ending in a
surprisingly strong set of fanged jaws.
CYTHNIGOT CREATURE 1
UNCOMMON CE TINY FIEND QLIPPOTH
Perception +5; darkvision
Languages Abyssal; telepathy (touch only)
Skills Acrobatics +6, Occultism +7, Stealth +6
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +2, Cha +1
AC 16; Fort +9, Ref +6, Will +5
HP 14; Immunities controlled, fear; Weaknesses lawful 3; Resistances
mental 3, physical 3 (except cold iron)
Speed 30 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +8 (agile, chaotic, finesse, magical), Damage 1d10+1
piercing plus 1d4 chaotic and tangle spores
Occult Innate Spells DC 17; 4th read omens; 2nd detect alignment (at
will, lawful only), paranoia; 1st phantom pain; Cantrips (1st) daze,
detect magic
Sickening Display [one-action] (concentrate, emotion, enchantment, fear,
mental, occult, visual) The cythnigot presents its awful appearance
fully, and creatures in a 10-foot emanation must attempt a DC 17
Will save. Once a creature attempts this save, it’s temporarily
immune to further Sickening Displays for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is flat-footed until its next turn.
Failure The creature is sickened 1, and is flat-footed for as
long as it’s sickened.
Critical Failure The creature is sickened 2 and is flat-footed
for as long as it’s sickened.
Tangle Spores (disease) A creature bitten by a cythnigot
becomes afflicted by fast-growing spores that swiftly grow
into twitching spikes and hideous pallid growths of hairlike
fibers. These growths erupt from the bite wound and writhe
and wrap around the creature’s limbs. Plant creatures take
a –2 circumstance penalty to save against tangle spores; Saving
Throw DC 17 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 clumsy
1 (1 round); Stage 2 clumsy 1 and flat-footed (1 round); Stage 3 clumsy
2, flat-footed, and if you attempt a manipulate action, you must
succeed at a DC 5 flat check or it’s lost; roll the check
after spending the action, but before any effects
are applied (1 round).
O-R
213
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
QLIPPOTH AND MORTALS
As qlippoth lost territory to their
demonic rivals, they realized that the
only way to stem the tide of demonic
forces was to starve them of the
sinful souls that the Abyss uses to
spawn new demons. While qlippoth
have no concept of how they
might go about preventing sin by
changing the way mortals act, they
do understand that exterminating
mortal life would solve the problem
as well.
SHOGGTI
Shoggti travel to other planes in roving bands to capture and charm victims,
bringing them back to the Abyss where they are enslaved for unknown—but no
doubt insidiously evil—purposes. These squid-like qlippoth have slick, blue skin
and four suckered tentacles that end in dexterous pincers. In addition to a lampreylike mouth at the base of its body, each has a secondary maw in the middle of its
forehead that stretches from between its two bulging eyes to the back of its head.
SHOGGTI CREATURE 7
UNCOMMON CE LARGE AMPHIBIOUS FIEND QLIPPOTH
Perception +13; darkvision
Languages Abyssal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +17, Intimidation +17, Occultism +15, Stealth +15
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +4, Wis +2, Cha +6
AC 25; Fort +16, Ref +12, Will +14
HP 105; Immunities controlled, fear; Weaknesses lawful 5; Resistances mental 5,
physical 5 (except cold iron)
Speed 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +18 (chaotic, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d12+8 piercing plus 1d6 chaotic
Melee [one-action] pincer +18 (agile, chaotic, magical, reach 10 feet, versatile B), Damage 2d8+8
slashing plus 1d6 chaotic and Grab
Occult Innate Spells DC 23; 4th charm, dimension door; 2nd paranoia; 1st charm (×3);
Cantrips (4th) daze, detect magic
Braincloud [one-action] (attack, enchantment, mental, occult, open) The shoggti caresses a
creature with a tentacle and supernaturally erodes the creature’s capability for
thought as it does so. The target must succeed at a DC 25 Will save or become
stupefied 2, with an unlimited duration. The target can attempt the save to remove
the stupefied condition again once per day when it makes its daily preparations.
Constrict [one-action] 1d10+8 bludgeoning, DC 25
Fascinating Display [two-actions] (concentrate, emotion, enchantment, fear, mental, occult,
visual) The shoggti writhes its tentacles and
shifts its coloration to put on an unnaturally
fascinating hypnotic display. Creatures in a
30-foot emanation must attempt a DC 25
Will save, after which they are temporarily
immune to further Fascinating Displays for
1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is sickened 1.
Failure The creature is fascinated for 1
minute. Once the fascination effect
ends, the creature is sickened 1.
Critical Failure The creature is
fascinated for 1 minute, can’t use
reactions while fascinated, and is
sickened 2 once the fascination ends.
NYOGOTH
Little more than a coiled mass of intestines
encircling a massive gaping maw, this
qlippoth is an Abyssal scavenger, subsisting on
the filth and leftovers of demons and qlippoth
alike, although it relishes any opportunity to
consume living prey. Despite this seeming lowly role
in the Abyssal ecosystem, a nyogoth is far from a stupid
beast and can orchestrate cunning ambushes to secure
its next meal.
Bestiary 2
214
QLIPPOTH REALMS
Although it is widely accepted
that qlippoth have lost incalculable
territory in the Abyss to demonkind,
these fiends still control vast regions
in the deepest reaches of that plane.
Some sages suggest the troubling
possibility that perhaps qlippoth still
hold more territory of the Abyss than
demons do, but because demons are
more concerned with mortal life, we
simply interact with the layers they
control more often. For all we know,
these dour sages postulate, the
Abyss teems with endless swarms of
qlippoth that have yet to make their
move against mortal life.
NYOGOTH CREATURE 10
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM FIEND QLIPPOTH
Perception +19; darkvision
Languages Abyssal; telepathy 100 ft.
Skills Acrobatics +21, Athletics +21, Intimidation +19, Occultism +16, Stealth +21
Str +7, Dex +5, Con +6, Int +0, Wis +5, Cha +3
AC 29; Fort +20, Ref +19, Will +16
HP 175; Immunities acid, controlled, fear; Weaknesses lawful 10; Resistances mental 10,
physical 10 (except cold iron)
Caustic Blood [reaction] Trigger The nyogoth takes piercing or slashing damage; Effect The
nyogoth sprays its acidic blood on adjacent creatures, dealing 6d6 acid damage (DC
29 basic Reflex save).
Speed 5 feet, fly 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +23 (chaotic, magical), Damage 2d6+13 piercing plus 2d6 acid, 1d6
chaotic, and Grab
Melee [one-action] tentacle mouth +23 (agile, chaotic, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+13
piercing plus 1d6 acid, 1d6 chaotic, and Grab
Occult Innate Spells DC 26, attack +20; 5th cloudkill; 4th acid arrow (at will), dimension
door; 3rd fear (at will)
Feeding Frenzy [one-action] Requirement The nyogoth has grabbed a creature; Effect The nyogoth
slavers and chews at the grabbed creature, dealing 2d6+7 slashing and 1d6 acid
damage (DC 29 basic Fortitude save).
Nauseating Display[two-actions] (concentrate, emotion, enchantment, fear, incapacitation,
mental, occult, visual) The nyogoth untangles its tentacles and prolapses its
many mouths, turning itself inside out in a truly nauseating display.
Creatures in a 30-foot emanation must attempt a DC 29
Will save, after which they are temporarily immune to
further Nauseating Displays for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is sickened 1.
Failure The creature is stunned 3 and
sickened 1.
Critical Failure The creature is
stunned 5 and sickened 2.
CHERNOBUE
The chernobue infects all creatures it encounters
with itself, spreading pain and calamity wherever it
flops and writhes. It sheds ruin and sups on anguish,
but a chernobue can sometimes be persuaded to pause
for a few moments of conversation if its partner in
discourse can keep its attention by providing
enough atrocious details. Resembling a
tumor-like growth of oily blackness, this
vile monstrosity has numerous muscular
tentacles, a single glaring baleful eye, and a drooling, toothy maw
in the middle of its body.
CHERNOBUE CREATURE 12
UNCOMMON CE LARGE FIEND QLIPPOTH
Perception +25; greater darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Abyssal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +22, Athletics +25, Intimidation +25, Occultism +22
Str +7, Dex +4, Con +5, Int +4, Wis +7, Cha +5
AC 33; Fort +23, Ref +18, Will +25
HP 220; Immunities controlled, fear; Weaknesses lawful 10;
Resistances mental 10, physical 10 (except cold iron)
O-R
215
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OTHER QLIPPOTH
The qlippoth presented here are but
a small fraction of the squirming
awfulness that lurks in the deeper
rifts of the Abyss. Other types of
qlippoth include multi-armed, crab-like
gongorinans, which use living
creatures as incubators; shapeshifting
utukku, which infiltrate and undermine
religions; death-spawned behimirons,
which slay the living to reproduce;
and the living siege engines known as
catabolignes. Yet most frightening of
all is the immense iathavos, a monster
so abhorrent that even the Abyss
cannot bear to allow more than one to
exist at any one time.
Aura of Order’s Ruin (aura, necromancy, occult) 30 feet. A lawful or good creature that
begins its turn in this aura’s emanation must attempt a DC 29 Will save or become
sickened 1 (lawful good creatures instead become sickened 2).
Boiled by Light A chernobue takes 2d10 points of fire damage each time it starts its turn
in an area of bright light.
Recall Venom [reaction] Trigger A creature within 30 feet suffers the effects from stage 2 of
rupturing venom; Effect The chernobue calls out telepathically to the semi-alive
toxin, causing it to burst out of the target’s body and slither through the air to
drain back into one of the chernobue’s mouths. The poisoned creature takes 7d6
bludgeoning damage (DC 32 basic Fortitude save) as the venom exits its body, but
is thereafter cured of rupturing venom, and the chernobue regains an equal number
of Hit Points.
Speed 30 feet; air walk
Melee [one-action] jaws +26 (chaotic, magical), Damage 3d10+13 piercing plus 1d6 chaotic and
rupturing venom
Melee [one-action] tentacle mouth +26 (agile, chaotic, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d6+13
piercing plus 1d6 chaotic
Occult Innate Spells DC 32; 7th plane shift (self only); 6th phantasmal calamity, phantom
pain; 5th subconscious suggestion; 4th darkness (at will); Cantrips (6th) daze, detect
magic; Constant (4th) air walk
Paralyzing Display [two-actions] (concentrate, emotion,
enchantment, fear, incapacitation, mental,
occult, visual) The chernobue’s eye
pulses and its lid peels back to reveal
mind-bending awfulness. Creatures in
a 30-foot emanation must attempt a
DC 32 Will save, after which they are
temporarily immune to further Paralyzing
Displays for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is paralyzed for 1d4
rounds. It can attempt a new save to
end the effect at the end of each of
its turns.
Critical Failure As failure, but paralyzed
for 1 minute.
Rupturing Venom (poison) The
thick, orange venom injected by
a chernobue is semi-alive, and as
it seethes in a creature’s body, it
deals poison damage in addition to
bludgeoning damage as it ruptures
flesh; Saving Throw Fortitude DC 32;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage
1 2d6 poison and 2d6 bludgeoning (1
round); Stage 2 2d6 poison, 2d6 bludgeoning,
and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
AUGNAGAR
The brutish and gluttonous augnagar live to feast—
preferably on rotten flesh, and when possible, demon
flesh. But to them, the greatest delicacy is the flesh
of other augnagars. Augnagars have spiderlike legs
with leathery membranes like a bat’s wings, and
three tails ending in hooked claws perfect for
slicing flesh. 
Bestiary 2
216
AUGNAGARS AND THULGANTS
An augnagar that gorges sufficiently,
especially on other augnagars,
can grow so massive it can’t even
move, thrashing and festering
where it lies. It eventually flies
into a frenzy of self-cannibalism
as it rips apart its own flesh to
feast on. From the ruinous remains
emerges a thulgant—a smaller but
more powerful qlippoth. Scholars
are uncertain if other qlippoth are
capable of transforming themselves
in this fashion. So far, none have
returned from the Abyss with proof.
AUGNAGAR CREATURE 14
UNCOMMON CE HUGE FIEND QLIPPOTH
Perception +27; greater darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet, true seeing
Languages Abyssal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +27, Athletics +28, Intimidation +26
Str +8, Dex +5, Con +8, Int –2, Wis +5, Cha +4
AC 36; Fort +28, Ref +23, Will +25
HP 225; Immunities controlled, fear; Weaknesses lawful 15; Resistances mental 15, physical
15 (except cold iron)
Speed 40 feet, climb 40 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +28 (chaotic, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+14 piercing plus 4d6
persistent bleed, 1d6 chaotic, and rotting curse
Melee [one-action] sting +28 (agile, chaotic, magical, finesse, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+14 slashing
plus 4d6 persistent bleed and 1d6 chaotic
Occult Innate Spells DC 31; 5th dimension door (×3); Constant (7th) true seeing
Confusing Display [two-actions] (concentrate, emotion, enchantment, fear, incapacitation, mental,
occult, visual) The augnagar’s writhing limbs and flesh seethe and squirm in a disorienting
and unsettling manner. Creatures in a 30-foot emanation must attempt a DC 34 Will save,
after which they are temporarily immune to further Confusing Displays for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is stupefied 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is stupefied 1 and confused for 1 minute.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature can’t attempt a
flat check to recover from confusion whenever it takes
damage from an attack or spell.
Inhale Vitality [two-actions] (necromancy, occult) Frequency
once per day; Effect The augnagar inhales sharply,
drawing life force out of creatures in a 50-foot
cone. Creatures in the area take 14d6 negative
damage (DC 34 basic Fortitude save, and
the creature is fatigued on a failure). The
augnagar becomes quickened for 1 round
on its next turn, and it can use the extra
action only to Stride or Strike.
Rotting Curse (curse, disease, necromancy,
occult) Saving Throw DC 34 Fortitude;
Stage 1 drained 1 (1 day); Stage 2 drained
2 and the creature displays hideous,
festering wounds exuding a horrific
stench. Any creature within 30 feet of
the victim must succeed at a DC 34
Fortitude save or become sickened
1 (plus slowed 1 on a critical failure,
for as long as it’s sickened). While
within the aura, affected creatures
take a –2 circumstance penalty to
saves against disease and to recover
from the sickened condition. A creature
that succeeds at its save is temporarily
immune for 1 minute. The victim of the
disease doesn’t roll a save, but takes the
failure effects automatically and can’t
reduce its sickened value below 1 (1 day).
THULGANT
Although they spend most of their time
hunting and battling demons for control of the 
O-R
217
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
QLIPPOTH LORDS
The most powerful qlippoth are
quasi-deities themselves, ancient
entities only rarely worshipped by nonqlippoth. Of these monstrous divinities,
the Polymorph Plague, Yamasoth, is
the most well-known. Others include
Chavazvug the Crawling Inferno,
Isph-Aun-Vuln the Feaster Within, and
Thuskchoon the Everglutton.
Abyss, thulgants amuse themselves with a variety of diversions, such as maintaining
galleries of petrified mortals or building massive, hive-like lairs filled with enslaved
minions. Each of these qlippoth is a horrific tangle of limbs, with spiderlike legs,
writhing tentacles emerging from the top of its head, and three scorpion-like stingers.
THULGANT CREATURE 18
UNCOMMON CE LARGE FIEND QLIPPOTH
Perception +30; greater darkvision, true seeing
Languages Abyssal; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +32, Athletics +35, Occultism +33, Stealth +32
Str +9, Dex +6, Con +6, Int +5, Wis +6, Cha +9
AC 42; Fort +30, Ref +28, Will +32
HP 305, fast healing 10; Immunities controlled, fear; Weaknesses lawful 15; Resistances
mental 15, physical 15 (except cold iron)
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet, fly 50 feet; freedom of movement
Melee [one-action] stinger +35 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+17 piercing plus 3d6 mental, 1d6
chaotic, and thulgant venom
Melee [one-action] tentacle +35 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+17 bludgeoning plus 2d6 acid,
1d6 chaotic, and Grab
Occult Innate Spells DC 40; 9th flesh to stone (×3), phantasmal calamity; 8th dispel magic,
divine aura (chaotic only), divine decree (chaotic only), phantom pain (×3); 7th plane shift;
Cantrips (9th) daze, detect magic; Constant (6th) true seeing, (4th) freedom of movement
Rituals DC 40; imprisonment (9th)
Demon Hunter [one-action] (divination, occult) The thulgant causes a demon within 30 feet to
suffer the effect of its sinful vulnerability.
Greater Constrict [one-action] 2d6+17 bludgeoning and 1d6 acid, DC 40
Mind-Rending Sting [one-action] Requirement The thulgant hits the same
enemy with two consecutive sting Strikes in the same round;
Effect The thulgant deals 3d12+17 mental damage to the
enemy. If the enemy is affected by thulgant venom, that
poison gains the virulent trait.
Stunning Display [two-actions] (concentrate, emotion,
enchantment, fear, incapacitation, mental,
occult, visual) The thulgant rises up on
its twitching limbs and presents its
numerous tentacles and stingers in
a horrifying display of awfulness.
Creatures in a 30-foot emanation
must attempt a DC 40 Will save, after
which they are temporarily immune to
further Stunning Displays for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is stunned 1.
Failure The creature is stunned 4.
Critical Failure The creature is stunned 8.
Thulgant Venom (poison) Saving Throw Fortitude
DC 40; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 3d6
poison damage and the victim gains one of the
following at random: clumsy 1, enfeebled 1,
or stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 2 6d6 poison
damage and the victim gains two of the
following at random: clumsy 2, enfeebled 2,
or stupefied 2 (1 round); Stage 3 9d6
poison damage and the victim gains
all three of the following: clumsy
3, enfeebled 3, and stupefied 3
(1 round)
Bestiary 2
218
QUICKLING PRANKS
Quicklings consider cruelty to
be the pinnacle of pranking. As
a relatively minor example, a
quickling may spend an entire day
constantly moving food out of reach
of a starving man. More commonly,
however, a quickling prefers to cause
pain and injury directly, such as by
suddenly replacing a dinner fork with
a red-hot knife as it’s picked up, or
slashing the legs of a traveler moving
through tall grass.
Quickling
Few creatures can match a quickling’s speed. These malicious fey creatures delight in
striking with blinding speed and accuracy, racing in to stab and slash at foes before
scampering away for cover with maddening—even frightening—swiftness. Stories
of people simply doubling over, bleeding from what appear to be spontaneously
opening wounds, are often eyewitness accounts of quickling attacks.
Quicklings actively hate the “slow-paced dullards” they encounter every day,
delighting in inflicting suffering and pain on creatures they deem too sluggish to
matter. While they are related to kinder fey such as brownies and pixies, quicklings
care only for their own merriment. They see their own cruel pranks as the height of
humor and have full confidence that their speed and invisibility will keep them safe
from harm. They occasionally form gangs of up to a dozen individuals, although
the group usually devolves very quickly into mayhem, as they inevitably perform
increasingly deadly pranks against each other.
QUICKLING CREATURE 3
UNCOMMON CE SMALL FEY
Perception +9; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +13, Crafting +8, Deception +8, Nature +8, Stealth +11, Survival +6,
Thievery +11
Str +0, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +3, Wis +1, Cha +3
Items lethargy poison (3 doses), shortsword
AC 22; Fort +6, Ref +13, Will +8
HP 25; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Slow Susceptibility The quickling takes a –2 status penalty to saving throws against
effects that cause the slowed condition. If the quickling ever
becomes slowed, they lose their supernatural speed, can’t Fade
from View, and become sickened 1 for the duration of
the slow. They also can’t reduce this sickened
condition for the duration of the slowed effect.
Can’t Catch Me [reaction] Trigger The quickling is
targeted by a Strike; Effect The quickling
darts aside, gaining a +2 circumstance bonus
to AC, then Strides up to half their Speed after
the Strike resolves.
Speed 100 feet
Melee [one-action] shortsword +11
(agile, finesse, versatile S),
Damage 1d6+2 piercing plus
lethargy poison
Primal Innate Spells DC 20; 2nd shatter; 1st
ventriloquism; Cantrips (2nd) dancing lights, prestidigitation
Fade from View [free-action] Requirements The quickling used no attack, manipulate, or move actions
in the previous round; Effect The quickling becomes invisible until it uses an attack,
manipulate, or move action. The quickling can’t use Fade from View again for 1d4 rounds.
Sneak Attack The quickling’s Strikes deal an extra 1d6 precision damage to
flat-footed creatures.
Supernatural Speed The quickling’s speed, combined with nearly instantaneous
acceleration and deceleration, enables them to move in astonishing ways. As
long as they have a firm surface to travel across, they can Stride their full
movement vertically or horizontally. They can even run across unstable
surfaces, such as water, in the same way,
although dangerous surfaces (acid, lava,
etc.) harm them as normal. They must
end their movement on a horizontal surface
capable of bearing their weight or else they fall.
O-R
219
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
COASTAL HUNTERS
Quoppopaks prefer to hunt at dawn
and dusk, prowling seashores and
estuaries for fresh meat. While they
could easily live off of the minerals
and tiny organisms they filter from
the water sucked through their
ventral tubes, they delight in killing
living creatures. Despite their cruel
natures, quoppopaks don’t mind
hunting alongside others of their
kind if it means they’ll be able to
create even more carnage.
Quoppopak
Quoppopaks combine the most terrifying aspects of water striders, octopuses,
and vampire bats into one evil, water-dwelling monster. Their bodies consist of
an oval abdomen, eight hollow tentacles, and a thick, tail-like limb ending in
a ventral tube, which resembles a lamprey’s mouth and is capable of intaking
fluids at an astounding rate. While quoppopaks can clumsily maneuver on land,
they prefer to move on water; quoppopaks glide along the surface of lakes or the
ocean by thrusting their ventral tubes into the water, cycling liquid up through
their bodies, then spraying the water back out in a high-pressure stream through
their hollow, spear-like tentacles. Though the ventral tube can’t expel fluids, it
still poses a substantial threat to other creatures. Quoppopaks have gills, but
they are located inside the creatures’ abdomens, allowing them to draw their
air from the water they siphon through their ventral tubes. Quoppopaks can
hold some water in their abdomens for quick forays on land, but this is akin to
humans holding their breath to go underwater, and the monsters’ water reserves
quickly deplete.
QUOPPOPAK CREATURE 11
NE LARGE ABERRATION AQUATIC
Perception +22; low-light vision
Languages Aquan
Skills Acrobatics +23, Athletics +22, Stealth +23
Str +7, Dex +6, Con +5, Int –2, Wis +5, Cha +0
AC 31; Fort +22, Ref +23, Will +18
HP 195
Attack of Opportunity[reaction] Tentacle only.
Speed 15 feet, swim 40 feet, water glide 30 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +24 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+13 piercing
Melee [one-action] tentacle +24 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d8+13 bludgeoning plus Grab
Melee [one-action] ventral tube +24 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+13 slashing plus 1d6
persistent bleed
Ranged [one-action] water jet +23 (range 100 feet, water), Damage 2d6+13 bludgeoning plus
Push 5 feet
Flooding Thrust [two-actions] Requirements The quoppopak’s ventral tube
is in water; Effect The quoppopak uses Tentacle Stab against
a creature within reach; if either of these Strikes hits, the
creature must attempt a DC 30 Reflex save. On a failed
save, the quoppopak shoots water through its tentacles
into the creature, dealing 2d6+5 bludgeoning damage
and making the creature sickened 1 as its internal
organs fill with water (double damage and
sickened 2 on a critical failure).
Tentacle Stab [one-action] Frequency once per
round; Effect The quoppopak makes
two tentacle Strikes against the same
creature. These Strikes deal piercing
damage instead of bludgeoning,
and the quoppopak can’t Grab
with them. Its multiple attack
penalty doesn’t increase until
after both attacks.
Water Glide The quoppopak
can stand and move on the
surface of water or other liquids
without falling through. It can
go underwater if it wishes, but it
must Swim to do so.
Bestiary 2
220
ANCIENT INTELLECTS
Each radiant warden’s animating
force consists of raw positive
energy fused to the soul of a
willing sacrifice—usually an
astronomer or scholar near the
end of their natural life. Focused
now on protecting a site from any
intrusion—including by curious
archaeologists or adventurers—a
radiant warden might pause before
an attack if approached peacefully.
Unfortunately, these constructs are
prone to speaking in vague riddles
or complex mathematical diatribes
that can be as confusing as they are
intriguing; often, discussions break
down as frustration mounts on
either side (or both).
Radiant Warden
The enigmatic and strange radiant wardens were constructed thousands of
years ago to protect observatories and scholars against the incursion of alien
aggressors from the Dominion of the Black. Over time, their roles as guardians
expanded to include watching over any region where the laws of time and space
have worn thin, particularly near portals and permanent gates between planets,
planes, or dimensions.
Named for both the radial nature of the concentric rings that make up their
bodies as well as the glowing radiance of their attacks, radiant wardens carry on
their orders, defending sites from invasion with single-minded purpose.
RADIANT WARDEN CREATURE 17
UNCOMMON N GARGANTUAN CONSTRUCT
Perception +30; darkvision
Language any one ancient language (such as Jistkan)
Skills Arcana +32, Astronomy Lore +36, Athletics +33, Occultism +32
Str +9, Dex +6, Con +5, Int +6, Wis +5, Cha +0
AC 40; Fort +32, Ref +29, Will +28
HP 300; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease, doomed, drained, fatigued, necromancy,
nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison, sickened, unconscious; Resistances mental 15,
physical 15 (except adamantine)
Gatekeeper Aura (abjuration, aura, occult) 60 feet. A creature that uses a teleportation
ability within the aura’s emanation or enters it via a teleportation ability must succeed
a DC 38 Will save or become sickened 1 and have its destination changed to a point
of the radiant warden’s choosing within the emanation. On a successful save, the
creature arrives as intended but is still sickened 1.
Speed 30 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee [one-action] hammer +32 (magical, reach 15 feet,
shove), Damage 3d12+15 bludgeoning plus
radiant blow
Ranged [one-action] radiant beam +32 (magical, reach 15 feet),
Damage 4d10 force
Occult Innate Spells DC 38; 9th teleport; 8th
collective transposition (×3), scintillating
pattern; 7th dimensional lock, prismatic
spray; 5th dimension door (at will)
Orrery [one-action] (concentrate) Until it acts, the
radiant warden appears to be an orrery (or similar
large mechanical contraption, such as a telescope). It
has an automatic result of 53 on Deception checks and
DCs to convincingly pass as such a machine.
Radiant Blast [two-actions] (evocation, force, occult) The radiant
warden releases a 50-foot cone of bright energy
that deals 10d12 force damage (DC 38 basic
Reflex save). The radiant warden can’t use
Radiant Blast for 1d4 rounds.
Radiant Blow When a creature is hit by the
radiant warden’s hammer Strike, a flash
of radiant energy attempts to anchor
the creature in place. The creature
must attempt a DC 38 Will
save; on a failure, the creature
can’t use any teleportation
effects for 1 minute.
On a critical failure,
the creature is also
permanently blinded.
O-R
221
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RAVEN TRADERS
Given enough time to develop the
relationship and establish what you
want, it is possible to engage a raven
in a sort of trade. Placing a small,
shiny object where the raven can take
it might entice it to grab the prize and
fly off, returning 3d6 minutes later
with something from its own stash.
Convincing a raven to trade requires
a DC 20 Nature check to Command
an Animal and, of course, a raven who
has the inclination to trade with you
in the first place.
Raven
Few birds are as cunning and social as the raven.
RAVEN
These omnivorous birds are cunning and opportunistic scavengers. Capable of
solving simple puzzles in order to retrieve desired items, ravens gather at the
periphery of civilization, raiding it as needed when they are not hunting in the
wilds. Whether singularly, in pairs, or as a flock, ravens live off scraps as often
as they do carrion or prey. They are also unusually social among their own
kind, even alerting other ravens to large carcasses with loud, croaking cries; it is
rumored that this extends between flocks as well.
RAVEN CREATURE –1
N TINY ANIMAL
Perception +5; low-light vision
Skills Acrobatics +5, Thievery +5
Str –3, Dex +3, Con +0, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
Cunning A raven can use simple items as tools, such as
poking a stick at an opening to tease out a piece of food.
They are also quite adept at stealing objects. A raven can’t use
Thievery to Palm an Object, Disable a Device, or Pick a Lock,
but it can use Thievery to Steal light objects that it can carry
in its beak or talons or to accomplish other relatively simple tasks.
AC 15; Fort +2, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 7
Speed 10 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +7 (finesse), Damage 1d6 piercing
RAVEN SWARM
A flock of ravens is known as an unkindness. Certainly the name lives up
to its meaning when a swarm of ravens decides to work together. In most cases,
a raven swarm like the one presented here won’t attack larger foes, but when
manipulated by supernatural forces or simple desperation born from hunger,
an unkindness of ravens can be a surprisingly dangerous foe.
RAVEN SWARM CREATURE 3
N LARGE ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +9; low-light vision
Skills Acrobatics +10, Thievery +10
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +0, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha +0
AC 19; Fort +7, Ref +12, Will +9
HP 30; Immunities precision, swarm mind; Weaknesses area
damage 5, splash damage 5; Resistances bludgeoning 2,
piercing 5, slashing 5
Speed 10 feet, fly 40 feet
Enraged Cunning There are few things as dangerously
persistent in the natural world as an angry unkindness of
ravens. A raven swarm can hound its prey through most
barriers. Simple latches, unsecured chimney flues, loosely
shuttered windows, and similar obstacles rarely keep an
unkindness away. A raven swarm attempts a Thievery check to bypass
many of these simple obstructions, typically against DC 20.
Swarming Beaks [one-action] The ravens’ angry pecking deals 1d8 piercing
damage to each enemy in the swarm’s space (DC 20 basic
Reflex save). A creature that critically fails its save is blinded
for 1d4 rounds as the ravens focus their attacks on the target’s
vulnerable face.
Bestiary 2
222
RAVENER LAIRS
Cunning and paranoid, raveners
prefer to make their lairs in places
hostile to mortal life: atop peaks so
high that living creatures struggle to
breathe the rarefied air, submerged
beneath pools of magma in the
caldera of an active volcano, and so
on. Some raveners even go so far
as to deliberately fill their entire
lair with lethally poisonous gases,
and raveners that are capable of
advanced spellcasting often seal
their lairs completely, accessing
them exclusively by spells such as
teleport or gaseous form. Of course,
raveners must feed on the living to
persist, so they never locate their
lairs so far from sources of life that
they’ll starve.
Ravener
Though their lifespans can measure in millennia, all dragons must eventually
perish. While many do so on the blades or under the spells of dragonslayers, some
manage to outlast their enemies and must, in time, face the truth that awaits all
living creatures at the end of their natural lifespan. As with many other creatures,
some dragons respond to such looming reminders of their own mortality poorly,
and the particularly prideful or wrathful of their kind often lash out in anger
when confronted by this grim truth. Peace and acceptance may find some dragons,
but the most stubborn of their ilk (and invariably the most wicked) may pursue
a different answer to the problem. These dragons seek out sinister rites that can
transform them into undead creatures known as raveners.
A ravener’s flesh is stripped away as part of the transformation, leaving only
their skeleton. What they lose in flesh, however, the dragon gains in soul-rending
power, as their raw spiritual energy forms a protective barrier around their
skeleton, keeping it intact and allowing flight with now-skeletal wings. This new
existence is not so easy to maintain as other forms of undeath, however, and the
ravener must feed regularly on the souls of living creatures to power their profane
metabolism. This hunger is much greater than that of a living dragon, so raveners
are forced to relocate regularly, traveling to fresh hunting grounds each time they
strip their current home of prey. A ravener may depopulate whole regions at a
time in order to sate their endless hunger for souls, lest they lose much of their
power and become a ravener husk (page 224).
CREATING A RAVENER
Any evil dragon of at least level 13 can become a ravener, although it is exceedingly
rare for a dragon younger than an ancient true dragon (such as a chromatic, primal,
or metallic dragon) to do so. Typically, the dragon must perform a rare ritual called
ravenous reanimation, but this requirement can be waived if the prospective ravener
has the aid of a powerful patron. In certain unique conditions, such as the intervention
of a vile god of undeath, a dragon can transform into a ravener after death without
the use of this rite at all. A ravener is a powerful creature that is likely to have a major
impact on your game, so you might want to create each one as a custom monster. If
you don’t have time, you can also create a ravener via the following steps.
Increase the dragon’s level by 2 and change their statistics as follows.
• They gain the undead trait and the Necril language.
• Increase their AC, attack bonuses, DCs, saving throws, and skill modifiers by 2.
• They gain weakness to good damage and more HP (see below).
• The ravener’s melee strikes deal an additional 2d6 negative damage, and their
damaging Breath Weapon deals an additional 4d6 persistent negative damage.
Starting Level HP Increase Weakness
13–20 50 15
21 or greater 80 20
RaveneR abilities
A ravener gains the following abilities.
Darkvision
Soulsense A ravener senses the spiritual essence of living and undead creatures within
the listed range. Creatures whose material bodies are one unit with their souls, like
celestials and fiends, appear brighter to this sense.
Negative Healing
Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison, unconscious
Cowering Fear (aura, emotion, fear, mental) A ravener’s frightful presence causes
creatures to cower in fear as well. As long as a creature is at least frightened 2 or
more as a result of the ravener’s frightful presence, it is also immobilized from the fear.
Soul Ward An intangible field of necromantic energy protects a ravener from total
destruction. A soul ward has 150 maximum Hit Points, or 200 if the ravener is level 
O-R
223
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RAVENER MINIONS
Raveners view most undead
creatures with little more respect
than they have for living creatures,
but they often make use of them as
servants. They prefer incorporeal
undead such as ghosts, specters, and
wraiths over such crude and simple
minions as skeletons and zombies.
RAVENER SPELLCASTERS
Instead of gaining the vicious
criticals ability, a ravener spellcaster
gains additional spellcasting
prowess. When creating your own
ravener spellcaster, give it the
spellcasting ability of a spellcaster
roughly 2 levels higher than a normal
spellcasting dragon of its kind. This
typically means that if the original
dragon had two spells prepared of
its highest level, you should add one
more spell of that level and then
two spells of the next highest level,
while if it had three spells prepared
of its highest level, you would add
three spells of the next highest
level (if applicable, add only a single
10th-level spell). Either way, increase
its cantrip level by 1.
If the ravener is unusually young,
you might be able to use spells from
the relevant spellcasting dragon
sidebar, but for a typical ancient
dragon, consider the following spells
to fill in the new slots, depending on
which level of spells you need.
• 10th wish
• 9th power word kill, telepathic
demand, weird
• 8th disappearance, maze, mind
blank
• 7th contingency, energy aegis,
spell turning
21 or higher. Whenever a ravener would be reduced below 1 Hit Point, all damage in
excess of what would reduce them to 1 Hit Point is instead dealt to their soul ward. If
this damage reduces the soul ward to fewer than 0 Hit Points, the ravener is destroyed.
A soul ward’s Hit Points can be restored only via specific ravener abilities such as
Consume Soul, ravenous breath, or vicious criticals. A ravener who goes more than a
week without successfully using Consume Soul to feed on a dying creature starves,
and their soul ward loses 1d4 Hit Points each day until they feed. If the ravener’s soul
ward loses all its Hit Points while the ravener still has more than 1 HP, they become a
ravener husk (page 224).
Consume Soul [free-action] (death, divine, necromancy) Trigger A living creature within 30 feet of
the ravener dies; Effect The ravener tears the creature’s soul from its body with their
maw and gulps it down. The dying creature must attempt a Fortitude save with the
same DC as the ravener’s Breath Weapon.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The ravener tears off a small chunk of the creature’s soul. If the victim is restored
to life, they are drained 1 in addition to any other side effects of returning to life. The
ravener adds a number of Hit Points to their soul ward equal to half the creature’s level.
Failure As success, but the creature’s soul is ravaged. The creature is drained 3 and the
ravener adds a number of Hit Points to their soul ward equal to the creature’s level.
Critical Failure As failure, but the ravener devours the entire soul. The victim can’t
be restored to life as long as the ravener exists except via a 10th-level effect such
as miracle or wish, and the ravener adds a number of Hit Points to their soul ward
equal to twice the creature’s level.
Discorporate [free-action] (divine, necromancy) Trigger The ravener takes excess damage to their
soul ward but still has at least 51 Hit Points in their soul ward; Effect The ravener
draws deeply into their soul ward, discorporating their body into soul energy in order
to escape. They take 50 damage to their soul ward and their physical body vanishes,
reappearing 1d4 hours later in a random location within 1 mile from the location where
they used Discorporate.
Ravenous Breath A ravener’s Breath Weapon is infused with negative energy and strips
life essence from the victims. Any creature that fails its save against the ravener’s
Breath Weapon is drained 1 (or drained 2 on a critical failure). If at least one creature
is drained by the ravener’s Breath Weapon, the ravener’s soul ward gains 5 Hit Points.
Vicious Criticals The ravener treats an attack roll as a critical hit on a roll of 19 or 20,
as long as the attack roll was a success. Additionally, whenever the ravener makes a
critical hit with one of their Strikes, the target must succeed on a Fortitude save or
gain the drained 1 condition. If the target already has a drained value of greater than
0, their drained value instead increases by 1, to a maximum of drained 4. Whenever
the ravener applies drain to a creature in this way, their soul ward gains 5 Hit Points.
RAVENOUS REANIMATION RITUAL 7
RARE EVIL NECROMANCY
Cast 1 day; Cost valuable treasures from the target dragon’s hoard worth a total value
of 50,000 gp
Primary Check Arcana (master), Occultism (master), or Religion (master)
Requirements You must be an evil dragon.
You destroy the gathered treasures with your breath weapon or other powerful magic,
then invoke necromantic energies before you feed upon the charred and melted remains.
As you do so, negative energy courses through your flesh, automatically killing you.
Each individual ravener’s ravenous reanimation requires three to five unique additional
components. Whether or not you return as a ravener depends on the success of the ritual.
Critical Success You immediately transform into a ravener upon finishing the ritual; your
soul ward starts at full Hit Points (equal to 5 × your level).
Success You rise as a ravener 24 hours after completing the ritual, as long as your body
remains relatively intact. When you rise as a ravener, your soul ward starts at 1 Hit Point.
Failure You rise as a ravener husk 24 hours after completing the ritual.
Critical Failure You die.
Bestiary 2
224
RAVENER PATRONS
While most dragons are too prideful
to turn to anyone, even the gods,
for help, a few who seek to become
raveners are so desperate to stave
off death that they might turn to
powerful patrons for aid, such as
demon lords, evil deities, or powerful
necromancers, offering service in
exchange for their transformation.
RAVENER
The ravener presented here was once an ancient red dragon.
RAVENER CREATURE 21
RARE CE GARGANTUAN DRAGON FIRE UNDEAD
Perception +37; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 60 feet, smoke vision, soulsense 60 feet
Languages Abyssal, Common, Draconic, Dwarven, Jotun, Necril, Orcish
Skills Acrobatics +32, Arcana +37, Athletics +39, Deception +38, Diplomacy +38,
Intimidation +40, Stealth +35
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +9, Int +5, Wis +6, Cha +8
Smoke Vision Smoke doesn’t impair an ancient red ravener’s vision; it ignores the
concealed condition from smoke.
AC 47; Fort +38, Ref +34, Will +37; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 500, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, fire, paralyzed, poison,
sleep; Weaknesses cold 20, good 20
Cowering Fear (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 42.
Dragon Heat (arcane, aura, evocation, fire) 10 feet, 4d6 fire damage (DC 41 basic Reflex save)
Soul Ward 200 HP
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Jaws only.
Discorporate [free-action]
Redirect Fire [reaction] (abjuration, arcane) Trigger A creature within 100 feet casts a fire spell,
or a fire spell otherwise comes into effect from a source within 100 feet; Effect The
ravener makes all the choices to determine the targets, destination, and other effects
of the spell, as though they were the caster.
Speed 60 feet, fly 180 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +39 (fire, magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 4d10+17 piercing plus 3d6 fire
and 2d6 negative
Melee [one-action] claw +39 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 4d8+17 slashing plus 2d6 negative
Melee [one-action] tail +37 (magical, reach 25 feet), Damage 4d10+15 slashing plus 2d6 negative
Melee[one-action] wing +37 (agile, magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d8+15 slashing plus 2d6 negative
Arcane Innate Spells DC 44; 8th wall of fire (at will); 4th suggestion (at will); Cantrips
(9th) detect magic, read aura
Consume Soul [free-action] DC 44
Manipulate Flames [one-action] (arcane, concentrate, transmutation) The ravener attempts to take
control of a magical fire or a fire spell within 100 feet. If it succeeds at a counteract
check (counteract level 10, counteract modifier +34), the original caster loses control
of the spell or magical fire, control is transferred to the ravener, and this action counts
as the ravener having Sustained the Spell with the action (if applicable). The ravener
can choose to end the spell instead of taking control, if they choose.
Ravenous Breath Weapon [two-actions] (arcane, evocation, fire) The ravener breathes a blast of
flame that deals 20d6 fire damage plus 4d6 persistent negative damage (DC 44 basic
Reflex save). A creature that fails its save is also drained 1 (or drained 2 on a critical
failure). If a creature is drained by the ravener’s Ravenous Breath Weapon, the ravener’s
soul ward gains 5 HP. The ravener can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Vicious Criticals
RAVENER HUSK
Raveners require a steady diet of souls, and a ravener that’s unable to feed for too
long eventually cannibalizes their own soul. Should a ravener’s soul ward ever be
reduced to 0 Hit Points by hunger while the ravener has more than 1 Hit Point (see
Soul Ward on page 223), they lose all traces of their former identity and descend into
a feral, nearly mindless state. Even if a ravener husk later consumes soul energy, the
transformation can be reversed only via Ravenous Repast.
RAVENER HUSK CREATURE 14
RARE CE GARGANTUAN DRAGON UNDEAD
Perception +26; darkvision, soulsense 60 feet
O-R
225
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RAVENER TREASURE
Because they change lairs more often
than living dragons, raveners prefer
treasure that is compact and easily
transported. Instead of sprawling
mountains of coins, they tend to
prefer precious gems, art objects, and
especially magic items, particularly
magic items they are capable of using.
Skills Acrobatics +22, Athletics +28
Str +8, Dex +0, Con +6, Int –5, Wis +4, Cha +4
AC 35; Fort +28, Ref +22, Will +26
HP 325, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison, sleep;
Weaknesses good 10
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 90 feet, DC 31
Boneshatter [reaction] Trigger The ravener husk takes any amount of bludgeoning damage;
Effect The ravener’s brittle bones shatter, spraying bone shards everywhere. Every
creature within a 10-foot emanation of the ravener husk takes 7d6 piercing damage
(DC 31 basic Reflex save).
Speed 60 feet, fly 180 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +30 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+16 piercing plus 2d6 negative
Melee [one-action] claw +30 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d4+16 slashing plus 2d6 negative
Breath Weapon [two-actions] (divine, evocation, negative) The ravener husk breathes a torrent
of negative energy that deals 16d6 negative damage in a 40-foot cone (DC 34 basic
Reflex save). They can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Ravenous Repast[three-actions] (divine, necromancy) Frequency once per day; Effect The ravener
husk makes a jaws Strike against a deceased creature that has been dead no longer
than 1 minute, was good aligned, and was at least level 15 in life. The ravener attempts
a DC 5 flat check; if successful, they transform back into a ravener with 1 Hit Point in
their soul ward.
Bestiary 2
226
OTHER RAYS
Stingrays and manta rays are among
the most common species of these
fish, but others dwell in more remote
areas. The dangerous blood ray is
an ambush predator that dwells in
murky swamp waters and drains
creature’s blood after paralyzing them
with its sting, while the immense
leviathan ray is a deep-ocean predator
that has a deadly mouth capable of
swallowing small ships whole.
Ray
Rays are an unusual type of fish with wide, sail-like fins and long tails, giving them
an almost kite-like shape as they swim gracefully through the water. All rays have
a rudimentary form of electrolocation, allowing them to detect the faint electrical
charges that emanate naturally from nearby living creatures, a sense akin to scent
in its accuracy.
STINGRAY
Found in salt or fresh water, stingrays are normally passive creatures, but when
threatened or cornered, they lash out with their tails to lance foes with their
toxic stingers. Stingrays often bury themselves in mud, sand, or sea grass, and
unfortunately for those wading in shallow waters, stepping on an unseen stingray
is a surefire way to receive a painful sting.
STINGRAY CREATURE 0
N MEDIUM ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +6; electrolocation (imprecise) 30 feet, low-light vision
Skills Athletics +5, Stealth +7
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –4
Electrolocation A stingray in water can use its electrolocation as an imprecise sense at
the listed range to detect living creatures that are in the same body of water as itself.
AC 16; Fort +5, Ref +7, Will +5
HP 15
Speed swim 30 feet
Melee [one-action] sting +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6+1 piercing plus stingray venom
Stingray Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 16 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 4 rounds;
Stage 1 1d4 poison damage (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and clumsy 1 (1 round)
MANTA RAY
While manta rays might
appear daunting, they are
generally docile. Manta rays are
found in temperate or tropical oceans,
and they generally stay in the upper reaches
or at the surface of deeper waters. These rays are
filter feeders that subsist on plankton. They can also
eat larger fish or aquatic creatures as the need arises, but
rarely attack anything Small or larger. Many underwater
cultures, particularly aquatic elves, raise and farm manta
rays to serve as messengers, beasts of burden, or even pets.
Manta rays don’t make particularly good mounts, but some
aquatic civilizations use them to draw underwater carriages.
MANTA RAY CREATURE 1
N LARGE ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +6; electrolocation (imprecise) 30 feet, low-light vision
Skills Athletics +8
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –1
Electrolocation As stingray.
AC 16; Fort +6, Ref +9, Will +6
HP 24
Speed swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] tail +8 (agile), Damage 1d8+3 bludgeoning
Strafing Rush [one-action] The manta ray Swims, making one tail Strike at any point along the
way. The Strike deals half damage.
Swift Swimmer[two-actions] The manta ray Swims twice. It has a +10-foot circumstance bonus to
its Speed during these actions.
O-R
227
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
EXCEPTIONS TO EVIL
While most undead are evil, revenants
are not—these unusual stalkers rise
not out of a sense of cruelty or hatred
of the living, but spontaneously from
the need for vengeance following
a deep betrayal. One can avoid a
revenant’s wrath by simply getting
out of its way—unless you happen to
be its reason for unlife!
Revenant
Revenants are obsessed, undead stalkers who arise from their own murders and
are driven by only one thing: revenge against their killers. The common wisdom
is that revenants arise only from individuals who have been utterly betrayed or
abandoned to die a grueling death, but even then such victims might not rise
from their graves. In other cases, revenants might even rise from what might
legitimately be considered an accident if the revenant doesn’t understand the full
circumstances of their demise. In such cases, it doesn’t matter that the “murderer”
may not have intended to kill, for revenants understands no pity and can never
forgive. Revenants have little memory of their lives other than anything they
might need to recall in order to achieve their goal of vengeance.
REVENANT CREATURE 6
LN MEDIUM UNDEAD
Perception +14; darkvision, sense murderer
Languages any one spoken in life by their murderer (typically Common)
Skills Athletics +15, Intimidation +14
Str +5, Dex +3, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +2
Sense Murderer (divination, occult, scrying) A revenant knows the
direction of their murderer (as long as both are on the same plane), but
not the distance.
AC 23; Fort +14, Ref +13, Will +17
HP 115, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease,
paralyzed, poison, sleep; Resistances physical 5 (except slashing)
Self-Loathing (emotion, mental, visual) If a revenant sees their own
reflection or any object that was important to them in life, they
must attempt a DC 25 Will save.
Critical Success The revenant is unaffected and can no
longer be affected by that reflection or object in this way.
Success The revenant is distracted by self-loathing and
becomes slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The revenant becomes fascinated by the source that triggered
their self-loathing and does everything they can to destroy it until the end of
the revenant’s next turn.
Critical Failure The revenant becomes immobilized as long as the source of their
self-loathing is apparent, until they’re attacked, or until they see their murderer.
Undying Vendetta (emotion, necromancy, occult) If the revenant’s murderer
dies, the revenant is immediately destroyed. A revenant that can’t sense their
murderer must attempt a DC 11 flat check once every 24 hours to avoid becoming
immobilized and prone; they immediately rise again once they can sense their
murderer. A murderer who becomes undead does not trigger the revenant’s
destruction until the murderer is finally destroyed. The revenant gains a +2
status bonus to checks and DCs against their murderer.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile), Damage 2d8+5 slashing plus Grab
Baleful Shriek [two-actions] (auditory, emotion, fear, incapacitation, mental) The revenant
wails horribly. Each creature within a 60-foot burst must attempt a DC 23
Will save. Regardless of the outcome of their saving throw, affected creatures
are then immune to Baleful Shriek for 1 hour. The revenant’s murderer never
improves their degree of success due to this ability’s incapacitation trait. The
revenant can’t use Baleful Shriek again for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is frightened 2.
Failure The creature is frightened 2 and paralyzed for 1 round.
Critical Failure The creature is frightened 3 and paralyzed for
1d4 rounds.
Constrict [one-action] 2d6+5 bludgeoning, DC 24
Bestiary 2
228
RHINOCEROS HORNS
While some species have only a
single horn, many rhinos, including
woolly rhinos, have a second,
smaller horn on their brow directly
behind the larger one. Despite their
appearance and durability, rhino
horns aren’t bone or ivory, but rather
are composed of the same substance
as hooves and toenails. A rhino’s
horn continues to grow as it ages,
enabling a rhino to slowly regrow
a broken horn. While some value
rhino horns as trophies, the horns
themselves have no intrinsic value.
Rhinoceros
This hefty animal is easily recognizable by the distinctive upward-thrusting horn
on its snout. Rhinoceroses are herbivorous and, in spite of their hulking size, can
run at considerable speed. While rhinos have good hearing and a keen sense of
smell, their eyesight is relatively poor.
RHINOCEROS
Rhinoceroses are short-tempered, territorial, and easily startled, and these traits
combined with their innate ferocity means their natural instinct when disturbed
is to attack. When intruders disturb or surprise rhinoceroses, the animals
respond by charging directly at the interlopers and then lashing out with their
mighty horns.
RHINOCEROS CREATURE 4
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +9; scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +12, Survival +10
Str +6, Dex +0, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha –1
AC 22; Fort +14, Ref +8, Will +11
HP 70
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] horn +14, Damage 2d8+6 piercing
Melee [one-action] foot +12, Damage 2d6+6 bludgeoning
Rhinoceros Charge[two-actions] The rhinoceros Strides twice, then makes a horn Strike. As long
as the rhinoceros moved at least 20 feet, the Strike’s damage increases to 3d8+6. A
Medium or smaller creature struck by this attack must succeed at a DC 21 Reflex save
or be automatically Shoved back 5 feet and knocked prone by the force of the blow.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, foot, DC 18
WOOLLY RHINOCEROS
Even bulkier than their non-woolly
cousins, these rhinoceroses have a
shaggy pelt of long, thick fur and a
huge crescent-shaped horn. Woolly
rhinos inhabit areas of arid tundra
and cold steppes, spending much of
their day grazing for sustenance.
WOOLLY RHINOCEROS CREATURE 6
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +11; scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +16, Survival +13
Str +6, Dex +1, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha –1
AC 25; Fort +17, Ref +11, Will +15; +2 status
to all saves vs. cold
HP 100
Cold Adaptation The woolly rhinoceros treats
environmental cold effects as if they were one
step less extreme.
Ferocity[reaction]
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] horn +16 (reach 10 feet), Damage
2d12+6 piercing
Melee [one-action] foot +16, Damage 2d8+6 bludgeoning
Rhinoceros Charge [two-actions] As rhinoceros, except 3d12+6
damage and DC 24.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, foot, DC 21
O-R
229
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
BLUE WEEK
Those living in areas where rusalkas
dwell know well to avoid the water
during the week-long period in
early Sarenith when the fey become
particularly active, a time known in
many regions as Blue Week. Most
villages prohibit swimming and
fishing during this time, though the
prohibition is difficult to enforce, as it
takes place during the height of good
weather. Particularly superstitious
folk take care to lock their doors
both from within and without.
Rusalka
These androgynous, river-dwelling fey delight in manipulating the emotions of
those unfortunate enough to fall into their grasp, using humiliation to break
their victims’ wills. Rusalkas enjoy keeping their broken toys nearby, both for
continuing entertainment and to aid in the rusalkas’ defense, as the shame their
captives feel often drives them to become obsessively loyal to these fey.
RUSALKA CREATURE 12
NE MEDIUM AQUATIC FEY WATER
Perception +22; low-light vision
Languages Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +21, Athletics +22, Deception +25, Diplomacy +21, Nature +21,
Performance +23 (+25 to sing), Stealth +25
Str +4, Dex +5, Con +3, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +7
AC 33; Fort +21, Ref +25, Will +21
HP 230; Weaknesses cold iron 15; Resistances fire 10
Blurred Form A rusalka is concealed while underwater.
Speed 25 feet, swim 50 feet; water walk
Melee [one-action] tresses +24 (agile, finesse, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+10 bludgeoning plus
Improved Grab
Primal Innate Spells DC 35; 5th charm (at will), control water (at
will); 2nd invisibility (at will), obscuring mist (at will); Constant
(6th) water walk
Beckoning Call [one-action] (auditory, concentrate, enchantment, incapacitation,
mental, primal) The rusalka cries out a compelling invitation. Each
non-fey creature within a 300-foot emanation must attempt a DC 27
Will save. The effect lasts for 1 round, but if the rusalka uses Beckoning
Call again on subsequent rounds, the duration extends by 1 round for
all affected creatures. Once a creature succeeds at any save against
Beckoning Call, that creature is temporarily immune for 24 hours.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is fascinated and must spend each of its actions to
move closer to the rusalka, avoiding obvious dangers. If a beckoned
creature is adjacent to the rusalka, it stays still and doesn’t act. If
attacked by the rusalka, the creature is freed from captivation at the
end of the rusalka’s turn.
Critical Failure As failure, but if attacked by the rusalka, the creature
can attempt a new save only at the start of its next turn, rather than
being freed at the end of the rusalka’s turn.
Constrict [one-action] 2d8+10 bludgeoning, DC 32
Entangling Tresses A rusalka can have up to eight creatures grabbed within their
tresses at a time.
Flowing Hair [one-action] The rusalka attempts an Athletics check against each
grabbed creature’s Fortitude DC. The rusalka moves each creature
they succeed against up to 10 feet and each creature they critically
succeed against up to 20 feet. This movement must all be within
reach of its tresses.
Shameful Touch [one-action] (emotion, enchantment, mental, primal) The rusalka
touches a creature within 5 feet using their hand, stirring up memories
of regret and shame. The target must attempt a DC 35
Will save.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target is sickened 1.
Failure The creature is sickened 1 and stunned 1.
Critical Failure The creature is sickened 1 and stunned 1,
and it must use its first action on its next turn to Strike
itself, automatically hitting.
Bestiary 2
230
OTHER DEVILS
For over a decade, the legend of
the Sandpoint Devil has persisted
in western Varisia. Most hold that
it’s the fantasy of simple folk and
booze-filled bellies, but locals insist
it exists. Other creatures akin to
the Sandpoint Devil might exist
elsewhere in the world, with slight
variations on their innate spells and
the nature of their Accursed Breath.
Sandpoint Devil
While some creatures have been fused to create a new entity that’s graceful and
beautiful, the Sandpoint Devil is the opposite. It has the hooves and body of a
powerful horse, but it walks on its hind legs in a perverse parody of a humanoid
gait. Its equine face has been distorted and elongated with skeletal, yellowed fangs
and milky eyes. The pox-spotted hide along the creature’s back bears a draconic
tail with dark, spiny plates and two torn, bat-like wings.
The legendary Sandpoint Devil appears only on moonless nights when mists
gather around the coast. Most encounters end with missing livestock or children,
with little left behind other than oddly placed hoofprints that reek of brimstone.
SANDPOINT DEVIL CREATURE 8
UNIQUE NE LARGE BEAST FIEND
Perception +16; greater darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Abyssal, Varisian
Skills Acrobatics +16, Athletics +18, Intimidation +18, Stealth +18, Survival +16
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +5, Int +0, Wis +4, Cha +3
AC 27; Fort +19, Ref +14, Will +16; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 165; Immunities fire, fear; Weaknesses cold iron 5
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Hoof only.
Speed 35 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +20, Damage 2d10+12 piercing
Melee [one-action] hoof +20 (agile, versatile S), Damage
2d6+12 bludgeoning
Occult Innate Spells DC 23, attack +15; 4th
dimension door, phantasmal killer; 3rd
stinking cloud; 2nd obscuring mist; 1st
gust of wind (at will); Cantrips (4th)
produce flame
Accursed Breath [two-actions] (curse, evocation, fire,
occult) The Sandpoint Devil breathes a
30-foot cone of flame that deals 6d10
fire damage. Each creature in the area
must attempt a DC 26 Reflex save. The
Sandpoint Devil can’t use Accursed
Breath for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage.
Failure The creature takes full damage and
is sickened 2 by the agonizing pain of its
burns.
Critical Failure The creature takes full damage
and is cursed. The victim’s flesh appears
charred and burned, and the pain of being
burned alive never fully vanishes. The cursed
creature takes a –2 status penalty to all checks
from the constant pain. Healing doesn’t alter the
appearance of the burns or lessen the penalty, but
removing the curse does.
Devil’s Howl[two-actions] (auditory, emotion, enchantment, fear, mental,
occult) The Sandpoint Devil unleashes a bloodcurdling howl that
can be heard for miles. Each creature within a 100-foot emanation
must succeed at a DC 26 Will save or become frightened 2
(frightened 3 and fleeing as long as it remains frightened on a
critical failure). Creatures that attempt this Will save are
then immune to Devil’s Howl for 24 hours.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, hoof, DC 23
S-T
231
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
THE WITCH-TREE
The first sard was created when
the Eldest known as the Green
Mother beckoned the sky’s rage to
strike the eldest oak in her domain,
transforming the tree into a living
siege engine. This original sard still
stands sentinel in the Hanging Bower
of the First World.
Sard
An immense, gnarled, tree awoken with raw, primal power by one of the fey Eldest of
the First World, this monster—one of the legendary Tane—skitters on huge, spidery
roots and thrashes its branches as fiery lightning courses within its blackened bark,
a living manifestation of the violent clash between ancient forest and stormy sky.
SARD CREATURE 19
RARE CE GARGANTUAN ELECTRICITY PLANT TANE
Perception +35, low-light vision, tremorsense 120 feet
Languages Aklo, Arboreal, Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +33, Athletics +37, Nature +31
Str +10, Dex +6, Con +6, Int +2, Wis
+6, Cha +6
Planar Acclimation The sard treats the
plane it is located on as its home plane.
AC 43; Fort +35, Ref +31, Will +33; +1 status to
all saves vs. magic
HP 400, fast healing 15; Immunities
electricity; Weaknesses cold iron 15;
Resistances fire 15, physical 15
(except slashing)
Splintering Death (electricity, evocation,
primal) When the sard dies, its body
explodes in a 30-foot emanation.
All creatures in the area take 10d6
electricity damage and 10d6 piercing
damage (DC 43 basic Reflex save). Any creature
that takes piercing damage is also exposed to sard
venom.
Speed 40 feet, climb 25 feet
Melee [one-action] trunk +37 (fatal d12, reach 20 feet),
Damage 4d6+18 bludgeoning plus 3d6
persistent electricity
Melee [one-action] branch +37 (agile, reach 20 feet),
Damage 4d8+18 piercing plus sard venom
Melee [one-action] root +37 (reach 10 feet), Damage
4d6+18 bludgeoning plus 1d6 electricity
Ranged [one-action] thorn +35 (deadly d10, primal,
propulsive, range 180 feet), Damage 4d4+16 piercing plus sard venom
Primal Innate Spells DC 41; 9th storm of vengeance; 8th punishing
winds, tree stride; 7th chain lightning (×3)
Rituals DC 39; control weather (doesn’t require secondary casters)
Lightning-Struck Curse [reaction] (curse, necromancy, primal) Trigger The sard is
about to damage a creature that has electricity resistance; Effect An instant before the
target takes the electricity damage from the triggering event, the sard’s electrical sparks
glow red. The target must succeed at a DC 41 Will save or lose any electricity
resistance it has until this curse is lifted.
Sard Venom (poison, primal, virulent) Saving Throw DC 41 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 10 rounds; Stage 1 2d6 electricity damage,
2d6 poison damage, and clumsy 2 (1 round); Stage 2 3d6
electricity damage, 3d6 poison damage, clumsy 2, and slowed 1
(1 round); Stage 3 4d6 electricity damage, 4d6 poison damage,
clumsy 2, and slowed 2 (1 round)
Thorn Volley[two-actions] The sard makes up to four thorn Strikes, each
against a different target. The sard’s multiple attack penalty
doesn’t increase until after all the attacks have been made.
Trample[three-actions] Huge or smaller, root, DC 39
Bestiary 2
232
ODDS AND ENDS
Scarecrows hold a certain liminal space
that is inhabitable by spirit creatures.
Ghosts in particular can use their
malevolent possession on a scarecrow
as if it were a living creature, using
them as vehicles to escape their sitebound nature and so further spread
their murder and mayhem.
Scarecrow
A ramshackle collection of materials in a human shape, the scarecrow construct
is indistinguishable from a normal scarecrow until it slowly creaks to life. As it
animates, its carved pumpkin or sackcloth face bursts into eldritch flame, sending
fear creeping into the air around it. Each scarecrow is handcrafted and unique in
its appearance, though most are 5 to 6 feet tall and constructed of a combination
of wood, cloth, rope, straw, sawdust, discarded husks and cobs, and similar
materials, all dressed in ragged pastoral garments. This rudimentary construction
makes a scarecrow somewhat fragile, prone to snapping limbs in the crush of
battle. Yet its structure is adaptable, allowing it to reshape another piece of itself
into a clawed limb or grip a severed portion of itself to swat at its foes.
When a scarecrow is created, it must be anointed with a drop of its creator’s
blood into each of its eyes. This blood soaks into the material and siphons a tiny
sliver of the creator’s soul away—not enough to harm the creator, but more than
enough to imbue the scarecrow with an instinctive intellect that allows it to
follow commands as eagerly as a well-trained (if ill-tempered) guard dog. When
a scarecrow is destroyed, the blood leaks back out from its eyes, but the portion
of the creator’s soul never returns.
SCARECROW CREATURE 4
N MEDIUM CONSTRUCT
Perception +11; darkvision
Skills Athletics +12
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha –2
AC 19; Fort +13, Ref +8, Will +11
HP 60; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease,
doomed, drained, fatigued, healing, mental,
necromancy, nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison,
sickened, unconscious; Weaknesses fire 5; Resistances
physical 5 (except slashing)
Scarecrow’s Leer (aura, emotion, fear, mental, occult,
visual) 40 feet. The scarecrow’s eyes flicker with an
unnerving glow. A creature can’t reduce its frightened
condition below 1 as long as it is in the aura’s emanation.
When a creature enters or starts its turn in the aura, it
must attempt a DC 18 Will save. Birds and other avian creatures
take a –2 circumstance penalty to this save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is then temporarily
immune for 24 hours.
Success The creature is frightened 1.
Failure The creature is frightened 2 and is fascinated by the
scarecrow until the end of its next turn.
Critical Failure As failure, but frightened 3.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +13 (versatile S), Damage 2d6+7 bludgeoning plus
clawing fear
Baleful Glow [free-action] (concentrate, mental, occult) The scarecrow’s head
bursts into ghostly, heatless flame that sheds bright light in a 20-foot
emanation (and dim light to the next 20 feet). If the scarecrow uses this
ability on the first round of combat, any creature that has not acted yet is
startled and becomes flat-footed against the scarecrow for 1 round. It can
suppress the light by using this action again.
Clawing Fear The scarecrow’s strikes deal an additional 1d6 mental damage to frightened
creatures.
Mundane Appearance [one-action] (concentrate) Until it acts, the scarecrow resembles an ordinary
scarecrow. It has an automatic result of 32 on Deception checks and DCs to pass as
an ordinary scarecrow.
S-T
233
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SCEADUINAR CRYSTALS
Sceaduinar congregate on the great
crystalline knots of negative energy
that accrete in the Negative Energy
Plane. Sceaduinar prod treelike crystal
growths to produce dangerous items
akin to spheres of annihilation or
great structures that echo with eerie
chimes. Sceaduinar also stimulate
these aggregations of crystals to yield
other sceaduinar and similar hateful
creatures of unlife.
Sceaduinar
Strange creatures born from jagged crystals in the heart of the Negative Energy
Plane, sceaduinar are fueled by its negative energy and driven to extinguish all
life. Resembling crystalline gargoyles with serrated limbs and sharp, bat-like faces,
sceaduinar stand about 7 feet tall and weigh around 100 pounds.
These malevolent beings sometimes gather in great packs of their own kind.
Despite their intelligence, they act like cunning, feral beasts for the most part,
though they occasionally build tools to aid them in extinguishing life. Sceaduinar
sail through the great voids of their home plane, seeking to destroy any sparks of
life that find their way into that deadly realm—even the twisted sparks found in
undead creatures.
When they discover portals to other planes, sceaduinar swarm through in
great numbers, slaughtering all they come across. While dwelling outside the
Negative Energy plane is uncomfortable for sceaduinar, they can exist for
extended periods of time apart from their home. Of course, the feeling of a
plane where negative energy isn’t the rule doesn’t improve these creatures’
attitude, and as a result, they tend to be particularly cruel and violent
when encountered in such realms.
SCEADUINAR CREATURE 7
RARE NE MEDIUM ABERRATION NEGATIVE
Perception +15; greater darkvision, lifesense 120 feet
Languages Aklo
Skills Acrobatics +17, Athletics +13, Intimidation +13,
Occultism +15, Stealth +17
Str +2, Dex +6, Con +4, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +0
AC 25; Fort +16, Ref +18, Will +14; +1 status to all saves
vs. magic
HP 100, negative healing; Immunities death effects,
drained; Weaknesses good 10, Resistances physical
5 (except adamantine)
Void Child Sceaduinars have neither souls nor the
ability to create. A sceaduinar is immune to effects
that target a soul (such as bind soul or resurrect) or
that require knowledge of a creature’s identity (such
as scrying), and critically fails Crafting checks.
Wing Flash[reaction] Trigger A creature attempts a melee attack against a sceaduinar or an
Acrobatics check to Tumble Through the sceaduinar’s space; Effect The sceaduinar
flexes its wings to emit a brief pulse of negative energy that deals 4d6 negative
damage to the triggering creature (DC 22 basic Reflex save).
Speed 30 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +18 (agile, finesse, magical), Damage 2d6+4 piercing plus 2d6
negative and drain life
Melee [one-action] wing +18 (agile, finesse, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d6+4 slashing plus 2d6 negative
Occult Innate Spells DC 25; 4th darkness, dimension
door, dispel magic, harm; 3rd grim tendrils, harm
(×3); 2nd silence; Cantrips (4th) chill touch
Drain Life (necromancy, occult) When the sceaduinar damages a living
creature with its jaws Strike, the sceaduinar gains 5 temporary Hit Points and the
creature must succeed at a DC 25 Fortitude save or become drained 1. Further damage
dealt to the creature by the sceaduinar increases the drained value by 1 on a
failed save, to a maximum of drained 4.
Entropic Touch Negative damage dealt by a sceaduinar damages undead
and creatures with negative healing as if it were positive damage.
The sceaduinar’s melee Strikes have the benefits of the ghost
touch property rune on attacks against incorporeal undead.
Bestiary 2
234
THE DESERT RIDER
Those rescued from death in the
burning sands often recount the
same dying vision: a strange,
silver-eyed woman whose scarlet
silk tents stand on the back of a
colossal black scorpion, riding out
of a shattered city and leading an
army of the dead across a sea of
glass toward the world of the living.
Millennium-old paintings on the
walls of rediscovered tombs depict
a similar desert rider. The identity of
this red-robed woman is unknown.
Scorpion
Scorpions are frightening enough at their normal diminutive size, but when they
grow to reach or surpass the size of a human, they become absolutely terrifying.
CAVE SCORPION
Cave scorpions prefer to reside in underground lairs. Most have lost nearly all of
their pigmentation, making them appear ghostly when they lurk at the edge of
the light. While they prefer to eat large insects, cave scorpions can and will attack
humanoids. Some Darklands societies have developed techniques to herd or lure
scorpions into pest-infested tunnels and warrens at the edge of their settlements,
where the scorpions thrive in a dual role of exterminators and guardians.
CAVE SCORPION CREATURE 1
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +7; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +7, Stealth +7
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –4
AC 16; Fort +6, Ref +9, Will +5
HP 20
Speed 30 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] pincer +9 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d8+2 slashing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] stinger +9 (finesse), Damage 1d6+2 piercing plus cave scorpion venom
Cave Scorpion Venom (poison); Saving Throw DC 17 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6
rounds; Stage 1 1d4 poison damage (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and
enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 3 1d8 poison damage and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
BLACK SCORPION
With a carapace the color of polished obsidian and a penchant for
attacking villages, this humongous scorpion is one of the desert’s most
frightening predators. A black scorpion measures 60 feet from tip to
the base of its stinger.
BLACK SCORPION CREATURE 15
N GARGANTUAN ANIMAL
Perception +27, darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 90 feet
Skills Athletics +30
Str +9, Dex +4, Con +6, Int –5, Wis +6, Cha –4
AC 38; Fort +29, Ref +25, Will +25
HP 275
Speed 50 feet
Melee [one-action] pincer +30 (agile, reach 30 feet), Damage 3d12+15
slashing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] stinger +30 (reach 30 feet), Damage 3d8+15 piercing plus
black scorpion venom
Black Scorpion Venom (poison); Saving Throw DC 36 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 2d12
poison damage and clumsy 2 (1 round);
Stage 2 3d12 poison damage, clumsy 2,
and slowed 1 (1 round); Stage 3 4d12 poison
damage, clumsy 4, and slowed 2 (1 round)
Greater Constrict [one-action] 2d12+12 bludgeoning,
DC 36
Rapid Stinging [two-actions] The black scorpion makes
three stinger Strikes, each against a different
target. Its multiple attack penalty applies to each
attack, but the penalty increases only after all the
attacks have been made.
S-T
235
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SCYTHEWOOD
Wood harvested from a dead scythe
tree is knotted and twisted, and
often contains pockets of teeth and
bones from long-digested meals
embedded in the growth rings. While
difficult to obtain and challenging
to work with, this wood is sought
out by necromancers, as it is a vital
component in creating particularly
potent necromantic wands and
staves. A single scythe tree typically
yields about 150 gp worth of viable
scythewood for such endeavors.
Scythe Tree
Malevolent, vicious, and cruel, scythe trees pose as normal trees near deep forest
paths, where they wait to slaughter passersby. Instead of drawing sustenance
from light and soil, scythe trees gorge themselves on the flesh, blood, and bone of
sapient creatures. Nothing is more delectable to scythe trees than a kind-hearted
gnome or an altruistic dryad who believes that a scythe tree can be redeemed. The
screams and whimpers of these victims are music to these cruel plants and add an
extra dimension of flavor to the meal.
Scythe trees are solitary creatures by nature, and their size and power mean
that they don’t need to compete for food with other carnivorous plants. Once
food sources dwindle in an area, scythe trees move on to another location. When
a scythe tree dwells in a location for many months or years, it leaves traces of its
bark and roots in the soil. Over time, these blood-nourished fragments might grow
into a new scythe tree, but the progenitor will most likely have already moved on
to new hunting grounds long before the new scythe tree reaches maturity.
Scythe trees appear as dead or dying deciduous trees with long, twisted
branches that end in scythe-like blades. These carnivorous plants have darkbrown bark that is nearly black near the bottom of the trunk and rusty brown
leaves that remain attached year-round. Scythe trees’ disturbing mouths
remain closed when not eating, appearing as a jagged gash on
the trunk. When scythe trees deign to speak, their voices
are rough, deep, and mocking, particularly when
discussing arboreals, whom scythe trees universally
find to be insufferable and worthy of little more than
being hacked to pieces.
SCYTHE TREE CREATURE 6
CE HUGE PLANT
Perception +14; lifesense 30 feet, low-light
vision
Languages Aklo, Arboreal, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +15, Stealth +12 (+14 in
forests)
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +2,
Cha +0
AC 24; Fort +17, Ref +8, Will +9
HP 105; Resistances bludgeoning 5,
piercing 5
Axe Vulnerability A scythe tree takes
5 additional damage from axes.
Ripping Disarm [reaction] Trigger A creature rolls a critical failure on a melee
weapon Strike against the scythe tree; Effect The scythe tree attempts
to Disarm the creature.
Speed 15 feet
Melee [one-action] scythe branch +18 (backswing, deadly d10, reach 15 feet), Damage
2d10+9 slashing
Dead Tree [one-action] (concentrate) Until the scythe tree acts, it appears to be a
dead tree. It has an automatic result of 35 on Deception
checks and DCs to pass as a dead tree.
Woodland Ambush [one-action] Requirements The scythe
tree is using Dead Tree in forested terrain, and
a creature that hasn’t detected it is within 30
feet; Effect The scythe tree Strides up to 25 feet
toward the triggering creature. Once the creature
is in reach, the scythe tree makes a scythe branch
Strike against it. The creature is flat-footed against
this Strike.
Bestiary 2
236
THE HEADLESS KING
Ydersius was defeated by an Azlanti
heroine named Savith in the era
before Earthfall, and now the so-called
Headless King’s body prowls aimlessly
in the Darklands. That the decapitated
god’s clerics still gain power from
worship points to Ydersius’s tenacity
and continued existence, after a
fashion. Those who seek to recover
his skull and return it to his body
hope that doing so will restore both
him and the sekmin civilization to
their full power.
Serpentfolk
Before their ancient clash with humanity devastated their civilization, serpentfolk
were masters of a sprawling underground empire. Few serpentfolk survive
today; their power is shattered, their god Ydersius decapitated (although not
quite slain). The cunning, intelligence, and magical abilities of serpentfolk have
diminished from their ancient heights, and most are born without these boons.
Those serpentfolk who retain their ancestry’s legacy of intelligence and magic
are known as zyss, and they look down upon their more numerous kindred with
a mix of disdain and shame. They see these offshoots as a curse on their kind,
resulting from their god’s decapitation and the pandemonium during the fall
of their underground empire, and have dubbed them aapoph, meaning “chaos
made flesh.”
Today, the central realm of the Darklands retains the old name of the serpentfolk
empire that once dominated this region—Sekamina. This name is also the source
of the serpentfolk’s Aklo title, sekmin, which they are often called in ancient texts.
Sekamina itself retains very little of the serpentfolk’s legacy, its mantle of rule
having passed on to others like drow, ghouls, gugs, and deep gnomes. Yet in remote
reaches of this dangerous realm, the ruins of serpentfolk cities still stand. Within,
a great many serpentfolk sleep in torpor in secluded vaults, with only a few
cells awake to enact their schemes. In addition, a small number of serpentfolk
settlements dot Golarion’s surface, most of them in humid, remote jungles,
far-flung islands, or caverns close to the surface. It’s rare for such a settlement
to number more than a few dozen serpentfolk. They rely primarily on slaves
to build their power bases, to defend them, and to perform essentially all the
practical functions of their society. This includes providing food, crafting goods,
and tending to the serpentfolk’s every need.
Zyss serpentfolk are megalomaniacal geniuses with dreams of returning
to their place of dominance, though modern serpentfolk have few means of
accomplishing this goal. Many of their plans hinge on resurrecting Ydersius,
their decapitated god. His headless body still thrashes about, mindless, in the
Darklands, waiting to be reunited with his lost skull. Serpentfolk numbers are
so small that reclaiming their dominance seems a distant dream, especially
since their reproduction is slow. Though a parent can birth a dozen young
at once, the gestation period lasts up to a decade, and the likelihood that
even one will be zyss is low. There’s no telling whether a child will be zyss
or aapoph, regardless of parentage. A coveted zyss child is just as likely
to arise from aapoph parents as from two zyss, and every serpentfolk
colony has someone in charge of sorting the young, identifying the
earliest signs of intelligence in them.
Though the number of zyss is small in serpentfolk colonies,
bringing in more zyss isn’t necessarily desirable. A serpentfolk
conclave with just a few zyss is functional, but one with a large
number becomes fractious. Cults and societies form, all pursuing their own
passions and politics, with scheming and backstabbing running rampant.
A powerful priest may be able to bring other zyss to heel, but many zyss
question why a priest should be in charge if their god is dead. Zyss thrive
on selfish desires for hedonistic pleasure and adulation. They feel no love
for others, even their offspring. Thriving on decadence, they crave receiving
expensive gifts, gorging themselves on massive meals, and pursing arts such
as music, poetry, or sculpture. Even more academic hobbies, like the study
of magic or warfare, take an artistic bent, like carefully designing colorful
illusions or memorizing epic poems about renowned wars. Each zyss
believes themself to have more refined tastes than their peers.
YDERSIUS
The serpentfolk god is not dead, but in his decapitated
state, he might as well be. Reduced to a feral, animalistic 
S-T
237
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SERPENTFOLK MAGIC
Some serpentfolk might have
entirely different innate spells.
These alternative spells are
typically illusions, enchantments,
or divinations like dream message,
enthrall, glibness, invisibility,
mindlink, mind probe, mind reading,
mislead, phantom pain, or zealous
conviction. Aapoph serpentfolk lack
innate spells.
existence, Ydersius is even less aware of his legacy than the lowest of the aapoph.
Ydersius’s symbol is a snake’s skull surrounded by a skeletal ouroboros.
YDERSIUS (CE)
Edicts seek to return Ydersius to life, fulfill your passions, conquer your foes with no
mercy, achieve glory for serpentkind
Anathema put the needs of others above those of serpentfolk, aid the spawn of Azlant
Follower Alignments LE, NE, CE
Divine Font harm
Divine Skill Deception
Favored Weapon dagger
Domains ambition, indulgence, might, zeal
Cleric Spells 1st: magic fang, 5th: cloudkill, 6th: purple worm sting
ZYSS SERPENTFOLK
Even the least among zyss serpentfolk consider themselves greater than any
mammal. Their magical abilities, most notably their telepathy, are all the
reason they need to hold this view. And it’s true enough that the instinctual
skill and magic of any zyss is enough to best the average human.
ZYSS SERPENTFOLK CREATURE 2
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM HUMANOID SERPENTFOLK
Perception +8; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Aklo, Common, Undercommon; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +8, Arcana +8, Deception +9, Occultism +8, Society +8
Str –1, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +4, Wis +2, Cha +3
Items dagger, shortbow (30 arrows)
AC 18; Fort +6, Ref +8, Will +8 (+4 status vs. mental); +1 status to all saves
vs. magic
HP 25; Resistances poison 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +10 (finesse), Damage 1d6+1 piercing plus serpentfolk
venom
Melee [one-action] dagger +10 (agile, finesse, versatile S), Damage 1d4+1
piercing plus serpentfolk venom
Ranged [one-action] shortbow +10 (deadly 1d10, range increment 60
feet), Damage 1d6+2 piercing plus serpentfolk venom
Occult Innate Spells DC 18; 4th suggestion; 2nd mirror image
(at will); 1st illusory disguise (at will), ventriloquism (at will)
Serpentfolk Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 16 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d4 poison damage
and enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 2d4 poison damage
and enfeebled 1 (1 round)
AAPOPH SERPENTFOLK
Aapophs possess greater
strength and stronger
venom than their zyss kin,
but they lack zyss’ intelligence
and innate magic. Unlike their selfish superiors, aapophs are
communal and group together to hunt, wrestle, and sleep curled
together in pits. Though they’re looked down upon and insulted
by zyss, most aapophs lack the higher brain functions to
recognize when they’re being insulted, much less plan or
execute a rebellion. Aapophs often have unusual
physical mutations—horns, vestigial
tails, or spines protruding from their 
Bestiary 2
238
AAPOPH MUTATIONS
Aapoph are prone to mutations, which
you can choose or roll using a d%.
1–45 No mutation
46–56 Dual tail
57–66 Additional fangs
67–74 Additional, vestigial arm
75–84 Hooded neck
85–91 Horns
92–96 Additional, vestigial head
97–100 Spiny scales
scales—yet these variations have little impact on their overall combat prowess—
and combat prowess is the measure by which zyss judge them.
AAPOPH SERPENTFOLK CREATURE 3
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM HUMANOID MUTANT SERPENTFOLK
Perception +8; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Aklo, Undercommon; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +11, Intimidation +6
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –3, Wis +1, Cha –1
Items scimitar
AC 18; Fort +10, Ref +7, Will +6 (+2 status vs. mental)
HP 60; Resistances poison 5
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] scimitar +11 (forceful, sweep), Damage 1d6+6 slashing
Melee [one-action] fangs +11, Damage 1d8+6 piercing plus serpentfolk venom
Melee [one-action] tail +11 (agile), Damage 1d6+6 bludgeoning plus Knockdown
Serpentfolk Venom (poison) As zyss serpentfolk, but DC 20.
Slithering Attack [one-action] The aapoph serpentfolk makes one scimitar or fangs Strike and
one tail Strike, each targeting a different creature. These attacks both count toward
the aapoph’s multiple attack penalty, but the penalty doesn’t increase until after the
aapoph makes both attacks.
COIL SPY
Some serpentfolk undergo intense ritual training and practice to improve their
innate ability to disguise themselves. These serpentfolk often identify as members
of a sinister society known as the Coils of Ydersius, and the most devoted of
their number seek out methods of reincarnating into new forms to even more
efficiently infiltrate enemy societies. But before such agents take this extreme
step, they must prove themselves as Coil spies. These serpentfolk train in
methods of infiltrating other societies to such an extent that they might be
capable of infiltrating a mammalian civilization for years. Though they’re
expected to work entirely toward the eventual triumph of their people,
most Coil spies also find personal pursuits to keep them occupied in
the shorter term. When Coil spies get caught, it’s rarely due to a lack
of pure skill, but rather to their arrogance or recklessness as they
pursue their hedonistic desires.
COIL SPY CREATURE 4
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM HUMANOID SERPENTFOLK
Perception +10; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Aklo, Common, Dwarven, Gnomish,
Undercommon; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +10, Deception +13, Diplomacy +11,
Intimidation +11, Occultism +10, Society +10, Stealth
+12, Thievery +12
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +1, Int +4, Wis +2, Cha +5
Items hand crossbow (20 bolts), hunting spider venom (2), shortsword, thieves’
tools
AC 22; Fort +9, Ref +12, Will +10 (+4 status vs. mental); +1 status to all saves vs.
magic
HP 48; Resistances poison 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] shortsword +14 (agile, finesse, versatile S), Damage 1d6+5 piercing
plus serpentfolk venom
Melee [one-action] fangs +14 (finesse), Damage 1d6+5 piercing plus
serpentfolk venom
S-T
239
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
WHAT FALLS WILL RISE
The war between the humans of
ancient Azlant and the serpentfolk
of Sekamina waged on for years.
The serpentfolk’s defeat threw their
society into chaos and undermined
their conviction that they would
continue to rule simply because they
had done so for eons. For millennia,
serpentfolk have remained in hiding
in their underground fortresses, but
many feel it is time to rise again!
Ranged [one-action] hand crossbow +10 (range increment 60 feet, reload 1), Damage 1d6+3
piercing plus serpentfolk venom or hunting spider venom (Core Rulebook 552)
Occult Innate Spells DC 21; 4th suggestion; 3rd illusory disguise (at will); 2nd mirror
image (at will); 1st ventriloquism (at will)
Deceptive Reposition [one-action] The Coil spy Strides up to half their Speed and attempts a Feint,
in either order.
Maintain Disguise A Coil spy can maintain an ongoing illusory disguise as long as they
are conscious without having to re-cast the spell; they need only Cast the Spell again
to reassume their illusory disguise if they wish to change their appearance or if the
active spell is dispelled. Coil spies typically seek privacy when they need to sleep, as
an ongoing illusory disguise ends an hour after they fall unconscious.
Serpentfolk Venom (poison) As zyss serpentfolk, but DC 19.
Sneak Attack The Coil spy’s Strikes deal an extra 2d6 precision damage to flat-footed
creatures.
BONE PROPHET
The speakers for the dead known as bone prophets hold an esteemed place
as voices for their decapitated god. Burial rites, necromantic rituals,
and the delivery of cryptic utterances supposedly whispered to them by
Ydersius all fall under the dominion of these priests. Bone prophets often
raise fallen aapophs as skeletons.
BONE PROPHET CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM HUMANOID SERPENTFOLK
Perception +15; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Aklo, Common, Necril, Undercommon; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Arcana +15, Deception +18, Intimidation +16, Occultism +17, Religion +19,
Society +15, Stealth +13
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +5, Wis +5, Cha +6
Items invisibility potion, religious symbol of Ydersius, +1 striking staff
AC 27; Fort +14, Ref +15, Will +19 (+4 status vs. mental); +1 status to all saves
vs. magic
HP 115; Resistances poison 10
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] staff +18 (magical, two-hand d8), Damage 2d4+9 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] fangs +17 (finesse), Damage 2d6+9 piercing plus serpentfolk venom
Divine Spontaneous Spells DC 28, attack +20; 4th (3 slots) air walk, harm,
read omens, talking corpse; 3rd (4 slots) bind undead, blindness, chilling
darkness, vampiric touch; 2nd (4 slots) darkness, death knell, resist energy,
see invisibility; 1st (4 slots) bane, command, fear, ventriloquism; Cantrips
(4th) chill touch, detect magic, guidance, light, read aura
Occult Innate Spells DC 28; 6th dominate; 5th illusory scene, suggestion; 3rd
illusory disguise (at will); 2nd mirror image (at will); 1st ventriloquism (at will)
Rituals DC 28; create undead
Raise Serpent [three-actions] (divine, necromancy) Frequency once per day; Effect The
bone prophet animates corpses of snakes, serpentfolk, or similar serpentine
creatures within a 30-foot emanation. Any flesh on the bodies sloughs off,
and they rise as skeletons. The bone prophet can raise one Large creature
as a skeletal giant or up to three Medium creatures as skeletal champions;
the equipment and attacks might be different depending on the corpses’
possessions (Bestiary 298). These skeletons have the minion trait and
are under the bone prophet’s control; the bone prophet can give all
these minions the same command with a single action that has
the concentrate trait. Any skeletal minions that still
remain after 10 minutes crumble to dust.
Serpentfolk Venom (poison) As zyss serpentfolk, but
DC 26.
Bestiary 2
240
SHOCKER LIZARD TRAPS
Kobolds are particularly fond of using
shocker lizards in their trap designs,
although such traps rarely keep the
shocker lizards’ safety and comfort in
mind, forcing these cruel but creative
kobolds to constantly replace the
permanently restrained lizards they’ve
set up to defend their lairs.
Shocker Lizard
These brightly colored reptiles share the rough size and pack mentality of guard
dogs, roaming in small groups. Shocker lizards have specialized glands under their
scales that accumulate static electricity, and they can unleash blasts of lightning
strong enough to harm significantly larger foes. Though they’re meek and docile
when encountered alone, shocker lizards are significantly more aggressive in
packs, when they can amplify each other’s electrical attacks.
Shocker lizards are notoriously difficult to domesticate because they’re
dangerously hostile as part of a pack, but will also swiftly wither and die if kept
alone in captivity without constant attention. A shocker lizard is 3 feet long and
weighs 25 pounds.
SHOCKER LIZARD CREATURE 2
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +7; low-light vision, greater electrolocation 20 feet
Skills Acrobatics +8, Athletics +5, Stealth +8
Str +1, Dex +4, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
Greater Electrolocation A shocker lizard can sense minute electrical charges in living
creatures, which it can use as a precise sense at a range of 20 feet. This distance
increases to 100 feet against any creature that has used an electricity effect within
the last minute.
AC 18; Fort +7, Ref +10, Will +7
HP 32; Immunities electricity
Speed 35 feet, climb 15 feet, swim 15 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +10 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d8+3 piercing
Ranged [one-action] shock +10 (nonlethal, range increment 5 feet), Damage 2d6 electricity
Amplify Voltage [reaction] Trigger A shocker lizard within 20 feet
makes a shock Strike or uses Discharge; Effect The
shocker lizard lends some of its electrical power to the
nearby lizard. This either causes the other lizard’s
shock Strike to lose the nonlethal trait or increases
the DC of its Discharge to 20.
Discharge [two-actions] (electricity) The shocker
lizard releases a blast of lightning
from its body. Creatures within
a 10-foot emanation take 3d6
electricity damage (DC 18 basic
Reflex save). The shocker lizard can’t
use Discharge for 1d4
rounds.
Shocking Burst[three-actions] (electricity,
evocation, primal) The shocker
lizard hunkers down and begins
to spark with electricity, which it
releases in a 10-foot emanation that
deals 3d8 electricity damage (DC 18 basic
Reflex save). The shocker lizard can’t use
Shocking Burst again for 1 minute.
Up to four shocker lizards can combine
their Shocking Bursts. In this case, the lizards
can delay the release of their electricity until
any other shocker lizard within 30 feet completes
its Shocking Burst. The combined Shocking Bursts create
an emanation with the combined area from all participating
shocker lizards. For each additional shocker lizard that joins
the burst, the damage increases by 3d8 and the save DC increases by 1
(to a maximum of four lizards dealing 12d8 damage with a DC 21 save). 
S-T
241
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SKAVELING INTELLECT
As a curious side effect of its
creation, a skaveling absorbs many
of the memories and thoughts of the
ghoul brains it was fed. While it was
merely an oversized animal in life,
in undeath these memories coalesce
into a strange form of intelligence
that affords the skaveling the ability
to speak and reason, all the better to
serve its urdefhan masters.
Skaveling
Hideous necromantic rituals give rise to skavelings, or ghoul bats, monstrosities that
are not true ghouls but instead are specifically crafted undead creatures. Their creators
are the bloodsucking urdefhans of the Darklands, who create skavelings from giant
bats specially raised on diets of toxic fungus and the flesh of ghouls—especially
brains harvested from these undead. Upon reaching maturity, these giant bats are
ritually slain via the use of cytillesh oil (Core Rulebook 551). While this poison
simply rots away the flesh of most creatures, one of these specially prepared bats
will immediately rise from death as a skaveling after succumbing to its effects.
Despite its tattered wings and sagging skin, a skaveling is more than capable of
flight, even when carrying a creature mounted on its back—urdefhans often use
skavelings as mounts in this way. Their intelligence is more advanced than that
of the typical giant bat, and in combat they function more as allies than as mere
mounts, capable of making their own tactical decisions. Yet even though they can
reason and think, skavelings remain loyal to the urdefhans who created them,
and they never take actions in a fight that would knowingly put their masters in
harm’s way.
SKAVELING CREATURE 5
CE LARGE UNDEAD
Perception +15; darkvision, echolocation 40 feet
Skills Acrobatics +13, Athletics +13, Intimidation +11
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +6, Cha +2
Echolocation A skaveling can use its hearing as a precise sense at the listed range.
AC 22; Fort +11, Ref +13, Will +15
HP 80
Speed 15 feet, fly 30 feet
Melee fangs +15; Damage 2d8+8 plus ghoul fever and paralysis
Melee wing +15 (agile); Damage 2d4+8 plus paralysis
Bone-Chilling Screech [two-actions] (auditory, emotion, fear,
mental, necromancy, occult) The skaveling
unleashes a horrifying screech that chills the
very bones of those close enough to feel it.
The screech can be heard for miles, but each
creature in a 20-foot emanation must also
attempt a DC 22 Will save. The skaveling
can’t use Bone-Chilling Screech again for
1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected
and is temporarily immune to BoneChilling Screech for 24 hours.
Success The creature is frightened 1.
Failure The creature is frightened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is
frightened 2 and stunned 1 by fear.
Ghoul Fever (disease) Saving Throw DC 22 Fortitude; Stage 1
carrier with no ill effect (1 day); Stage 2 2d6 negative
damage and regains half as many Hit Points from all healing
(1 day); Stage 3 as stage 2 (1 day); Stage 4 2d6 negative damage and
gains no benefit from healing (1 day); Stage 5 as stage 4 (1 day); Stage 6
dead, and rises as a ghoul the next midnight
Paralysis (incapacitation, occult, necromancy) Any creature hit by the skaveling’s Strikes
must attempt a DC 22 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is slowed 1.
Failure The creature is paralyzed. It can attempt a new save at the end of each of its
turns, and the DC cumulatively decreases by 1 on each save. 
Bestiary 2
242
SKRIK NETTLE HARVESTING
Skrik nettle venom is magical in
nature and deteriorates swiftly. A
character with alchemist’s tools can
harvest a single dose of skrik nettle
venom from a skrik nettle that has
been dead no longer than an hour
with a successful DC 24 Crafting
check, which transforms the fluid
into a standard potion of flying.
Skrik Nettle
The expansive skies of the First World are home to skrik nettles—delicate, bizarrelooking creatures that resemble large jellyfishes. A fringe of brightly colored
feathers circles their bodies, and long tendrils trail from their center, each ending in
a snapping beak. Known for their eerie, chirping melodies, skrik nettles soar above
the First World in flocks of a dozen or more, diligently scavenging for food in the
fey realm’s cutthroat ecosystem. When hunting or provoked, skrik nettles attack
their foes by injecting them with a magical poison that causes the victim to float
helplessly up into the sky. Skrik nettles continuously inject this poison into their
helpless prey until it dies or is so high up that the skrik nettle needs only wait for the
poison to end, its meal crashing helplessly to the ground below.
Skrik nettles that find their way to the Material Plane (or any plane other than the
First World, for that matter) tend to be much more aggressive, for the planar energies
that they find comforting and soothing on the First World are conspicuously absent.
The first few minutes after a skrik nettle arrives on any plane but the First World tend
to be filled with violence and fear, as the panicking creature lashes out at any nearby
creatures (including other skrik nettles) in the mistaken notion that these others are
somehow responsible for the discomforting change. After 10 minutes or so, assuming
the skrik nettle survives its bout of violence, the creature calms down somewhat and
does its best to acclimate to its new home. Yet even skrik nettles who find themselves
marooned beyond the First World for years never lose their longing for home, and
they instinctively seek out portals to this plane for the rest of their lives.
SKRIK NETTLE CREATURE 6
N LARGE ABERRATION
Perception +16; motionsense 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +16
Str +4, Dex +5, Con +2, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha +0
Motionsense A flying skrik nettle can detect the movement of nearby creatures and
objects from the tiny gusts of wind created by their movements. This is a precise sense
at the listed range, but it works only against creatures and objects that moved through
air in the previous round.
AC 22; Fort +10, Ref +17, Will +14
HP 130, fast healing 5; Weaknesses piercing 5, slashing 5
Spill Venom [reaction] Trigger The skrik nettle takes piercing or slashing damage;
Effect The skrik nettle ejects its venom onto an adjacent creature. That
creature is exposed to skrik nettle venom.
Speed 10 feet, fly 25 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +17 (agile, finesse, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+6
piercing plus skrik nettle venom
Negate Levitation [one-action] (evocation, primal) The skrik nettle
attempts to counteract (with a modifier of +17) a single
effect currently levitating a creature it can detect with its
motionsense.
Skrik Nettle Venom (evocation, poison, primal) Saving Throw DC
27 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 clumsy 1 and
levitate upward 5 feet (1 round); Stage 2 clumsy 2 and levitate
upward 10 feet (1 round)
A levitating creature takes a –2 circumstance penalty to
attack rolls. It can spend an Interact action to stabilize itself
and negate this penalty for the remainder of its turn. If it’s
adjacent to a fixed object or stable terrain, it can move across
the surface by climbing (if the surface is vertical) or crawling
(if the surface is horizontal, such as a ceiling). A flying
creature can move normally but still increases its altitude as
appropriate from the venom. A creature that can’t fly falls as
soon as it recovers from skrik nettle venom.
S-T
243
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SKULK TREASURE
The greediness of skulks and
their easy relationship with
violence means the creatures often
accumulate a fair amount of valuable
coin and items. They prefer fine
weapons above all else and jealously
protect such finds. Since clothing
inhibits their natural camouflage,
skulks either store this treasure in
a secure location or carry it in such
a way that their bodies block what
they are carrying from sight.
Skulk
The cowardly and lazy skulks live on the fringes of organized societies and steal
from others without a second thought. Even murder is merely another necessity,
and they think nothing of creeping into a house, dispatching the residents, and
taking what they want.
Their chameleon-like ability to blend into their surroundings makes skulks
difficult to detect, so their ever-present populations around the periphery of
large settlements are nearly impossible to dislodge permanently. They typically
travel in small groups of no more than 16 individuals, since groups larger
than that tend to break into violence directed at one other. While skulks see
themselves as sharing a common history of being cast out and hated, this is not a
strong enough bond to hold large groups of the creatures together with a shared
purpose for very long.
Entrances and exits from cities, especially less-guarded access ways around
sewers and the like, are skulks’ favorite stomping grounds. These sites allow
them to closely observe who comes and goes from the city while also affording
them swift escape options, should the authorities uncover their presence. On rare
occasions, a well-disciplined skulk can rise to prominence within the local thieves’
guild and become sought after for difficult jobs. Their repugnant personalities and
overwhelming selfishness, however, usually means they are unable to secure longlasting leadership roles.
A typical skulk is 6 feet tall with similar body structure to a gangly human.
Skulks mature quickly and can live up to 50 years, although most meet a violent
end long before then. The rare skulk who manages to escape their society of
violence and craven bitterness can be of any alignment, but those skulks who
remain bound by their traditions always see these self-imposed exiles
as the worst kind of traitors, and the exiles are often targeted for
eradication to the exclusion of all other victims. More than one
band of skulks has accidentally engineered its own doom after
throwing caution to the wind and exposing its existence to
the authorities in an ill-planned but violently passionate
attempt to track down such an exile.
SKULK CREATURE 1
CE MEDIUM HUMANOID SKULK
Perception +5; low-light vision
Languages Common
Skills Acrobatics +6, Deception +6, Society +4, Stealth
+8, Thievery +6
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +2, Cha +1
Items dagger (2), shortsword
Camouflaged Step The skulk gains the benefit of the
Cover Tracks action in forests and subterranean settings
without moving at half Speed.
Chameleon Skin The skulk’s skin shifts and changes to match
the surroundings. As long as most of their body is not covered
by clothing or armor, the skulk gains a +2 circumstance bonus to
Stealth checks to Hide.
AC 16; Fort +7, Ref +8, Will +5
HP 21
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] shortsword +8 (agile, finesse, versatile S),
Damage 1d6+2 piercing
Ranged [one-action] dagger +8 (agile, thrown 10 feet, versatile S),
Damage 1d4+2 piercing
Sneak Attack A skulk’s Strikes deal an extra 1d6 precision
damage to flat-footed creatures.
Bestiary 2
244
SLUGS OF WAR
Subterranean cultures like
urdefhans and xulgaths sometimes
turn giant slugs into war beasts.
The creatures’ primitive minds make
them easy to control for anyone
who knows a few simple tactics—
mostly ways of keeping them
well-fed until just before battle and
methods of guiding them in the
right direction as they rampage.
Slug
These massive, primeval relatives of ordinary slugs squirm slowly through
swamps and grasslands. Giant slugs are always voracious and prefer to eat flesh
or plants high in water content. They frequently consume livestock or strip bare
entire orchards or melon crops. For cattle, pigs, or other sizable meals, they first
shred the creatures using their radula—tongue-like appendages covered in teeth—
to make them easier to consume. The mucus secreted by a giant slug is powerfully
acidic and viscous. Wherever it travels, the creature leaves a trailing brown strip
that kills most vegetation. Farmers and ranchers, especially those living near
swamps known to contain giant slugs, keep close tabs on these journeys. Many
almanacs go into great detail on slug migration and mating seasons. Since each
giant slug needs its own wide hunting ground, the creatures typically come into
proximity to mate only once a year. Either or both slugs can become impregnated,
and any that do typically lay a clutch of around 100 eggs. They usually lay these
eggs in a shallow bog or a cool, humid cave.
Giant slugs tend to travel at night, as the creatures dislike sunlight and dry
weather. They have been known to seek out locations like barns, the undersides
of bridges, or even fortifications like castles for shelter as dawn starts to break.
Woe to the unprepared farmer who ambles out at sunrise to milk the cows but
instead finds that a giant slug has made the barn its home! Subterranean giant
slugs don’t have to worry about sunlight, and crawl about on no schedule in
particular. Narrow tunnels pose little obstacle for them, as the creatures can easily
compress their bodies. These factors make their movements very unpredictable,
so they pose quite a menace for underground peoples like kobolds or xulgaths.
GIANT SLUG CREATURE 8
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +14; no hearing, scent (imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Athletics +19
Str +7, Dex –1, Con +7, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –4
AC 25; Fort +21, Ref +11, Will +14
HP 165; Weaknesses salt 5; Resistances acid 10
Speed 20 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] radula +21 (reach 15 feet), Damage
2d10+10 slashing plus mucus
Melee [one-action] foot +21 (reach 10 feet), Damage
2d8+10 bludgeoning plus mucus
Ranged [one-action] disgorged mucus +17
(brutal, range increment 50 feet,
splash), Damage 3d6 acid damage
plus mucus and 1d6 acid splash damage
Malleable The giant slug can fit through tight spaces as if it
were a Large creature. While Squeezing, it can move at its
full Speed. It can Squeeze through spaces that typically fit
only a Medium creature, but it does so at the usual Speed
for Squeezing.
Mucus Any creature hit by the giant slug or that moves
into its mucus trail is coated in sticky, caustic mucus.
It takes 1d4 persistent acid damage and takes
a –5-foot status penalty to its Speeds while the
damage persists.
Mucus Trail Any square the giant slug moves into is
coated in mucus. These spaces are difficult terrain, and
any creature that moves into one or ends its turn in one is
subjected to the slug’s mucus. After an hour, the mucus dries
and the area is no longer difficult terrain.
Trample[three-actions] Large or smaller, foot, DC 27
S-T
245
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
EATING HABITS
Snakes of all sorts eat their meals
by devouring their prey whole. After
incapacitating a creature, a snake
unhinges its jaw and consumes the
creature entirely, even if it’s more
than twice the diameter of the
snake’s body. A snake can consume
a creature of the same size as itself
or smaller, but most snakes are logy
and sluggish while the meal digests.
Snake
Snakes of some variety thrive in every non-arctic ecosystem, each with their own
particular hunting patterns and defense mechanisms.
SEA SNAKE
These lithe snakes like to frequent the shallow waters of tropical seas. Their 4-footlong, blue-green bodies easily blend into the water where they lurk to ambush prey.
Tales speak of massive sea snakes that swim in deeper waters and follow ships,
waiting for sailors to fall overboard or climbing the side to snatch them from the deck.
SEA SNAKE CREATURE 0
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +5; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +2 (+6 to Swim), Stealth +5, Survival +5
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –2
Deep Breath The sea snake can hold its breath for about an hour.
AC 16; Fort +5, Ref +9, Will +3
HP 15
Lash Out [reaction] Trigger A creature within the sea snake’s reach uses a move action; Effect
The sea snake makes a bite Strike against the attacker.
Speed 15 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d8 piercing plus
sea snake venom
Sea Snake Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 16 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 4 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison damage
(1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage and enfeebled
1 (1 round)
EMPEROR COBRA
These aggressive serpents infest bogs and
lowlands. Despite a length of over 16 feet and
weighing over 200 pounds, they can climb trees
in seconds. An emperor cobra wards off predators
by flaring its hood and hissing at its attacker.
EMPEROR COBRA CREATURE 5
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +13, low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +11, Athletics +13, Survival +11
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 22; Fort +15, Ref +11, Will +9
HP 80
Speed 25 feet, climb 25 feet, swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +15 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+8 piercing
plus emperor cobra venom
Emperor Cobra Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 22 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d8 poison damage (1
round); Stage 2 1d8 poison damage and drained 1 (1 round);
Stage 3 2d6 poison damage and drained 2 (1 round)
Flare Hood [one-action] (emotion, fear, mental, visual) The emperor
cobra flares its hood. Each non–emperor cobra creature
within a 20-foot emanation must attempt a DC 22 Will save.
The creature is then temporarily immune for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is frightened 1.
Failure The creature is frightened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is frightened 3.
Bestiary 2
246
SOLIFUGID BURROWS
Most species of solifugid lay their
eggs in burrows. The female doesn’t
eat while guarding her eggs, and
thus fights even more aggressively
against any creatures she deems
potential threats to her brood. The
bodies of wayward adventurers often
litter such burrows, though this does
little to deter other fortune-hunters
from trying their luck in such
treasure-laden nests.
Solifugid
These monstrous vermin have six legs and two large feeding appendages easily
mistaken for an additional pair of legs. They are often called camel spiders,
sun spiders, or wind scorpions, despite the fact that they are neither spiders
nor scorpions.
GIANT SOLIFUGID
The smallest of giant solifugids are still large enough to harry desert traders and
their mounts.
GIANT SOLIFUGID CREATURE 1
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +7; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +8, Athletics +6, Stealth +6 (+10 in deserts)
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –4
AC 16; Fort +6, Ref +8, Will +4
HP 20
Speed 35 feet, climb 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +8, Damage 1d10+1 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +8 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 1d8+1 slashing
Pounce [one-action] The giant solifugid Strides and makes a Strike at the end of that movement.
If the giant solifugid began this action hidden, it remains hidden until after this
ability’s Strike.
Rend [one-action] claw
DUNESHAKER SOLIFUGID
The largest solifugids, duneshakers, are so immense that their movements make
the terrain around them tremble. They can prey on creatures the size of mammoths
or even larger.
DUNESHAKER SOLIFUGID CREATURE 18
N GARGANTUAN ANIMAL
Perception +30; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +33, Athletics +35, Stealth +33 (+37 in deserts)
Str +9, Dex +7, Con +7, Int –5, Wis +4, Cha –4
AC 42; Fort +31, Ref +33, Will +28
HP 340
Speed 50 feet, burrow 25 feet, climb 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +35 (reach 10 feet), Damage 4d10+17 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +35 (agile, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d10+17
slashing
Earth Shaker Each turn, the first time the
duneshaker solifugid is adjacent to
a Large or smaller creature during
a move action it’s using, that
creature must succeed at a DC 39
Reflex save or fall prone.
Pounce [one-action] The duneshaker
solifugid Strides and makes a
Strike at the end of that movement. If the duneshaker solifugid began this action
hidden, it remains hidden until after this ability’s Strike.
Rend [one-action] claw
Venom Spray[two-actions] (poison) The duneshaker solifugid spews toxic barbs at all creatures
in a 30-foot cone. Each creature within the area takes 10d6 poison damage (DC 39
basic Fortitude save). A creature that fails its saving throw is blinded for 1d6 rounds
(or permanently on a critical failure). The duneshaker solifugid can’t use Venom
Spray again for 1d4 rounds.
S-T
247
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SOUL GLUTTONS
As if soul eaters weren’t frightening
enough, there exists on Abaddon
much larger variants of these
monsters, known as soul gluttons.
Appearing as roiling, inky black
clouds and possessing a half dozen
arms, soul gluttons are much deadlier
than their smaller kin and are also
much more dangerous to conjure,
as they have a disturbing knack for
wriggling out of a conjurer’s control.
Soul Eater
Only the most desperate or foolhardy conjurers call upon the aid of these strange
fiends from the inky swamps of Abaddon.
SOUL EATER CREATURE 7
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM FIEND
Perception +15; greater darkvision
Languages Daemonic
Skills Abaddon Lore +12, Acrobatics +17, Intimidation +15, Stealth +17 (+19 in darkness
or smoke)
Str +0, Dex +6, Con +4, Int –1, Wis +4, Cha +4
Caster Link (detection, divine, divination) A conjured soul eater forms a mental link with
its conjurer. While both are on the same plane, the soul eater knows the location of its
conjurer per its find target ability. If the soul eater’s target dies before the soul eater
can drain its soul, or if the soul eater is defeated (but not destroyed) by the target, the
soul eater returns to its conjurer and tries to kill them.
Find Target (detection, divine, divination) When a soul eater is
conjured to the Material Plane to find a specific
creature, it gains the benefits of a 5th-level
locate spell that isn’t blocked by lead or
running water. The conjurer must
have seen the target and must
speak the target’s name while
conjuring the soul eater in
order to grant this ability.
AC 26; Fort +13, Ref +19, Will +15
HP 80; Immunities critical hits,
disease, paralyzed, poison, precision,
sleep; Weaknesses good 10; Resistances physical 10
Speed 25 feet, fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +19 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6+3
slashing plus 2d6 negative and mind-numbing touch
Drain Soul[three-actions] (death, divine, manipulate, necromancy)
Requirements The soul eater is adjacent to a dying
creature; Effect The soul eater attempts to
devour the dying creature’s soul. The creature
must attempt a DC 25 Will save. A creature
that dies as a result of Drain Soul can’t be
restored to life except by a spell or ritual of 8th
level or higher. If the soul eater that used Drain
Soul on a creature is slain within 100 feet of that
creature’s corpse and the creature has been dead no
longer than 1 minute, the creature’s soul returns to
its body and is restored to life, leaving the creature
unconscious and dying 1 but no longer doomed.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature becomes doomed 1, or
increases its doomed value by 1 if it was already doomed.
Failure As success, but doomed 2.
Critical Failure As success, but doomed 3.
Mind-Numbing Touch (curse, divine, necromancy) When a soul eater hits a creature with
its claw Strike, the creature must succeed at a DC 23 Fortitude save or become stupefied
1 (stupefied 2 on a critical failure). Further damage dealt by the soul eater increases
the stupefied value by 1 on a failed save, to a maximum of stupefied 4. This condition
value decreases by 1 each time the creature gets a full night’s rest. As long as the
creature is stupefied by a soul eater, rest does not decrease any doomed
value that creature might have.
Bestiary 2
248
SPECTRAL THRALLS
Specters often keep a few humanoid
thralls to torment, preventing the
agony of pain starvation, but since
they can’t minimize the negative
damage they inflict with their vile
touch, humanoid thralls who are too
low level generally don’t last long.
Specter
When an evil mortal creature dies, it sometimes returns to haunt the area of its
death as a specter, a hateful remnant, always seeking to slay others—particularly
humanoids—in an attempt to distribute its pain among as many souls as it can. A
specter maintains a strange semblance of its prior identity, but with a corrupted
sense of purpose. It cannot be reasoned with.
A specter denied the opportunity to harm living humanoids grows increasingly
agonized and irrational, akin to the mindset of a starving person forever denied a
release from agony through death.
SPECTER CREATURE 7
LE MEDIUM INCORPOREAL UNDEAD
Perception +15; darkvision
Languages Common, Necril; telepathy 100 feet (with
spectral thralls only)
Skills Acrobatics +17, Intimidation +15, Stealth +17
Str –5, Dex +6, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +4, Cha +4
AC 25; Fort +13, Ref +17, Will +15
HP 95, negative healing; Immunities death effects,
disease, paralyzed, poison, precision, unconscious;
Resistances all 5 (except force, ghost touch, or
positive; double resistance vs. non-magical)
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) 30
feet, DC 22
Pain Starvation A specter that goes for more than a
month without dealing negative damage to a living
humanoid becomes desperate and almost feral. It
changes alignment from lawful evil to chaotic evil,
loses control of any corrupted thralls it might have,
and becomes quickened. It can use its additional action
only to make vile touch Strikes against humanoid targets.
At the end of any turn in which it deals any amount of
negative damage to a living humanoid, it reverts to lawful
evil and is no longer quickened, but any thralls it lost
control of remain free.
Sunlight Powerlessness A specter caught in sunlight is clumsy 2
and slowed 2 for as long as it remains in the sunlight.
Speed fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] vile touch +18 (finesse), Damage 6d6 negative plus
spectral corruption
Spectral Corruption (curse, divine, enchantment, incapacitation,
mental) When the specter damages a living creature with its vile
touch Strike, the specter gains 5 temporary Hit Points and the target
creature must attempt a DC 25 Will save to avoid becoming corrupted.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune to
spectral corruption for 1 minute.
Success The creature is stupefied 2 for 1 hour.
Failure The creature succumbs to the corruption and becomes a spectral
thrall. The creature is controlled by the specter, obeying the specter’s
telepathic or spoken orders, though a spectral thrall does not obey
obviously self-destructive orders. It can attempt a new Will save at
the end of each of its turns; on a success, it is no longer controlled
by the specter but becomes stupefied 2 for 1 hour.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature remains a thrall to the
specter until the curse is removed or until the specter succumbs
to pain starvation; it can’t attempt new Will saves to recover on
its own.
S-T
249
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SHIVER ADDICTS
Talented alchemists process dream
spider venom into an addictive drug
called shiver (Gamemastery Guide
121). Those who become addicted to
shiver may be driven in desperation
to seek out dream spiders and allow
them to bite their flesh in order
to get their fix—a tactic that often
backfires awfully as the spiders feed.
Spider
Spiders range dramatically in size, yet all are to some extent venomous.
DREAM SPIDER
A dream spider’s webs have an iridescent hue and are infused with the same
hallucinogenic compound as the creature’s toxin. Originally denizens of tropical
jungles, dream spiders have adapted well to temperate environments, particularly
thriving among the rooftops of cities where shady alchemists use their venom to
produce the drug known as shiver.
DREAM SPIDER CREATURE 0
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +6; darkvision, web sense
Skills Acrobatics +5, Athletics +2, Stealth +7
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +1, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –4
Web Sense The dream spider has imprecise tremorsense to detect the vibrations of
creatures touching its web.
AC 16; Fort +5, Ref +7, Will +4
HP 15
Speed 25 feet, climb 25 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +7 (finesse), Damage 1d6 plus dream spider venom
Ranged [one-action] web +7 (range increment 10 feet), Effect web trap plus dream spider venom
Dream Spider Venom (poison) Saving Throw DC 16 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 4 rounds;
Stage 1 stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison damage plus stupefied 1 (1 round)
Web Trap A creature hit by the dream spider’s web attack is immobilized and stuck to the
nearest surface until it Escapes (DC 16).
OGRE SPIDER
These terrifying creatures grow as large as elephants. The placement
of their eyes above their wide mandibles evokes the grimacing visage
of an ogre’s leer. Ogres themselves find the appearance of ogre spider
faces simultaneously amusing and adorable, but in most cases, ogres’
attempts to keep these spiders as pets result in dead ogres and wellfed spiders.
OGRE SPIDER CREATURE 5
N HUGE ANIMAL
Perception +13; darkvision, web sense
Skills Acrobatics +13, Athletics +13
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –4
Web Sense The ogre spider has imprecise tremorsense to detect the
vibrations of creatures touching its web.
AC 23; Fort +15, Ref +13, Will +9
HP 70
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +15, Damage 2d8+8 plus ogre spider venom
Ranged [one-action] web +13 (range increment 30 feet), Effect web trap
Eerie Flexibility An ogre spider can fit through tight spaces as if
it were a Large creature. While Squeezing, it can move at its
full speed.
Ogre Spider Venom (poison); Saving Throw Fortitude DC 22;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison damage (1 round);
Stage 2 1d6 poison damage, clumsy 1, and enfeebled 1 (1 round);
Stage 3 2d6 poison damage, clumsy 1, and enfeebled 1 (1 round);
Stage 4 2d6 poison damage, clumsy 2, and enfeebled 2 (1 round)
Web Trap A creature hit by the ogre spider’s web attack is immobilized and stuck to the
nearest surface until it Escapes (DC 22).
Bestiary 2
250
SPIRAL CENTURION GLITCHES
A spiral centurion might have one of
the following glitches.
Dulled Blades: Its blade Strike deals
only 2d10+5 bludgeoning damage.
Misaligned Gears: It loses Rev Up,
and if it Strides more than once per
round, it takes 1d10 damage.
Stuck in a Rut: It uses the same
actions each round, regardless of
the circumstances.
Spiral Centurion
These mechanical constructs were created to serve as guardians in an ancient
and bygone era, although exactly who made them and the secrets of their
construction have long since been lost to history. From the waist up, they
resemble humanoids made of metal, but from the waist down their bodies
take the form of spinning metal tops ringed with blades, which excel at cutting
down nearby foes. Most spiral centurions can be directed to stand down with a
password, although often these command phrases have been lost to the mists of
time. In rare cases, a spiral centurion may also wield manufactured weapons or
a shield in addition to its built-in weapons, giving it access to additional actions
besides those listed below.
Most spiral centurions are hundreds or even thousands of years old, only
staying functional because of the powerful magic used in their creation. Still,
millennia of neglect have caused many spiral centurions to develop small glitches
or malfunctions.
SPIRAL CENTURION CREATURE 11
N MEDIUM CONSTRUCT MINDLESS
Perception +20; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +23, Athletics +23
Str +6, Dex +6, Con +5, Int –5, Wis +2, Cha –5
AC 31; Fort +22, Ref +25, Will +16
HP 170; Hardness 10; Immunities bleed, death effects, disease, doomed, drained,
fatigued, healing, mental, necromancy, nonlethal attacks, paralyzed, poison,
sickened, unconscious
Top-Heavy A spiral centurion’s
top-like design makes it susceptible
to effects that would cause it to fall
prone. The DC of any attempt to knock
the spiral centurion prone is reduced
by 5. If the spiral centurion attempts
a check or saving throw to resist being
knocked prone, it takes a –5 status penalty. A
spiral centurion that has been knocked prone can’t use any actions other
than to attempt to Stand, but it must succeed at a DC 30 Acrobatics
check to do so.
Speed 40 feet
Melee [one-action] blade +23 (agile, sweep), Damage 2d12+12
slashing
Hurl Blade [two-actions] The spiral centurion hurls one of its
blades with an angled spin to ensure a swooping
flight path. The blade deals 6d6 slashing damage
to each creature in a 40-foot line (DC 30 basic Reflex
save). At the start of the spiral centurion’s next turn, the
blade swoops around and returns along the same flight path,
again dealing 6d6 slashing damage (DC 30 basic Reflex save) to
each creature along the same line.
Rev Up [one-action] Requirements The spiral centurion has not acted yet this turn; Effect The
spiral centurion Strides up to its Speed. It then gains a +2 circumstance bonus to
attack and damage rolls until the end of its turn.
Trample[three-actions] Medium or smaller, blade, DC 30
Whirling Death[three-actions] The spiral centurion spins furiously in place, its blades extended
to slice through nearby creatures. It makes up to five melee blade Strikes. No
single creature can be targeted by more than one blade Strike during one use
of this ability. These attacks count toward the spiral centurion’s multiple attack
penalty, but the multiple attack penalty doesn’t increase until after all the attacks
are made. 
S-T
251
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OTHER SPORTLEBORES
While the creature presented here
is the most common of its type,
the sportlebore is in fact an entire
family of insects that specialize in
mimicking everyday objects. Other
varieties of sportlebore include the
spindly, wood-devouring wartlebore;
the corpse-eating sportlegore; and
the sportleglug, which is so small it
can burrow into leather wineskins
and drink their contents without
the bag spilling a drop. Like the
sportlebore, most of these vermin
aren’t too dangerous as individuals
but can turn into a real problem if
their numbers are left unchecked.
Sportlebore
The bane of hungry adventurers the world over, sportlebores are nefarious vermin
that resemble delicious snacks. When positioned near trail rations such as fruit or
jerky, a sportlebore can flawlessly imitate these foodstuffs by flexing, contorting,
and color-shifting its abdomen, then folding its thorax, head, and legs into hiding
under its delicious-looking body. Once consumed, the sportlebore reproduces into
a hungry swarm that is regurgitated by the now ailing eater, ravenously attacking
any creatures it thinks it can consume.
SPORTLEBORE
On its own, a single sportlebore functions as a hazard rather than a creature.
SPORTLEBORE HAZARD 7
ENVIRONMENTAL ANIMAL
Stealth DC 26 (expert)
Description A sportlebore hides amid the victuals on a plate of food or within a pack of
trail rations.
Disable A creature that notices the sportlebore can remove it from the food it is hidden
within automatically as an Interact action.
Mimic Food [reaction] Trigger A creature eats food the sportlebore is hidden within; Effect The
sportlebore rapidly multiplies in the host’s stomach, exposing the host to sportlebore
infestation.
Sportlebore Infestation (disease) Saving Throw DC 22 Fortitude; Stage 1 carrier with no
ill effect (1 day); Stage 2 enfeebled 1 (1 hour); Stage 3 enfeebled 2 (1 hour); Stage 4 4d6
bludgeoning damage (DC 25 basic Fortitude save) as the host painfully vomits out a
sportlebore swarm and returns to stage 1
SPORTLEBORE SWARM
A swarm of sportlebores is a much more dangerous foe than a single insect.
SPORTLEBORE SWARM CREATURE 7
N LARGE ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +13; low-light vision
Skills Acrobatics +17, Stealth +17
Str +2, Dex +6, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha +4
AC 25; Fort +15, Ref +17, Will +13
HP 85; Immunities precision, swarm mind; Weaknesses area damage 7, splash
damage 7; Resistances bludgeoning 3, piercing 7, slashing 7
Pour Down Throat [reaction] Trigger A creature in the sportlebore swarm’s area speaks,
uses a verbal component, or opens its mouth; Effect A portion of the
sportlebore swarm attempts to surge down the throat of the triggering
creature, which must attempt a DC 25 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature gets a mouthful of sportlebores. It spits the
insects out and avoids further damage, but it can’t speak for 1
round, and if it was performing a verbal spellcasting action, the
spell fails and the caster wastes the action.
Failure The creature takes 4d6 piercing damage from sportlebore
bites, can’t speak for 1 round, and loses a
spell as noted under Success.
Critical Failure As failure, but
the creature is also exposed to
sportlebore infestation.
Speed 35 feet, fly 35 feet
Swarming Bites [one-action] Each creature in the sportlebore
swarm’s area takes 4d6 piercing damage (DC 25
basic Reflex save).
Bestiary 2
252
REDEEMED SPRIGGANS
A spriggan’s nature is rooted
deeply in its inability to feel joy
and pleasure, and as such, non-evil
spriggans are rare. Yet they are not
unheard of. A spriggan who manages
to turn back on their inherent
nature loses their ability to assume
enormous size, and always becomes
a hated (if not feared) exile from
their clan. Such a spriggan never
fully transforms into a gnome, but
those who embrace redemption often
discover strange new powers waiting
for them to master, such as the
ability to draw upon the First World
to heal themselves and allies, or the
power to transform into actual fey
creatures for a short period of time.
Spriggan
When the gnomes first emigrated from the First World so many eons ago, some
found the Material Plane so strange and terrifying that they lost their sense
of joy. Seeing only the threat of the new world and none of its wonders, these
gnomes grimly resolved to survive no matter what the cost. Their innate magic
responded to this goal by twisting them in mind and body over the course of
many generations, eventually transforming them into the creatures known today
as spriggans.
Love, happiness, and beauty have no meaning for nearly all spriggans, for
their minds have long since abandoned the capacity to understand and enjoy
such positivity in the world. Violence, malice, and distortion have expanded in
spriggan society to fill the aching voids left behind by their ancient expunging of
positivity. Today, the best a spriggan can manage in place of positive emotions is
a muted satisfaction when they make another creature suffer.
Spriggans resemble muted, hairless gnomes with oversized, pointed ears and
an alien, feral appearance. Many of them are gaunt and haggard. Skin tones vary
across all different shades of blue, from a pale sky color to a deep midnight.
Unlike their more cheerful and optimistic kin, spriggans do not become afflicted
by the bleaching, a fact that many of their kind smugly hold up as proof that
their ancestors’ choice to abandon joy was the right one.
While spriggans can specialize in a wide range of skills, one feature they all
share is the capacity to transform into lumbering, hulking incarnations of their
normally small frames. By drawing upon the void left behind in their souls,
they reflect the anger and cruelty in their minds and physically transform into
giant versions of themselves akin to ogres in stature; however, this rage-induced
change takes a toll on their bodies. The longer a spriggan remains in giant form,
the more pain and agony they have waiting for them when, inevitably, they
revert to their true size. Yet this promise of pain does not deter a spriggan from
using their power to grow in size, for it’s only when they assume gargantuan
proportions that they can truly feel joy and satisfaction. That spriggans feel these
emotions only when they are bullying smaller creatures, fighting enemies (or
even allies), or inflicting pain on victims speaks to the depths of their corruption.
SPRIGGAN BULLY
The typical spriggan is a bully who prefers to take live prisoners in fights, but
only to ensure that they have a large stock of living victims to torment, tease, and
abuse. They train to use weapons in nonlethal ways that inflict the maximum
amount of pain even as they guard against accidental death. When not bullying
prisoners or hunting for new victims, spriggan bullies enjoy drinking, watching
others fight, and fighting among themselves.
SPRIGGAN BULLY CREATURE 3
CE SMALL GNOME HUMANOID SPRIGGAN
Perception +10; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Gnome
Skills Acrobatics +9, Athletics +8, Intimidation +10, Society +8, Stealth +11, Survival +10,
Thievery +9
Str +3, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +1
Items crossbow (10 bolts), morningstar
AC 19; Fort +9, Ref +11, Will +8
HP 48
Enraged Growth [reaction] (polymorph, primal, transmutation) Trigger The spriggan bully takes
damage; Effect The spriggan bully grows to Large size, along with their equipment
(which returns to natural size if removed). The spriggan bully’s reach increases by 5
feet. They regain 5 Hit Points and gain a +2 status bonus to melee attacks and damage
rolls. This effect continues until the end of the spriggan bully’s next turn, but on any
turn in which the spriggan bully deals damage to another creature and is not fatigued, 
S-T
253
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
SPRIGGAN DISTRACTIONS
As a culture, most spriggans live for
battle and constantly patrol their
territories in hopes of encountering
trespassers to capture and victimize.
Even so, spriggans sometimes need to
relax. Since they lack the capacity for
pleasure, games, art, and similar leisure
activities are lost on them. Instead,
they fill their idle time training for
combat, watching others fight to the
death, crafting weapons, or plotting
against their kin for personal gain.
the effect extends until the end of the following turn. When Enraged Growth ends, the
spriggan bully is fatigued for 1 hour.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] morningstar +10 (versatile P), Damage 1d6+6 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] crossbow +11 (range increment 120 feet, reload 1), Damage 1d8 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 20; 2nd shatter; 1st fear; Cantrips (2nd) dancing lights
Bully’s Bludgeon [one-action] The spriggan bully makes a morningstar Strike with a +2
circumstance bonus to its attack roll. This attack is nonlethal.
Sneak Attack The spriggan bully’s Strikes deal an additional 1d6 precision damage to
flat-footed creatures.
SPRIGGAN WARLORD
While the leaders of larger spriggan enclaves tend to be uniquely trained warriors
with highly specialized skills, spriggan warlords are fond of the traditional spriggan
weaponry of morningstar and crossbow, valuing this traditional fighting style for
its simplicity and for using both weapons to their full potential. Spriggan warlords
often serve as sub-commanders in large groups, filling roles in spriggan society
akin to captains of the guard or bodyguards to spriggan royalty.
In smaller groups or remote outposts, a single spriggan warlord is
typically in charge of a band of spriggan bullies.
SPRIGGAN WARLORD CREATURE 7
CE SMALL GNOME HUMANOID SPRIGGAN
Perception +14; low-light vision
Languages Aklo, Common, Gnome
Skills Acrobatics +15, Athletics +17, Intimidation +17, Society +12,
Stealth +17, Survival +14, Thievery +15
Str +6, Dex +4, Con +4, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +4
Items +1 crossbow (10 bolts), +1 morningstar
AC 25; Fort +13, Ref +17, Will +14
HP 120
Enraged Growth [reaction] (polymorph, primal, transmutation) Trigger The spriggan
warlord takes damage; Effect The spriggan warlord grows to size Large,
along with their equipment (which returns to natural size if removed).
The spriggan warlord’s reach increases by 5 feet. They regain 15 Hit
Points and gain a +2 status bonus to melee attack and damage rolls.
This effect continues until the end of the spriggan warlord’s next
turn, but on any turn in which the spriggan warlord deals damage
to another creature and is not fatigued, the effect extends until
the end of the following turn. When Enraged Growth ends, the
spriggan warlord is fatigued for 1 hour.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] morningstar +18 (magical, versatile P), Damage
2d6+9 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] crossbow +18 (magical, range increment 120 feet, reload 0),
Damage 2d8 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 25; 4th fly, shatter; 3rd dispel magic, fear; 2nd blur;
Cantrips (4th) dancing lights
Bully’s Bludgeon [one-action] The spriggan warlord makes a morningstar
Strike with a +2 circumstance bonus to its attack roll. This
attack is nonlethal.
Sneak Attack The spriggan warlord’s Strikes deal an
additional 2d6 precision damage to flat-footed creatures.
Warlord’s Training A spriggan warlord has access to
the critical specialization effects for crossbows and
morningstars, and the reload of any crossbow they
wield is reduced by 1 (to a minimum of 0).
Bestiary 2
254
GIANT SQUID TACTICS
The giant squid attacks by lashing
out with its longest tentacles and
then rapidly pulling the prey toward
itself. While closing the distance
between them, it attacks again,
this time closing its smaller arms
around the prey. Once it has the prey
thoroughly trapped, the giant squid
tears and cuts with its beak and the
teeth-lined saw it has in the place of
a tongue.
Squid
The unusual shape of these swift, voracious predators has prompted many a
nautical tale.
VAMPIRE SQUID
Vampire squid are neither undead nor blood drinkers. Their name is instead
inspired by their red eyes and the dark, cloak-like webbing between their arms.
Living in the lightless depths of the ocean, the vampire squid can eject a cloud of
bioluminescent mucus that nauseates predators.
VAMPIRE SQUID CREATURE 0
N SMALL ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +7; darkvision
Skills Athletics +4, Stealth +7
Str +0, Dex +3, Con +0, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha –2
AC 16; Fort +4, Ref +8, Will +6
HP 15; Resistances cold 5
Speed swim 25 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +7 (finesse), Damage 1d8 piercing
Melee [one-action] tentacles +7 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d6 bludgeoning
Glowing Mucus [one-action] Frequency once per day; Requirements The vampire squid is in water;
Effect The vampire squid ejects a cloud of bioluminescent mucus in a 15-foot cone.
Non-squid creatures within the cloud must attempt a DC 16 Fortitude save or become
sickened 1. The glowing mucus remains in the area for 1 minute, and any creature that
ends its turn in the area must succeed at a DC 13 Fortitude save or become sickened 1.
GIANT SQUID
Dwelling deep within the oceans, this huge cephalopod grows up to 45 feet in
length and can weigh up to 600 pounds. Its arms and tentacles are lined with
hundreds of hooks and suckers, allowing it to seize its prey with ease.
GIANT SQUID CREATURE 9
N HUGE ANIMAL AQUATIC
Perception +21; darkvision
Skills Athletics +20, Stealth +18
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +6, Cha –2
AC 28; Fort +15, Ref +18, Will +21
HP 155; Resistances cold 10
Speed swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +21, Damage
2d12+11 piercing
Melee [one-action] barbed tentacles +21
(agile, reach 25 feet), Damage 2d10+11 slashing
plus Grab
Melee [one-action] arm +21 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+11
bludgeoning plus Improved Grab
Constrict [one-action] 1d10+10 bludgeoning, DC 25
Jet[two-actions] (move) The giant squid moves up to 200 feet in a straight
line through the water without triggering any reactions.
Ravenous Embrace[two-actions] The giant squid makes up to four arm Strikes,
each with a different arm and against a different target.
The giant squid then makes a beak Strike
against one creature that it grabbed during
Ravenous Embrace. Each arm Strike counts
separately for the squid’s multiple attack penalty, but the penalty doesn’t increase
until the squid has made all of its arm Strikes; the beak Strike uses the multiple attack
penalty as normal.
S-T
255
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
STYGIRA GEMS
The gem a stygira carries does not
need to be particularly valuable,
but some stygiras prefer to use
more expensive gems as an
affectation. More powerful stygiras
have developed methods of using
particularly expensive gems to
enhance their gem gaze ability,
allowing some to charm those they
gaze upon, light them on fire, or even
afflict them with crippling poison.
Stygira
Withered hermits wrapped in tattered rags, these scarred, eyeless creatures
command strange secrets of the earth and interpret the fateful energies of the
subterranean depths. In some regions, stygiras are worshipped as seers or even
gods, although they lack the ability to grant spells to clerics and are often not aware
of their worshippers at all. In other areas, they have strange ties to the ancient
empires of the cyclopes, often dwelling in the oversized ruins those creatures left
behind long ago. To many stygiras, gemstones harvested from ancient cyclopean
mosaics have even greater magical properties than other crystals.
Although technically blind, stygiras do have vestigial eyes hidden beneath the
stony, scarred flesh of their faces. Capable of sensing bright lights even through
their scars, stygiras are sickened and distracted by these flashing glimpses, so
they keep to their caves during the day and
wander into the world above only after
nightfall. Far from benevolent, they seek out
unwary travelers or explorers to capture and
reduce them down to the base chemicals and
supernatural humors the stygiras require to
infuse gemstones with the capacity to give
them sight and magical power.
STYGIRA CREATURE 7
LE MEDIUM EARTH FEY
Perception +17; gemsight
Languages Aklo, Cyclops, Jotun, Terran
Skills Athletics +15, Deception +15, Gem Lore +17, Nature
+17, Occultism +17
Str +4, Dex +4, Con +5, Int +4, Wis +6, Cha +2
Items gemstone (worth 25 gp)
Gemsight As long as the stygira holds a gemstone, they can
see through the gem with darkvision and the effects of true
seeing. The stygira is blind when they are not holding a gem
in a hand.
AC 26; Fort +15, Ref +13, Will +19; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 80; Immunities paralyzed, petrified, visual; Weaknesses cold iron 5;
Resistances physical 10 (except adamantine)
Light Sickness A stygira in an area of bright light is sickened 1.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile); Damage 2d6+10 slashing plus stone curse
Occult Innate Spells DC 25; 4th clairvoyance, read omens, shape stone; 3rd
clairaudience, earthbind; 2nd augury, undetectable alignment; Cantrips (4th)
know direction, read aura
Gem Gaze [one-action] (emotion, fear, mental, primal) The stygira holds aloft a gem and
gazes into the mind of a creature within 30 feet, infusing the creature’s
thoughts with visions of the creature’s own dead body slowly petrifying.
The creature must succeed at a DC 25 Will save or become frightened 1
(frightened 2 on a critical failure).
Stone Curse (curse, primal, transmutation) Wounds dealt by the stygira’s
claws leave the flesh bleached of color and turn the blood that runs from
them dark gray. Each time a creature is damaged by the stygira’s claw
Strike, it must succeed at a DC 25 Fortitude save or become permanently
slowed 1 (slowed 2 on a critical failure) as its flesh stiffens like stone. If
a creature is reduced to 0 Hit Points from the stygira’s claw Strike and
fails the saving throw against stone curse, it is petrified. A creature
that spends 8 hours in direct sunlight can attempt a new saving
throw to remove the effects of stone curse, even if it has
been petrified.
Bestiary 2
256
OTHER TATZLWYRMS
People in some regions claim to have
seen creatures that are just like
tatzlwyrms in most respects—a long
body, two arms, and a head—except
that they have traits that are not
of reptilian origin. Travelers on a
savanna should beware a furry,
lion-headed tatzlwyrm protecting its
cubs, while those in the mountains
might be attacked by a feathered
(but wingless) variant with the head
of an eagle.
Tatzlwyrm
Tatzlwyrms resemble human-sized snakes with two arms and a dragon’s head.
Distant relatives of true dragons, tatzlwyrms possess only a meager level of
intelligence. They can speak Draconic (with a thick, hissing accent), but their
ability to reason is limited and they can’t use magic. They do possess a level of
cunning, however, and some have been known to build rudimentary traps and
even lairs. They are not treasure-hoarders, though, so don’t expect to find a
tatzlwyrm sitting atop a bed of coins.
Some tatzlwyrms have managed to forge working relationships with dragons,
though it’s a rare occurrence. From time to time, dragons have used them as
messengers (because they can speak their language, however crudely), scouts (due
to their smaller size), guides (when they’re familiar with a particular mountain),
and even muscle (harassing foes not worthy of a dragon’s direct attention).
Tatzlwyrms don’t work with kobolds, though—tatzlwyrms eat kobolds.
Tatzlwyrms hibernate in cold weather, and when they feel winter approaching they
seek out underground lairs, mountain crevices, or even hay lofts. On one notable
occasion, townsfolk reported being briefly overrun by tatzlwyrms after a conflict
between spellcasters in the nearby hills caused a sudden blizzard. Local scholars still
debate whether the cause of the influx was the sudden change in weather or if the
creatures were drawn to one of the other magic users staying in town who were part
of the same pilgrimage as those doing battle.
When confronted, tatzlwyrms are more likely to attack than retreat. Indeed,
they sometimes lie in wait on purpose, taking advantage of their scales’ natural
camouflage and awaiting the chance to unleash their signature move: belching
poisonous vapor into an opponent’s face. Since this breath attack doesn’t have
much range, the wyrms usually need to grab their foes first and bring them close
to their mouth.
TATZLWYRM CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM DRAGON
Perception +8; darkvision
Languages Draconic
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +8, Crafting +4, Intimidation +6, Stealth
+7
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +3, Int –3, Wis +2, Cha +0
Natural Camouflage A tatzlwyrm’s green, gray, and brown scales provide
it natural camouflage. In areas of dense undergrowth, a tatzlwyrm can
move at its full Speed when Sneaking, and it gains a +4 circumstance
bonus to Hide.
AC 18; Fort +11, Ref +5, Will +8
HP 30; Immunities paralyzed, sleep
Speed 30 feet, climb 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +10 (magical), Damage 1d8+6 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +10 (agile, magical), Damage 1d6+6 slashing
Poison Gasp [one-action] The tatzlwyrm belches a puff of poisonous vapor into the face of an
adjacent creature, which must attempt a DC 15 Fortitude save; the creature
takes a –2 circumstance penalty to this save if it’s grabbed or
flat-footed. The tatzlwyrm can’t use Poison Gasp again for
2 rounds.
Critical Success The target is unaffected.
Success The target is sickened 1.
Failure The target takes 2d6 poison
damage and is enfeebled 1 for
1 round.
Critical Failure The target takes
4d6 poison damage and is
enfeebled 1 for 1 minute.
S-T
257
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
TENDRICULOS LACQUER
Objects coated with tendriculos
lacquer gain resistance 5 to acid.
Making and applying tendriculos
lacquer requires a 5th-level formula,
the Alchemical Crafting skill feat,
and the fluid from the stomach of a
tendriculos. A successful DC 20 Craft
check and 4 days of work are enough
to protect 1 Bulk of items with no
other cost in materials, but the fluid is
used up even on a failed check.
Tendriculos
These strange amalgams of plant and fungus with animal tendencies form where
the natural world is corrupted by foul magic or frayed planar boundaries.
Tendriculoses are instinctive ambush predators who seek out lightly traveled
forest paths and lie in wait in the undergrowth. A tendriculos swallows its prey
as quickly as possible and lets its paralytic digestive juices finish the meal, while
swiftly restoring itself with the nourishment provided by the trapped creature.
When collected, neutralized, and refined, the digestive fluids of a tendriculos
form a lacquer that retains some of the tendriculos’s acid resistance.
A tendriculos comes into being with a rudimentary understanding of the
Sylvan language, but in some cases it might manifest knowing a different
tongue, such as Aklo, Draconic, or even Necril. Regardless, tendriculoses have
little patience for chattering from potential meals, though some determined
fey and primal spellcasters have been known to form alliances or even
closer bonds with tendriculoses. Befriending a tendriculos requires great
patience and plentiful food—and these the gifts of food must be alive
when handed over.
When it has finished feeding and is out of combat, a tendriculos slips into
a quiescent state for a full day, one of the few times it is safe to approach.
Upon rousing, it seeks the deep forest to regurgitate the less digestible
portions of its meal. These remains may contain valuables that survived
digestion and indicate that a tendriculos’s hunting grounds lie nearby.
Tendriculoses dwell in deep woods and jungles. Those too near
populated areas soon draw unwanted attention with their ravenous
appetites. Well-fed tendriculoses develop fruiting bodies that cast
forth millions of spores. Spores that
happen to alight on carrion grow into
new tendriculoses.
TENDRICULOS CREATURE 7
N HUGE FUNGUS PLANT
Perception +15; low-light vision
Languages Sylvan (can’t speak any language)
Skills Athletics +17, Stealth +14 (+16 in
undergrowth)
Str +7, Dex +2, Con +5, Int –2,
Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 25; Fort +17, Ref +12, Will +13
HP 120; Immunities acid; Weaknesses fire 5;
Resistances piercing 5, slashing 5
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Tentacle only.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +18 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+11 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] tentacle +18 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d6+11
bludgeoning plus Grab
Rampant Growth [one-action] Requirements A
creature the tendriculos has Swallowed
Whole has taken damage since the end
of the tendriculos’s last turn, and the
tendriculos hasn’t used any other actions
this turn; Effect The tendriculos regains 3d8
HP and recovers from the fatigued and slowed conditions. It reduces any
enfeebled value it has by 2.
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Large, 2d10+7 acid plus tendriculos venom, Rupture 14
Tendriculos Venom (incapacitation, poison); Saving Throw DC 21 Fortitude; Maximum
Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 clumsy 2 (1 round); Stage 2 clumsy 2 and slowed 2 (1
round); Stage 3 paralyzed (1 round)
Bestiary 2
258
OTHER TANE
Originally engineered by the Eldest
as living weapons, the Tane are a
group of mythical creatures whose
might is capable of bringing entire
cities to heel. The jabberwock and
the sard are two other examples
of the Tane in this book, but
others include creatures like the
bandersnatch, the jubjub bird, and
arguably the most powerful of them
all, the unique monster known
as Leviathan.
Thrasfyr
As bizarre in appearance as they are ferocious, thrasfyrs resemble six-limbed bears
with bull-like horns, draconic scales, and a fire-breathing serpent for a tail. Every
thrasfyr is wrapped in animated chains psychically linked to the creature’s mind.
THRASFYR CREATURE 17
RARE CE HUGE BEAST FIRE TANE
Perception +31; darkvision, see invisibility
Languages Aklo, Sylvan
Skills Athletics +34, Intimidation +31
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +9, Int –3, Wis +6, Cha +6
Planar Acclimation The thrasfyr always treats the plane it is located on as its home plane.
AC 40; Fort +35, Ref +28, Will +27; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 350, regeneration 25 (deactivated by acid or cold); Immunities fire; Weaknesses cold
15, cold iron 15; Resistances physical 15 (except cold iron)
Speed 40 feet, climb 40 feet; air walk
Melee [one-action] chain +34 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+17 bludgeoning plus Improved
Knockdown
Melee [one-action] jaws +32 (magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d6+15 piercing plus 3d6 fire
Melee [one-action] claw +32 (agile, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d8+15 slashing
Melee [one-action] horn +32 (fatal d12, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d12+15 piercing
Primal Innate Spells DC 37; 9th teleport (self and rider only); Constant (4th) air walk;
(2nd) see invisibility
Breath Weapon [two-actions] The thrasfyr’s serpent tail breathes a blast of
flame in a 50-foot cone, dealing 10d12 fire damage (DC 40 basic
Reflex save). It can’t use Breath Weapon again for 1d4 rounds.
Rider’s Bond [one-action] (divination, mental, primal) The thrasfyr
designates one creature as its rider by touching the
rider with its claw. The thrasfyr and rider
can communicate with each other
telepathically at any range
on the same plane and
are aware of each
other’s present state,
direction from each
other, distance
from each other,
and any conditions
affecting either.
Tangling Chains [two-actions]
(incapacitation, primal,
transmutation) The thrasfyr
thrashes its chains in all
directions. Each creature in a
15-foot emanation takes 18d6
bludgeoning damage (DC 38
basic Reflex save); creatures that
fail are immobilized until the start of
the thrasfyr’s next turn. The thrasfyr
can’t use Tangling Chains or make chain
Strikes for 1d4 rounds.
Whirling Frenzy [two-actions] The thrasfyr makes a
jaws Strike, a horn Strike, and two claw
Strikes, each against a different target.
Each attack counts toward the thrasfyr’s
multiple attack penalty, but the penalty doesn’t
increase until after all the attacks.
S-T
259
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
THUNDER AND FIRE
Thunderbirds have a complex
relationship with phoenixes, whom
they regard as too kindly and patient
with human civilizations, even as
they admire phoenixes’ beauty
and mastery over elements that
thunderbirds cannot control. Often,
encounters with phoenixes escalate
into violent arguments, but it’s rare
for one of these meetings to end
in a thunderbird’s death, and even
rarer for a phoenix to be significantly
threatened by the upstart challenger.
Thunderbird
Thunderbirds bring storms on their wings. In times of drought, they are welcomed.
Other times, they are offered gifts in hopes they might leave before flooding begins.
When angered, they call down hurricanes and lay waste to entire villages, so many
settlements conduct extensive rites to appease and honor local thunderbirds.
Thunderbird parents carry their newly hatched offspring to hidden mountaintop
nests, where the young are struck by their first bolts of lightning and learn the
mysteries of the storm.
THUNDERBIRD CREATURE 11
UNCOMMON N GARGANTUAN AIR BEAST ELECTRICITY
Perception +22; darkvision, stormsight
Languages Auran, Common
Skills Acrobatics +22, Athletics +23, Intimidation +20, Nature +20
Str +8, Dex +3, Con +7, Int +3, Wis +5, Cha +3
Stormsight Wind, precipitation, and clouds don’t impair a thunderbird’s vision; it ignores
the concealed condition from storms, mist, precipitation, and the like.
AC 31; Fort +24, Ref +20, Will +22
HP 200; Immunities electricity; Resistances sonic 10
Storm Aura (air, aura, evocation, primal, water) 100 feet. The thunderbird is surrounded
by a cyclone of wind and driving rain. This area is greater difficult terrain for flying
creatures, who must successfully Maneuver in Flight (DC 27) or be blown 30 feet
away from the thunderbird. Creatures on the ground must succeed at a DC 27 Reflex
save to perform any move action and are knocked prone on a critical failure. The
driving rain in the storm aura imposes a –2 circumstance penalty on Perception
checks and extinguishes smaller flames. A thunderbird can deactivate or
activate the storm aura as a free action with the concentrate trait.
Reactive Shock [reaction] Trigger A creature
enters the thunderbird’s reach or
uses a move action within their
reach; Effect A lightning bolt
dancing on the thunderbird’s
body leaps onto the creature,
dealing 8d6 electricity damage
(DC 30 basic Reflex save).
Speed 25 feet, fly 80 feet
Melee [one-action] beak +24, Damage
2d6+12 piercing plus 3d6
electricity
Melee [one-action] talon +24 (agile),
Damage 2d8+12 slashing
Ranged [one-action] thunderbolt +23
(range 200 feet), Damage 3d6
electricity and 3d6 sonic plus
thunderstrike
Rituals DC 30; control weather (does not
require secondary casters)
Lightning Blast [two-actions] (evocation, primal)
The thunderbird spreads their wings and
blasts their foe with thunderous bolts of lightning.
Each creature in a 30-foot emanation takes 6d6 electricity
damage and 6d6 sonic damage (DC 30 basic Reflex save). The
thunderbird can’t use Lightning Blast for 1d4 rounds.
Stormflight A thunderbird can move in wind with ease. They don’t treat wind as
difficult terrain or need to Maneuver in Flight in high winds.
Thunderstrike A creature that takes damage from a thunderbird’s thunderbolt Strike
must succeed at a DC 28 Fortitude save or be knocked prone and deafened for 1 round.
Bestiary 2
260
TICK DISEASES
Giant ticks and tick swarms can
potentially inflict diseases other than
tick fever. Drawing from the list on
pages 118–119 of the Gamemastery
Guide, potential diseases that a
tick could spread include blinding
sickness, bubonic plague, malaria, or
scarlet fever. The saving throw DC
should be adjusted to DC 17 (for giant
ticks) or DC 27 (for tick swarms).
Tick
These blood-sucking parasites are common vectors for disease and other
infections. Ticks infest all parts of the world, save for the most remote and frigid
locales, and have evolved to feed on just about every kind of creature.
GIANT TICK
This grotesque tick is the size of a dog and scurries with surprising speed.
GIANT TICK CREATURE 1
N SMALL ANIMAL
Perception +6; darkvision
Skills Athletics +6, Stealth +6
Str +1, Dex +3, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –5
AC 16; Fort +9, Ref +6, Will +4
HP 20
Speed 15 feet, climb 15 feet
Melee [one-action] hypostome +8 (finesse), Damage 1d6+1 plus attach and tick fever
Attach When the giant tick Strikes a creature larger than itself, its barbed hypostome
attaches it to that creature. This is similar to Grabbing the creature, but the giant tick
moves with that creature rather than holding it in place. The giant tick is flat-footed
while attached. If the giant tick is killed or pushed away while attached to a creature on
which it has used Blood Drain, that creature takes 1 persistent bleed damage. Escaping
the attachment or removing the giant tick in other ways doesn’t cause bleed damage.
Blood Drain [one-action] Requirements The giant tick is attached to a creature; Effect The giant
tick uses its hypostome to drain blood from the creature it’s attached to. This deals 1d4
damage, and the giant tick gains temporary Hit Points equal to the damage dealt. A
creature that has its blood drained by a giant tick is drained 1 until it receives healing
(of any kind or amount).
Tick Fever (disease); Saving Throw DC 17 Fortitude; Onset 1 day; Stage 1 enfeebled (1
day); Stage 2 enfeebled 2 (1 day).
TICK SWARM
This swarm of thousands of fist-sized ticks forms a moving carpet
of bloated insects—a nauseating and intimidating sight.
TICK SWARM CREATURE 9
N LARGE ANIMAL SWARM
Perception +18; darkvision
Skills Athletics +16, Stealth +19
Str +1, Dex +6, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +3, Cha –5
AC 28; Fort +19, Ref +19, Will +14
HP 130; Immunities precision, swarm
mind; Weaknesses area damage 10, splash
damage 10; Resistances bludgeoning 5,
piercing 10, slashing 10
Cling [reaction] Trigger A creature leaves the swarm’s
space; Effect The swarm takes 1d6 damage
as ticks cling to the creature and continue
biting, dealing 3d6 persistent piercing
damage. Immersion in water reduces the
DC of the flat check to end this persistent
damage to 5, and any area damage dealt to
the creature destroys these clinging ticks.
Speed 25 feet, climb 25 feet
Swarming Bites [one-action] Each enemy in the swarm’s space takes 3d6 piercing
damage (DC 28 basic Reflex save) plus Cling and exposure to tick fever.
Tick Fever (disease) As giant tick but DC 27.
S-T
261
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FROGS AND TOADS
While they might look similar
in appearance, toads and frogs
are quite different creatures,
particularly some of their oversized
variants. Frogs tend to dwell in
swampy or marshy areas, while
toads are found in drier regions
like forests, plains, grasslands, and
deserts. Monstrous toads also skew
to a larger size overall.
Toad
Most giant toads live in dry environments, particularly deserts, and eagerly
eat almost any creature smaller than themselves. They’re known to eat giant
rats, then take over the rats’ burrows as homes. Giant toads have large poison
glands behind their eyes that enable them to coat their skin with poison. This
leads to them having very few natural predators, and populations can quickly
explode if left unchecked. While most consider giant toads dangerous pests,
some groups of ogres and hill giants cultivate them to collect their poison for
recreational use.
GIANT TOAD CREATURE 2
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +8; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +9 (+11 to High Jump or Long Jump), Stealth +6
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +2, Cha –2
AC 17; Fort +9, Ref +8, Will +6
HP 36
Poisonous Warts Any creature that hits the giant toad with an unarmed Strike or
otherwise touches the toad is exposed to giant toad poison.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] bite +11, Damage 1d8+5 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] tongue +11 (reach 10 feet), Effect tongue grab
Giant Toad Poison (poison); Saving Throw DC 19 Fortitude; Maximum Duration 6 rounds;
Stage 1 stupefied 1 (1 round); Stage 2 stupefied 1 and confused (1 round)
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Medium, 1d8+2 bludgeoning, Rupture 8
Tongue Grab A creature hit by the giant toad’s tongue becomes grabbed by the giant
toad. The creature isn’t immobilized, but it can’t move beyond the reach of the toad’s
tongue. A creature can sever the tongue with a successful Strike against AC 15
that deals at least 6 slashing damage. This deals no damage
to the toad but prevents it from using its tongue Strike
until it regrows its tongue, which takes a week.
TOAD TEARS
A giant toad’s poison glands can be harvested and
used as raw materials to craft a specialized poison
known somewhat inaccurately as “toad tears” (likely
due to the harvesting process, which requires one to
dig the glands out from behind the eyes). One giant
toad’s poison gland can supply enough materials for
a single dose.
TOAD TEARS ITEM 2
ALCHEMICAL CONSUMABLE INGESTED POISON
Price 6 gp
Usage held in 1 hand; Bulk L
Activate [one-action] Interact
Toad tears can be mixed with any other foodstuff or
drink, but the poison can also be ingested as is. The
process of refining giant toad poison lessens its
deadly qualities, and as a result, toad tears are
rarely directly fatal. Yet those who are exposed
to toad tears often lose control of their actions,
making it a dangerous poison nevertheless.
Saving Throw DC 19 Fortitude; Onset 5 minutes;
Maximum Duration 30 minutes; Stage 1
stupefied 1 (10 minutes); Stage 2 stupefied 1
and confused (1 minute)
Bestiary 2
262
FLESH SCULPTORS
Some totenmaskes craft macabre
“art” by shaping the flesh of their
victims, spending hours, days, or
even weeks molding a victim’s skin,
or even fusing multiple creatures
together into one piece. The
horrifying results of this process can
take the form of furniture made from
flesh that still lives and breathes,
“sculptures” that in no way resemble
the human form, and even more
twisted and depraved things.
Totenmaske
Spawned by the same unnatural and self-destructive obsessions that drove them
when they were alive, totenmaskes are the undead remnants of the most selfindulgent and sinful among us. Though unable to sate their perverse desires, these
foul undead can drain the very flesh from their victims so as to wrap themselves
in a perverse mockery of life that allows them to pursue their base wants.
Totenmaskes’ specific longings vary—one might be obsessed with food or drink,
while another might be vain and desirous of an attractive form to marvel at in a
mirror, while yet another could simply long for the scent of blood. Whatever the
sensation the totenmaske seeks, it is always a vice taken to extreme, for this sin is
what helped condemn it to unlife in the first place. A totenmaske obsessed with
food, for example, might find itself assaulting bakeries or breweries, while a vain
totenmaske obsessed with glamor could quickly grow bored of each new look and
switch its victims out daily, or even hourly.
TOTENMASKE CREATURE 7
NE MEDIUM UNDEAD
Perception +15, darkvision
Languages Common, Necril
Skills Acrobatics +15, Deception +17, Stealth +17, Thievery +15
Str +4, Dex +6, Con +2, Int +1, Wis +2, Cha +3
AC 25; Fort +15, Ref +17, Will +13
HP 128, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison, unconscious
Speed 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +18 (finesse), Damage 2d6+7 piercing plus 2d6 negative
Melee [one-action] claw +18 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d8+7 slashing
Drink Flesh [one-action] (divine, necromancy) Requirement The totenmaske hit the same
enemy with two claw Strikes this turn and is still adjacent to it; Effect
The totenmaske drains flesh from the creature’s body. The creature
becomes sickened 2 and drained 1 unless it succeeds at a DC 25
Fortitude save (sickened 2 and drained 2 on a critical failure).
Living Form [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph, transmutation)
The totenmaske takes the appearance of a Medium or
smaller humanoid creature. This is either its form
from before it became undead, or the form of
the last creature it successfully hit with Drink
Flesh. This doesn’t change the totenmaske’s
Speed or the attack and damage bonuses for its
Strikes, but might change the damage type its
Strikes deal (typically to bludgeoning).
Shape Flesh (curse, divine, necromancy) After spending
1 minute in contact with a paralyzed, unconscious,
or willing creature, a totenmaske can reshape the
target’s face, causing flesh to cover vital features.
The target can attempt a DC 25 Fortitude save
to resist; a critical success grants temporary
immunity to Shape Flesh for 24 hours. Each
time the totenmaske Shapes Flesh, it chooses
one feature: ears (target becomes deafened),
eyes (target becomes blinded), mouth (target
can’t speak or eat), or nose (target can’t
smell). A creature with both its nose and mouth
sealed can’t breathe and begins to suffocate (Core
Rulebook 478). Changes are permanent until reversed
by removing this curse, or the sealed flesh can be
surgically opened with a DC 25 Medicine check that takes
1d4 rounds and deals 1d6 slashing damage per round.
S-T
263
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
TRITON CONCH TRUMPETS
Tritons use a conch shell as a focus
to summon aquatic allies. Some
specialize in different uses of the
conch, such as frightening foes (as
the fear spell) or using water for
attacks (as the spell hydraulic push).
Triton conch shells in the hands
of non-tritons do not produce any
magical effects, but have inspired
other crafters to build magical
triton’s conches (Core Rulebook 576).
Triton
While sometimes understandably mistaken for merfolk—both species live
underwater and have a blend of features from both humans and fish—tritons
have two legs instead of a tail. This gives tritons the ability to operate on land,
though they are neither as comfortable nor as skilled above water as below.
The arms and legs of a triton feature fins that assist in swimming, and their
entire body is covered in fine scales that range in color from silver to cerulean
blue to seaweed green. Their amphibious nature shows in the webbing between
the digits of their feet and hands, as well as the fact that they have both gills and
a human-shaped nose and mouth. Triton hair grows in wide strands like seagrass,
commonly green in shade but in some cases blue or white. Their eyes range in
color from sea blue to golden.
Many tritons see themselves as defenders of the deep, dedicating their lives to
protecting the inhabitants of the seas from evil creatures and intruders—whether
they come from underwater or the surface world. Primary among triton foes are
sea devils and alghollthu, both of whom have amphibious forces that tritons
have had to fight underwater and on land.
In their quest to fight underwater evil, tritons sometimes ally with dolphins
and sea turtles (both of which make excellent mounts), water elementals, and
sometimes even sharks and sea serpents. Tritons can summon such allies using
a conch shell as a trumpet. When it comes to other intelligent undersea
species, however, tritons take pride in their self-sufficiency, rarely trading
with other underwater peoples such as merfolk, and even more rarely
forming established alliances.
Tritons live in natural-grown villages on the sea floor,
forging dwellings out of colorful coral reefs, in rift valleys
heated by volcanic activity, and even in underwater canyons—
though they avoid settling in extreme depths due to
the risk of encountering krakens or worse. They
like to decorate their homes with aquatic plants,
bioluminescent fish, and attractive trinkets recovered
from shipwrecks.
TRITON CREATURE 2
NG MEDIUM AMPHIBIOUS HUMANOID
Perception +8; darkvision
Languages Aquan, Common
Skills Athletics +8, Crafting +4, Diplomacy +6, Nature +6,
Stealth +9
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +1, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +0
Items conch shell, shell armor (hide armor), trident
AC 18; Fort +5, Ref +11, Will +8
HP 30
Speed 5 feet, swim 35 feet
Melee [one-action] trident +10, Damage 1d8+6 piercing
Ranged [one-action] trident +9 (thrown 20 feet), Damage 1d8+6 piercing
Defender of the Seas [one-action] The triton Interacts to raise their trident, gaining a +1
circumstance bonus to AC until the start of their next turn. During this time,
any of their allies also gains the bonus while adjacent to the triton.
Summon Aquatic Ally [three-actions] (conjuration, primal) Frequency once per
day; Effect The triton blows into a conch shell, casting a 2ndlevel summon animal spell. The triton can summon only
an aquatic creature, such as a dolphin (page 84), octopus
(page 187), ray (page 226), sea snake (page 245), or electric
eel (Bestiary 142). This creature remains until it is slain, the
triton Dismisses it, or the triton summons another ally.
Bestiary 2
264
DEATHLESS FROST
Historically isolated in the remote
frozen wilderness of the Saga Lands,
frost trolls have increasingly been
encountered in more temperate
climates on Golarion. It’s unclear
what’s driving these ice-hearted
trolls southward, but some suspect
the machinations of a wrathful
demon lord are at play.
Troll
Towering brutes with slavering jaws and razor-sharp claws, trolls are voracious
predators. They are nigh invulnerable and single-minded in their pursuit, so they
throw themselves against prey with reckless abandon. Wounds that would cripple
or kill most other creatures regenerate into healthy troll flesh within seconds.
Trolls don’t mark their hunting grounds with claw marks or urine as beasts
do. After gorging upon their kill, they suspend any meat, bones, or other bodily
detritus that remain from tree branches to mark their domains. Unfortunately,
trolls tend to treat these borders as approximations. Before a hapless traveler
even spots such a grisly marker and realizes that they have wandered into troll
territory, the trolls are already preparing to attack.
These pages present lesser-known varieties beyond the common troll.
FROST TROLL
Frost trolls are nightmarish frozen monsters of rime-stained claws and hoarfrost
teeth. Possessing wits superior to those of common trolls, frost trolls often hunt in
packs of three—one attacking their quarry openly while the remaining two pause to
assess weaknesses before moving in for the kill. Frost trolls relish the taste of human
flesh and adjust their hunting grounds seasonally to remain in close proximity
to their favorite prey. Of slighter frame than common trolls, a typical frost
troll stands 11 feet tall when not hunched and weighs 900 pounds. Their
sickly, cracked flesh is of an icy, cerulean pallor. Frost trolls often adorn
themselves with trophies of bone and hide flayed from their kills.
FROST TROLL CREATURE 4
UNCOMMON CE LARGE COLD GIANT TROLL
Perception +12; darkvision
Languages Common, Jotun
Skills Athletics +13, Intimidation +10, Survival +10
Str +5, Dex +2, Con +5, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +2
Items hatchet
AC 19; Fort +13, Ref +10, Will +8
HP 90, regeneration 15 (deactivated by acid or fire);
Immunities cold; Weaknesses fire 10
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 30 feet; ice stride
Melee [one-action] jaws +13 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+7
piercing
Melee [one-action] hatchet +13 (agile, reach 10 feet, sweep),
Damage 2d6+7 slashing
Melee [one-action] claw +13 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d4+7 slashing
Ranged [one-action] hatchet +10 (agile, sweep, thrown 10
feet), Damage 2d6+7 slashing
Ice Stride A frost troll isn’t impeded by difficult
terrain caused by snow or ice, nor do they need
to attempt Acrobatics checks to keep from falling on
slippery ice.
Rend [one-action] claw
CAVERN TROLL
Insatiable scavengers stalking the eternal gloom
of the Darklands, cavern trolls consume all in
their path—even rocks and minerals when more
nourishing sustenance is scarce. These rocky
goliaths can tunnel through stone with their
iron-sharp claws.
S-T
265
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
NAR-VOTH DELICACIES
Both cavern trolls and xorns—squat,
tripartite earth elementals—share a
voracious appetite for deposits of
precious minerals. When either group
encounters the other, a frenzy of
claws and ravenous gorging ensues
until only one side remains. Powerful
cavern trolls who consume a critical
mass of xorns can gain tremorsense
and rule as monarchs over their
subterranean kin.
Cavern trolls rarely venture to the surface world, for they have a debilitating
vulnerability to sunlight that petrifies them on sustained contact. Unlike common
trolls, cavern trolls can regenerate wounds dealt by fire. The crystalline nature of
their skin, however, permits sonic attacks to neutralize their signature regeneration.
As cavern trolls age, their flinty skin becomes studded with small crystals and
stones of various composition. Paragons of their kind have toothy maws replete
with large, crystalline fangs. A typical cavern troll stands 14 feet in height and
weighs about 2,000 pounds.
CAVERN TROLL CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON CE LARGE EARTH GIANT TROLL
Perception +14; darkvision
Languages Jotun, Undercommon
Skills Athletics +16, Intimidation +14
Str +6, Dex +2, Con +6, Int –2, Wis +2, Cha +2
AC 22; Fort +18, Ref +13, Will +8
HP 135, regeneration 20 (deactivated by acid or sonic); Immunities bleed
Sunlight Petrification If exposed to direct sunlight, a cavern troll immediately
becomes slowed 1 and can’t use reactions or Trample. The slowed value increases
by 1 each time the cavern troll ends its turn in sunlight. If the cavern troll’s
actions are reduced to 0 in this way, they become petrified until they
spends at least 1 minute in darkness. Spells like sunburst that
create magical sunlight cannot petrify a cavern troll, but the
troll is slowed 1 for 1d4 rounds after being exposed to
such an effect.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Catch Rock [reaction]
Speed 25 feet, burrow 20 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +16 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+8 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +16 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage
2d6+8 slashing
Ranged [one-action] rock +16 (brutal, range increment 120 feet),
Damage 1d12+8 bludgeoning
Rend [one-action] claw
Rock Tunneler A cavern troll can burrow
through solid stone at a Speed of 10 feet.
It can leave a tunnel if it desires.
Throw Rock [one-action]
TWO-HEADED TROLL
Two-headed trolls are savage, dualminded monsters with an unquenchable
thirst for bloodshed, and dread tales of their
ravenous appetites are whispered of in homesteads throughout the
lands of the Inner Sea. Indeed, it is a custom for parents to invoke
the two-headed troll as a warning to misbehaving children.
“Finish your chores,” a parent might say to a stubborn child, “or
a two-headed troll will snatch you away at night and swallow
you whole!” It’s unclear why such a morbid tradition gained
traction with parents, but it’s an undeniable fact that twoheaded trolls have an appetite for “nibbles”—creatures
small enough to devour with one bite.
Mature two-headed trolls stand 13 feet in height,
weighing roughly 1,700 pounds. Unlike common
trolls, two-headed trolls share the upright
gait of their ettin ancestry and do not walk
hunched over.
Bestiary 2
266
MOTHER OF TROLLS
Trolls and ettins do not normally
seek one another as mates, but this
pairing is the source of the original
two-headed trolls—such couplings
were engineered and arranged by
the cult of Lamashtu in ages past.
Oblivious to their origin, two-headed
trolls tend to give no deference to
the Mother of Monsters.
TWO-HEADED TROLL CREATURE 8
UNCOMMON CE LARGE GIANT TROLL
Perception +18; darkvision
Skills Athletics +18, Intimidation +17
Languages Jotun
Str +6, Dex +1, Con +6, Int –2, Wis +4, Cha +3
Independent Brains Each of a two-headed troll’s heads rolls their own initiative and has
their own turn. Neither head can Delay. At the start of a head’s turn, that head gets 2
actions and 1 reaction. Each brain controls one of the troll’s arms, but both can move the
legs. Any ability that would sever a two-headed troll’s head (such as the vorpal weapon
property) doesn’t cause the two-headed troll to die if they still have their other head,
but does cause them to lose the turns, actions, and reactions of the severed head.
Mental effects that target a single creature affect only one of the troll’s heads.
Items club
AC 24; Fort +20, Ref +15, Will +14
HP 190, regeneration 25 (deactivated by acid or fire); Weaknesses fire 10
Head Regrowth A two-headed troll’s regeneration can regrow a severed head. After
regaining Hit Points from regeneration, the two-headed troll attempts a DC 10 flat
check. On a success, the missing head is fully restored. If a two-headed troll
loses their last remaining head, they die immediately.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +18 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d12+8 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +18 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d8+8 slashing
Melee [one-action] club +18 (reach 10 feet), Damage 2d6+8 bludgeoning
Ranged [one-action] club +13 (thrown 10 feet), Damage 2d6+8 bludgeoning
Reactive Chomp [one-action] Requirements One of the troll’s heads hit the
same enemy with two consecutive claw Strikes in the same
round; Effect The other head uses their reaction to make a
jaws Strike against the creature that was hit.
JOTUND TROLL
Jotund trolls are gigantic, nine-headed
horrors who prowl frigid moors, marshes,
and wastelands, always alone and always
enraged. While each of the jotund troll’s nine
heads possess their own brains and senses,
they work much more in tandem than the
dual-minded nature of the two-headed
troll. Despite this, the heads often argue and
bicker, particularly over which head gets to
eat. The fact that all nine maws lead to the
same shared stomach makes little difference
in such culinary disagreements.
Prevailing wisdom holds that the jotund
troll represents a primordial, if not
original, shape and design for the first
trolls to plague the world, arising from a
mythical realm in the Great Beyond known
as Jotungard. This sprawling domain, said to be
nestled in a remote reach of Elysium, is the legendary
home of the deities of giant-kind. Whether the
jotund troll was created in Jotungard to plague
the Material Plane as punishment or challenge,
or if it’s merely an evocative legend told
by scholars, is unknown. In any case, the
jotund trolls themselves likely care little.
S-T
267
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RAVENOUS MUTANTS
Jotund trolls on the world of Golarion
are found in two particular regions
with greater frequency: the magicwarped reaches of the Mana Wastes,
and the radiation-wracked badlands
of Numeria. In both places, the
presence of life-altering magic or
science seems to have had the same
effect in bolstering the presence of
these lumbering monstrosities.
JOTUND TROLL CREATURE 15
RARE CE HUGE GIANT MUTANT TROLL
Perception +29; darkvision
Languages Jotun
Skills Athletics +29, Intimidation +27
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +8, Int –1, Wis +6, Cha +4
AC 35, all-around vision; Fort +31, Ref +23, Will +23
HP 360, regeneration 40 (deactivated by acid or fire); Weaknesses fire 10
Head Regrowth A jotund troll ordinarily has nine heads, and they can use regeneration
to regrow a head that is severed from an effect like a vorpal weapon. After regaining
Hit Points from regeneration, the jotund troll attempts a DC 8 flat check. On a success,
one missing head is fully restored; on a critical success, two missing heads are fully
restored. If a jotund troll loses their last remaining head, they die immediately.
Multiple Opportunities A jotund troll gains an extra reaction per round for each of their
heads beyond the first, which they can use only to make Attacks of Opportunity
with their jaws or to Fast Swallow. They can’t use more than 1 reaction for the
same triggering action, even if a creature leaves several squares within their
reach, and the jotund troll must use a different head for each Attack of
Opportunity they make. Whenever one of the jotund troll’s heads is
severed, the troll loses 1 of their extra reactions per round.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Catch Rock [reaction]
Speed 30 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +29 (reach 15 feet), Damage 3d12+14 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +29 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage
3d10+14 slashing
Ranged [one-action] rock +30 (brutal, range increment 120 feet),
Damage 2d12+14 bludgeoning
Cacophonous Roar [two-actions] (auditory, emotion, enchantment,
incapacitation, mental, primal) The jotund troll emits a
cacophonous roar from all their heads with a mystical
power that distorts the listener’s mind. Each non-troll
creature within 100 feet must attempt a DC 34 Will
save. The jotund troll can’t use Cacophonous Roar
for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is
temporarily immune to Cacophonous Roar for
24 hours.
Success The creature is stupefied 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is confused for 1 round.
Critical Failure The creature is confused
for 1d4 rounds.
Fast Swallow [reaction] Trigger The jotund
troll Grabs a creature with
their jaws; Effect The troll uses
Swallow Whole.
Ravenous Jaws [two-actions] The jotund troll
makes a number of jaws Strikes
up to their number of heads, each
against a different target. These attacks
count toward the troll’s multiple attack penalty, but
the penalty doesn’t increase until after the jotund troll
makes all of these attacks.
Rend [one-action] claw
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Medium, 3d12+8
bludgeoning, Rupture 36
Throw Rock [one-action]
Bestiary 2
268
TROLLHOUND GENESIS
The first trollhounds were the
unexpected result of occult
experimentation on wargs with
alchemically prepared troll blood in
the hope of creating an ooze with
limited regeneration. Most of the
wargs died during the trials; the
few survivors lost their cunning
and intelligence in exchange for
a troll’s voracious appetite and
ability to regenerate. Successive
generations of trollhounds often hunt
alongside trolls, understanding on an
instinctual level the bonds they share
with these lumbering giants.
Trollhound
Trollhounds are squat, slavering beasts akin to trolls in canine form. Requiring
vast quantities of meat to fuel their regenerative metabolisms, packs of wild
trollhounds prowl the foothills of regions where trolls dwell, their voracious
hunger driving them to slaughter and consume any prey they encounter. In some
regions, trolls breed trollhounds as pets, utilizing the trollhounds’ keen sense of
smell to aid in the hunt.
Covered in fetid, weeping sores, trollhounds are carriers of a debilitating
contagion known as bloodfire fever. Creatures that contract the disease through
the bite of a trollhound experience deep internal pain, as if their blood were on
fire. Additional symptoms include loss of muscle coordination, pus-filled blisters,
and overall lethargy and fatigue. Other than suffering from skin irritation, both
trolls and trollhounds are immune to the major effects of the disease.
Trollhounds are fearless on the hunt and in combat, relying on their ability to
regenerate to carry them through. Not even the threat of fire is enough to repel
them, as the beasts don’t recognize the danger it represents. Nevertheless, fire is
one of the most effective tools in combating trollhounds; canny hunters know to
burn every last remnant of a supposedly slain trollhound, for their regenerative
powers are potent indeed.
While trolls themselves have had great success in domesticating, training, and
even befriending trollhounds, the same cannot be said for other would-be masters.
Whether impeded by constant exposure to trollhounds’ diseased slobber, their
ravenous hunger that never seems to be fully sated, or simply their foul personality
and quick-to-bite temperament, most attempts to use trollhounds in place of more
reliable guardians end in pain, misery, and a pack of feral trollhounds escaping
into the hinterlands. Left to their own devices, a pack of escaped trollhounds
can breed relatively quickly, and it can take less than a year for a small pack to
multiply into a significant threat to the countryside. Best to leave the trollhounds
to the trolls, as they say!
TROLLHOUND CREATURE 3
N MEDIUM BEAST TROLL
Perception +6; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Acrobatics +6, Athletics +11, Stealth +8,
Survival +6
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +5, Int –4, Wis +1,
Cha –2
AC 17; Fort +14, Ref +8, Will +6
HP 65, regeneration 15 (deactivated
by acid or fire); Weaknesses
fire 10
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +11, Damage 1d12+4
piercing plus Knockdown and
bloodfire fever
Bloodfire Fever (disease); Saving
Throw DC 18 Fortitude; Stage 1
carrier with no ill effect (1 day);
Stage 2 enfeebled 1 (1 day); Stage
3 enfeebled 1 and clumsy 1 (1 day);
Stage 4 enfeebled 2 and clumsy
2 (1 day); Stage 5 enfeebled 2,
clumsy 2, and fatigued (1 day)
Pack Attack The trollhound deals an
extra 1d6 damage to any creature
within reach of at least two of the
trollhound’s allies.
S-T
269
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
BUILDING WITH SHELLS
The shell of a giant snapping turtle
is over 20 feet long and is sturdy,
naturally curved, and waterproof,
making it a useful building material.
While boggards seldom have
advanced construction techniques,
they use giant snapping turtle shells
as roofs and rafts when available.
Boggards also incorporate smaller
turtle shells into their armor.
Turtle
These generally mild-mannered and docile creatures prefer to be left alone, but the
ill-tempered snapping turtle is a notably violent exception to this rule.
SNAPPING TURTLE
Snapping turtles are freshwater reptiles with a long flexible neck, a sharp piercing
beak, and a confrontational temperament that doesn’t prevent some spellcasters
from choosing these creatures as familiars. They weigh about 20 pounds and have
shells around 18 inches in length.
SNAPPING TURTLE CREATURE –1
N TINY ANIMAL
Perception +3, low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +5, Stealth +3 (+5 in water)
Str +1, Dex –1, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +1, Cha –2
Deep Breath The snapping turtle can hold its breath for 30 minutes.
AC 16; Fort +8, Ref +1, Will +3
HP 9
Speed 10 feet, swim 20 feet
Melee jaws +6, Damage 1d4+2 piercing
Clench Jaws [one-action] Requirements The snapping turtle damaged a creature with a jaws
Strike in its previous action; Effect The snapping turtle clenches its jaws down and
automatically deals an additional 1d4 bludgeoning damage to the creature it just bit.
Shell Defense [one-action] The snapping turtle retracts its limbs and head into its shell and ends
its turn. This increases its AC to 18, but it can’t act except to reemerge, which it can
do as a single action.
GIANT SNAPPING TURTLE
If the regular-sized snapping turtle is foul-tempered, then the giant snapping turtle
seems to be willfully violent toward anything that dares intrude upon its domain.
Measuring over 20 feet long and weighing thousands of pounds, this creature is
capable of swallowing a humanoid whole. Swamp-dwelling societies, particularly
boggards and lizardfolk, have often tried to domesticate giant snapping turtles to
serve as powerful guardians, but in most cases the casualties pile up quickly. Those
unfortunate enough to be swallowed whole by a giant snapping turtle find that even
the creature’s stomach is somewhat armored, making it difficult to cut through.
GIANT SNAPPING TURTLE CREATURE 9
N GARGANTUAN ANIMAL
Perception +17, low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +20
Str +7, Dex +0, Con +4, Int –4, Wis +4, Cha –2
Deep Breath The giant snapping turtle can hold its
breath for 2 hours.
AC 28; Fort +19, Ref +15, Will +19
HP 170
Speed 20 feet, swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +22, Damage 2d12+10
piercing plus Improved Grab
Capsize [one-action] (attack, move) The turtle
tries to capsize an adjacent aquatic
vessel of its size or smaller. The turtle must succeed at
a DC 35 Athletics check (reduced by 5 for each size smaller
the vessel is than the turtle) or the pilot’s Sailing Lore DC,
whichever is higher.
Shell Defense [one-action] As snapping turtle, but AC 30.
Swallow Whole [one-action] Large, 2d12+7 bludgeoning, Rupture 30
Bestiary 2
270
TWIGJACK BRAMBLES
Sometimes groups of twigjacks
gather and form temporary
communities called “brambles,”
usually to aid in times of need for
the forest or to enact some great
vengeance. These groups can
consist of anywhere from three to
30 twigjacks. Once their task is
complete, the twigjacks go their
separate ways.
Twigjack
Maladjusted forest denizens, twigjacks form from the cruel and prankish
combination of fey and the very woods in which they reside. A twigjack’s body is
made up of prickly brambles woven with vines. Shaggy, mossy growth, not unlike
hair, tops a twigjack’s head. Its mouth is just a canyon of splintered and broken
sticks bisecting its face. Leaves and sprigs of new growth randomly sprout from
the creature’s body. Many dense forests on Golarion have at least a handful of
twigjacks living in the undergrowth.
While truculent and violent, twigjacks care deeply for what they consider
to be their forests. These creatures harass outsiders who delve deep into their
wooded domains, forcing back even the most determined explorers, foresters, and
travelers, especially when those intruders cut roads through the forest. However,
they are not terribly territorial when it comes to other forest creatures. When
sylvan creatures, especially fey, rally against an outside threat, twigjacks in the
area eagerly arrive to fight, even if they were not invited.
Less seasoned travelers who encounter twigjacks in their canopied homes often
mistake them for leshys, a tendency that frustrates twigjacks, as they
have a low opinion of such creatures. More broadly, twigjacks
resent being considered mere animated plants at all. Rather, they
embrace their fey heritage—often to a foolish end. Twigjacks
go out of their way to ingratiate themselves to the fey creatures
they live among. Several popular comic songs weave the tale of
a twigjack attempting to woo a powerful and graceful dryad, only
to be comically disgraced after many loutish attempts. Many fey
seem embarrassed by these strange cousins, but
some spriggans, quicklings, and redcaps harness
the twigjacks’ violent urges and disruptive
behavior for their own purposes.
While twigjacks are fey, and as such are often
found in the First World, it’s somewhat curious that
those twigjacks who find religion only rarely turn to
the Eldest of the First World. Instead, twigjacks tend
to worship false deities of their own design: figures
spotted in tangles of tree branches, clots of undergrowth,
or other hidden nooks in the natural world. These religions
are always highly localized, and while these faiths do not support
clerics, they often inspire zealous crusades against non-fey.
TWIGJACK CREATURE 3
CE TINY FEY PLANT
Perception +9; darkvision
Languages Common, Sylvan
Skills Acrobatics +11, Athletics +9, Nature +7, Stealth +11
Str +2, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +1
AC 19; Fort +9, Ref +11, Will +7
HP 50; Weaknesses fire 5
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +11 (agile, finesse), Damage 1d10+4 slashing
Ranged [one-action] splinter +11 (deadly 1d6, range increment 30 feet), Damage 1d6+4
piercing
Bramble Jump [three-actions] (conjuration, plant, primal, teleportation) Requirements The
twigjack is in undergrowth; Effect The twigjack scrambles into the undergrowth
and instantly teleports to a square of undergrowth within 60 feet. This
movement doesn’t trigger reactions.
Splinter Spray [two-actions] The twigjack sprays a barrage of splinters and brambles
from its body in a 15-foot cone, dealing 4d6 piercing damage (DC 20 basic
Reflex save). It can’t use Splinter Spray again for 1d4 rounds.
U-Z
271
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
UMONLEE FABLES
While they’re immense, violent,
and frightening, umonlees aren’t
inherently evil creatures. As such,
there are stories of youths, gnomes,
or other small-statured creatures
who encounter umonlees in the wild
and manage to befriend them, so that
at some later point in the tale when
the pint-sized protagonists are in
peril, their enormous ally can arrive,
bursting from a nearby glacier to
play the role of overwhelming savior.
Whether or not these tales have any
basis in truth is unknown.
Umonlee
Those who dwell in the coldest climates of Golarion tell of a brutal beast that
swims through the ice and snow and can devastate entire villages in minutes.
Ancient Erutaki who made their homes in the frozen polar expanse called the
Crown of the World named this monster the umonlee.
Umonlees are bestial predators who constantly hunt, rarely resting in service
of a hunger that is never fully sated. Despite this animalistic drive, umonlees are
semi-intelligent creatures who often select and stalk their prey. However, they are
not terribly bright and often keep their hunting grounds in sparsely-trafficked
areas. It is rare for an umonlee to attack a village, but one might attack a sparse
group, such as a hunting or scouting party. Many caravans traversing the Path
of Aganhei—the trade route between the continents of Avistan and Tian Xia that
crosses the Crown of the World—have had their expeditions abruptly ended by
an encounter with one of these monstrosities.
Those who study monsters posit that umonlees are related to chuuls, as
the creatures exhibit some similarities. Both are semi-intelligent, crustacean
predators that use ambush tactics to kill and eat their prey. Even though they
can talk, umonlees typically only speak Aklo, which also gives credence to
this theory. This would also lend to the theory that chuuls are products of
alghollthu manipulation, meaning that umonlees are also the results of these
alien designs. However, the fact that these creatures aren’t evil argues well
against such a theory.
UMONLEE CREATURE 15
UNCOMMON N HUGE AMPHIBIOUS BEAST COLD
Perception +25, darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 80 feet
Languages Aklo
Skills Athletics +31, Stealth +24
Str +8, Dex +3, Con +7, Int –3, Wis +2, Cha +3
AC 39; Fort +28, Ref +26, Will +23; +1 status vs. mental
HP 320; Immunities cold; Weaknesses fire 15; Resistances
mental 10
Speed 50 feet, burrow 25 feet, swim 40 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +31 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d6+16 piercing
plus 3d6 cold
Melee [one-action] pincers +31 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+16
slashing plus Improved Grab
Freezing Breath [two-actions] (cold, evocation, incapacitation,
primal) The umonlee breathes a cone of extremely
cold air that damages its prey and can freeze
them to the ground. Its breath deals 12d8 cold
damage to creatures in the 50-foot cone (DC
38 Reflex save). The umonlee can’t use Freezing
Breath again for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature takes half damage and is
slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature takes full damage and is slowed 1
for 1 round. If the creature is standing on the ground, it’s
immobilized as thick ice forms around it, and it can’t recover from
being slowed. The creature remains immobilized and slowed 1
until it manages to Escape (DC 36) or deal 30 damage to the
ice, which has weakness 10 to fire.
Critical Failure As failure, except the creature takes double
damage and the ice holding it in place requires 60 damage
to break.
Greater Constrict [one-action] 2d10+8 bludgeoning, DC 36
Bestiary 2
272
MINOS-PASHAT
The first urdefhans were unleashed
into the depths of Golarion’s
Darklands in the vault of MinosPashat, a nation-sized cavern riddled
with maze-like tangles of stalactites,
stalagmites, and fissures.
Urdefhan
The violent warmongers, occultists, and poisoners known as urdefhans dwell
within the Darklands. They were created in eons past by the mysterious First
Horsemen of the Apocalypse to serve as agents of the end times within the
Material Plane. Urdefhans continue to honor their creators by worshipping the
wretched beings who rule over the plane of Abaddon, and like their fiendish lieges,
urdefhans exist for one reason and one reason alone: to kill.
While urdefhans are humanoid and dwell together in large groups, this is
where their similarities to surface ancestries end. Their visages are horrific, with
transparent skin and musculature displaying their glistening entrails, gleaming
bones, and perhaps worst of all, their baleful red eyes. This, combined with
their gaping maws full of sharp fangs, works to create the false impression that
these beings are some sort of vampiric undead, not creatures of living flesh and
blood. When an urdefhan’s life comes to an end, their flesh quickly curdles and
then bursts in a wave of awful corruption that spreads to the flesh of other
creatures in the area. The typical urdefhan views their eventual demise as a
disappointment, for once they’re dead, their chances to kill will
finally come to an end.
Urdefhans’ primary concern is death and how to inflict it
in the goriest, most painful, and widespread ways. Beyond
this ethos of violence, urdefhans concern themselves only
tangentially with matters such as formal modes of
warfare or aspects of their damnable religion. When
an urdefhan is not actively engaged in violence,
their giddy cruelty is tempered only by a sense
of self-preservation that ensures they survive
long enough to spread the “blessings” of their
daemonic patrons. They pass the time between wars inventing new
weapons, developing new diseases, and researching awful new magic,
all in preparation for the next inevitable conflict.
URDEFHAN WARRIOR
From the moment they are born, urdefhans are prepared for war. Urdefhan
warriors are among the least powerful urdefhans one might encounter outside of
their eerie underground cities.
URDEFHAN WARRIOR CREATURE 3
NE MEDIUM HUMANOID URDEFHAN
Perception +9; greater darkvision
Languages Aklo, Daemonic, Undercommon
Skills Athletics +10, Intimidation +9, Religion +7, Survival +7
Str +3, Dex +1, Con +2 Int +0, Wis +2, Cha +2
Items composite longbow (20 arrows), rhoka sword, studded leather
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +8, Will +9
HP 55, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, fear; Weaknesses positive 5
Necrotic Decay (divine, necromancy, negative) When an urdefhan dies, its invisible flesh
quickly rots away and sublimates into a foul-smelling gas that fills a 5-foot emanation
around the body. This gas deals 3d6 negative damage to creatures in this area as their
flesh curdles and rots as well (DC 17 basic Fortitude save).
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] rhoka sword +12 (deadly 1d8, two-hand 1d10), Damage 1d8+6 slashing
Melee [one-action] jaws +12, Damage 1d6+6 piercing plus Wicked Bite
Ranged [one-action] composite longbow +10 (deadly 1d10, propulsive, range increment 100 feet,
volley 30 feet), Damage 1d8+4 piercing
Divine Innate Spells DC 17, attack +9; 2nd death knell; 1st feather fall (at will, self only),
ray of enfeeblement
U-Z
273
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RHOKA SWORDS
The rhoka sword is the preferred
weapon of urdefhan soldiers,
though all urdefhans
know how to wield these
instruments of war. These
uncommon advanced
weapons cost 4 gp, deal 1d8
slashing damage, have 2 Bulk,
and require 1 hand to use. Rhoka
swords are in the sword group and
have the deadly d8 and two-hand
1d10 traits.
Ravenous Attack[two-actions] The urdefhan makes one rhoka sword Strike and one jaws Strike
against a single creature. Its multiple attack penalty doesn’t increase until after
both attacks.
Wicked Bite [one-action] Requirements The urdefhan damaged a creature with a jaws Strike on its
last action; Effect The urdefhan maintains contact, turning the creature’s
flesh translucent around the site of the injury. The urdefhan chooses
one of two options, each of which requires a DC 20 Fortitude save.
If the jaws Strike was a critical hit, the creature suffers both effects,
using the same save result for both.
• Drain Blood The urdefhan drinks some of the creature’s blood. On a
failed save, the creature is drained 1 and the urdefhan regains 5 HP
(or, on a critical failure, it’s drained 2 and the urdefhan regains 10 HP).
• Drain Vitality (necromancy) The urdefhan draws out some of the
creature’s vital essence. The creature becomes enfeebled 1 for 1 hour
on a failed save (or enfeebled 2 for 1 hour on a critical failure).
URDEFHAN TORMENTOR
Urdefhan spellcasters with a knack for the divine are invariably
unholy worshippers of daemonkind, typically taking on one of
Abaddon’s Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse as their patron deity.
With their unholy gifts, these urdefhan tormentors summon daemons
into battle and bolster their allies with profane magic, preferring to
stick to the sidelines rather than enter the fray directly.
URDEFHAN TORMENTOR CREATURE 5
NE MEDIUM HUMANOID URDEFHAN
Perception +13; greater darkvision
Languages Aklo, Daemonic, Undercommon
Skills Acrobatics +8, Crafting +9, Intimidation +11, Occultism +11,
Religion +13
Str +3, Dex +1, Con +3, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +2
Items warhammer
AC 21; Fort +11, Ref +10, Will +15
HP 77, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease,
fear; Weaknesses positive 5
Necrotic Decay (divine, necromancy, negative) As urdefhan
warrior, but DC 21 and 5d6 negative damage.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] warhammer +12 (shove), Damage 1d8+5
bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] jaws +14, Damage 2d6+5 piercing plus
Wicked Bite
Divine Innate Spells DC 23, attack +15; 3rd harm,
paralyze; 2nd darkness, death knell, false life, harm;
1st feather fall (self only), grim tendrils, harm, ray
of enfeeblement
Rituals DC 23; daemonic pact
Stoke the Fervent [two-actions] (auditory, divine, emotion,
enchantment, mental) Frequency once per day; Effect
The urdefhan lets out a battle cry, sending itself and its
allies into a fanatical frenzy. Each ally that hears the call
gains a +1 status bonus to attack rolls, damage rolls, and
saving throws, and takes a –1 status penalty to AC. Affected
allies must use at least one of their actions to Strike each round, if
they are able (even if it means attacking an ally, object, or thin
air). This lasts for 2d4 rounds.
Wicked Bite [one-action] As urdefhan warrior, but DC 22.
Bestiary 2
274
BUILDING A VRYKOLAKAS
Like vampires (Bestiary 318–321),
vrykolakas can infect victims with
their twisted form of vampirism,
transforming practically any living
monster into one of these undead
horrors. You can build a new
vrykolakas from the ground up
using the standard monster creation
rules, which were used to create
the vrykolakas spawn, vrykolakas
master, and vrykolakas ancient, or
you can use the guidelines presented
under Creating a Vrykolakas to
turn an existing creature (even a
player character!) into a vrykolakas,
adjusting the monster as you see fit.
In either case, specific vrykolakas
abilities like negative healing, Feral
Corruption, and Drink Blood work
the same.
Vampire, Vrykolakas
Wicked and vengeful souls denied even the most basic burial rites can rise again as
vrykolakas, blood-drinking and plague-bearing reanimated corpses. They spread
suffering and death among all who cross their paths, punishing all who remind
them of those who failed to properly lay their bodies and souls to rest.
CREATING A VRYKOLAKAS
You can turn an existing living creature into a vrykolakas using the following steps.
Increase the creature’s level by 1 and change its statistics as follows.
• It gains the undead and vampire traits, and it becomes evil.
• Increase AC, attack modifiers, DCs, saving throws, and skill modifiers by 1.
• Increase Speed by 10 feet or to 40 feet, whichever results in a higher Speed.
• Increase damage with Strikes and other offensive abilities by 1. If an ability
can be used only a small number of times (such as a dragon’s Breath Weapon),
increase the damage by 2 instead.
Basic Vrykolakas aBilities
If the base creature becoming a vrykolakas has any abilities that specifically come
from it being a living creature, it loses them. It also loses any traits that represented
its life as a living creature, such as human and humanoid. You might also need to
adjust abilities that conflict with the vrykolakas’ theme. All vrykolakas gain the
following abilities.
Darkvision
Swift Tracker The vrykolakas moves at full Speed while Tracking.
Negative Healing
Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison, sleep
Feral Corruption [free-action] (curse, divine, incapacitation, mental, necromancy, possession)
Trigger The vrykolakas is reduced to 0 Hit Points, and an animal is within 100 feet;
Effect Unlike most other undead, a vrykolakas isn’t destroyed when it reaches 0
HP. Instead, it attempts to cast its spirit into an animal within 100 feet, which must
attempt a Will save (use a high DC for the vrykolakas’s level from the Spell DC and
Spell Attack Roll table on page 66 of the Gamemastery Guide). On a failure, the animal
is possessed. This has the effects of the possession spell, but it lasts a number of
days equal to the vrykolakas’s level. This possession can’t be counteracted with magic
(though remove curse works against it normally).
If the animal succeeds at its save, the vrykolakas can attempt to possess a different
animal within 100 feet. If at any point an animal critically succeeds at its save or no
animal is within 100 feet, the vrykolakas fails to possess anything and is destroyed.
A vrykolakas possessing an animal seeks out its burial site (see Burial Site Bound
below) immediately, burying itself there. While the vrykolakas is in this state of recovery,
its animal host is paralyzed, and beheading it destroys the vrykolakas and kills its host.
Removing the curse destroys the vrykolakas and returns the animal to normal. After
1d4 days, if the vrykolakas hasn’t been destroyed, the animal dies and the vrykolakas
rises in a new body that’s identical to its previous one, formed from the animal’s remains.
Vrykolakas Vulnerabilities Vrykolakas all have the following vulnerabilities.
• Burial Site Bound A vrykolakas is bound to the place of its death or interment. It
must return to this location once per week and bury itself in the earth for 24 hours,
during which time it is paralyzed and can be beheaded. If it is unable to return to
this site, it is reduced to 0 Hit Points and attempts to use Feral Corruption; if this
host animal can’t return to the burial site before the possession effect ends, the
vrykolakas is destroyed and the animal host returns to normal.
• Vulnerable to Decapitation A vrykolakas that is beheaded can’t use its Feral
Possession, and a beheaded corpse cannot rise as a vrykolakas.
Climb Speed A vrykolakas gains a climb Speed equal to one-half its land Speed.
Claws If the base creature had hands, it gains an unarmed claw Strike that deals slashing
damage and has the agile trait. Use the moderate damage for the creature’s level on
the Strike Damage table found on page 65 of the Gamemastery Guide.
U-Z
275
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
VRYKOLAKAS HABITS
Most vrykolakas have curious
affectations, such as a compulsion
to knock on a door before
entering or calling out the name
of the person within. If the person
answers, the vrykolakas then tries
to hunt and slay them within 3 days.
Others have an affinity for specific
types of animals, always preferring
to charm or possess them, or have
an aversion to others. Unlike a moroi
vampire, however, for a vrykolakas
these habits are merely sadistic
games or personal preferences, not
mystical compulsions.
Fangs The teeth of the vrykolakas grow long, sharp, and deadly, granting it a fangs
Strike: an unarmed attack that deals piercing damage and enables the use of its Drink
Blood ability. Use the high damage for the creature’s level on the Strike Damage table
found on page 65 of the Gamemastery Guide.
Drink Blood [one-action] (divine, necromancy) Requirements The vrykolakas’ last action was a
successful fangs Strike; Effect The vrykolakas sinks its fangs into that creature to
drink its blood. This requires an Athletics check against the creature’s Fortitude DC.
On a success, the creature becomes drained 1, and the vrykolakas regains HP equal
to 10% of its maximum HP, gaining any excess HP as temporary Hit Points. Drinking
Blood from a creature that’s already drained doesn’t restore any HP to the vampire,
but it increases the creature’s drained condition value by 1. A vrykolakas can also
consume blood that’s been emptied into a vessel for sustenance, but it gains no HP
from doing so.
The target creature’s drained condition value decreases by 1 per week. A blood
transfusion, which requires a successful DC 20 Medicine check and sufficient blood or
a blood donor, reduces the drained value by 1 after 10 minutes.
Rend [one-action] The vrykolakas gains the Rend action with its claws.
Vrykolakas Master aBilities
Particularly powerful vrykolakas can create spawn from the bodies of their
victims and gain additional abilities, as detailed below. Creatures of 9th level or
higher can become a vrykolakas master, while those of 12th level or higher who
have survived for centuries might become a vrykolakas ancient.
Children of the Night (divine, enchantment, mental) The presence of a vrykolakas master
inspires savage creatures to crawl forth to do its bidding, including rat swarms, wargs,
werewolves, and similar creatures. The vrykolakas master can give telepathic orders
to these creatures within 100 feet, but they can’t communicate back.
Pestilential Aura (aura, divine, necromancy) 5 feet. Creatures beginning their turn in the
area while the vrykolakas is in its true form are exposed to bubonic plague.
Divine Innate Spells The vrykolakas master can cast vampiric touch (heightened
to half its level rounded up) and 3rd-level fear three times per day each as
divine innate spells. It uses a high DC for its level (Gamemastery Guide 66).
Bubonic Plague (disease) Saving Throw Fortitude (use a high DC for the
vrykolakas’s level [Gamemastery Guide 66]); Onset 1 day; Stage 1 fatigued (1 day);
Stage 2 enfeebled 2 and fatigued (1 day); Stage 3 enfeebled 3, fatigued, and takes
1d6 persistent bleed damage every 1d20 minutes (1 day)
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph, transmutation) A vrykolakas
master can transform into a form resembling the body it had in life, with the effects
of humanoid form but with unlimited duration. It loses its fangs and claw Strikes but
gains a +2 circumstance bonus to Deception checks to Impersonate in this form.
Create Spawn (divine, downtime, necromancy) If a creature dies after being reduced to
0 HP by Drink Blood, a vrykolakas master can turn this creature into a vrykolakas
spawn (page 276) by donating some of its own blood to the
creature and burying it in earth for 3 nights. Such vrykolakas
spawn are generally friendly to the vrykolakas that created
them, but they are not under its control and typically wander
off on their own rampage within 1d6 days of their creation.
Dominate Animal [one-action] (divine, enchantment,
incapacitation, mental) The vrykolakas can
cast dominate at will as a divine innate
spell that affects only animals. The save
DC is a high DC for the vrykolakas’s
level (Gamemastery Guide 66), and a
creature that succeeds is immune to
that vrykolakas’s Dominate Animal
for 24 hours. Destroying the
vrykolakas ends the effect, but 
Bestiary 2
276
DEBASED AND DISTORTED
Vrykolakas are corrupted bestial
versions of their appearance in life,
and are emaciated and pockmarked
with disease. Their spines are bent
in a perpetual hunch. While some
vrykolakas can cloak themselves
in a semblance of living flesh, their
fragmented memories often cannot
accurately recreate their former
appearance or persona. They may not
recognize former family and friends
(and vice versa), but those they
do remember are marked as their
favored victims.
reducing it to 0 HP does not. A dominated animal takes a –4 circumstance penalty to
saving throws against the vrykolakas’s Feral Possession.
Drink Blood As a typical vrykolakas, but the creature is drained 2 instead of 1.
VRYKOLAKAS SPAWN
Vrykolakas unleash their spawn upon the world to spread terror, plague, and
suffering and to draw attention away from their masters.
VRYKOLAKAS SPAWN CREATURE 6
NE MEDIUM UNDEAD VAMPIRE
Perception +14; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +14, Athletics +15, Stealth +14, Survival +11
Languages Common
Str +5, Dex +4, Con +2, Int –3, Wis +2, Cha +2
AC 24; Fort +14, Ref +16, Will +12
HP 99, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyze, poison, sleep
Vrykolakas Vulnerabilities
Feral Possession [free-action] (divine, incapacitation, mental, necromancy, possession) DC 24
Speed 40 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +17, Damage 2d8+8 piercing plus Drink Blood
Melee [one-action] claw +17 (agile), Damage 2d6+8 slashing
Drink Blood [one-action] (divine, necromancy) When Drinking Blood, the vrykolakas spawn
regains 10 HP.
Rend [one-action] claw
VRYKOLAKAS MASTER
Vrykolakas masters are sinister shapechangers. They walk undetected
among the living and prey upon them like a wolf among sheep, often
leaving the corpses to rise as vrykolakas spawn.
VRYKOLAKAS MASTER CREATURE 10
NE MEDIUM UNDEAD VAMPIRE
Perception +19; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +19, Athletics +23, Deception +19, Intimidation
+21, Stealth +21, Survival +17
Languages Common
Str +7, Dex +5, Con +3, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +5
Children of the Night (divine, enchantment, mental)
Swift Tracker
AC 30; Fort +19, Ref +21, Will +17
HP 190, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyze,
poison, sleep
Pestilential Aura (aura, divine, necromancy) DC 29
Vrykolakas Vulnerabilities
Feral Possession[free-action] (divine, incapacitation, mental, necromancy,
possession) DC 29
Speed 40 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +23, Damage 2d12+13 piercing plus
Drink Blood
Melee [one-action] claw +23 (agile), Damage 2d8+13 slashing
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 5th vampiric touch (×3);
3rd fear (×3)
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph,
transmutation)
Create Spawn (divine, downtime, necromancy)
Dominate Animal [one-action] (divine, enchantment, incapacitation, mental)
DC 29
U-Z
277
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
MYTHOLOGICAL ORIGINS
The vrykolakas (pronounced
“vree-KO-la-kahss”) is an undead
creature from Greek folklore. These
revenants appear as humans come
back after death to complete some
task left undone before they can
peacefully rest. Many are vengeful
and murderous, but some are simply
attempting to return to their former
lives, like a shoemaker rising from
the grave to mend his children’s
shoes, carry water, and chop
firewood. The Pathfinder version of
this creature is more associated with
a feral form of vampire.
Drink Blood [one-action] (divine, necromancy) When Drinking Blood, the vrykolakas master
regains 19 HP.
Rend [one-action] claw
VRYKOLAKAS ANCIENT
Vrykolakas ancients are the sinister overlords of their kind, stealing blood, breath,
and life to feed their immortal hunger.
VRYKOLAKAS ANCIENT CREATURE 13
UNCOMMON NE MEDIUM UNDEAD VAMPIRE
Perception +23; darkvision
Skills Acrobatics +24, Athletics +29, Deception +27, Intimidation +27, Religion +19,
Stealth +26, Survival +23
Languages Common
Str +8, Dex +5, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +4, Cha +8
Children of the Night (divine, enchantment, mental)
Swift Tracker
AC 34; Fort +23, Ref +24, Will +21
HP 250, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyze, poison, sleep
Pestilential Aura (aura, divine, necromancy) DC 33
Vrykolakas Vulnerabilities
Feral Possession [free-action] (divine, incapacitation, mental, necromancy, possession) DC 33
Speed 40 feet, climb 20 feet
Melee [one-action] fangs +27, Damage 3d10+17 piercing plus Drink Blood
Melee [one-action] claw +27 (agile); Damage 3d6+17 slashing
Divine Innate Spells DC 33; 7th vampiric touch (×3); 3rd fear (×3)
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, divine, polymorph, transmutation)
Create Spawn (divine, downtime, necromancy)
Dominate Animal [one-action] (divine, enchantment, incapacitation, mental) DC 33
Drink Blood [one-action] (divine, necromancy) When Drinking Blood, the
vrykolakas ancient regains 25 HP.
Rend [one-action] claw
Sanguine Mauling [one-action] Requirements The vrykolakas ancient’s
last action was to Drink Blood; Effect The vrykolakas
ancient makes two claw Strikes. Both count toward its
multiple attack penalty, but the penalty increases only
after it makes both attacks. If it hits with both claws,
the target takes 1d6 persistent bleed damage.
Steal Breath [two-actions] (manipulate) Requirements The
vrykolakas ancient is adjacent to an unconscious
creature; Effect The vrykolakas ancient steals
the creature’s breath. The unconscious creature
begins suffocating, can’t be awakened for 1
round, and must attempt a DC 33 Fortitude
save. If a creature is targeted with this
ability in consecutive rounds, the save DC
decreases by 2 each round after the first.
Critical Success The target
immediately awakens and is then
temporarily immune to Steal
Breath for 24 hours.
Success The target is unaffected.
Failure The target takes
1d10 damage.
Critical Failure The target
is reduced to 0 HP and
becomes dying 1. 
Bestiary 2
278
AGENTS OF EMPTY DEATH
Vampiric mists are linked to the
will-o’-wisp, another notorious
swamp-dwelling, vaporous predator,
in that both of these entities are
often encountered in areas where
the Outer God Nhimbaloth has
brushed close to the world. Often,
the wounds on a corpse fed upon by
a vampiric mist bear Nhimbaloth’s
mark: a cluster of seven perfectly
spaced punctures through which the
victim’s blood has been drained.
Vampiric Mist
Though they’re often mistaken for vampires in gaseous form or an unusual type
of air elemental, vampiric mists are in fact strange aberrant life-forms. With an
amorphous body that consists as much of fluid as it does of air, these creatures
dwell in swamps or moist underground regions where their vulnerability to heat
isn’t as much of a concern. Still, they prefer to lair near the fringes of such areas,
as a vampiric mist needs a constant supply of fresh blood for sustenance. While
blood drawn from animals is just as nutritious as blood from anything else, these
sadistic monsters vastly prefer the flavor of blood drawn from thinking creatures.
Like will-o’-wisps, vampiric mists find that fear flavors the blood, though they
gain no particular advantage by feeding on the frightened.
Although somewhat intelligent, vampiric mists do not form societies. They
sometimes group into small gangs, but even then they show little interest in working
together. Vampiric mists spend most of their time seeking prey—a pursuit they
approach with great creativity. The mists’ propensity for taking on vague, skeletal
forms of the creatures whose blood they drink further adds to their mystique and
fuels rumors that they have connections to the undead. Indeed, many vampiric
mists enjoy using this common misconception
to their advantage, leading foes to apply foolish
tactics—such as tricking spellcasters
into attempting to use positive
energy against them as if they
were undead monsters.
VAMPIRIC MIST CREATURE 3
NE MEDIUM ABERRATION
Perception +9; darkvision, sense
blood (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Aklo
Skills Acrobatics +10, Stealth +10
Str –5, Dex +5, Con +3, Int –1, Wis +2, Cha +0
Misty Form A vampiric mist’s body is composed of a semisolid red mist similar in
consistency to thick foam. This enables a vampiric mist to move through spaces as
narrow as 1 inch in diameter with no reduction to its Speed. However, a vampiric
mist can’t wear or interact with objects. It also can’t enter water or other fluids, and
it’s treated as Tiny for the purpose of how wind affects it.
Sense Blood A vampiric mist can sense creatures that have blood within 60 feet.
It can sense exposed blood within a mile.
AC 18; Fort +8, Ref +12, Will +9
HP 35; Immunities precision; Weaknesses fire 5; Resistances
physical 5
Speed fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] misty tendril +10 (agile, finesse), Damage 2d6 slashing
damage plus 1d6 persistent bleed damage and blood siphon
Blood Siphon When a vampiric mist damages a creature with a misty tendril Strike,
the creature must attempt a DC 20 Fortitude save. If the Strike was a critical hit, the
outcome of the creature’s save is one degree worse than the result of the saving throw.
Any temporary Hit Points the vampiric mist gains from Blood Siphon fade after 1 hour.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is drained 1, and the vampiric mist gains 5 temporary
Hit Points.
Critical Failure The creature is drained 2.
The vampiric mist gains 10 temporary
Hit Points and takes on an intense red
until the end of its next turn. During this time,
it gains a +2 status bonus to AC and saves and is
quickened. It can use its extra action only to Strike.
U-Z
279
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
FORBIDDEN ARMOR
After a devastating battle with a
vaspercham, many legendary heroes
have tried to forge armor or weapons
from the magical shell of the sea
beast, but all have failed because of
the powerful curse that suffuses the
opaline material. If one were able to
dispel the curse of a vaspercham’s
shell—or somehow twist the curse
to their own benefit—they would be
able to craft an incredible suit of
spell‑reflecting plate mail.
Vaspercham
The darkly intelligent vaspercham, an aquatic horror who delights in violence and
destruction, lurks in the shallows near shorelines. Once a vaspercham settles on a new
home, they stubbornly stay there, regardless of any communities dwelling nearby. A
vaspercham’s physical might and magic-warping abilities make them incredibly hard
to dislodge once entrenched, and many seaside communities have relocated after a
vaspercham came calling. The monster responds only to strength, so one must best
a vaspercham in combat to gain their begrudging cooperation. But once the creature
recovers their strength, they inevitably betray any temporary alliance.
VASPERCHAM CREATURE 17
CE HUGE ABERRATION AQUATIC
Perception +30; darkvision, see invisibility
Languages Aklo
Skills Arcana +33, Athletics +33, Deception +31, Intimidation +29, Sea Lore +33
Str +8, Dex +4, Con +6, Int +8, Wis +5, Cha +6
AC 41; Fort +31, Ref +25, Will +32; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 335; Weaknesses fire 15; Resistances cold 10, electricity 10
Magic-Warping Aura (arcane, aura, transmutation) 30 feet. A vaspercham’s shell distorts
nearby magic. Any creature in the aura who Casts a Spell must attempt a DC 37 Will save.
Critical Success The spell is unaffected and the caster is temporarily immune to the
magic-warping aura for 1 minute.
Success The spell is unaffected, but if the spell allows a saving throw, the vaspercham
gains a +1 circumstance bonus to save against it.
Failure If the spell has a target and there are one or more viable targets within its
range, the spell’s target changes, determined randomly by the GM. If there is no
other possible target within range or the spell has no target, the spell is disrupted.
Critical Failure The caster instead Casts another Spell, choosing randomly from their
spell repertoire, prepared spells, or available focus spells (as appropriate) and
selecting any targets at random.
Speed 20 feet, swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] tentacle +33 (agile, magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d10+16 bludgeoning
plus hallucinatory brine
Ranged[one-action] water blast +33 (brutal,
magical, range increment 100
feet, water), Damage 2d8+16
bludgeoning plus hallucinatory brine
Arcane Innate Spells DC 41; 9th cone of cold, spell immunity; 8th
lightning bolt; 7th regenerate; 6th spellwrack (×3); 5th control water
(at will); Constant (7th) see invisibility
Hallucinatory Brine (arcane, illusion, mental) A creature hit by the
vaspercham’s Strikes or Mindwarping Tide must attempt a DC 38
Fortitude save. On a failure, the creature is overwhelmed with
phantasmal visions, becoming confused for 1 round (1 minute
on a critical failure).
Mindwarping Tide [one-action] (concentrate) The vaspercham releases
an effusion of noxious water from its shell. Creatures within
a 15-foot emanation must save against the vaspercham’s
hallucinatory brine.
Whipping Tentacles [two-actions] The vaspercham
makes four tentacle Strikes, each against
a different target. These attacks count
toward the vaspercham’s multiple attack
penalty, but the multiple attack
penalty doesn’t increase until
after the vaspercham makes all of
their attacks.
Bestiary 2
280
A MORTAL NAME
Some mortals refer to velstracs
as “kytons,” a misattribution that
the velstracs tolerate with cold
amusement. The term “kyton” denotes
a master or virtuoso among their kind,
and these fiends enjoy being labeled
as masters of their horrid paths of
perfection through agony.
Velstrac
The search for ultimate sensation through self-mutilation is the horrifying
preoccupation of the shadow-dwelling fiends known as velstracs. They transcend
their stoic detachment only when inflicting pain and terror upon their victims,
practicing new forms of torture, or when turning their agonizing practices back
on themselves. Velstracs consider themselves enlightened beings, transcending
such limitations as morality or mortal taboos, but their victims know them as
emotionless tormentors who inflict sadistic suffering. These fiends claim to
seek perfection in thought, form, and action, although they don’t recognize any
refinement that doesn’t require the painful excision of the flesh or spirit.
Velstracs manifest from the souls of the most extreme masochistic or sadistic
mortals who are judged and sent on to the Shadow Plane. They take on forms that
suit their vile predilections, ranging from the low-ranking augurs to the maestros
of suffering and mutilation called eremites. The process of transformation warps
the soul step by step, with other velstracs conveying their new members through
untold chambers of pain among the dark reaches of the Shadow Plane.
AUGUR
These spherical knots of sinewy muscle, serrated blades, and bloody metal are
the most common velstracs on the Shadow Plane. Each augur has only a single
eye, from which they can see the horrors inflicted by other velstracs, who train
the augur to expect and appreciate pain. Augurs are 1 foot in diameter and
weigh 30 pounds.
AUGUR CREATURE 1
LE TINY FIEND VELSTRAC
Perception +8; greater darkvision, painsight
Languages Common, Infernal, Shadowtongue (can’t speak any language)
Skills Acrobatics +8, Deception +6, Intimidation +7, Religion +4, Stealth +8,
Torture Lore +7
Str –1, Dex +3, Con +1, Int +2, Wis +1, Cha –1
Painsight (divination, divine) A velstrac automatically
knows whether a creature it sees has any of the
doomed, dying, and wounded conditions, as well as the
value of those conditions.
AC 17; Fort +4, Ref +10, Will +7
HP 14, regeneration 2 (deactivated by good or silver);
Immunities cold; Weaknesses good 5, silver 5
Feel the Blades (aura, divine, enchantment, fear, mental,
visual) 30 feet. When a creature ends its turn in the
aura, it feels the sharp barbs of the augur’s blades
on its skin. The creature must succeed at a DC 17
Will save or become frightened 1 (frightened 2 on a
critical failure).
Speed 20 feet, fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] blade +8 (agile, evil, finesse, magical, versatile P),
Damage 1d4–1 slashing plus 1d4 persistent bleed
Divine Innate Spells DC 17; 4th read omens (once per week); 2nd
augury (×2); 1st harm (×3); Cantrips (1st) mage hand
Focus Gaze [one-action] (concentrate, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) The augur
stares at a creature they can see within 30 feet. The target must immediately attempt
a Will save against feel the blades. After attempting this save, the creature is then
temporarily immune until the start of the augur’s next turn.
Whirling Slice [two-actions] The augur Flies or Strides, whirling as they move. The augur deals
the damage of their blade Strike to each creature whose space they enter (DC 16 basic
Reflex save). Each creature is affected only once, even if the augur moves through its
space multiple times. 
U-Z
281
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
VELSTRAC DIVINITIES
The most powerful velstracs are
unique divinities known collectively
as velstrac demagogues—powerful
creatures worshipped by those
mortals who seek to experience
agonizing new revelations and
gain power by enhancing the body
through pain.
OSTIARIUS
Ostiariuses, as emissaries of the velstracs, tend to the portals between the Shadow
Plane and the Material Plane. They not only escort other velstracs into the world
of mortals, but also work to entice mortals into the realms of the velstracs—
from which most mortals never leave. Among the most pleasant and persuasive of
the velstracs, ostiariuses are prepared to converse for hours upon any topic, and
they are skilled at returning, again and again, to the subject of the delights found
in their perverse philosophies. Ostiariuses stand over 6 feet tall, and individuals
range from skeletally thin to hugely corpulent.
OSTIARIUS CREATURE 5
LE MEDIUM FIEND VELSTRAC
Perception +15; greater darkvision, painsight, sense portal
Languages Common, Infernal, Shadowtongue; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Acrobatics +13, Deception +12, Diplomacy +12, Intimidation +16,
Religion +11, Torture Lore +11
Str +0, Dex +4, Con +2, Int +2, Wis +4, Cha +5
Painsight (divination, divine) As augur.
Sense Portal (divination, divine) The ostiarius always knows the
direction and distance to the closest portal between the Shadow
Plane and the Material Plane. This sense functions only on
these two planes.
AC 21; Fort +9, Ref +15, Will +13; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 67, regeneration 5 (deactivated by good or silver);
Immunities cold; Weaknesses good 5, silver 5
Whispering Wounds (aura, divine, enchantment, mental,
visual) 30 feet. When a creature ends its turn in the aura,
it hears the wounds on the ostiarius’s body whisper obscene
truths. The creature must succeed at a DC 21 Will save or become
sickened 1.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +13 (agile, evil, finesse, magical), Damage 2d6+2
slashing plus 2d6 persistent bleed
Divine Innate Spells DC 24; 3rd enthrall, wanderer’s guide; 2nd
calm emotions (at will), darkness, silence; Cantrips (3rd) shield
Rituals DC 22; inveigle
Compel Courage [one-action] (auditory, divine, emotion, enchantment,
linguistic, mental) The ostiarius inspires their willing allies and
themself by whispering words of courage from their wounds.
The ostiarius and their allies in a 50-foot emanation gain a +1
status bonus to attack rolls, damage rolls, and saves against fear effects.
The ostiarius can Sustain Compel Courage. Non-velstracs who accept this
compelled courage find bleeding wounds opening on their own bodies to
whisper in thanks. They take 1 persistent bleed damage and can’t attempt
a flat check to end this damage as long as they’re compelled.
Focus Gaze[one-action] (concentrate, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) The ostiarius
stares at a creature they can see within 30 feet. The creature must immediately
attempt a Will save against whispering wounds. In addition, if the creature was
already sickened and fails its save, the creature is fascinated by the ostiarius and
can’t use hostile actions. This fascination lasts for 1 round or until the ostiarius takes
any hostile action against the creature or the creature’s allies. Whether the creature
succeeds at or fails the save, it is temporarily immune for 1 hour.
EVANGELIST
Evangelists, the velstracs’ unofficial ambassadors, roam the farthest reaches
of the planes to spread the word of their kind’s abhorrent belief in perfection
through pain. They are therefore the most frequently encountered velstracs on the 
Bestiary 2
282
DESPICABLE ORIGINS
Velstracs originated with the first
debased thoughts of mortals, which
divine beings found so deplorable
that they locked all velstracs away
in Hell. It wasn’t long, however,
before the newly formed beings
escaped their infernal prison to the
Shadow Plane.
Material Plane, leading covens of hedonistic mortal flesh-sculptors or serving as
wardens of horrific dungeons. In regions ruled by infernal powers, evangelists may
serve as lieutenants or advisors, whispering secret paths to power in exchange for
mortal’s souls or choice mortal flesh. Evangelists are the same size as humans,
although with the heavy chains that always drape their forms, they often weigh
350 pounds or more.
EVANGELIST CREATURE 6
LE MEDIUM FIEND VELSTRAC
Perception +13; greater darkvision, painsight
Languages Common, Infernal, Shadowtongue
Skills Acrobatics +13, Athletics +15, Crafting +10, Intimidation +15, Religion +11, Torture
Lore +12
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +2, Int +0, Wis +1, Cha +1
Painsight (divination, divine) As augur.
AC 24; Fort +15, Ref +14, Will +11; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 90, regeneration 10 (deactivated by good or silver); Immunities cold; Weaknesses
good 5, silver 5
Unnerving Gaze (aura, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) 30 feet. When a
creature ends its turn in the aura, it sees the face of a departed loved one in place
of the evangelist’s face. The creature must succeed at a DC 21 Will save or become
frightened 2 (frightened 3 on a critical failure).
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] chain +17 (disarm, evil, magical, reach 10 feet, trip), Damage
2d8+7 piercing plus 1d6 persistent bleed and impaling chain
Animate Chains (divine, transmutation) Chains in the evangelist’s
vicinity sprout barbs and writhe menacingly. The evangelist can
make chain Strikes against any creature that is adjacent to an
unattended chain within 20 feet, in addition to those within the
reach of the evangelist’s chain Strike.
Focus Gaze [one-action] (concentrate, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual)
The evangelist stares at a creature they can see within 30 feet. The
target must immediately attempt a Will save against unnerving
gaze. In addition, if the creature was already frightened, on a failed
save, the evangelist is concealed from the creature for as long as the
creature remains frightened. After attempting this save, the creature
is then temporarily immune until the start of the evangelist’s next turn.
Impaling Chain When the evangelist critically hits with a chain Strike,
the target is impaled and anchored in place, becoming grabbed by
the chain. The creature is unable to recover from persistent bleed
damage until it gets free (DC 25 Escape).
SACRISTAN
Sacristans are failures among the velstracs, creatures
whose bodies and minds have been utterly broken
by the velstracs’ torments. These unfortunates are
assembled from scrap metal, nerveless flesh, and
bits of darkness into loyal agents who take ecstatic
pleasure in serving other velstracs. Sacristans
are empowered by a miniature gateway to the
Shadow Plane deep in their mouths. By distending
their jaws, they can howl with the shrieks and
windstorms of that plane. Sacristans vary in
appearance but are the size of maimed humans.
Their features are redundant or absent and they are
wrapped in barbed and rusted chains.
U-Z
283
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
THE SHADOW FORGE
Many velstracs outsource the forging
of their chains to unique velstracs
known as almoners. These six-armed,
legless humanoids toil endlessly at
a great burning foundry called the
Shadow Forge. Almoners operate
under mysterious strictures, and are
just as likely to turn a velstrac away
empty-handed as not.
SACRISTAN CREATURE 10
LE MEDIUM FIEND VELSTRAC
Perception +19; greater darkvision, painsight
Languages Common, Infernal, Shadowtongue
Skills Acrobatics +19, Athletics +22, Intimidation +18, Stealth +21, Torture Lore +16
Str +6, Dex +5, Con +6, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +2
Painsight (divination, divine) As augur.
AC 30; Fort +22, Ref +19, Will +17; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 175, regeneration 10 (deactivated by good or silver); Immunities cold; Weaknesses
good 10, silver 10
Staggering Servitude (aura, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) 30 feet. When a
creature ends its turn in the aura, it sees a vision of the sacristan groveling in pitiable
servitude. The creature must succeed at a DC 27 Will save or become stunned 1.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] barbed chain +22 (evil, magical, reach 10 feet, trip, versatile S), Damage 2d8+9
piercing plus 1d6 evil and 2d6 persistent bleed
Divine Innate Spells DC 29; 5th chilling darkness; 3rd fear
Focus Gaze [one-action] (concentrate, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) The sacristan
stares at a creature they can see within 30 feet. The creature must immediately
attempt a Will save against staggering servitude. In addition, if the creature was
already stunned, on a failed save its revulsion toward the sacristan’s presence causes
it to be stupefied 2 for 1 minute. After attempting this save, the creature is then
temporarily immune until the start of the sacristan’s next turn.
Shadow Scream[three-actions] (aura, concentrate, darkness, divine, evocation, mental, sonic)
Frequency once per hour; Effect The sacristan opens their mouth to unloose
the wailing howls and mind-twisting darkness of the Shadow Plane.
This creates a 30-foot emanation of darkness and wailing sounds
around the sacristan. Creatures with darkvision can’t see through
this darkness. The sacristan can Sustain Shadow Scream for up
to 1 minute. Non-velstrac creatures in the area when the ability is
used, as well as those who enter or start their turn in the area, must
attempt a DC 28 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is
unaffected and is then temporarily
immune for 24 hours.
Success The creature is deafened for 1 round.
Failure The creature is confused and deafened for
1 round.
Critical Failure The creature takes 20 mental damage,
and is confused and deafened for 1 round.
INTERLOCUTOR
Interlocutors are the most talented surgeon-sculptors of
the velstracs, carving away flesh and replacing it with
new body parts of muscle, sinew, and metal.
Each interlocutor structures their individual
appearance carefully, but all are towering,
multi-limbed amalgamations of the strongest
limbs, densest bone, and sharpest metal they
can find. They continually search for new
material to graft to their forms, and their slain
foes are rarely found intact, as little is
more valuable to interlocutors than a
powerful opponent’s legs, eyes, or even
brain. Interlocutors average 9 feet tall
and weigh approximately 800 pounds.
Bestiary 2
284
VELSTRACS ON GOLARION
Velstracs are most often
encountered in the shadowy realm
of Nidal, where the state worship
of Zon-Kuthon is rigidly enforced.
Indeed, many velstracs are created
from the souls of Joyful Things,
devotees of Zon-Kuthon who have
had their limbs amputated to focus
their minds on the veneration of
pain, sacrifice, and torment.
INTERLOCUTOR CREATURE 12
LE LARGE FIEND VELSTRAC
Perception +24; greater darkvision, painsight
Languages Common, Infernal, Shadowtongue
Skills Athletics +25, Crafting +22 (+24 sculpting flesh), Intimidation +25, Medicine +26,
Religion +22, Stealth +19, Torture Lore +20
Str +7, Dex +3, Con +5, Int +2, Wis +6, Cha +5
Painsight (divination, divine) As augur.
AC 33; Fort +23, Ref +21, Will +26; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 215, regeneration 20 (deactivated by good or silver); Immunities cold; Weaknesses
good 15, silver 15
Glimpse of Stolen Flesh (aura, divine, enchantment, fear, mental, visual) 30 feet. When a
creature ends its turn in the aura, it sees pieces of its own body amid the interlocutor’s
form. The creature must succeed at a DC 29 Will save or become stunned 1.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 40 feet
Melee [one-action] claw +25 (deadly 2d10, evil, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 3d10+13 slashing
plus 2d6 persistent bleed
Divine Innate Spells DC 33; 7th plane shift (self only, to the Material Plane or Shadow
Plane only); 5th breath of life; 4th heal (×2), restoration (×2); Cantrips (6th) stabilize
Focus Gaze [one-action] (concentrate, divine,
enchantment, fear, mental, visual)
The interlocutor
stares at a creature
they can see within
30 feet. The creature must
immediately attempt a Will save
against glimpse
of stolen flesh. In
addition, if the creature
was already stunned, on a failed
save, it feels its internal organs twist
and writhe, and is clumsy 2 for 1
minute. After attempting this
save, the creature is then
temporarily immune
until the start of the
interlocutor’s next turn.
Surgical Rend [one-action] This functions as the Rend
ability, dealing claw damage. In addition, if
the target is a living creature with organs and
muscle, the interlocutor opens a precise wound.
Until the creature is restored to its maximum Hit
Points, thus closing the wound, Strikes against the
creature deal 1d6 extra precision damage.
EREMITE
Eremites roam the planes to seek out ideal portions of
other creatures, such as a hero’s sword-arm or an angel’s
pinions. Eremites capture these specimens to clinically
test their true limits, then harvest specimens
and add them to their own bodies. An
eremite might attach tongues to their
hand as extra fingers or a fist to
the back of their neck in a horrid
“improvement.” Eremites average
7 feet tall and weigh approximately 200 pounds.
U-Z
285
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
OTHER VELSTRACS
There are as many different velstracs
as there are ways to inflict pain.
Other velstracs range in power from
the relatively weak lampadariuses to
the powerful phylacators.
EREMITE CREATURE 20
LE MEDIUM FIEND VELSTRAC
Perception +34; greater darkvision, painsight, true seeing
Languages Common, Infernal, Shadowtongue; telepathy 100 feet
Skills Athletics +35, Deception +38, Diplomacy +36, Intimidation +40, Medicine +36,
Religion +34, Stealth +36, Torture Lore +36
Str +9, Dex +6, Con +7, Int +6, Wis +6, Cha +10
Painsight (divination, divine) As augur.
AC 45; Fort +37, Ref +32, Will +34; +1 status to all saves vs. magic
HP 375, regeneration 25 (deactivated by good or silver); Immunities
cold, fear, nonlethal; Weaknesses good 20, silver 20
Ignore Pain An eremite’s actions can’t be disrupted due to damage or
Strikes (such as Attack of Opportunity).
Paralytic Perfection (aura, divine, enchantment, fear, incapacitation,
mental, visual) 30 feet. When a creature ends its turn in the aura, it feels
compelled to offer pieces of its own flesh to the eremite. The creature
must succeed at a DC 40 Will save or become paralyzed for 1 round.
Speed 30 feet, fly 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +39 (evil, magical), Damage 4d8+19 piercing plus 2d6 persistent
bleed and exquisite pain
Melee [one-action] claw +39 (agile, evil, magical), Damage 3d6+19 slashing plus 2d6
persistent bleed, exquisite pain, and Improved Grab
Divine Innate Spells DC 42; 9th bind soul, blade barrier, harm (×2), heal (×2), shadow
blast, shadow walk (at will); 7th dimension door (at will), dimensional lock, plane shift
(to Material Plane or Shadow Plane only), shadow siphon (at will), warp mind; Cantrips
(9th) stabilize; Constant (9th) true seeing
Rituals DC 42; imprisonment
Evisceration [one-action] (attack) Requirements The eremite has a
creature grabbed; Effect The eremite excises flesh or
bone from a creature it has grabbed. The target takes
6d10 persistent bleed damage.
Exquisite Pain An eremite’s knowledge of pressure
points and pain centers is unsurpassed. A creature
hit by an eremite’s melee Strikes must succeed
at a DC 40 Fortitude save or be stunned 2
(stunned 4 on a critical failure). A creature
that critically succeeds is temporarily
immune for 24 hours.
Focus Gaze [one-action] (concentrate, divine,
enchantment, fear, mental, visual) The eremite
stares at a creature they can see within 30
feet. The creature must immediately attempt
a Will save against paralytic perfection.
In addition, if the creature was already
paralyzed, on a failed save, its unnatural
longing causes it to become doomed 1.
After attempting this save, the creature is
then temporarily immune until the start of
the eremite’s next turn.
Graft Flesh [one-action] Requirement The eremite holds a piece of flesh they collected
via Evisceration; Effect The eremite attaches the stolen flesh to
themself. They either regain 100 Hit Points; reduce the
value of their clumsy, drained, enfeebled, or stupefied
condition by 3; or reduce the stage of any affliction
affecting them by 3.
Shadow Traveler (divine, divination) When an eremite uses plane shift or shadow walk,
they arrive at exactly their intended destination.
Bestiary 2
286
DEADLY WHIPS
Canny adventurers can harvest a
defeated violet fungus’s tentacles and
use them as whips. The whips inflict
violent rot (with the same effects
and DC as in the violet fungus’s
stat block) on anything they touch,
including the wielder, although metal
gloves such as gauntlets can protect
against the poison. Such whips can be
used for 1 hour before they degrade
and become useless.
Violet Fungus
At a glance, a violet fungus might seem to be little more than an unsightly and
sickeningly purple mushroom of unusual size. Only once one draws closer—
once whip-like tentacles dripping with flesh-rotting venom slither out from the
fungus’s cratered cap—does the terrifying truth of this carnivorous toadstool
become apparent. Many amateur spelunkers have met untimely ends in the
clutches of this monstrous fungus’s tentacles, since violet fungi are practically
synonymous with caverns on Golarion.
Anyone who has ever braved the world’s caves for an extended period of
time know the dangers of the deadly violet fungus. Darklands dwellers such as
drow and duergars often bear the long, whip-like scars of at least one brush
with this vicious plant’s cruel, poison-infused tentacles. Canny subterranean
trappers and scouts sometimes make use of cultivated violent fungi to catch
game in the enormous caverns below the surface world. Some Darklands
peoples also cultivate violet fungi as a means to defend their territory. Xulgaths
in particular place violet fungi around the perimeters of their settlements as a
first line of defense.
VIOLET FUNGUS CREATURE 3
N MEDIUM FUNGUS MINDLESS
Perception +8; no vision, tremorsense 60 feet
Skills Stealth +9
Str +4, Dex +0, Con +3, Int –5, Wis +1, Cha –2
AC 17; Fort +10, Ref +7, Will +6
HP 60; Immunities bleed, fatigued, mental, poison, sleep,
unconscious; Weaknesses fire 5
Speed 10 feet
Melee [one-action] tentacle +11 (agile, reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+4
bludgeoning plus violet rot
Violet Rot (poison); Saving Throw DC 20 Fortitude;
Maximum Duration 6 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison
plus enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2 1d6 poison plus
enfeebled 1 and drained 1 (1 round); Stage 3 2d6 poison
plus enfeebled 1 and drained 1 (1 round)
VIOLET VENOM
Alchemists and poisoners cherish violet fungi for the
plants’ potent rotting poison, and have perfected an
effective method of preserving the toxin as violet venom.
After slaying a violet fungus, a character can extract
the fungus’s toxin with a successful DC 20 Nature or
Survival check. Afterward, the extracted venom can be
Crafted into 1 dose of violet venom with a successful
DC 18 Crafting check.
VIOLET VENOM ITEM 3
ALCHEMICAL CONSUMABLE CONTACT POISON
Price 12 gp
Usage held in 2 hands; Bulk L
Activate [one-action] Interact
The delicate process of extracting violet venom from a violet fungus
leaves it diluted at the best of times. Alchemists are still on the hunt for a truly pure,
unadulterated version of this highly toxic poison.
Saving Throw DC 17 Fortitude; Onset 1 minute; Maximum Duration
6 rounds; Stage 1 1d6 poison plus enfeebled 1 (1 round); Stage 2
1d6 poison plus drained 1 (1 round); Stage 3 2d6 poison plus
enfeebled 1 (1 round)
U-Z
287
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
VIPER VINE POLLEN
While viper vine pollen degrades
quickly after it is harvested carefully
from the plant, a character who has
a set of alchemical tools can gather
and preserve 1d6 doses of pollen
with a successful DC 33 Crafting
or Nature check and 10 minutes
of work. A single dose of viper
vine pollen is worth 300 gp as raw
materials for crafting any alchemical
or magical item that creates an
incapacitation effect.
Viper Vine
A voracious, flesh-eating carnivore, the viper vine has a single enormous blossom
arising from a thick, leafy tangle of snake-like vines. When the plant senses the
approach of suitable prey through its sensitive, shallowly buried root system, it
rises up like an agitated snake and unfurls its brightly colored bloom, an act that
releases a cloud of mind-numbing pollen. Persistent stories claim the viper vine
can lure prey into its clutches by swaying with a hypnotic motion, but this effect
is in fact created by this invisible, odorless pollen cloud.
Since a viper vine gains nourishment by consuming creatures rather than
through ingesting moisture and soil, it has developed rudimentary locomotion
and can drag itself along the ground with its tentacle-like roots. It even has a form
of rudimentary sentience, allowing it to not only discern differences in prey and
make limited tactical decisions, but also to avoid creatures that are particularly
large or dangerous-looking.
The area around viper vine hunting grounds is often strewn with the partially
devoured remains of victims. It’s not unusual to find the rotting corpses of wild
animals, ill-fated adventurers, and even giants in the plant’s immediate vicinity,
along with a scattering of incidental treasure left behind on the corpses. A
viper vine rarely returns to the carcass of a creature it killed earlier,
preferring to hunt fresh meat.
VIPER VINE CREATURE 13
N LARGE PLANT
Perception +22, low-light vision, tremorsense (imprecise) 60 feet
Skills Athletics +27, Stealth +24
Str +8, Dex +5, Con +7, Int –4, Wis +5, Cha –3
AC 33; Fort +26, Ref +24, Will +22
HP 270; Resistances poison 15
Cold Vulnerability When exposed to a cold effect, the viper vine is
overwhelmed by lethargy, becoming slowed 1 for 1d4 rounds.
Speed 20 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +27 (reach 10 feet), Damage 3d6+11 piercing plus
3d6 poison
Melee [one-action] vine +27 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d10+11
bludgeoning plus Grab
Captivating Pollen [one-action] (enchantment, incapacitation, mental,
poison) The viper vine releases a 60-foot emanation of invisible
pollen that stays in the air for 5 rounds unless dispersed by a
moderate or stronger wind. Each creature that enters or starts its
turn in the area must attempt a DC 33 Will save or be captivated. The
viper vine can’t use Captivating Pollen for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and
is temporarily immune to Captivating Pollen
for 24 hours.
Success The creature is sickened 1.
Failure The creature is fascinated, and
it must spend each of its actions
to move closer to the viper vine as
expediently as possible while avoiding
obvious dangers. If a captivated creature
is adjacent to the viper vine, it stays still
and doesn’t act. It ceases to be fascinated if it’s
no longer in the pollen aura at the end of
its turn.
Critical Failure As failure, plus the creature is
stupefied 2 for 24 hours.
Constrict [one-action] 3d8+8 bludgeoning, DC 33
Bestiary 2
288
NON-EVIL UNDEAD
Void zombies are unusual in that
their animating negative force is
provided by a living parasite that
survives within their corpses,
controlling their nervous systems
for defense and to hunt food. As
such, the soul of a person who
succumbs to an akata’s void death
is not bound to its rotting corpse at
all and travels on to judgment in the
Boneyard unimpeded. Nevertheless,
most worshippers of Pharasma
and crusaders against undeath
still consider void zombies to be
anathema and fight to destroy them.
Void Zombie
A void zombie arises when a humanoid dies from an akata’s void death affliction
(page 13). This walking corpse is animated by a larval akata attached to the
deceased creature’s brain, using a grotesque feeding tendril that emerges from the
corpse’s mouth to drink blood from its victims.
A void zombie typically exists for only a few months before it collapses and
the larval akata crawls free from the motionless shell. When it feels the natural
end of its unlife approaching, a void zombie finds a secluded place to vomit
forth the nearly mature akata larva, then withers away. The disgorged larva
metamorphizes into a full-grown akata several hours later, usually eating the
corpse as its first meal.
The name “void zombie” is something of a misnomer; though still compelled by
necromantic energies, a void zombie is a host in the life cycle of a parasitic alien,
not a mindless, reanimated corpse (despite their similar appearances). The fact that
a typical void zombie shares the neutral alignment of the larval akata
within, rather than the intrinsically evil nature of other zombies,
has caused some scholars to push to reclassify them under other
names. Suggestions have included “void dead,” “akata spawn,”
or “bloodwalker,” but the visceral and compelling commonplace
name has proven difficult to shed.
The driving force behind a void zombie’s violence rises from
the ravenous hunger of the alien parasite that serves as the channel
for its animating negative energies. Necromancers have tried often
to duplicate the void zombie, but without a larval akata hosted
within, the result is simply a zombie with missing jaws or, at best,
one that moves faster than normal. Others have compared a
captive void zombie to a captive yellow musk thrall (page 301)
in an attempt to discover a potential link between the two—
after all, both are animated bodies controlled by a parasitic
outside force. Strangely, a void zombie becomes particularly
violent when encountering a yellow musk thrall, making direct
comparisons of the two creatures particularly difficult, or even
dangerous. The fact that a void zombie, unlike a yellow musk
thrall, is actually undead may hold some clues as to the source of
this strange behavior.
VOID ZOMBIE CREATURE 1
RARE N MEDIUM UNDEAD
Perception +3; darkvision
Skills Athletics +6
Str +3, Dex -2, Con +2, Int -5, Wis +0, Cha -2
AC 13; Fort +7, Ref +3, Will +5
HP 26, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed,
poison; Weaknesses salt water 5, slashing 2
Salt Water Vulnerability Salt water acts as an extremely strong acid on
the larval akata inside the void zombie. Full immersion in salt water deals
4d6 acid damage per round. On any round in which the void zombie takes
damage due to its salt water weakness, the larval akata retreats to the depths
of the void zombie’s body, causing the void zombie to become slowed 1 until
the end of its next turn.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +8, Damage 1d6+3 bludgeoning
Melee [one-action] feeding tendril +6 (agile), Damage 1d4+3 piercing plus Feed on Blood
Feed on Blood [one-action] Requirements The void zombie’s previous action was a successful
feeding tendril Strike against the target creature; Effect The void zombie uses its
feeding tendril to drain blood from the creature struck. The void zombie regains 4 Hit
Points, and the creature is drained 1 until it receives healing of any kind or amount.
U-Z
289
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
LOCAL ORMS
People who live by the lakes
inhabited by legendary water
orms have a tendency to give local
lake monsters names that sound
somewhat homey or even adorable.
As a result, such creatures are often
regarded as local mascots or goodluck charms—particularly in lakeside
settlements that depend on fishing
as a significant income source.
Water Orm
Legendary creatures lurking in remote lakes, water orms always find their way
into the tavern tales of lakeside communities. To some travelers, every lake of
respectable size seems to be surrounded by towns full of fishers claiming to have
spotted a water orm. These elusive creatures inhabit lakes mainly in cool and
gloomy regions. Some claim that water orms are an offshoot of sea serpents and
linnorms, but no credible link between these creatures has been found.
Water orms have many features that sea serpents do not, such as the ability
to understand the rudiments of language. Their natural inclination to avoid
contact and remain hidden often remains at odds with their equally compelling
curiosity about those they might spy upon the shores of their lakes. Water orm
sightings usually occur when they can’t help but to rise up to the surface to take
a peek at someone (or something) particularly unusual on the beach or floating
on the water’s surface.
These creatures are extremely long-lived and can go for decades, or even
centuries, with very little to eat. This allows water orms to subsist in lakes
without surfacing for many years, even in bodies of fresh water
without ample food sources. Water orms might lie in a silty
lake bed for years, their elusiveness only contributing to
their mythical reputation. When a pet or child goes
missing near a lake, rumors might hold that the
local water orm is responsible, leading to
folk tales that caution residents against
venturing out alone near the water.
While most water orms are
described as serpentine or long-necked
reptiles, others look similar to bizarrely
elongated seals or whales, impossibly large sea
horses, or long-necked creatures with paddles resembling those of elasmosauruses.
WATER ORM CREATURE 10
RARE N HUGE AQUATIC BEAST WATER
Perception +21; darkvision
Languages Aquan (can’t speak any language)
Skills Athletics +22, Stealth +23
Str +8, Dex +5, Con +5, Int –3, Wis +5, Cha +0
Slow Metabolism A water orm can go for 10 years without
feeding. Beyond this limit, the water orm’s hunger causes it to
become slowed 1, but doesn’t otherwise impact its lifespan. A
water orm that’s slowed as a result of starvation can remove
this condition by using Swallow Whole to gulp down a meal.
Undetectable (abjuration, primal) A water orm automatically tries to
counteract any detection, revelation, or scrying divination attempted against it,
using its Stealth modifier for the counteract check.
AC 30; Fort +21, Ref +19, Will +17
HP 170; Resistances cold 10, fire 10
Speed 20 feet, swim 50 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +24 (reach 15 feet), Damage 2d10+11 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] tail +24 (agile, reach 15 feet), Damage 2d6+11 bludgeoning
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) Large, 2d8+8 bludgeoning, Rupture 22
Water Travel[three-actions] (primal, transmutation, water) A water orm can dissolve into water,
appearing only as a long, dark, serpentine stretch of water. While in this form, a water
orm’s swim Speed increases to 600 feet, it automatically succeeds at Athletics checks
to swim, and it gains a +4 circumstance bonus to Stealth checks in water. A water
orm can remain in this form for 8 hours, but it can’t enter salt water when using this
ability. A water orm can return to its normal form using a single action which has the
concentrate trait.
Bestiary 2
290
CREATING WERECREATURES
Werecreatures are complex monsters
capable of shifting between three
different forms and of inflicting their
condition upon other humanoids. Full
rules for building werecreatures, along
with how to apply the werecreature’s
curse, appear on pages 328–329 of
the Pathfinder Bestiary.
Werecreature
Werecreatures transform into animals and animal-humanoid hybrids under
the light of the full moon. The doomed fate of these shapechanging creatures
derives from an ancient primal curse that they can, in turn, transmit through
their own bites. The stat blocks in this section reflect werecreatures in their
hybrid forms.
WERECREATURE ABILITIES
The following abilities are shared among all werecreatures. A werecreature also
gains several other abilities, as explained in the Bestiary, but additional rules for
those abilities aren’t necessary unless you create your own werecreature.
Animal Empathy (divination, primal) A werecreature can communicate with animals of
the same general kind.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) The werecreature
changes into their humanoid, hybrid, or animal shape. Each shape has a specific,
persistent appearance. A true werecreature’s natural form is their hybrid shape. In
humanoid shape, the werecreature uses their original humanoid size, loses their jaws
and claw Strikes, and gains a melee fist Strike that deals bludgeoning damage equal to
the slashing damage dealt by their claw. In animal shape, their Speed and size change
to that of the animal, they gain any special Strike effects of the animal that they didn’t
already have (such as Grab), and they lose their weapon Strikes.
Curse of the Werecreature (curse, necromancy, primal) This
curse affects only humanoids; Saving Throw Fortitude DC
is the standard DC for the werecreature’s new level – 1. On
each full moon, the cursed creature must succeed at another
Fortitude save or turn into the same kind of werecreature
until dawn. The creature is under the GM’s
control and goes on a rampage for half the
night before falling unconscious until dawn.
Moon Frenzy (polymorph, primal, transmutation)
When a full moon appears in the
night sky, the werecreature must
enter hybrid form, can’t Change
Shape thereafter, becomes one
size larger, increases their reach
by 5 feet, and increases the
damage of their jaws Strike by 2.
When the moon sets or the sun rises,
the werecreature returns to humanoid form and is fatigued
for 2d4 hours.
WEREBOAR
Wereboars tend to be aggressive and stubborn, and often
live with their own kind in small, remote
communities. Even when they’re inclined
to interact with others, wereboars’ short
tempers and hostile nature lead other creatures
to avoid them. Lone wereboars who settle down—often on
remote farms—are extremely territorial, though others are
content to roam and explore lands far from home. Their other
habits also vary widely from individual to individual, right down
to diet: some wereboars might feast on human flesh, while others are
mostly vegetarian.
WEREBOAR CREATURE 2
CN MEDIUM BEAST HUMAN HUMANOID WERECREATURE
Perception +8; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
U-Z
291
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
LYCANTHROPY
Many scholars refer to the curse of
the werecreature as “lycanthropy,”
but technically this is correct only
when speaking of werewolves.
Nevertheless, the word has gained
traction in certain circles, and as a
result it’s not uncommon to hear
the whispers of locals who fear
lycanthropes even when a ravenous
weretiger is the real threat. Naturally,
the werecreatures themselves don’t
take this ignorance lightly, and tend
to see being equated with a werewolf
as a great insult. Unless, of course, the
werecreature is a werewolf!
Languages Common; boar empathy
Skills Acrobatics +7, Athletics +8, Intimidation +5, Survival +7
Str +4, Dex +1, Con +4, Int +0, Wis +2, Cha –1
Items dagger (2), studded leather armor
Boar Empathy (divination, primal) The wereboar can communicate with boars and pigs.
AC 18; Fort +10, Ref +5, Will +8
HP 45; Weaknesses silver 5
Ferocity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] dagger +10 (agile, versatile S), Damage 1d4+6 piercing
Melee [one-action] tusk +10, Damage 1d8+6 piercing plus curse of the wereboar
Melee [one-action] claw +10 (agile), Damage 1d4+6 piercing
Ranged [one-action] dagger +7 (agile, thrown 10 feet, versatile S), Damage 1d4+4 piercing
Boar Charge[two-actions] The wereboar Strides twice and then makes a melee Strike. As long as
they moved at least 20 feet, they gain a +2 circumstance bonus to their attack roll.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation) Human with fist +10
for 1d4+2 bludgeoning, or boar with Speed 40 feet and tusk for 2d6+4 piercing.
Curse of the Wereboar (curse, necromancy, primal); Saving Throw DC 18 Fortitude
Moon Frenzy (polymorph, primal, transmutation)
WERETIGER
These ferocious werecreatures stalk prey with the cunning and skill of a true
apex predator. Weretigers typically view all life as a potential meal.
Powerful nocturnal hunters with excellent senses that help them
ambush prey, weretigers are adaptable to an extreme range of
environments. However, weretigers living in densely populated
cities (potentially as courtesans, assassins, or guild leaders)
often struggle to suppress their killer instincts, becoming
overwhelmed by the urge to hunt. They prefer to wear loosefitting clothing and rely on their claws and jaws in a fight.
WERETIGER CREATURE 4
NE LARGE BEAST HUMAN HUMANOID WERECREATURE
Perception +11; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Common; tiger empathy
Skills Acrobatics +11, Athletics +12, Deception +7, Society +10, Stealth +11
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +3, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha –1
Tiger Empathy (divination, primal) The weretiger can communicate
with felines.
AC 21; Fort +11, Ref +13, Will +9
HP 75; Weaknesses silver 5
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +14, Damage 2d6+7 piercing plus curse of the weretiger
and Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +14 (agile), Damage 2d4+7 slashing
Change Shape[one-action] (concentrate, polymorph, primal, transmutation)
Human with fist +14 for 1d4+7 bludgeoning, or tiger with
Speed 30 feet and Wrestle (Bestiary page 53).
Curse of the Weretiger (curse, necromancy, primal); Saving Throw
DC 21 Fortitude
Moon Frenzy (polymorph, primal, transmutation)
Pounce [one-action] The weretiger Strides and makes a Strike at
the end of that movement. If the weretiger began
this action hidden, they remain hidden
until after this ability’s Strike.
Rend [one-action] claw
Bestiary 2
292
CAIRN WIGHT DIRGES
Unlike a typical wight, cairn wights
have an unusual affinity for music.
The lyrics of their dirges often
contain a valuable bit of knowledge
or long-lost lore, possibly the
greatest treasure a cairn wight
guards. There are even brave souls
who seek out the creatures to listen
to their songs in hopes of finding
profit from the dry, rasping words.
Wight, Cairn
Jealous guardians of tombs, barrows, and sepulchers, cairn wights usually spawn
from necromantic rituals. For those mortals who cannot abide the thought
of separation from their earthly possessions, the undead existence offered
by transformation into a cairn wight can be tempting. Perhaps as frequently,
particularly avaricious and wealthy royalty or merchants seek out victims to
transform into cairn wights to guard their precious wealth for all time.
Only in the rarest instances is the greed of a mortal strong enough to
spontaneously transform them into a cairn wight without a dark ritual or the
intercession of a powerful divine being. On those occasions, however, the resultant
wight exhibits unmatched viciousness and likely owns rare treasure indeed.
As guardians of material possessions, cairn wights are supernaturally bound to
the armaments they wore during the ritual used to create them. They can spread
their necromantic powers into the weapons they wield. A slash from a cairn
wight’s sword channels life from the victim into the wight.
CAIRN WIGHT CREATURE 4
UNCOMMON LE MEDIUM UNDEAD WIGHT
Perception +11; darkvision
Languages Common, Necril
Skills Athletics +12, Intimidation +11, Religion +9, Stealth +12
Str +4, Dex +2, Con +4, Int +1, Wis +3, Cha +3
Items longsword, studded leather armor
AC 20; Fort +12, Ref +10,
Will +11
HP 67; negative healing;
Immunities death effects, disease,
paralyze, poison, unconscious
Final Spite [reaction] Trigger The cairn wight is
reduced to 0 Hit Points; Effect The cairn wight
makes a Strike before being destroyed. It doesn’t
gain any temporary HP from drain life on this Strike.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] longsword +14 (versatile P), Damage 1d8+7 slashing plus
drain life
Melee [one-action] claw +14 (agile), Damage 1d6+7 slashing plus drain life
Cairn Wight Spawn (divine, necromancy) A living humanoid slain by a cairn
wight’s weapon or claw Strike rises as a spawned wight after 1d4 rounds.
This spawned wight is under the command of the cairn wight that killed it.
It doesn’t have drain life or cairn wight spawn and is clumsy 2 for as long as it is
a spawned wight. If its creator dies, the spawned wight becomes a full-fledged,
autonomous cairn wight; it regains its free will, gains drain life and cairn wight
spawn, and is no longer clumsy.
Drain Life (divine, necromancy) When the cairn wight damages a living creature with
a melee Strike, using an unarmed attack or its bound weapon, the cairn wight gains
5 temporary Hit Points and the creature must succeed at a DC 18 Fortitude save or
become drained 1. Further damage dealt by the cairn wraith increases the drained
condition value by 1 on a failed save, to a maximum of drained 4.
Funereal Dirge [two-actions] (auditory, divine, emotion, fear, mental, necromancy) The cairn
wight chants a low, haunting melody. Living creatures within 50 feet must
attempt a DC 21 Will save. The cairn wight can’t chant a new Funereal Dirge
for 1d4 rounds.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected.
Success The creature is frightened 1.
Failure The creature is frightened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is frightened 2 and takes a –2 status
penalty to saving throws against drain life.
U-Z
293
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
WISPS AND FIRE
Witchfires have the ability to summon
will-o’-wisps, but a number of these
aberrations usually linger nearby of
their own accord. The fear-inducing
witchflame aura manifested by
witchfires provides will-o’-wisps their
favored sustenance.
Witchfire
Manifesting as a sinuous form wreathed in sickly green flames, this incorporeal
undead forms when a powerful hag or witch dies in agony or rage. The body at the
center of the flames usually resembles the witch’s idealized self-image, regardless
of their age and appearance at the time of their death.
A witchfire often resides in a bog or swamp, which slowly blackens and decays
around them. These regions are often plagued by will-o’-wisps, which seem to
have an uncanny relationship with the resident witchfire. A witchfire might visit
villages on the edge of their home terrain to lure away villagers, but always
attack victims within earshot to make sure that other villagers hear the screams.
A witchfire might also ally with other hags or witches and even join their covens,
but a witchfire is incapable of forming covens entirely on their own.
WITCHFIRE CREATURE 9
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM INCORPOREAL SPIRIT UNDEAD
Perception +18; darkvision
Languages Aklo, Common, Necril
Skills Acrobatics +17, Deception +19, Intimidation +21, Occultism +18, Stealth +19
Str –5, Dex +6, Con +0, Int +3, Wis +3, Cha +6
Coven The witchfire adds nightmare, phantasmal killer, phantasmal calamity,
and summon entity to their coven’s spells. A coven can contain one or
more witchfires, but it must also include at least one living creature
capable of forming a coven; three witchfires cannot form a coven.
AC 28; Fort +15, Ref +21, Will +18
HP 125, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, fire,
paralyzed, poison, precision, unconscious; Resistances all 10
(except force, ghost touch, or positive; double resistance vs.
non-magical)
Opportune Witchflame [reaction] Trigger A creature makes a melee
Strike against or touches the witchfire; Effect The
witchfire makes a witchflame caress Strike against the
triggering creature.
Speed fly 40 feet
Melee [one-action] witchflame caress +21 (agile, evil, finesse,
magical), Damage 3d6 fire plus 3d6 negative
and witchflame
Ranged [one-action] witchflame bolt +21 (evil, magical, range 100
feet), Damage 2d6 fire plus 2d6 negative and witchflame
Occult Innate Spells DC 28; 6th summon entity (will-o’-wisp only); 5th
crushing despair; 4th invisibility, phantasmal killer; 3rd phantom pain;
2nd illusory disguise (at will); Cantrips (5th) dancing lights, ghost sound
Witchflame (curse, fire, necromancy, occult) Any creature that takes negative
damage from a witchfire’s Strike must attempt a DC 26 Will save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is temporarily immune to
witchflame for 1 hour.
Success The creature appears to catch fire with sickly green flames. These
flames deal no damage on their own, but as long as the flames burn, the
creature can’t be concealed (invisible creatures are concealed rather than
being undetected) and gains weakness 5 to fire for 1 round.
Failure As success, but the effect is permanent until removed.
Critical Failure As failure, but the creature gains weakness 10 to fire.
Witchflame Kindling [two-actions] (fire, necromancy, occult) Requirements A creature within
30 feet of the witchfire burns with witchflame; Effect The witchfire’s eyes and
mouth glow brightly, and the witchflame on the target creature momentarily
burns much hotter, dealing 5d6 fire damage and 5d6 negative damage to that
creature (DC 28 basic Fortitude save). The witchfire can’t use Witchflame
Kindling for 1d4 rounds.
Bestiary 2
294
ALIEN ALLIES
High-ranking or wealthy witchwyrds
rarely travel the planes alone,
employing bodyguards to accompany
them and leading entourages
composed of various strange beings
they’ve met during their travels.
Witchwyrd
Witchwyrds conceal most of their faces, leaving only their eyes unmasked. Their
inscrutability is a boon to one of their most significant interests—mercantilism—
and many haughty witchwyrds openly revel in the befuddlement inspired by
their mysterious guises and mannerisms. Witchwyrds have a keen eye for new
opportunities and markets, and a witchwyrd almost always knows when someone
is trying to pull one over on them.
These four-armed humanoid creatures have hairless blue-gray skin, are typically
6-1/2 feet tall, and weigh 300 pounds. Their hands have three evenly sized and
spaced digits in a tripod-like arrangement. When not trying to blend in with the
local community, witchwyrds favor outlandish, loose-fitting clothes in bright reds or
yellows and a signature conical hat. They tend to prefer the driest, warmest regions
of the lands they visit—perhaps an indicator of their mysterious home world. This,
however, is the only indicator; witchwyrds are notoriously close-mouthed about
details of this distant world, and with good reason: most witchwyrds on
Golarion have never visited their ancestral home. To these witchwyrds, the
notion of a home planet is a constant thorn in their side, and when asked,
many choose to ignore the question altogether. Others are so agitated by these
queries that they respond with impatience or even violence. Some scholars
have theorized a connection between
witchwyrds and several other four-armed
creatures, but like with questions of their
place of origin, witchwyrds have little to
say about the topic.
WITCHWYRD CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON LN MEDIUM HUMANOID
Perception +12; darkvision
Languages Common, Draconic, one or more planar
languages; tongues
Skills Arcana +16, Deception +15, Desert Lore +14,
Diplomacy +15, Intimidation +15, one or more Lore skills
related to a specific plane
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +1, Int +4, Wis +3, Cha +5
Items +1 ranseur
AC 22; Fort +13, Ref +13, Will +15
HP 110; Resistances force 5
Absorb Force [reaction] (arcane, evocation, force) Frequency once per
round; Trigger A magic missile is fired at the witchwyrd, and the
witchwyrd is aware of it and has a free hand; Effect The witchwyrd
“catches” the missile, absorbing it and causing that hand
to glow while it holds this energy. A hand that’s holding
energy can’t be used for any other purpose except to use
Force Bolt. The energy lasts for 6 rounds or until it is released.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] ranseur +16 (disarm, magical, reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+6
piercing
Melee [one-action] fist +15 (agile, nonlethal), Damage 1d6+6 bludgeoning
plus Grab
Arcane Innate Spells DC 23; 5th dimension door; 4th resist energy (×2), suggestion,
resilient sphere; 3rd dispel magic; 2nd mirror image; 1st floating disk (at will), unseen
servant (at will); Cantrips (3rd) detect magic; Constant (5th) tongues
Force Bolt [one-action] to [three-actions] (arcane, evocation, force) The witchwyrd fires one magic
missile per action spent (dealing 1d4+1 force damage each). They can’t
spend more actions on this ability than they have free hands. If they
use a hand that has Absorbed Force, that hand hurls two missiles instead of one,
expending the held energy.
U-Z
295
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
TERRITORIAL BEASTS
Wolverines are territorial animals
and fiercely defend their kills,
even from larger predators or
when they’re outnumbered. They
claim wide swaths of forests or
frozen tundra as their territory,
marking it with a pungent odor that
serves as a warning to those who
recognize the smell. Wolverines
have voracious appetites and tend to
aggressively devour their food with
reckless abandon.
Wolverine
Few creatures in the natural world can compare in ferocity to an angry wolverine.
WOLVERINE
Wolverines resemble small bears, to which they are related. Stocky and muscular
with long claws, wolverines are about 3 feet in length and weigh approximately 40
pounds. They have a thick fur coat that protects them from the cold temperatures
of the forests and frozen tundras where they reside.
WOLVERINE CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM ANIMAL
Perception +8; low-light vision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Athletics +7, Stealth +7
Str +3, Dex +3, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +0, Cha –2
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +7, Will +6
HP 34
Speed 25 feet, burrow 10 feet, climb 10 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +11, Damage 1d8+5 piercing
Melee [one-action] claw +11 (agile), Damage 1d6+5 slashing
Pounce [one-action] The wolverine Strides and makes a Strike at the end of that movement. If the
wolverine begins this action hidden, it remains hidden until after the attack.
Rend [one-action] claw
Wolverine Rage [one-action] (concentrate, emotion, mental) The wolverine enters a state of pure
rage that lasts either for 1 minute, until there are no enemies it can perceive, or until
it falls unconscious, whichever comes first. While raging, the wolverine has AC 17,
its jaws Strike deals 1d8+7 damage, and its claw Strike deals 1d6+7 damage. While
raging, the wolverine can’t use actions that have the concentrate trait, except for Seek.
After it’s stopped raging, a wolverine can’t use Wolverine Rage again for 1 minute.
GIANT WOLVERINE
Giant wolverines grow to the approximate size of
horses and claim even more expansive territories
than their more diminutive wolverine cousins.
While a smaller wolverine will defend its prey
from armed humanoids, a giant wolverine is
unafraid to stalk and kill such creatures.
GIANT WOLVERINE CREATURE 4
N LARGE ANIMAL
Perception +9; low-light vision, scent (imprecise)
30 feet
Skills Athletics +12, Stealth +11
Str +6, Dex +3, Con +3, Int –4, Wis +3, Cha +0
AC 21; Fort +13, Ref +11, Will +9
HP 65
Speed 25 feet, climb 10 feet
Melee [one-action] jaws +12, Damage 2d6+8 piercing plus Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +12 (agile), Damage 2d4+8 slashing
Gnaw [one-action] Requirements The wolverine has a creature grabbed from
its jaws Strike; Effect The wolverine chews violently on the
creature, dealing 2d6 piercing damage (DC 21 basic Fortitude
save). A creature that fails its save also takes 2d6 persistent
bleed damage.
Pounce [one-action] As wolverine.
Rend [one-action] claw
Wolverine Rage [one-action] As wolverine, except AC 20, jaws 2d6+11,
and claws 2d4+11.
Bestiary 2
296
OTHER WALKING VERMIN
While worms are the most common
type of creature to form the composite
body of a worm that walks, other
verminous variations are possible.
• Cockroaches: A worm that walks
made of cockroaches gains a +1 bonus
to AC and light blindness.
• Leeches: A worm that walks made of
leeches gains a swim Speed of 25 feet,
but its land Speed is 10 feet.
• Spiders: A worm that walks made
of spiders gains a climb Speed equal
to half its land Speed, and half the
damage from its Squirming Embrace
is poison damage.
Worm That Walks
When a powerful spellcaster with a strong personality, a lust for life, and a
remorselessly evil soul dies and is buried in a graveyard infused with eldritch
magic, a strange phenomenon can occur. The decaying body fattens and
instructs the very worms that feast upon it. These grave worms thrive not
only on the consumption of the spellcaster’s dead flesh, but on their corrupt
memories and magical power. The spellcaster’s very soul is consumed in this
vile process, only to be split apart into fragments that inhabit each of the
individual worms. The result is a hideous hive mind of slithering life known
as a worm that walks—a mass of worms that clings to the vague shape of the
body that granted it this new existence and can use the powers and magic
the spellcaster had in life. A worm that walks retains memories of its life as a
spellcaster before its death, but it is not undead—it is a hideous new form of
undulant life.
CREATING A WORM THAT WALKS
You can turn an existing evil, living, spellcasting creature into a worm that
walks using the following steps.
Increase the creature’s level by 1 and change its statistics as follows.
• It gains the aberration and swarm traits and usually remains evil.
• Increase AC, attack bonuses, DCs, saving throws, and skill modifiers by 1.
• Reduce its Hit Points by the amount listed on the table (to a minimum of 2
HP per level).
• The worm that walks gains fast healing, resistance to physical damage, and
weakness to area damage and splash damage as indicated in the table. These
abilities are the reason the worm that walks has fewer HP.
 Fast Healing,
Starting Level HP Decrease Resistance, and Weakness
4 or less –20 5
5–7 –30 7
8–14 –40 10
15 or higher –60 15
Worm ThaT Walks abiliTies
A worm that walks loses any abilities that came from its previous physical form
and any traits that represent its life, such as human and humanoid. It retains
any spellcasting abilities it had in life, regardless of their origin, and gains the
abilities listed below. You might need to adjust other abilities that conflict with the
monster’s new theme as a worm that walks.
Darkvision
Tremorsense 30 feet (imprecise)
Immunities All worms that walk have immunity to disease, paralyzed, poison, precision,
and unconscious. They also have the swarm mind ability, which makes them immune
to mental effects that target a specific number of creatures, though they are still
subject to mental effects that affect all creatures in an area.
All-Around Vision
Discorporate When the worm that walks is reduced to 0 HP, it discorporates and the
component worms that make up its body disperse in every direction. If even a single
worm escapes, the worm that walks will eventually re-form using a process that
typically takes 1d10 days.
While the exact circumstances and surroundings determine how long the worm
that walks’s foes have to dispatch the fleeing worms before they escape, usually its
foes have only a single round. Typically, this requires the application of an area effect
or splash weapon within 1 round to the space where the worm that walks collapsed.
After any amount of area or splash damage is dealt to that space, the character dealing
the damage must attempt a DC 15 flat check. Each subsequent area or splash damage 
U-Z
297
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
WORMS REDEEMED
In rare situations, once a spellcaster
rises as a worm that walks it might
recant its evil ways, given the right
influence and enough time. Many
of these worms that walk seek selfdestruction, not out of abhorrence at
their new form but at the realization
of the evils they wrought while alive.
Others, though, take advantage of
their second chance and use their
new life to help undo the ruin and
horror they might have afflicted upon
the world in their prior existence.
effect performed on the area reduces the DC of this flat check by 2, to a minimum of
DC 5. If any of these flat checks succeed, none of the worms escape, and the worm
that walks is destroyed permanently. At the GM’s discretion, clever means of trapping
or otherwise detaining the vermin may extend the time allowed to finish off the worm
that walks.
Tendril Regardless of the creature’s former anatomy, it gains a tendril melee Strike with
reach that deals persistent piercing damage as it leaves biting worms on the target. If
it had any agile attacks, the damage dealt by its tendril should be roughly the same as
the damage dealt by those attacks. If it had only non-agile attacks, its tendril should
deal three-quarters of that damage.
Squirming Embrace [one-action] The worm that walks Strides, ending its movement sharing a
space with a creature, and deals piercing damage to the creature equal to 1d8 plus an
additional 1d8 for every 3 levels the worm that walks has. The creature can attempt a
basic Reflex save with a DC of the worm that walks’s spell DC – 2.
Swarm Shape [one-action] (concentrate) The worm that walks collapses into a shapeless swarm
of worms. It drops all held, worn, and carried items. While
discorporated, the worm that walks can’t use attack actions
and can’t cast spells, but it can move through areas small
enough for its individual worms to fit without having
to Squeeze. It can use the same action to coalesce back
into its normal form.
WORM THAT WALKS
This worm that walks was a cultist of the Great Old One
Hastur in its prior life. It continues its conspiracies and
strives to further its evil plots in its new life.
WORM THAT WALKS CULTIST CREATURE 14
UNCOMMON CE MEDIUM ABERRATION SWARM
Perception +25, darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Aklo, Common
Skills Acrobatics +24, Deception +28, Intimidation +26,
Occultism +27, Society +23, Stealth +28
Str +5, Dex +8, Con +5, Int +5, Wis +4, Cha +8
AC 36, all-around vision; Fort +23, Ref +28, Will +26
HP 200, fast healing 10; Immunities disease, paralyzed,
poison, precision, swarm mind, unconscious;
Weaknesses area damage 10, splash damage 10;
Resistances physical 10
Discorporate
Speed 30 feet
Melee [one-action] tendril +29 (reach 10 feet), Damage 4d8+14
persistent piercing damage
Occult Spontaneous Spells DC 34, attack +26; 7th (3 slots)
phantasmal killer, visions of danger, warp mind; 6th (4
slots) dispel magic, dominate, paranoia, summon entity;
5th (4 slots) black tentacles, mind probe, phantom
pain, subconscious suggestion; 4th (4 slots)
dimension door, modify memory, suggestion,
veil; 3rd (4 slots) dream message, haste,
hypercognition, slow; 2nd (4 slots)
comprehend language, illusory creature,
mirror image, undetectable alignment; 1st (4 slots) charm, illusory
disguise, mindlink, ray of enfeeblement; Cantrips (7th) daze,
detect magic, light, mage hand, shield
Squirming Embrace [one-action] 5d8 piercing, DC 32
Swarm Shape [one-action]
Bestiary 2
298
DREAD WRAITH ORIGINS
The most unusual dread wraiths
are those that coalesce from an
amalgamation of evil spirits, often
in regions where such spirits are
shredded from their consciousnesses
and churned in foci of negative
energy, such as the Negative Energy
Plane or on the Isle of Terror.
Wraith, Dread
These menacing spiritual remnants of wicked warlords or bloodthirsty generals
are towering specters of shadow and death. Like other wraiths, dread wraiths
haunt the shadowy places of the world, but dread wraiths are more likely to travel
greater distances to sow terror or amass influence, often sticking to dark glades or
sinister ruins when journeying across sun-dappled lands. Dread wraiths tends to
be arrogant and rarely form a pack with others of their kind, preferring instead
to dominate groups of ordinary wraiths. A particularly powerful necromancer
might compel packs of dread wraiths into service, however, while a particularly
malevolent goal—such as to eradicate a bastion of light and life—might draw
several dread wraiths together in a common purpose.
DREAD WRAITH CREATURE 9
LE LARGE INCORPOREAL UNDEAD WRAITH
Perception +19; darkvision, lifesense 60 feet
Languages Common, Necril
Skills Acrobatics +19, Intimidation +21, Stealth +19
Str –5, Dex +6, Con +3, Int +3, Wis +4, Cha +6
AC 28; Fort +16, Ref +19, Will +21; +1 status to all saves vs. positive
HP 130, negative healing; Immunities death effects, disease, paralyzed, poison, precision,
unconscious; Resistances all 10 (except force, ghost touch, or positive; double
resistance vs. non-magical)
Draining Presence (aura, negative) 10 feet. A creature entering the aura must succeed at
a DC 26 Fortitude save or become drained 1. It recovers after it has been out of the
aura for 1 minute. This drained condition value is cumulative with the drained value
caused by drain life, but not with multiple draining presence auras. A creature
that succeeds at its save is temporarily immune to draining presence for 24 hours.
Sunlight Powerlessness A dread wraith caught in sunlight is stunned 2 and
clumsy 2.
Attack of Opportunity[reaction]
Speed fly 60 feet
Melee [one-action] spectral hand +21 (finesse, reach 10 feet), Damage 2d10+7
negative plus drain life
Absorb Wraith [two-actions] The dread wraith extends its hand toward
another wraith creature within 100 feet. The target wraith
dissolves and streaks toward the dread wraith in a straight
line, dealing 6d10 negative damage to each creature along the
line (DC 28 basic Fortitude save). The dread wraith absorbs the
essence of the target wraith, becoming quickened and gaining a
+10-foot status bonus to its fly Speed for a number of rounds
equal to the level of the absorbed wraith. It can use its
extra action only to Fly or Strike. An unwilling target can
attempt a DC 28 Will save to resist being absorbed.
Drain Life (divine, necromancy) When the dread wraith
damages a living creature with its spectral hand
Strike, the wraith gains 10 temporary Hit Points
and the target must succeed at a DC 28 Fortitude
save or become drained 1. Further damage dealt
by the wraith increases the drained condition value
by 1 on a failed save, to a maximum of drained 4.
Wraith Spawn (divine, necromancy) A living humanoid
slain by a wraith’s spectral hand Strike rises as a wraith
spawn after 1d4 rounds. This wraith spawn is under the
command of the dread wraith that killed it. It doesn’t have drain
life or wraith spawn. If the creator of the wraith spawn dies,
the wraith spawn becomes a full-fledged, autonomous wraith; it
regains its free will and gains drain life and wraith spawn.
U-Z
299
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
THE ETHER WAR
Xills see Material Plane creatures as
little more than incubators, but the
need for fresh hosts never abates,
for on their home plane, xills are
constantly at war. Only the relative
emptiness of the Ethereal Plane
keeps their conflict with creatures
like ether spiders from becoming too
overwhelming and outpacing the speed
at which new ranks of soldiers can
replace those who have fallen.
Xill
Xills visit the Material Plane, where they’re often known as ethereal stalkers,
primarily to maraud and to kidnap creatures back to their native Ethereal Plane.
These four-armed, warmongering monsters paralyze their victims before implanting
them with eggs using an ovipositor normally kept retracted behind their mandibles.
Their single-minded drive to expand and conquer is so all-encompassing that while
they work together dutifully and without dissent, there is little else in their lives.
XILL CREATURE 6
UNCOMMON LE MEDIUM ABERRATION ETHEREAL
Perception +15; darkvision
Languages Aklo
Skills Acrobatics +15, Athletics +14, Deception +12, Intimidation +14, Stealth +15, Warfare
Lore +12
Str +4, Dex +5, Con +3, Int +0, Wis +3, Cha +0
Items breastplate, +1 longbow (40 arrows), scimitar (2), steel shield (Hardness 5, HP 20,
BT 10)
AC 24 (26 with shield raised); Fort +15, Ref +17, Will +11
HP 100
Attack of Opportunity [reaction]
Shield Block [reaction]
Speed 35 feet
Melee [one-action] scimitar +16 (forceful, sweep), Damage 2d6+7 slashing
Melee [one-action] bite +16, Damage 2d8+7 piercing plus xill paralysis
Ranged [one-action] longbow +17 (deadly 1d10, magical, range 100 feet, reload 0, volley
30 feet), Damage 2d8 piercing
Occult Innate Spells DC 24; 7th plane shift (to Ethereal Plane or Material Plane
only, self only)
Double Slash [one-action] (flourish) The xill makes two scimitar Strikes against a single
target. If both hit, combine their damage for the purpose of the target’s
resistances and weaknesses. The xill applies its multiple attack penalty
to each strike normally.
Implant [two-actions] (manipulate) Requirements The xill is adjacent to a
unconscious, willing, or paralyzed creature; Effect The xill
implants xill eggs in the creature’s flesh.
Xill Eggs (disease) The sickened condition from xill eggs doesn’t
improve on its own until the disease is cured or runs its
course. It can be cured with a 10-minute operation that
requires a successful DC 26 Medicine check and deals
4d6 slashing damage to the host; Saving Throw
DC 24 Fortitude; Maximum Duration
24 hours; Stage 1 infested with no
ill effect (8 hours); Stage 2 sickened 1
(8 hours); Stage 3 sickened 2 (4 hours);
Stage 4 sickened 2 and 2d6 persistent
bleed damage as larval xills burrow out of
the body and immediately fade away into
the Ethereal Plane (1 hour)
Xill Paralysis (incapacitation, occult) A
creature hit by the xill’s bite Strike must attempt a DC 24 Fortitude save.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected and is immune to xill
paralysis for 1 minute.
Success The creature is slowed 1 for 1 round.
Failure The creature is paralyzed for 1 round.
Critical Failure The creature is paralyzed. It can
attempt a new save at the end of each of its turns
to recover, and the save DC decreases by 1 each round.
Bestiary 2
300
MASSIVE MUSK CREEPERS
Ancient or specially cultivated musk
creepers can grow to great size. Their
pollen often changes color as they
grow, and pollen of different colors can
alter the creeper’s thralls in different
ways. Some creepers even become
intelligent after they’re awakened by
primal magic. These few exert far more
control over their thralls.
Yellow Musk Creeper
Made up of thick, green vines with numerous yellow flowers, the yellow musk
creeper grows at places where the ground is enriched with spilled blood and corpses,
like battlefields and graveyards. An ideal environment for the yellow musk creeper
isn’t inhabited, but draws occasional humanoid visitors the plant can transform into
thralls. The yellow musk creeper enraptures creatures with its bright yellow pollen
to bring them close. It then physically alters their brains with its tendrils, implanting
a seed in each to turn the creatures into mindless thralls. The yellow musk creeper
might try to take over a sleeping creature, but it lacks the faculties to sneak up on
anyone, and is likely to wake victims before it can drag itself close enough.
The plant’s pollen can spread far on the wind but quickly becomes too diffuse to
cause harm. Wilderness scouts learn to sniff out the distinctive musky scent of the
pollen, which stays potent even in harmless quantities. A sprouting creeper is also
easy to detect, since it grows from the rotting, messy corpse of a thrall creature.
YELLOW MUSK CREEPER CREATURE 2
N MEDIUM MINDLESS PLANT
Perception +4; tremorsense (imprecise) 30 feet
Skills Stealth +6
Str +3, Dex +2, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –1
AC 18; Fort +10, Ref +6, Will +4
HP 34; Immunities mental; Weaknesses fire 5
Speed 5 feet
Melee [one-action] tendril +9 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d10+3 piercing
Bore into Brain[three-actions] (manipulate, mental) The creeper bores dozens
of tendrils into the brain of a Small, Medium, or Large humanoid
creature that’s unconscious, willing, or fascinated by Spray Pollen,
and within reach of the creeper’s tendrils. The creature must succeed
at a DC 18 Fortitude save or become stupefied 1 (stupefied 2
on a critical failure). Subsequent failed saves against Bore
into Brain increase the stupefied value. If the creature
reaches stupefied 5, it is turned into a yellow musk thrall
(see below). Boring into a creature’s brain doesn’t end
fascination caused by Spray Pollen.
Spray Pollen[two-actions] (mental, poison) The yellow musk creeper
blasts yellow pollen in either a 30-foot line or a 15-foot
cone. Each creature in the emanation must attempt a DC
20 Will save. Once a creature succeeds at any save against
Spray Pollen, it becomes temporarily immune for 24 hours.
Success The creature is unaffected.
Failure The creature is fascinated. For as long as it is fascinated, it must
spend each of its actions to move closer to the yellow musk creeper
as expediently as possible, while avoiding obvious dangers. If the
creature is adjacent to the yellow musk creeper, it stays still
and doesn’t act.
Critical Failure As failure, but the condition doesn’t
end automatically. The creature can attempt
a new save at the end of each of its
turns. On a success, the fascinated
condition and other effects end.
YELLOW MUSK THRALL
A creature transformed by a
yellow musk creeper’s tendrils
boring into its brain becomes a
yellow musk thrall if it’s Small or Medium,
or a yellow musk brute if Large (a Small 
U-Z
301
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
RECOVERY FROM THRALLDOM
A creature that’s transformed into a
yellow musk thrall or brute doesn’t
die right away, although it no longer
retains its personality, memories,
or abilities as long as it exists as a
thrall. Within the first few days after
its transformation, a thrall or brute
can be restored to its normal life with
any magical effect that can remove
disease or a 1-hour procedure that
requires a successful DC 22 Medicine
(expert) check and deals
2d6 slashing damage to the
thrall or brute.
creature becomes a Small thrall rather than a Medium one). The transformation
takes 1 hour. A yellow musk thrall takes only the most rudimentary of actions:
bringing the yellow musk creeper water and new creatures to infest. After a few
days (or if the creeper dies), the thrall wanders off into the wilderness and falls dead
within 24 hours. The body of a deceased thrall sprouts a new yellow musk creeper
within hours of its death, becoming a fully grown plant within 24 hours.
YELLOW MUSK THRALL CREATURE –1
N MEDIUM MINDLESS PLANT
Perception +0; low-light vision
Skills Athletics +5
Str +3, Dex –2, Con +2, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –2
Slow A yellow musk thrall is permanently slowed 1 and can’t use reactions.
AC 14; Fort +6, Ref +0, Will +2
HP 12; Immunities mental; Weaknesses fire 5
Entangling Tendrils (aura) 5 feet. Grasping tendrils extend out from the thrall. When the
thrall ends its movement next to a creature, or a creature ends its turn next to the
thrall, that creature must succeed at a DC 14 Reflex save or be grabbed by the tendrils.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +7, Damage 1d4+3 bludgeoning plus Grab and pollen touch
Limb Extension [free-action] Trigger The yellow musk thrall is reduced to 4 HP or
fewer; Effect Creeper tendrils tear through the thrall’s limbs, causing its
forearms to tear loose. The thrall’s melee reach increases by 5 feet.
Pollen Touch When the thrall strikes a creature, that creature is exposed
to yellow musk creeper pollen, as Spray Pollen (DC 14). The creature is
fascinated by the yellow musk creeper that spawned the thrall, not by the
thrall itself.
YELLOW MUSK BRUTE CREATURE 2
N LARGE MINDLESS PLANT
Perception +4; low-light vision
Skills Athletics +9
Str +5, Dex –3, Con +4, Int –5, Wis +0, Cha –2
Slow As yellow musk thrall.
AC 15; Fort +10, Ref +3, Will +6
HP 45; Immunities mental; Weaknesses fire 10
Entangling Tendrils (aura) As yellow musk thrall, but DC 15.
Speed 25 feet
Melee [one-action] fist +11 (reach 10 feet), Damage 1d12+5 bludgeoning
plus Improved Push 5 feet
Limb Extension [free-action] As yellow musk thrall, but the trigger occurs
when the yellow musk brute is reduced to 15 HP or fewer.
Pollen Touch As yellow musk thrall, but DC 15.
YELLOW MUSK VIAL
The pollen of a yellow musk creeper can be carefully harvested with a successful
DC 20 Crafting check to make an alchemical item.
YELLOW MUSK POISON ITEM 2
ALCHEMICAL CONSUMABLE INHALED MENTAL POISON
Price 7 gp
Usage held in 1 hand; Bulk L
Activate [one-action] Interact
The powdered pollen from a yellow musk creeper addles the mind.
Saving Throw DC 16 Will; Maximum Duration 2 rounds; Stage 1 fascinated by
the poison cloud (1 round); Stage 2 fascinated by the poison cloud, and can
use no actions but to move closer to the cloud’s point of origin (1 round)
Bestiary 2
302
YETH HOUND ALLIES
When an evil cult engages the
services of a yeth hound, the
process is more like forging an
alliance than animal training. Yeth
hound allies can provide much more
complex services than a typical
animal, but they also present the
risk of possible treachery.
Yeth Hound
Wicked canine creatures who live for the thrill of the hunt, yeth hounds often
serve evil masters as guardians and trackers. Yeth hounds resemble lean, sleek
dogs with overlarge ears and narrow paws that can tread on air as easily as the
ground. Despite their canine appearance, yeth hounds are remarkably intelligent,
although they rarely display this intelligence except when devising intricate
tactics to ensnare their quarry. Their eerie bays echo across the countryside
when they are engaged in a hunt, and they particularly enjoy baying to frighten
and disorient intelligent creatures. Yeth hound packs can number as many as a
dozen members, each working in uncanny communion with its packmates to
corner and kill their prey. Yeth hounds like to drag their victims back to their
lairs to eat at their leisure, so these lairs often contain discarded treasures from
the hounds’ previous meals.
Yeth hounds despise two things: sunlight and other canines. They hunt
only at night if they can, often breaking off their hunt at dawn to retreat to a
subterranean lair or den, no matter how close they had come to catching their
prey. Yeth hounds usually attack wargs, wolves, and similar creatures on sight,
working to drive larger or more powerful canines from their hunting areas when
then can’t simply overpower and kill them.
Evil rangers, bestial demons, and wicked cults are frequently gifted yeth hound
servants by fiendish patrons. Such hounds often serve as spies and are quick to
turn against those who fail to advance the patrons’ wicked aims. The cult of
Lamashtu, in particular, is fond of using yeth hounds as temple guardians.
YETH HOUND CREATURE 3
CE MEDIUM BEAST FIEND
Perception +9; darkvision, scent (imprecise) 30 feet
Languages Abyssal (can’t speak any language)
Skills Acrobatics +8, Athletics +9, Stealth +10, Survival +8
Str +4, Dex +3, Con +2, Int –2, Wis +3, Cha +1
AC 18; Fort +9, Ref +12, Will +12
HP 55; Weaknesses silver 5
Speed 40 feet; air walk
Melee [one-action] jaws +11, Damage 1d8+6 piercing plus 1d6 evil, Knockdown, and
sinister bite
Divine Innate Spells DC 20; Constant (4th) air walk
Bay [three-actions] (auditory, concentrate, divine,
enchantment, fear, mental) The yeth hound emits
an unearthly howl audible up
to 300 feet away. Any nonfiend creature that hears the
howl must succeed at a DC 20
Will save or become frightened
1. Any creature that critically
fails and is within 60 feet of the
yeth hound is instead frightened
3 and fleeing for 1d4 rounds (or
until it recovers from its frightened
condition). Whether it succeeds or fails
the saving throw, the creature is then
temporarily immune to Bay for 24 hours.
Sinister Bite A good creature bitten by a yeth
hound must attempt a DC 20 Will save. On a
critical success, the creature is temporarily immune
to sinister bite for 1 minute. A creature that fails
becomes frightened 1, or increases the value of its
frightened condition by 1 if already frightened.
U-Z
303
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
ZOMOKS’ PRIMAL CALL
Zomoks can use primal call without
needing any secondary casters. The
zomok typically calls an awakened
tree, arboreal, or shambler, and
often tasks the called creature
with guarding a sacred location,
accompanying an ally on a mission
for the good of the forest, or a
similar assignment.
Zomok
Mighty plant-dragons, zomoks prowl the woodlands, defending their homes
from destructive forces while healing and restoring the woods following natural
disasters and ravaging intruders. Zomoks vary in appearance with the seasons,
growing verdant green in the spring and summer, changing to autumnal colors in
the fall, and decaying to brown in winter. While zomoks can and often do swallow
their foes, they have no real need to eat. Any creature they gulp down is typically
left behind as a mangled corpse the next time the zomok travels via their Forest
Step ability. Zomoks reach 35 to 40 feet in length and weigh 30 tons.
ZOMOK CREATURE 16
N GARGANTUAN DRAGON PLANT
Perception +28; darkvision, tremorsense (imprecise) 60 feet
Languages Arboreal, Common, Sylvan, Terran; speak with plants
Skills Acrobatics +27, Athletics +33, Nature +29, Stealth +29, Survival +30
Str +9, Dex +5, Con +9, Int +3, Wis +6, Cha +6
AC 39; Fort +31, Ref +25, Will +28
HP 310; Immunities paralyzed, poison, sleep, stunned; Weaknesses fire 15
Speed 30 feet, fly 80 feet; pass without trace
Melee [one-action] jaws +33 (magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d12+17 piercing plus Improved Grab
Melee [one-action] claw +33 (agile, magical, reach 15 feet), Damage 3d8+17 slashing
Melee [one-action] tail +33 (magical, reach 20 feet), Damage 3d10+17 bludgeoning
Primal Innate Spells DC 34, attack +26; 8th charm (plant creatures only); 7th wall
of thorns; 6th tangling creepers; Constant (4th) speak with plants; (1st) pass
without trace
Rituals DC 34; blight, plant growth, primal call (doesn’t require secondary casters)
Entombing Breath [two-actions] (conjuration, earth, primal) The zomok blasts forth a 60-foot
cone of earth and gravel, dealing 17d6 bludgeoning damage (DC 34 basic
Reflex save); prone creatures take a –2 circumstance penalty to this saving
throw. Creatures touching the ground that fail their saves take a 10-foot
circumstance penalty to their Speeds and are restrained (Escape DC 34)
on a critical failure. The zomok can’t use Entombing Breath again
for 1d4 rounds.
The bodies of creatures slain by Entombing Breath
instantly decompose and are destroyed—they can be
restored to life only by a 7th-level or higher spell or
ritual that restores life. The creature’s equipment is
unharmed but buried under 5 feet of earth.
Forest Step [one-action] (conjuration, healing,
necromancy, primal, teleportation)
Frequency three times per day; Effect The
zomok teleports itself with the effects
of a 5th-level dimension door spell,
but the zomok must begin and end
the teleportation effect in forest
terrain. The zomok regains
10d10 Hit Points during
this teleportation. Creatures
swallowed by the zomok are
left behind. The zomok can’t
use Forest Step again for
1d6+1 rounds.
Swallow Whole [one-action]
(attack) Huge, 3d12+9
bludgeoning, Rupture 35
Trample [three-actions] Huge or
smaller, tail, DC 32
Bestiary 2
304
Ability Glossary
The following creature abilities are listed here because
they are shared by many creatures or are highly complex.
The statistics for individual creatures might alter the
traits, the number of actions, or other rules of these
abilities. Anything noted in a specific creature’s stat
block overrides the general rules for the ability below.
In these abilities, “monster” is used for the creature
that has the ability, to differentiate it from any other
creatures the ability might affect.
All-Around Vision This monster can see in all directions
simultaneously, and therefore can’t be flanked.
Aquatic Ambush [one-action] Requirements The monster is hiding in
water and a creature that hasn’t detected it is within the
listed number of feet; Effect The monster moves up to
its swim Speed + 10 feet toward the triggering creature,
traveling on water and on land. Once the creature is in
reach, the monster makes a Strike against it. The creature is
flat-footed against this Strike.
Attack of Opportunity [reaction] Trigger A creature within the
monster’s reach uses a manipulate action or a move action,
makes a ranged attack, or leaves a square during a move
action it’s using; Effect The monster attempts a melee Strike
against the triggering creature. If the attack is a critical
hit and the trigger was a manipulate action, the monster
disrupts that action. This Strike doesn’t count toward the
monster’s multiple attack penalty, and its multiple attack
penalty doesn’t apply to this Strike.
At-Will Spells The monster can cast its at-will spells any
number of times without using up spell slots.
Aura A monster’s aura automatically affects everything within
a specified emanation around that monster. The monster
doesn’t need to spend actions on the aura; rather, the aura’s
effects are applied at specific times, such as when a creature
ends its turn in the aura or when creatures enter the aura.
If an aura does nothing but deal damage, its entry lists
only the radius, damage, and saving throw. Such auras deal
this damage to a creature when the creature enters the aura
and when a creature starts its turn in the aura. A creature
can take damage from the aura only once per round.
The GM might determine that a monster’s aura doesn’t
affect its own allies. For example, a creature might be
immune to a monster’s frightful presence if they have been
around each other for a long time.
Buck [reaction] Most monsters that serve as mounts can attempt to
buck off unwanted or annoying riders, but most mounts
will not use this reaction against a trusted creature unless
the mounts are spooked or mistreated; Trigger A creature
Mounts or uses the Command an Animal action while riding
the monster; Effect The triggering creature must succeed
at a Reflex saving throw against the listed DC or fall off the
creature and land prone. If the save is a critical failure, the
triggering creature also takes 1d6 bludgeoning damage in
addition to the normal damage for the fall.
Catch Rock [reaction] Requirements The monster must have a free hand
but can Release anything it’s holding as part of this reaction;
Trigger The monster is targeted with a thrown rock Strike
or a rock would fall on the monster; Effect The monster
gains a +4 circumstance bonus to its AC against the
triggering attack or to any defense against the falling rock.
If the attack misses or the monster successfully defends
against the falling rock, the monster catches the rock, takes
no damage, and is now holding the rock.
Change Shape [one-action] (concentrate, [magical tradition],
polymorph, transmutation) The monster changes its shape
indefinitely. It can use this action again to return to its
natural shape or adopt a new shape. Unless otherwise
noted, a monster cannot use Change Shape to appear
as a specific individual. Using Change Shape counts as
creating a disguise for the Impersonate use of Deception.
The monster’s transformation automatically defeats
Perception DCs to determine whether the creature is
a member of the ancestry or creature type into which
it transformed, and it gains a +4 status bonus to its
Deception DC to prevent others from seeing through its
disguise. Change Shape abilities specify what shapes the
monster can adopt. The monster doesn’t gain any special
abilities of the new shape, only its physical form. For
example, in each shape, it replaces its normal Speeds and
Strikes, and might potentially change its senses or size.
Any changes are listed in its stat block.
Constant Spells A constant spell affects the monster without
the monster needing to cast it, and its duration is unlimited.
If a constant spell gets counteracted, the monster can
reactivate it by spending the normal spellcasting actions
the spell requires.
Constrict [one-action] The monster deals the listed amount of damage
to any number of creatures grabbed or restrained by it.
Each of those creatures can attempt a basic Fortitude save
with the listed DC.
Coven (divination, mental, occult) This monster can form a
coven with two or more other creatures who also have the
coven ability. This involves performing an 8-hour ceremony
with all prospective coven members. After the coven
is formed, each of its members gains elite adjustments
(page 6), adjusting their levels accordingly. Coven members
can sense other members’ locations and conditions by
spending a single action, which has the concentrate trait,
and can sense what another coven member is sensing as a
two-action activity, which has the concentrate trait as well.
Covens also grant spells and rituals to their members,
but these can be cast only in cooperation between three
coven members who are all within 30 feet of one another.
A coven member can contribute to a coven spell with a
single-action spellcasting activity that has a single verbal
component. If two coven members have contributed these
actions within the last round, a third member can cast a
coven spell on her turn by spending the normal spellcasting
actions. A coven can cast its coven spells an unlimited
number of times but can cast only one coven spell each
round. All covens grant the 8th-level baleful polymorph
spell and all the following spells, which the coven can
cast at any level up to 5th: augury, charm, clairaudience, 
305
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
clairvoyance, dream message, illusory disguise, illusory
scene, prying eye, and talking corpse. Individual creatures
with the coven ability also grant additional spells to any
coven they join. A coven can also cast the control weather
ritual (Core Rulebook 411), with a DC of 23 instead of the
standard DC.
If a coven member leaving the coven or the death of a
coven member brings the coven below three members,
the remaining members keep their elite adjustments for
24 hours, but without enough members to contribute the
necessary actions, they can’t cast coven spells.
Darkvision A monster with darkvision can see perfectly well
in areas of darkness and dim light, though such vision is in
black and white only. Some forms of magical darkness, such
as a 4th-level darkness spell, block normal darkvision. A
monster with greater darkvision, however, can see through
even these forms of magical darkness.
Disease When a creature is exposed to a monster’s disease, it
attempts a Fortitude save or succumbs to the disease. The
level of a disease is the level of the monster inflicting the
disease. The disease follows the rules for afflictions found
on page 457 of the Pathfinder Core Rulebook.
Engulf [two-actions]The monster Strides up to double its Speed and can
move through the spaces of any creatures in its path. Any
creature of the monster’s size or smaller whose space the
monster moves through can attempt a Reflex save with the
listed DC to avoid being engulfed. A creature unable to act
automatically critically fails this save. If a creature succeeds
at its save, it can choose to be either pushed aside (out of
the monster’s path) or pushed in front of the monster to the
end of the monster’s movement. The monster can attempt
to Engulf the same creature only once in a single use of
Engulf. The monster can contain as many creatures as can
fit in its space.
A creature that fails its save is pulled into the monster’s
body. It is grabbed, is slowed 1, and has to hold its breath
or start suffocating. The creature takes the listed amount
of damage when first engulfed and at the end of each of
its turns while it’s engulfed. An engulfed creature can get
free by Escaping against the listed Escape DC. An engulfed
creature can attack the monster engulfing it, but only with
unarmed attacks or with weapons of light Bulk or less. The
engulfing creature is flat-footed against the attack. If the
monster takes piercing or slashing damage equaling or
exceeding the listed Rupture value from a single attack or
spell, the engulfed creature cuts itself free. A creature that
gets free by either method can immediately breathe and
exits the engulfing monster’s space.
If the monster dies, all creatures it has engulfed are
automatically released as the monster’s form loses cohesion.
Fast Healing A monster with this ability regains the given
number of Hit Points each round at the beginning of its turn.
Ferocity [reaction] Trigger The monster is reduced to 0 HP; Effect The
monster avoids being knocked out and remains at 1 HP, but
its wounded value increases by 1. When it is wounded 3, it
can no longer use this ability.
Frightful Presence (aura, emotion, fear, mental) A creature
that first enters the area must attempt a Will save.
Regardless of the result of the saving throw, the creature
is temporarily immune to this monster’s Frightful Presence
for 1 minute.
Critical Success The creature is unaffected by the presence.
Success The creature is frightened 1.
Failure The creature is frightened 2.
Critical Failure The creature is frightened 4.
Grab [one-action] Requirements The monster’s last action was a
success with a Strike that lists Grab in its damage entry,
or it has a creature grabbed using this action; Effect The
monster automatically Grabs the target until the end of the
monster’s next turn. The creature is grabbed by whichever
body part the monster attacked with, and that body part
can’t be used to Strike creatures until the grab is ended.
Using Grab extends the duration of the monster’s Grab
until the end of its next turn for all creatures grabbed by it.
A grabbed creature can use the Escape action to get out of
the grab, and the Grab ends for a grabbed creatures if the
monster moves away from it.
Greater Constrict [one-action] The monster deals the listed amount of
damage to any number of creatures grabbed or restrained
by it. Each of those creatures can attempt a basic Fortitude
save with the listed DC. A creature that fails this save
falls unconscious, and a creature that succeeds is then
temporarily immune to falling unconscious from Greater
Constrict for 1 minute.
Improved Grab, Improved Knockdown, or Improved Push
[free-action] The monster can use Grab, Knockdown, or Push (as
appropriate) as a free action triggered by a hit with its
initial attack. A monster with Improved Grab still needs
to spend an action to extend the duration for creatures it
already has grabbed.
Knockdown [one-action] Requirements The monster’s last action was
a success with a Strike that lists Knockdown in its damage
entry; Effect The monster knocks the target prone.
Lifesense Lifesense allows a monster to sense the vital
essence of living and undead creatures within the listed
range. The sense can distinguish between the positive
energy animating living creatures and the negative
energy animating undead creatures, much as sight
distinguishes colors.
Light Blindness When first exposed to bright light, the
monster is blinded until the end of its next turn. After this
exposure, light doesn’t blind the monster again until after it
spends 1 hour in darkness. However, as long as the monster
is in an area of bright light, it’s dazzled.
Low-Light Vision The monster can see in dim light as though
it were bright light, so it ignores the concealed condition
due to dim light.
Negative Healing A creature with negative healing draws
health from negative energy rather than positive energy.
It is damaged by positive damage and is not healed by
positive healing effects. It does not take negative damage,
and it is healed by negative effects that heal undead.
Poison When a creature is exposed to a monster’s poison,
it attempts a Fortitude save to avoid becoming poisoned. 
Bestiary 2
306
The level of a poison is the level of the monster inflicting
the poison. The poison follows the rules for afflictions
found on page 457 of the Core Rulebook.
Push [one-action] Requirements The monster’s last action was a success
with a Strike that lists Push in its damage entry; Effect The
monster automatically knocks the target away from the
monster. Unless otherwise noted in the ability description,
the creature is pushed 5 feet. If the attack was a critical hit,
this distance is doubled.
Regeneration This monster regains the listed number of Hit
Points each round at the beginning of its turn. Its dying
condition never increases beyond dying 3 as long as its
regeneration is active. However, if it takes damage of a
type listed in the regeneration entry, its regeneration
deactivates until the end of its next turn. Deactivate the
regeneration before applying any damage of a listed type,
since that damage might kill the monster by bringing it
to dying 4.
Rend [one-action] A Rend entry lists a Strike the monster has;
Requirements The monster hit the same enemy with two
consecutive Strikes of the listed type in the same round;
Effect The monster automatically deals that Strike’s damage
again to the enemy.
Retributive Strike [reaction] Trigger An enemy damages the
monster’s ally, and both are within 15 feet of the monster;
Effect The ally gains resistance to all damage against the
triggering damage equal to 2 + the monster’s level. If the
foe is within reach, the monster makes a melee Strike
against it.
Scent Scent involves sensing creatures or objects by smell,
and is usually a vague sense. The range is listed in the ability,
and it functions only if the creature or object being detected
emits an aroma (for instance, incorporeal creatures usually
do not exude an aroma).
If a creature emits a heavy aroma or is upwind, the GM
can double or even triple the range of scent abilities used to
detect that creature, and the GM can reduce the range if a
creature is downwind.
Shield Block [reaction] Trigger The monster has its shield raised and
takes damage from a physical attack; Effect The monster
snaps its shield into place to deflect a blow. The shield
prevents the monster from taking an amount of damage
up to the shield’s Hardness. The monster and the shield
each take any remaining damage, possibly breaking or
destroying the shield.
Swallow Whole [one-action] (attack) The monster attempts to swallow
a creature of the listed size or smaller that it has grabbed in
its jaws or mouth. If a swallowed creature is of the maximum
size listed, the monster can’t use Swallow Whole again.
If the creature is smaller than the maximum, the monster
can usually swallow more creatures; the GM determines
the maximum. The monster attempts an Athletics check
opposed by the grabbed creature’s Reflex DC. If it succeeds,
it swallows the creature. The monster’s mouth or jaws no
longer grab a creature it has swallowed, so the monster is
free to use them to Strike or Grab once again. The monster
can’t attack creatures it has swallowed.
A swallowed creature is grabbed, is slowed 1, and has to
hold its breath or start suffocating. The swallowed creature
takes the listed amount of damage when first swallowed
and at the end of each of its turns while it’s swallowed. If
the victim Escapes this ability’s grabbed condition, it exits
through the monster’s mouth. This frees any other creature
grabbed in the monster’s mouth or jaws. A swallowed
creature can attack the monster that has swallowed it, but
only with unarmed attacks or with weapons of light Bulk
or less. The swallowing creature is flat-footed against the
attack. If the monster takes piercing or slashing damage
equaling or exceeding the listed Rupture value from a single
attack or spell, the swallowed creature cuts itself free. A
creature that gets free by either Escaping or cutting itself
free can immediately breathe and exits the swallowing
monster’s space.
If the monster dies, a swallowed creature can be
freed by creatures adjacent to the corpse if they spend
a combined total of 3 actions cutting the monster open
with a weapon or unarmed attack that deals piercing or
slashing damage.
Swarm Mind This monster doesn’t have a single mind
(typically because it’s a swarm of smaller creatures), and is
immune to mental effects that target only a specific number
of creatures. It is still subject to mental effects that affect all
creatures in an area.
Telepathy (aura, divination, magical) A monster with
telepathy can communicate mentally with any creatures
within the listed radius, as long as they share a language.
This doesn’t give any special access to their thoughts,
and communicates no more information than normal
speech would.
Throw Rock [one-action] The monster interacts to pick up a rock within
reach or retrieve a stowed rock and throws it, making a
ranged Strike.
Trample [three-actions] The monster Strides up to double its Speed
and can move through the spaces of creatures of the listed
size, Trampling each creature whose space it enters. The
monster can attempt to Trample the same creature only
once in a single use of Trample. The monster deals the
damage of the listed Strike, but trampled creatures can
attempt a basic Reflex save at the listed DC (no damage on
a critical success, half damage on a success, double damage
on a critical failure).
Tremorsense Tremorsense allows a monster to feel the
vibrations through a solid surface caused by movement.
It is usually an imprecise sense with a limited range
(listed in the ability). Tremorsense functions only if the
monster is on the same surface as the subject, and only
if the subject is moving along (or burrowing through) the
surface.
Wavesense This sense allows a monster to feel vibrations
caused by movement through a liquid. It’s usually an
imprecise sense with a limited range (listed in the ability).
Wavesense functions only if the monster and the subject
are in the same body of liquid, and only if the subject is
moving through the liquid.
307
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Creature Traits
Some of these traits appear in the Core Rulebook, while
others are new to this book and the first Bestiary.
Rarity Traits
Unless the creature is common, its trait list starts with a
rarity trait. Creatures that don’t start with a rarity trait
have the common rarity.
Common A creature of this rarity is generally known and can
be summoned with the appropriate summon spell.
Uncommon Less is known about uncommon creatures than
common creatures. They typically can’t be summoned. The
DC of Recall Knowledge checks related to this creature is
increased by 2.
Rare As the name suggests, these creatures are rare. They
typically can’t be summoned. The DC of Recall Knowledge
checks related to this creature is increased by 5.
Unique A creature with this rarity is one of a kind. The DC
of Recall Knowledge checks related to this creature is
increased by 10.
Alignment Trait Abbreviation
Following any listed rarity trait is one of nine alignment
trait abbreviations. They are listed below with the
alignment traits that these abbreviations represent.
General descriptions of alignments are found on pages
28–29 of the Core Rulebook.
CE Chaotic and evil
CG Chaotic and good
CN Chaotic and neutral
LG Lawful and good
LE Lawful and evil
LN Lawful and neutral
N Neutral
NE Neutral and evil
NG Neutral and good
Size
After any listed rarity trait and the alignment
abbreviation, each creature has its size listed
before its other traits.
Gargantuan This size of creature takes up a space
of at least 20 feet by 20 feet (16 squares on the grid), but
can be much larger. Gargantuan creatures typically have a
reach of 20 feet if they are tall, or 15 feet if they are long,
but larger ones could have a much longer reach.
Huge A Huge creature takes up a 15-foot-by-15-foot space (9
squares on the grid). It typically has a reach of 15 feet if the
creature is tall or 10 feet if the creature is long.
Large A Large creature takes up a 10-foot-by-10-foot space
(4 squares on the grid). It typically has a reach of 10 feet if
the creature is tall or 5 feet if the creature is long.
Medium A Medium creature takes up a 5-foot-by-5-foot space
(1 square on the grid) and typically has a reach of 5 feet.
Small A Small creature takes up a 5-foot-by-5-foot space
(1 square on the grid) and typically has a reach of 5 feet.
Tiny A creature of this size takes up less than a 5-foot-by-5-foot
space (1 square on the grid), and multiple Tiny creatures
can occupy the same square on the grid. At least four Tiny
creatures can occupy the same square, and even more
can occupy the same square, at the GM’s discretion. They
can also occupy the same space as larger creatures, and
if their reach is 0 feet, they must do so in order to attack.
Other Traits
After any rarity traits, the alignment abbreviation, and
the size, each creature’s trait line lists all other traits the
creature has in alphabetical order. The following is a list
of those traits found in the book.
Aberration Aberrations are creatures from beyond the planes
or corruptions of the natural order.
Acid Creatures with this trait are primarily constituted of acid
or have a magical connection to it.
Aeon These monitors are the self-styled defenders of reality.
Traditional aeons have dualistic natures and forms, and
they hold a dichotomy of interests, though axiomites
and inevitables do not. Aeons other than axiomites 
Bestiary 2
308
and inevitables communicate via a strange telepathic
hodgepodge of sensory sending called envisioning.
Air Creatures with this trait consist primarily of air or have a
magical connection to that element.
Amphibious An amphibious creature can breathe in water and
in air, even outside of its preferred environment, usually
indefinitely but at least for hours. These creatures often
have a swim Speed. Their bludgeoning and slashing unarmed
Strikes don’t take the usual –2 penalty for being underwater.
Angel This family of celestials is native to the plane of Nirvana.
Most angels are neutral good, have darkvision, and have a
weakness to evil damage.
Animal An animal is a creature with a relatively low
intelligence. It typically doesn’t have an Intelligence modifier
above –4, can’t speak languages, and can’t be trained in
Intelligence-based skills.
Aquatic Aquatic creatures are at home underwater. Their
bludgeoning and slashing unarmed Strikes don’t take the
usual –2 penalty for being underwater. Aquatic creatures
can breathe water but not air.
Archon Members of this family of celestials are the protectors
of Heaven and are lawful good. They have darkvision and a
weakness to evil damage.
Azata This family of celestials is native to Elysium. They are
chaotic good and have darkvision and a weakness to evil
and cold iron.
Beast A creature similar to an animal but with an Intelligence
modifier of –3 or higher is usually a beast. Unlike an animal,
a beast might be able to speak and reason.
Caligni These subterranean people have darkvision, and some
have powers to create darkness.
Celestial Creatures that hail from or have a strong connection
to the good-aligned planes are called celestials. Celestials
can survive the basic environmental effects of planes in the
Outer Sphere.
Cold Creatures with this trait have a magical connection to cold.
Construct A construct is an artificial creature empowered
by a force other than necromancy. Constructs are often
mindless; they are immune to bleed damage, death
effects, disease, healing, necromancy, nonlethal attacks,
poison, and the doomed, drained, fatigued, paralyzed,
sickened, and unconscious conditions; and they may
have Hardness based on the materials used to construct
their bodies. Constructs are not living creatures, nor are
they undead. When reduced to 0 Hit Points, a construct
creature is destroyed.
Couatl A family of supernatural feathered serpents who serve
as guardians and messengers on the Material Plane for
various good-aligned divinities.
Daemon A family of fiends spawned on the desolate plane
of Abaddon, most daemons are neutral evil. They
typically have darkvision and weakness to good
damage.
Demon A family of fiends hailing from the Abyss,
most demons are chaotic evil. Most
demons have darkvision and weakness
to good damage.
Devil A family of fiends from Hell, most devils
are lawful evil. They typically have greater
darkvision, weakness to good damage,
immunity to fire, and telepathy.
Dinosaur These reptiles have survived
from prehistoric times.
Dragon Dragons are reptilian creatures,
often winged or with the power of flight.
Most are able to use a breath weapon and are
immune to sleep and the paralyzed condition.
Dream Creatures native to the Dimension of Dreams
can be any alignment and possess a diverse array
of abilities, although those associated with the
nightmare realm of Leng are almost always evil and
immune to that realm’s freezing temperatures.
Earth Creatures with this trait consist primarily of earth or
have a magical connection to that element.
Electricity Creatures with this trait have a magical connection
to electricity.
Elemental Elementals are creatures directly tied to an element
and are native to the Elemental Planes. Elementals don’t
need to breathe.
Ethereal Ethereal creatures are natives of the Ethereal Plane.
They can survive the basic environmental effects of the
Ethereal Plane.
Fetchling A creature with this trait is a member of 
309
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
the fetchling ancestry. Fetchlings were once human,
but generations of life on the Shadow Plane have
transformed them.
Fey Creatures of the First World are called the fey.
Fiend Creatures that hail from or have a strong connection
to the evil-aligned planes are called fiends. Fiends can
survive the basic environmental effects of planes in the
Outer Sphere.
Fire Creatures with this trait are primarily constituted of fire
or have a magical connection to that element.
Fungus Fungal creatures have the fungus trait. They are
distinct from normal fungi.
Ghoul Ghouls are vile undead creatures that feast on flesh.
Giant Giants are massive humanoid creatures.
Gnome A creature with this trait is a member of the gnome
ancestry. Gnomes are small people skilled at magic who
seek out new experiences and usually have low-light vision.
Golem Golems are a special type of construct. Golems are immune
to almost all magic, but most have a weakness to certain spells.
Gremlin Cruel and mischievous fey, gremlins have acclimated
to life on the Material Plane.
Grippli Gripplis are a family of froglike humanoids.
Human A creature with this trait is a member of the human
ancestry. Humans are a diverse array of people known for
their adaptability. An ability with this trait can be used or
selected only by humans.
Humanoid Humanoids reason and act much like humans. They
typically stand upright and have two arms and two legs.
Ifrit Ifrits are planar scions descended from efreet.
Incorporeal An incorporeal creature or object has no physical
form. It can pass through solid objects, including walls.
When inside an object, an incorporeal creature can’t perceive,
attack, or interact with anything outside the object, and if it
starts its turn in an object, it is slowed 1. Corporeal creatures
can pass through an incorporeal creature, but they can’t end
their movement in its space.
An incorporeal creature can’t attempt Strength-based checks
against physical creatures or objects—only against incorporeal
ones—unless those objects have the ghost touch property rune.
Likewise, a corporeal creature can’t attempt Strength-based
checks against incorporeal creatures or objects.
Incorporeal creatures usually have immunity to effects
or conditions that require a physical body, like disease,
poison, and precision damage. They usually have resistance
against all damage (except force damage and damage from
Strikes with the ghost touch property rune), with double
the resistance against non-magical damage.
Inevitable These constructed aeons were created by the
axiomites. Each type of inevitable is dedicated to a specific
task. Most inevitables have weakness to chaotic damage.
Leshy Leshys are small, roughly humanoid plant creatures.
Magical Something with the magical trait is imbued with
magical energies not tied to a specific tradition of magic.
A magical item radiates a magic aura infused with its
dominant school of magic.
Some items or effects are closely tied to a particular
tradition of magic. In these cases, the item has the arcane,
divine, occult, or primal trait instead of the magical trait.
Any of these traits indicate that the item is magical.
Mindless A mindless creature has either programmed or
rudimentary mental attributes. Most, if not all, of their mental
ability modifiers are –5. They are immune to all mental effects.
Monitor Creatures that hail from or have a strong connection
to the neutrally aligned planes are called monitors. Monitors
can survive the basic environmental effects of planes in the
Outer Sphere.
Morlock Morlocks are a family of pale, underground-dwelling
humanoids who, generations ago, were regular humans.
Mummy A mummy is an undead creature created from a
preserved corpse.
Mutant The monster has mutated or evolved, granting it
unusual benefits, drawbacks, or both.
Negative Creatures with this trait are natives of the Negative
Energy Plane. They can survive the basic environmental
effects of the Negative Energy Plane.
Oni Oni are a family of fiends who dwell on the Material Plane
and take monstrous forms based on humanoid shapes.
Ooze Oozes are creatures with simple anatomies. They tend
to have low mental ability scores and immunity to mental
effects and precision damage.
Oread Oreads are planar scions descended from shaitans.
Petitioner Petitioners are mortal souls who have been judged
and then transformed into creatures native to other planes.
Petitioners can survive the basic environmental effects of
their home plane.
Plant Vegetable creatures have the plant trait. They are
distinct from normal plants.
Positive Creatures with this trait are natives of the Positive
Energy Plane. They can survive the basic environmental
effects of the Positive Energy Plane.
Protean A family of monitors spawned within the Maelstrom,
these creatures are guardians of disorder and are chaotic
neutral. They typically have darkvision, an amorphous
anatomy, and a weakness to lawful damage.
Psychopomp A family of monitors spawned within the
Boneyard to convey souls to the Outer Planes, most
psychopomps are true neutral. They typically have
darkvision, lifesense, and spirit touch, and they are immune
to death effects.
Qlippoth A family of fiends hailing from the Abyss, most
qlippoth are chaotic evil. Their appearance affects the
minds of non-qlippoth that view them.
Serpentfolk Serpentfolk are a family of serpentine humanoids.
Shadow Creatures with this trait are natives of the Shadow
Plane. They can survive the basic environmental effects of
the Shadow Plane.
Skulk Skulks are a family of humanoids whose skin can shift
coloration to aid in stealth.
Sonic A creature with this trait has a magical connection to
powerful sound.
Soulbound These constructs are mentally augmented by a
fragment of a once-living creature’s soul.
Spirit Spirits are ephemeral creatures defined by their spiritual
essence. They often lack a material form.
Bestiary 2
310
Spriggan Kin to gnomes, spriggans tend to be evil and can
grow in size to resemble giants.
Suli Sulis are planar scions descended from jann.
Swarm A swarm is a mass or cloud of creatures that functions
as one monster. Its size entry gives the size of the entire
mass, though for most swarms the individual creatures
that make up that mass are Tiny. A swarm can occupy the
same space as other creatures, and must do so in order to
use its damaging action. A swarm typically has weakness
to effects that deal damage over an area (like area spells
and splash weapons). Swarms are immune to the grappled,
prone, and restrained conditions.
Sylph Sylphs are planar scions descended from djinn.
Tane The Tane are powerful creatures created eons ago by the
Eldest of the First World. All of the Tane treat whatever
plane they happen to be on as their home plane.
Time Time creatures are natives of the Dimension of Time.
They do not age, and while some may be driven by
supernatural hungers, they do not need to eat or drink to
survive. They can survive the basic environmental effects
of the Dimension of Time.
Troll Trolls are giant, brutish creatures and are well known for
their ability to regenerate.
Undead Once living, these creatures were infused after death
with negative energy and soul-corrupting evil magic. When
reduced to 0 Hit Points, an undead creature is destroyed.
Undead creatures are damaged by positive energy, are healed
by negative energy, and don’t benefit from healing effects.
Undine Undines are planar scions descended from marids.
Urdefhan Urdefhans are humanoids who have pacts with
daemons, have transparent skin, and drink blood.
Vampire Undead creatures who thirst for blood, vampires are
notoriously versatile and hard to destroy.
Velstrac A family of fiends from the Shadow Plane that are
associated with pain and agony. All velstracs possess some
form of disturbing gaze.
Water Creatures with this trait are primarily constituted of
water or have a magical connection to the element.
Wight A wight is an undead creature that drains life and
stands vigil over its burial site.
Werecreature These shapechanging creatures either are naturally
able to shift between animal, humanoid, and hybrid forms or
are afflicted with a curse that forces them to shift involuntarily.
Wraith A wraith is an incorporeal undead creature infused
with negative energy and driven by a hatred of all life.
Weapon Traits
The bonuses from these weapons traits are included in
creatures’ statistics, but the traits appear because they’re
relevant for the clumsy and enfeebled conditions.
Brutal A ranged attack with this trait uses its Strength
modifier instead of Dexterity on the attack roll.
Finesse This melee attack is Dexterity based. Even if
a weapon normally has the finesse trait, this trait is
omitted in the Strike entry if the monster is applying
its Strength.
Rituals
Some creatures from the Outer Planes can use special
rituals to call their kin or transport themselves to another
plane. These are the rituals used by various creatures in
this book.
ABYSSAL PACT RITUAL 1
UNCOMMON CONJURATION
Cast 1 day
Primary Check Religion (expert; you must be a demon)
You call in a favor from another demon whose level is no
more than double Abyssal pact’s spell level, two demons
whose levels are each at least 2 less than double the spell
level, or three demons whose levels are each at least 3 less
than double the spell level.
Critical Success You conjure the demon or demons. They
are eager to pursue the task, so they don’t ask for a favor.
Success You conjure the demon or demons. They are not
eager to pursue the task, so they require a favor in return.
Failure You don’t conjure any demons.
Critical Failure The demon or demons are angry that
you disturbed them. They appear before you, but they
immediately attack you.
ANGELIC MESSENGER RITUAL 1
UNCOMMON CONJURATION
Cast 1 day
Primary Check Religion (expert; you must be an angel)
You transport yourself to either a celestial plane or a world
on the Material Plane where worshippers of your patron
can be found. You must be of no higher level than double
angelic messenger’s spell level.
Critical Success As success, but if you’ve never visited that
plane or world before, you appear right in front of the
message’s intended recipient.
Success You arrive on the target plane or world at the
last location you visited on that plane or world, or to a
random location within 10d10 miles of your message’s
intended recipient if you’ve never visited that plane or
world before.
Failure You don’t travel.
Critical Failure You accidentally travel to the wrong plane,
possibly a dangerous plane.
311
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
DAEMONIC PACT RITUAL 1
UNCOMMON CONJURATION
Cast 1 day
Primary Check Religion (expert; you must be a daemon or an
urdefhan)
You call upon the powers of Abaddon to grant you the
assistance of a daemon. You call upon a daemon whose level
can be no more than double daemonic pact’s spell level, two
daemons whose levels are each at least 2 less than double the
spell level, or three daemons whose levels are each at least 3
less than double the spell level.
Critical Success You conjure the daemon or daemons, and
they require nothing in return for their service.
Success You conjure the daemon or daemons, who serve you
willingly, but require a sacrifice in the form of spilled blood
(either another creature’s or your own).
Failure You don’t conjure any daemons.
Critical Failure You don’t conjure any daemons, and the selfsacrifice required to perform the ritual leaves you drained 1
(or drained 2 if the spell level is 5 or higher).
INFERNAL PACT RITUAL 1
UNCOMMON CONJURATION
Cast 1 day
Primary Check Religion (expert; you must be a devil)
You make an appeal to a powerful devil, asking it to bind some
of its subordinates to your service. If you succeed, the devil
sends you its choice of one devil whose level is no more than
double infernal pact’s level, two devils whose levels are each at
least 2 less than double the spell level, or three devils whose
levels are each at least 3 less than double the spell level.
Critical Success The devils are sent to you and serve you for
1d4 weeks.
Success The devils are sent to you and serve you for 1d4 days.
Failure Your request is denied.
Critical Failure Not only is your request denied, but the
powerful devil sends word of its displeasure to your master.
Languages
Some creatures in this book speak languages not found on
page 65 of the Pathfinder Core Rulebook. The languages
are listed below.
TABLE: UNCOMMON LANGUAGES
Language Speakers
Alghollthu Alghollthus and some of their enemies
Arboreal Plant creatures
Caligni Calignis
Cyclops Cyclopes and associated creatures
Daemonic Daemons and their worshippers
Destrachan Destrachans
D’ziriak D’ziriaks
Grippli Gripplis
Jistkan Ancient constructs
Jyoti Jyotis
Varisian Regional human language, Sandpoint Devil
Utopian Axiomites and inevitables
Creatures by Type
The following lists organize the creatures by their major
types, subdivided by level. A superscript “U” indicates
that a creature is uncommon, “R” that it’s rare, and “Uq”
that it’s unique.
Aberration
Level 0 grindylow; Level 1 akataR
; Level 2 bog striderU, choker;
Level 3 d’ziriak, vampiric mist; Level 6 lunar nagaU, skrik nettle,
xillU; Level 7 hound of TindalosR
, sceaduinarR
; Level 8 denizen of
Leng, destrachan, intellect devourerU; Level  9 irnakurse, spirit
nagaU; Level 10 ghonhatine; Level 11 gosregU, isqulugU, quoppopak;
Level 13 froghemothU, irlgaunt, Leng spiderU; Level 14 doprillu,
worm that walksU; Level 15 neothelidU; Level 17 vaspercham
Animal
Level  –1 compsognathus, raven, snapping turtle; Level  0
badger, blue-ringed octopus, bottlenose dolphin, dream
spider, giant maggot, sea snake, spear frog, stingray, vampire
squid; Level 1 cave scorpion, giant cockroach, giant fly, giant
frog, giant solifugid, giant tick, hippocampus, manta ray, reef
octopus; Level 2 black bear, blindheim, cave fisher, cockroach
swarm, giant ant, giant badger, giant crab, giant leech,
giant toad, hippogriff, shocker lizard, wolverine; Level  3 fen
mosquito swarm, giant chameleon, giant dragonfly nymph,
giant whiptail centipede, pachycephalosaurus, raven swarm;
Level 4 brood leech swarm, giant dragonfly, giant wolverine,
hadrosaurid, rhinoceros; Level  5 army ant swarm, emperor
cobra, hippopotamus, ogre spider, orca, polar bear; Level  6
fire jellyfish swarm, giant mosquito, iguanodon, woolly
rhinoceros; Level  7 elasmosaurus, giant jellyfish, megalania,
sportlebore swarm; Level  8 anancus, giant hippocampusu
,
giant slug; Level  9 aurumvorax, giant snapping turtle, giant
squid, mastodon, tick swarm, titan centipede; Level  10
behemoth hippopotamus; Level 11 spinosaurus; Level 12 frost
worm; Level 15 black scorpion; Level 18 duneshaker solifugid
Beast
Level  1 carbuncleR; Level  2 blink dogU, wereboar; Level  3
chupacabra, trollhound, yeth hound; Level  4 peryton,
weretiger; Level  5 grodair, leucrotta; Level  6 ahuizotlU,
hodagU; Level 7 dweomercatU, hellcat; Level 8 behir, gorgonU,
Sandpoint DevilUq; Level 9 dracoliskU; Level 10 bebilith, quetz
couatlU, water ormR; Level 11 thunderbirdU; Level 12 catoblepas;
Level 15 umonleeU; Level 17 leydrothU, thrasfyrR
Celestial
Level 4 hound archon; Level 6 bralani; Level 10 movanic deva;
Level  12 monadic deva; Level  14 trumpet archon; Level  16
planetarU; Level  19 star archon; Level  20 bastion archonR,
veranallia; Level 23 solarR
Construct
Level  3 necrophidius; Level  4 carrion golemU, scarecrow;
Level 5 dig-widget, ice golemU; Level 6 wood golemU; Level 8
glass golemU; Level  11 spiral centurion; Level  17 radiant
wardenU; Level 18 aolazR
Bestiary 2
312
Dragon
Level 2 shadow drake, tatzlwyrm; Level 6 sea drake; Level 7
young crystal dragonU; Level 8 young brine dragonU; Level 9
dracoliskU, young magma dragonU; Level  10 peluda, young
cloud dragonU; Level 11 adult crystal dragonU, young umbral
dragonU; Level 12 adult brine dragonU; Level 13 adult magma
dragonU; Level 14 adult cloud dragonU, ravener huskR; Level 15
adult umbral dragonU, shoal linnormU; Level 16 ancient crystal
dragonR, fjord linnormU, zomok; Level 17 ancient brine dragonR;
Level  18 ancient magma dragonR, cairn linnormU; Level  19
ancient cloud dragonR, taiga linnormU; Level 20 ancient umbral
dragonR; Level 21 ravenerR; Level 23 jabberwockR
Dream
Level 8 animate dreamU, denizen of Leng; Level 13 Leng spiderU
Elemental
Level  1 dust mephitU, ice mephitU, ooze mephitU, steam
mephitU; Level  2 ember fox, icicle snake, living boulder,
mudwretch, spark bat; Level 4 earthen destrier, filth fire, living
thunderclap, mist stalker; Level 6 belker, blizzardborn, sand
sentry, striding fire; Level  7 young crystal dragonU; Level  8
granite glyptodont, magma scorpion, young brine dragonU;
Level 9 young magma dragonU; Level 10 icewyrm, melody on
the wind, young cloud dragonU; Level 11 adult crystal dragonU;
Level 12 adult brine dragonU; Level 13 adult magma dragonU;
Level 14 adult cloud dragonU; Level 16 ancient crystal dragonR;
Level  17 ancient brine dragonR; Level  18 ancient magma
dragonR; Level 19 ancient cloud dragonR; Level 21 lerritan
Ethereal
Level 6 xillU
Fey
Level 1 brownie, nixie, vexgit; Level 2 leprechaun, nuglub; Level 3
quicklingU, twigjack; Level 4 kelpie, korredU; Level 5 grimstalker,
grodair, lurker in light; Level 6 baobhan sithU, blodeuweddU; Level 7
culdewen, stygira; Level 9 nuckelavee; Level 10 nereid; Level 12
rusalka; Level 14 ankou; Level 15 marrmora; Level 20 nornR
Fiend
Level  1 augur, cythnigotU; Level  3 yeth hound, zebub; Level  5
ostiarius; Level  6 babau, evangelist; Level  7 hellcat, invidiak,
shoggtiU, soul eaterU; Level  8 nabasu, onidoshi, Sandpoint
DevilUq, sarglagon; Level 9 osyluth; Level 10 bebilith, nyogothU,
piscodaemon, sacristan; Level 11 hamatula, hezrou, meladaemon;
Level  12 chernobueU, derghodaemon, interlocutor; Level  13 ice
yai, thanadaemon; Level 14 augnagarU, fire yai, gylou, nalfeshnee;
Level  16 cornugon; Level  17 water yai; Level  18 purrodaemon,
thulgantU; Level 19 vrolikaiU; Level 20 eremite, olethrodaemon
Fungus
Level 2 slime mold; Level 3 violet fungus; Level 5 basidirond;
Level 7 tendriculos
Giant
Level 4 frost trollU; Level 6 cavern trollU, wood giant; Level 8
marsh giant, onidoshi, two-headed trollU; Level  12 athach,
taiga giant; Level 13 ice yai, shadow giant; Level 14 fire yai;
Level 15 jotund trollR; Level 17 water yai
Humanoid
Level  1 fetchling scout; Level  1 grippli scout, ifrit pyrochemist,
oread guard, skulk, suli dune dancer, sylph sneak, undine
hydromancer; Level 2 morlock, triton, wereboar, zyss serpentfolkU;
Level  3 aapoph serpentfolkU, caligni slayerU, spriggan bully,
urdefhan warrior; Level 4 Coil spyU, weretiger; Level 5 urdefhan
tormentor; Level 6 witchwyrdU, wood giant; Level 7 spriggan
warlord; Level 8 bone prophetU, marsh giant, onidoshi; Level 9
jyoti; Level 12 athach, taiga giant; Level 13 ice yai, shadow giant;
Level 14 fire yai; Level 17 water yai; Level 19 GrendelUq
Monitor
Level  3 akizendri, esobok; Level  5 azuretzi, catrina; Level  7
theletos, vanth; Level 9 zelekhut; Level 10 imentesh; Level 15
marut; Level 16 bythosU; Level 20 yamarajU
negative
Level 7 sceaduinarR
Ooze
Level 1 amoeba swarm, giant amoeba; Level 2 slime mold; Level 4
gray ooze; Level 6 verdurous ooze; Level 13 carnivorous blob
Petitioner
Level 1 petitioner
Plant
Level –1 yellow musk thrall; Level 1 sunflower leshy; Level 2
yellow musk brute, yellow musk creeper; Level  3 assassin
vine, twigjack; Level  4 calathgar, flytrap leshy, mandragora;
Level  6 blodeuweddU, scythe tree; Level  7 drainberry bush,
tendriculos; Level 8 moonflowerU; Level 13 viper vine; Level 16
zomok; Level 19 sardR
Positive
Level 9 jyoti
Shadow
Level 1 fetchling scout; Level 2 shadow drake; Level 3 d’ziriak;
Level 11 young umbral dragonU; Level 13 shadow giant; Level 15
adult umbral dragonU; Level 20 ancient umbral dragonR
Time
Level 7 hound of TindalosR
Undead
Level –1 crawling hand; Level 1 void zombieR; Level 2 draugr;
Level 4 attic whisperer, cairn wightU; Level 5 bog mummy,
giant crawling hand, skaveling; Level 6 revenant, vrykolakas
spawn; Level 7 specter, totenmaske; Level 8 bodakU, mohrg;
Level 9 dread wraith, witchfireU; Level 10 vrykolakas master;
Level  11 devourerU; Level  13 vrykolakas ancientU; Level  14
ravener huskR; Level 21 ravenerR
313
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Creature Level Category Type Traits Rarity Page
Compsognathus –1 Dinosaur Animal Common 80
Crawling hand –1 Crawling hand Undead Common 56
Raven –1 Raven Animal Common 221
Snapping turtle –1 Turtle Animal Common 269
Yellow musk thrall –1 Yellow musk creeper Plant Common 300
Badger 0 Badger Animal Common 32
Blue–ringed octopus 0 Octopus Animal Common 187
Bottlenose dolphin 0 Dolphin Animal Common 84
Dream spider 0 Spider Animal Common 249
Giant maggot 0 Fly Animal Common 120
Grindylow 0 Grindylow Aberration Common 138
Sea snake 0 Snake Animal Common 245
Spear frog 0 Frog Animal Common 121
Stingray 0 Ray Animal Common 226
Vampire squid 0 Squid Animal Common 254
Akata 1 Akata Aberration Rare 13
Amoeba swarm 1 Ooze Ooze Common 192
Augur 1 Velstrac Fiend Common 280
Brownie 1 Brownie Fey Common 44
Carbuncle 1 Carbuncle Beast Rare 47
Cave scorpion 1 Scorpion Animal Common 234
Cythnigot 1 Qlippoth Fiend Uncommon 212
Dust mephit 1 Elemental, mephit Elemental Uncommon 112
Fetchling scout 1 Fetchling Humanoid, shadow Common 117
Giant amoeba 1 Ooze Ooze Common 192
Giant cockroach 1 Cockroach Animal Common 53
Giant fly 1 Fly Animal Common 120
Giant frog 1 Frog Animal Common 121
Giant solifugid 1 Solifugid Animal Common 246
Giant tick 1 Tick Animal Common 260
Grippli scout 1 Grippli Humanoid Common 139
Hippocampus 1 Hippocampus Animal Common 142
Ice mephit 1 Elemental, mephit Elemental Uncommon 112
Ifrit pyrochemist 1 Planar scion, geniekin Humanoid Common 200
Manta ray 1 Ray Animal Common 226
Nixie 1 Nixie Fey Common 183
Ooze mephit 1 Elemental, mephit Elemental Uncommon 113
Oread guard 1 Planar scion, geniekin Humanoid Common 200
Petitioner 1 Petitioner Petitioner Common 198
Reef octopus 1 Octopus Animal Common 187
Skulk 1 Skulk Humanoid Common 243
Steam mephit 1 Elemental, mephit Elemental Uncommon 113
Suli dune danger 1 Planar scion, geniekin Humanoid Common 201
Sunflower leshy 1 Leshy Plant Common 160
Sylph sneak 1 Planar scion, geniekin Humanoid Common 202
Undine hydromancer 1 Planar scion, geniekin Humanoid Common 203
Vexgit 1 Gremlin Fey Common 134
Void zombie 1 Void zombie Undead Rare 288
Black bear 2 Bear Animal Common 36
Blindheim 2 Blindheim Animal Common 39
Blink dog 2 Blink dog Beast Uncommon 40
Creatures by Level
The following tables present every single stat block in
Bestiary 2, organized by level. Each entry also details the
creature’s category, showing under which entry it can be
found and the general group it belongs to; its type traits,
which are useful for summoning and some other abilities;
its rarity; and page number. 
Bestiary 2
314
Bog strider
2 Bog strider Aberration Uncommon 43
Cave fisher
2 Cave fisher Animal Common 49
Choker
2 Choker Aberration Common 51
Cockroach swarm
2 Cockroach Animal Common 53
Draugr
2 Draugr Undead Common 102
Ember fox
2 Elemental, fire Elemental Common 110
Giant ant
2 Ant Animal Common 20
Giant badger
2 Badger Animal Common 32
Giant crab
2 Crab Animal Common 55
Giant leech
2 Leech Animal Common 156
Giant toad
2 Toad Animal Common 261
Hippogriff
2 Hippogriff Animal Common 143
Icicle snake
2 Elemental, water Elemental Common 114
Leprechaun
2 Leprechaun Fey Common 158
Living boulder
2 Elemental, earth Elemental Common 108
Morlock
2 Morlock Humanoid Common 174
Mudwretch
2 Mudwretch Elemental Common 176
Nuglub
2 Gremlin Fey Common 135
Shadow drake
2 Drake Dragon, shadow Common 100
Shocker lizard
2 Shocker lizard Animal Common 240
Slime mold
2 Ooze Fungus, ooze Common 193
Spark bat
2 Elemental, air Elemental Common 106
Tatzlwyrm
2 Tatzlwyrm Dragon Common 256
Triton
2 Triton Humanoid Common 263
Wereboar
2 Werecreature Beast, humanoid Common 290
Wolverine
2 Wolverine Animal Common 295
Yellow musk brute
2 Yellow musk creeper Plant Common 301
Yellow musk creeper
2 Yellow musk creeper Plant Common 300
Zyss serpentfolk
2 Serpentfolk Humanoid Uncommon 237
Aapoph serpentfolk
3 Serpentfolk Humanoid Uncommon 237
Akizendri
3 Protean Monitor Common 204
Assassin vine
3 Assassin vine Plant Common 26
Caligni slayer
3 Caligni Humanoid Uncommon 46
Chupacabra
3 Chupacabra Beast Common 52
D’ziriak
3 D’ziriak Aberration, shadow Common 104
Esobok
3 Psychopomp Monitor Common 208
Fen mosquito swarm
3 Mosquito Animal Common 175
Giant chameleon
3 Lizard Animal Common 168
Giant dragonfly nymph
3 Dragonfly Animal Common 98
Giant whiptail centipede
3 Centipede Animal Common 50
Necrophidius
3 Necrophidius Construct Common 180
Pachycephalosaurus
3 Dinosaur Animal Common 80
Quickling
3 Quickling Fey Uncommon 218
Raven swarm
3 Raven Animal Common 221
Spriggan bully
3 Spriggan Humanoid Common 252
Trollhound
3 Trollhound Beast Common 268
Twigjack
3 Twigjack Fey, plant Common 270
Urdefhan warrior
3 Urdefhan Humanoid Common 272
Vampiric mist
3 Vampiric mist Aberration Common 278
Violet fungus
3 Violet fungus Fungus Common 286
Yeth hound
3 Yeth hound Beast, fiend Common 302
Zebub
3 Devil Fiend Common 72
Attic whisperer
4 Attic whisperer Undead Common 28
Brood leech swarm
4 Leech Animal Common 156
Cairn wight
4 Wight Undead Uncommon 292
Calathgar
4 Calathgar Plant Common 45
Carrion golem
4 Golem Construct Uncommon 128
315
Introduction
A-CD
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Coil spy
4 Serpentfolk Humanoid Uncommon 238
Earthen destrier
4 Elemental, earth Elemental Common 108
Filth fire
4 Elemental, fire Elemental Common 110
Flytrap leshy
4 Leshy Plant Common 161
Frost troll
4 Troll Giant Uncommon 264
Giant dragonfly
4 Dragonfly Animal Common 98
Giant wolverine
4 Wolverine Animal Common 295
Gray ooze
4 Ooze Ooze Common 193
Hadrosaurid
4 Dinosaur Animal Common 81
Hound archon
4 Archon Celestial Common 22
Kelpie
4 Kelpie Fey Common 154
Korred
4 Korred Fey Uncommon 155
Living thunderclap
4 Elemental, air Elemental Common 106
Mandragora
4 Mandragora Plant Common 170
Mist stalker
4 Elemental, water Elemental Common 114
Peryton
4 Peryton Beast Common 197
Rhinoceros
4 Rhinoceros Animal Common 228
Scarecrow
4 Scarecrow Construct Common 232
Weretiger
4 Werecreature Beast, humanoid Common 291
Army ant swarm
5 Ant Animal Common 20
Azuretzi
5 Protean Monitor Common 205
Basidirond
5 Basidirond Fungus Common 34
Bog mummy
5 Mummy Undead Common 177
Catrina
5 Psychopomp Monitor Common 209
Dig–widget
5 Dig–widget Construct Common 79
Emperor cobra
5 Snake Animal Common 245
Giant crawling hand
5 Crawling hand Undead Common 56
Grimstalker
5 Grimstalker Fey Common 137
Grodair
5 Grodair Beast, fey Common 140
Hippopotamus
5 Hippopotamus Animal Common 144
Ice golem
5 Golem Construct Uncommon 129
Leucrotta
5 Leucrotta Beast Common 162
Lurker in light
5 Lurker in light Fey Common 169
Ogre spider
5 Spider Animal Common 249
Orca
5 Dolphin Animal Common 84
Ostiarius
5 Velstrac Fiend Common 281
Polar bear
5 Bear Animal Common 36
Skaveling
5 Skaveling Undead Common 241
Urdefhan tormentor
5 Urdefhan Humanoid Common 273
Ahuizotl
6 Ahuizotl Beast Uncommon 12
Babau
6 Demon Fiend Common 64
Baobhan sith
6 Baobhan sith Fey Uncommon 33
Belker
6 Elemental, air Elemental Common 106
Blizzardborn
6 Elemental, water Elemental Common 114
Blodeuwedd
6 Blodeuwedd Fey, plant Uncommon 41
Bralani
6 Azata Celestial Common 30
Cavern troll
6 Troll Giant Uncommon 264
Evangelist
6 Velstrac Fiend Common 281
Fire jellyfish swarm
6 Jellyfish Animal Common 152
Giant mosquito
6 Mosquito Animal Common 175
Hodag
6 Hodag Beast Uncommon 145
Iguanodon
6 Dinosaur Animal Common 82
Lunar naga
6 Naga Aberration Uncommon 178
Revenant
6 Revenant Undead Common 227
Sand sentry
6 Elemental, earth Elemental Common 108
Scythe tree
6 Scythe tree Plant Common 235
Sea drake
6 Drake Dragon Common 101
Bestiary 2
316
Skrik nettle
6 Skrik nettle Aberration Common 242
Striding fire
6 Elemental, fire Elemental Common 111
Verdurous ooze
6 Ooze Ooze Common 194
Vrykolakas spawn
6 Vampire Undead Common 276
Witchwyrd
6 Witchwyrd Humanoid Uncommon 294
Wood giant
6 Giant Giant, humanoid Common 124
Wood golem
6 Golem Construct Uncommon 130
Woolly rhinoceros
6 Rhinoceros Animal Common 228
Xill
6 Xill Aberration, ethereal Uncommon 299
Culdewen
7 Culdewen Fey Common 57
Drainberry bush
7 Drainberry bush Plant Common 99
Dweomercat
7 Dweomercat Beast Uncommon 103
Elasmosaurus
7 Elasmosaurus Animal Common 105
Giant jellyfish
7 Jellyfish Animal Common 152
Hellcat
7 Hellcat Beast, fiend Common 141
Hound of Tindalos
7 Hound of Tindalos Aberration, time Rare 146
Invidiak
7 Demon Fiend Common 65
Megalania
7 Lizard Animal Common 168
Sceaduinar
7 Sceaduinar Aberration, negative Rare 233
Shoggti
7 Qlippoth Fiend Uncommon 213
Soul eater
7 Soul eater Fiend Uncommon 247
Spectre
7 Spectre Undead Common 248
Sportlebore swarm
7 Sportlebore Animal Common 251
Spriggan warlord
7 Spriggan Humanoid Common 253
Stygira
7 Stygira Fey Common 255
Tendriculos
7 Tendriculos Fungus, plant Common 257
Theletos
7 Aeon Monitor Common
8
Totenmaske
7 Totenmaske Undead Common 262
Vanth
7 Psychopomp Monitor Common 210
Young crystal dragon
7 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 91
Anancus
8 Elephant Animal Common 116
Animate dream
8 Animate dream Dream Uncommon 18
Behir
8 Behir Beast Common 38
Bodak
8 Bodak Undead Uncommon 42
Bone prophet
8 Serpentfolk Humanoid Uncommon 239
Denizen of Leng
8 Denizen of Leng Aberration, dream Common 70
Destrachan
8 Destrachan Aberration Common 71
Giant hippocampus
8 Hippocampus Animal Uncommon 142
Giant slug
8 Slug Animal Common 244
Glass golem
8 Golem Construct Uncommon 131
Gorgon
8 Gorgon Beast Uncommon 132
Granite glyptodont
8 Elemental, earth Elemental Common 109
Intellect devourer
8 Intellect devourer Aberration Uncommon 147
Magma scorpion
8 Elemental, fire Elemental Common 111
Marsh giant
8 Giant Giant, humanoid Common 125
Mohrg
8 Mohrg Undead Common 172
Moonflower
8 Moonflower Plant Uncommon 173
Nabasu
8 Demon Fiend Common 65
Onidoshi
8 Oni Fiend, giant, humanoid Common 188
Sandpoint Devil
8 Sandpoint Devil Beast, fiend Unique 230
Sarglagon
8 Devil Fiend Common 72
Two–headed troll
8 Troll Giant Uncommon 265
Young brine dragon
8 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 87
Aurumvorax
9 Aurumvorax Animal Common 29
Dracolisk
9 Basilisk Beast, dragon Uncommon 35
Dread wraith
9 Wraith Undead Common 298
Giant snapping turtle
9 Turtle Animal Common 269
317
Introduction
A-CD
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
Giant squid
9 Squid Animal Common 254
Irnakurse
9 Fleshwarp Aberration Common 118
Jyoti
9 Jyoti Humanoid, positive Common 153
Mastodon
9 Elephant Animal Common 116
Nuckelavee
9 Nuckelavee Fey Common 186
Osyluth
9 Devil Fiend Common 73
Spirit naga
9 Naga Aberration Uncommon 179
Tick swarm
9 Tick Animal Common 260
Titan centipede
9 Centipede Animal Common 50
Witchfire
9 Witchfire Undead Uncommon 293
Young magma dragon
9 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 94
Zelekhut
9 Aeon Monitor Common
9
Bebilith 10 Bebilith Beast, fiend Common 37
Behemoth hippopotamus 10 Hippopotamus Animal Common 144
Ghonhatine 10 Fleshwarp Aberration Common 119
Icewyrm 10 Elemental, water Elemental Common 115
Imentesh 10 Protean Monitor Common 207
Melody on the wind 10 Elemental, air Elemental Common 107
Movanic deva 10 Angel Celestial Common 14
Nereid 10 Nereid Fey Common 182
Nyogoth 10 Qlippoth Fiend Uncommon 213
Peluda 10 Peluda Dragon Common 196
Piscodaemon 10 Daemon Fiend Common 58
Quetz couatl 10 Couatl Beast Uncommon 54
Sacristan 10 Velstrac Fiend Common 282
Vrykolakas master 10 Vampire Undead Common 276
Water orm 10 Water orm Beast Rare 289
Young cloud dragon 10 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 89
Adult crystal dragon 11 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 92
Devourer 11 Devourer Undead Uncommon 78
Gosreg 11 Gosreg Aberration Uncommon 133
Hamatula 11 Devil Fiend Common 74
Hezrou 11 Demon Fiend Common 66
Isqulug 11 Isqulug Aberration Uncommon 149
Meladaemon 11 Daemon Fiend Common 58
Quoppopak 11 Quoppopak Aberration Common 219
Spinosaurus 11 Dinosaur Animal Common 82
Spiral centurion 11 Spiral centurion Construct Common 250
Thunderbird 11 Thunderbird Beast Uncommon 259
Young umbral dragon 11 Dragon, primal Dragon, shadow Uncommon 96
Adult brine dragon 12 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 87
Athach 12 Athach Giant, humanoid Common 27
Catoblepas 12 Catoblepas Beast Common 48
Chernobue 12 Qlippoth Fiend Uncommon 214
Derghodaemon 12 Daemon Fiend Common 59
Frost worm 12 Frost worm Animal Common 123
Interlocutor 12 Velstrac Fiend Common 283
Monadic deva 12 Angel Celestial Common 15
Rusalka 12 Rusalka Fey Common 229
Taiga giant 12 Giant Giant, humanoid Common 126
Adult magma dragon 13 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 94
Carnivorous blob 13 Ooze Ooze Common 195
Froghemoth 13 Froghemoth Aberration Uncommon 122
Ice yai 13 Oni Fiend, giant, humanoid Common 189
Irlgaunt 13 Irlgaunt Aberration Common 148
Leng spider 13 Leng spider Aberration, dream Uncommon 157
Shadow giant 13 Giant Giant, humanoid, shadow Common 127
Bestiary 2
318
Thanadaemon 13 Daemon Fiend Common 60
Viper vine 13 Viper vine Plant Common 287
Vrykolakas ancient 13 Vampire Undead Uncommon 277
Adult cloud dragon 14 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Uncommon 90
Ankou 14 Ankou Fey Common 19
Augnagar 14 Qlippoth Fiend Uncommon 215
Doprillu 14 Doprillu Aberration Common 85
Fire yai 14 Oni Fiend, giant, humanoid Common 190
Gylou 14 Devil Fiend Common 75
Nalfeshnee 14 Demon Fiend Common 67
Ravener husk 14 Ravener Dragon, undead Rare 224
Trumpet archon 14 Archon Celestial Common 23
Worm that walks cultist 14 Worm that walks Aberration Uncommon 297
Adult umbral dragon 15 Dragon, primal Dragon, shadow Uncommon 96
Black scorpion 15 Scorpion Animal Common 234
Jotund troll 15 Troll Giant Rare 267
Marrmora 15 Marrmora Fey Common 171
Marut 15 Aeon Monitor Common 10
Neothelid 15 Neothelid Aberration Uncommon 181
Shoal linnorm 15 Linnorm Dragon Uncommon 164
Umonlee 15 Umonlee Beast Uncommon 271
Ancient crystal dragon 16 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Rare 92
Bythos 16 Aeon Monitor Uncommon 11
Cornugon 16 Devil Fiend Common 76
Fjord linnorm 16 Linnorm Dragon Uncommon 165
Planetar 16 Angel Celestial Uncommon 15
Zomok 16 Zomok Dragon, plant Common 303
Ancient brine dragon 17 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Rare 88
Leydroth 17 Leydroth Beast Uncommon 163
Radiant warden 17 Radiant warden Construct Uncommon 220
Thrasfyr 17 Thrasfyr Beast Rare 258
Vaspercham 17 Vaspercham Aberration Common 279
Water yai 17 Oni Fiend, giant, humanoid Common 191
Ancient magma dragon 18 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Rare 95
Aolaz 18 Aolaz Construct Rare 21
Cairn linnorm 18 Linnorm Dragon Uncommon 166
Duneshaker solifugid 18 Solifugid Animal Common 246
Purrodaemon 18 Daemon Fiend Common 61
Thulgant 18 Qlippoth Fiend Uncommon 216
Ancient cloud dragon 19 Dragon, primal Dragon, elemental Rare 90
Grendel 19 Grendel Humanoid Unique 136
Sard 19 Sard Plant Rare 231
Star archon 19 Archon Celestial Common 23
Taiga linnorm 19 Linnorm Dragon Uncommon 167
Vrolikai 19 Demon Fiend Uncommon 68
Ancient umbral dragon 20 Dragon, primal Dragon, shadow Rare 97
Bastion archon 20 Archon Celestial Rare 24
Eremite 20 Velstrac Fiend Common 284
Norn 20 Norn Fey Rare 184
Olethrodaemon 20 Daemon Fiend Common 63
Veranallia 20 Azata Celestial Common 31
Yamaraj 20 Psychopomp Monitor Uncommon 211
Lerritan 21 Lerritan Elemental Common 159
Ravener 21 Ravener Dragon, undead Rare 224
Jabberwock 23 Jabberwock Dragon Rare 150
Solar 23 Angel Celestial Rare 16
319
Introduction
A-C
D
E-G
H-K
L-N
O-R
S-T
U-Z
Appendix
This product is compliant with the Open Game License (OGL) and is suitable for use with the Pathfinder
Roleplaying Game (Second Edition).
Product Identity: The following items are hereby identified as Product Identity, as defined in the Open Game
License version 1.0a, Section 1(e), and are not Open Game Content: All trademarks, registered trademarks, proper
nouns (characters, deities, locations, etc., as well as all adjectives, names, titles, and descriptive terms derived
from proper nouns), artworks, characters, dialogue, locations, organizations, plots, storylines, and trade dress.
(Elements that have previously been designated as Open Game Content, or are exclusively derived from previous
Open Game Content, or that are in the public domain are not included in this declaration.)
Open Game Content: Except for material designated as Product Identity (see above), the game mechanics of this
Paizo game product are Open Game Content, as defined in the Open Game License version 1.0a, Section 1(d).
No portion of this work other than the material designated as Open Game Content may be reproduced in any
form without written permission.
Pathfinder Bestiary 2 (Second Edition) © 2020, Paizo Inc. All Rights Reserved. Paizo, the Paizo golem logo,
Pathfinder, the Pathfinder logo, Pathfinder Society, Starfinder, and the Starfinder logo are registered trademarks of
Paizo Inc.; the Pathfinder P logo, Pathfinder Accessories, Pathfinder Adventure Card Game, Pathfinder Adventure
Card Society, Pathfinder Adventure Path, Pathfinder Adventures, Pathfinder Battles, Pathfinder Combat Pad,
Pathfinder Flip-Mat, Pathfinder Flip-Tiles, Pathfinder Legends, Pathfinder Lost Omens, Pathfinder Pawns,
Pathfinder Roleplaying Game, Pathfinder Tales, Starfinder Adventure Path, Starfinder Combat Pad, Starfinder FlipMat, Starfinder Pawns, Starfinder Roleplaying Game, and Starfinder Society are trademarks of Paizo Inc.
Printed in China.
OPEN GAME LICENSE Version 1.0a
The following text is the property of Wizards of the Coast, Inc. and is Copyright 2000 Wizards of the
Coast, Inc. (“Wizards”). All Rights Reserved.
1. Definitions: (a) “Contributors” means the copyright and/or trademark owners who have contributed
Open Game Content; (b) “Derivative Material” means copyrighted material including derivative works
and translations (including into other computer languages), potation, modification, correction, addition,
extension, upgrade, improvement, compilation, abridgment or other form in which an existing work
may be recast, transformed or adapted; (c) “Distribute” means to reproduce, license, rent, lease, sell,
broadcast, publicly display, transmit or otherwise distribute; (d) “Open Game Content” means the game
mechanic and includes the methods, procedures, processes and routines to the extent such content
does not embody the Product Identity and is an enhancement over the prior art and any additional
content clearly identified as Open Game Content by the Contributor, and means any work covered by
this License, including translations and derivative works under copyright law, but specifically excludes
Product Identity. (e) “Product Identity” means product and product line names, logos and identifying
marks including trade dress; artifacts, creatures, characters, stories, storylines, plots, thematic elements,
dialogue, incidents, language, artwork, symbols, designs, depictions, likenesses, formats, poses, concepts,
themes and graphic, photographic and other visual or audio representations; names and descriptions
of characters, spells, enchantments, personalities, teams, personas, likenesses and special abilities;
places, locations, environments, creatures, equipment, magical or supernatural abilities or effects,
logos, symbols, or graphic designs; and any other trademark or registered trademark clearly identified
as Product identity by the owner of the Product Identity, and which specifically excludes the Open
Game Content; (f) “Trademark” means the logos, names, mark, sign, motto, designs that are used by a
Contributor to identify itself or its products or the associated products contributed to the Open Game
License by the Contributor (g) “Use”, “Used” or “Using” means to use, Distribute, copy, edit, format,
modify, translate and otherwise create Derivative Material of Open Game Content. (h) “You” or “Your”
means the licensee in terms of this agreement.
2. The License: This License applies to any Open Game Content that contains a notice indicating that
the Open Game Content may only be Used under and in terms of this License. You must affix such a
notice to any Open Game Content that you Use. No terms may be added to or subtracted from this
License except as described by the License itself. No other terms or conditions may be applied to any
Open Game Content distributed using this License.
3. Offer and Acceptance: By Using the Open Game Content You indicate Your acceptance of the
terms of this License.
4. Grant and Consideration: In consideration for agreeing to use this License, the Contributors grant
You a perpetual, worldwide, royalty-free, non-exclusive license with the exact terms of this License
to Use, the Open Game Content.
5. Representation of Authority to Contribute: If You are contributing original material as Open Game
Content, You represent that Your Contributions are Your original creation and/or You have sufficient
rights to grant the rights conveyed by this License.
6. Notice of License Copyright: You must update the COPYRIGHT NOTICE portion of this License to
include the exact text of the COPYRIGHT NOTICE of any Open Game Content You are copying, modifying
or distributing, and You must add the title, the copyright date, and the copyright holder’s name to the
COPYRIGHT NOTICE of any original Open Game Content you Distribute.
7. Use of Product Identity: You agree not to Use any Product Identity, including as an indication as
to compatibility, except as expressly licensed in another, independent Agreement with the owner of
each element of that Product Identity. You agree not to indicate compatibility or co-adaptability with
any Trademark or Registered Trademark in conjunction with a work containing Open Game Content
except as expressly licensed in another, independent Agreement with the owner of such Trademark
or Registered Trademark. The use of any Product Identity in Open Game Content does not constitute
a challenge to the ownership of that Product Identity. The owner of any Product Identity used in Open
Game Content shall retain all rights, title and interest in and to that Product Identity.
8. Identification: If you distribute Open Game Content You must clearly indicate which portions of
the work that you are distributing are Open Game Content.
9. Updating the License: Wizards or its designated Agents may publish updated versions of this
License. You may use any authorized version of this License to copy, modify and distribute any Open
Game Content originally distributed under any version of this License.
10. Copy of this License: You MUST include a copy of this License with every copy of the Open
Game Content You distribute.
11. Use of Contributor Credits: You may not market or advertise the Open Game Content using the
name of any Contributor unless You have written permission from the Contributor to do so.
12. Inability to Comply: If it is impossible for You to comply with any of the terms of this License
with respect to some or all of the Open Game Content due to statute, judicial order, or governmental
regulation then You may not Use any Open Game Material so affected.
13. Termination: This License will terminate automatically if You fail to comply with all terms herein
and fail to cure such breach within 30 days of becoming aware of the breach. All sublicenses shall
survive the termination of this License.
14. Reformation: If any provision of this License is held to be unenforceable, such provision shall be
reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable.
15. COPYRIGHT NOTICE
Open Game License v 1.0a © 2000, Wizards of the Coast, Inc.
System Reference Document © 2000, Wizards of the Coast, Inc.; Authors: Jonathan Tweet, Monte
Cook, and Skip Williams, based on material by E. Gary Gygax and Dave Arneson.
Angel, Monadic Deva from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Angel, Movanic Deva from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Aurumvorax from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Basidirond from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Blindheim from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Roger Musson.
The Book of Fiends © 2003, Green Ronin Publishing; Authors: Aaron Loeb, Erik Mona, Chris Pramas,
and Robert J. Schwalb.
Armies of the Abyss © 2002, Green Ronin Publishing; Authors: Erik Mona and Chris Pramas.
The Avatar’s Handbook © 2003, Green Ronin Publishing; Authors: Jesse Decker and Chris Thomasson.
Book of the Righteous © 2002, Aaron Loeb.
Legions of Hell © 2001, Green Ronin Publishing; Author: Chris Pramas.
The Unholy Warrior’s Handbook © 2003, Green Ronin Publishing; Author: Robert J. Schwalb.
Carbuncle from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Albie Fiore.
Cave Fisher from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Lawrence Schick.
Daemon, Derghodaemon from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc.,
published and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by
Gary Gygax.
Daemon, Piscodaemon from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Dark Creeper from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Rik Shepard.
Dark Stalker from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Simon Muth.
Demon, Nabasu from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Demon, Shadow from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Neville White.
Dracolisk from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Froghemoth from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Genie, Marid from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
PAIZO INC.
Creative Directors • James Jacobs, Robert G. McCreary, and Sarah E. Robinson
Director of Game Design • Jason Bulmahn
Managing Developers • Adam Daigle and Amanda Hamon
Organized Play Lead Developer • Linda Zayas-Palmer
Developers • James Case, Eleanor Ferron, Jason Keeley, Luis Loza, Ron Lundeen,
Patrick Renie, Michael Sayre, and Jason Tondro
Starfinder Lead Designer • Joe Pasini
Starfinder Senior Developer • John Compton
Starfinder Society Developer • Thurston Hillman
Designers • Logan Bonner, Lyz Liddell, and Mark Seifter
Managing Editor • Judy Bauer
Editors • Leo Glass, Patrick Hurley, Avi Kool, Kieran Newton, and Lu Pellazar
Art Directors • Kent Hamilton and Sonja Morris
Senior Graphic Designers • Emily Crowell and Adam Vick
Production Artist • Tony Barnett
Franchise Manager • Mark Moreland
Paizo CEO • Lisa Stevens
Chief Creative Officer • Erik Mona
Chief Financial Officer • John Parrish
Chief Operations Officer • Jeffrey Alvarez
Chief Technical Officer • Vic Wertz
Program Manager • Glenn Elliott
Project Coordinator • Michael Nzazi
Director of Sales • Pierce Watters
Sales Associate • Cosmo Eisele
Vice President of Marketing & Licensing • Jim Butler
Public Relations Manager • Aaron Shanks
Social Media Producer • Payton Smith
Customer Service & Community Manager • Sara Marie
Operations Manager • Will Chase
Organized Play Manager • Tonya Woldridge
Accountant • William Jorenby
Data Entry Clerk • B. Scott Keim
Director of Technology • Raimi Kong
Web Content Manager • Maryssa Lagervall
Senior Software Developer • Gary Teter
Webstore Coordinator • Katina Davis
Customer Service Team • Joan Hong, Virginia Jordan, Samantha Phelan, and
Diego Valdez
Warehouse Team • Laura Wilkes Carey, Mika Hawkins, Heather Payne, Jeff Strand, and
Kevin Underwood
Website Team • Brian Bauman, Robert Brandenburg, Whitney Chatterjee, Erik Keith,
Josh Thornton, and Andrew White
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Grippli from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and distributed
by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Korred from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and distributed
by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Necrophidius from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Simon Tillbrook.
Nereid from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and distributed
by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Quickling from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Quickwood from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Gary Gygax.
Scythe Tree from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene.
Skulk from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and distributed
by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Simon Muth.
Soul Eater from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published and
distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by David Cook.
Troll, Two-Headed from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Oliver
Charles MacDonald.
Yellow Musk Creeper from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Albie Fiore.
Yellow Musk Zombie from the Tome of Horrors Complete © 2011, Necromancer Games, Inc., published
and distributed by Frog God Games; Author: Scott Greene, based on original material by Albie Fiore.
Pathfinder Core Rulebook (Second Edition) © 2019, Paizo Inc.; Authors: Logan Bonner, Jason
Bulmahn, Stephen Radney-MacFarland, and Mark Seifter.
Pathfinder Bestiary 2 (Second Edition) © 2020, Paizo Inc.; Authors: Alexander Augunas, Dennis
Baker, Jesse Benner, Joseph Blomquist, Logan Bonner, Paris Crenshaw, Adam Daigle, Jesse Decker,
Darrin Drader, Brian Duckwitz, Robert N. Emerson, Scott Fernandez, Keith Garrett, Scott Gladstein,
Matthew Goodall, T.H. Gulliver, BJ Hensley, Tim Hitchcock, Vanessa Hoskins, James Jacobs, Brian R.
James, Jason Keeley, John Laffan, Lyz Liddell, Colm Lundberg, Ron Lundeen, Jason Nelson, Randy Price,
Jessica Redekop, Patrick Renie, Alistair Rigg, Alex Riggs, David N. Ross, David Schwartz, Mark Seifter,
Amber Stewart, Jeffrey Swank, Russ Taylor, and Jason Tondro.
GAMEMASTERY GUIDE
HARDCOVER $49.99 and Deluxe Hardcover $69.99
© 2020, Paizo Inc. Paizo, the Paizo golem logo, Path nder, and the Path nder logo are registered trademarks of Paizo Inc.;
the Path nder P logo, Path nder Adventure Path, Path nder Roleplaying Game, and Path nder Lost Omens are trademarks of Paizo Inc.
Second Edition
paizo.com/pathfi nder
Learn to build adventures, campaigns, and the denizens and treasures that lurk within.
Make the game your own with variant rules like dual-class characters and free archetypes.
Explore new types of magic items like artifacts, cursed items, and relics that scale with
your character.
Experience exciting subsystems like chases, duels, and in ltrations.
Find more than 80 new NPCs to use in your game, from guards to assassins.
Available Now!
Rulebook
More Monsters,
More Mayhem!
More than 300 menacing monsters and fearsome foes await within this
compendium of creatures from the world of Pathfinder! From classic adversaries
like giants, dragons, and the jabberwock to potential allies and servants suitable
for summoners of every alignment, this must-have expansion to the Pathfinder
Bestiary seethes with enemies to challenge characters of any level.
paizo.com/pathfinder Printed in China. 